Title,Synopsis,Main_Genre
Kantara,"A fiery young man clashes with an unflinching forest officer in a south Indian village where spirituality, fate and folklore rule the lands. ",Action
The Dark Knight,"With the help of allies Lt. Jim Gordon (Gary Oldman) and DA Harvey Dent (Aaron Eckhart), Batman (Christian Bale) has been able to keep a tight lid on crime in Gotham City. But when a vile young criminal calling himself the Joker (Heath Ledger) suddenly throws the town into chaos, the caped Crusader begins to tread a fine line between heroism and vigilantism. ",Action
The Lord of the Rings: The Return of the King,"The culmination of nearly 10 years' work and conclusion to Peter Jackson's epic trilogy based on the timeless J.R.R. Tolkien classic, ""The Lord of the Rings: The Return of the King"" presents the final confrontation between the forces of good and evil fighting for control of the future of Middle-earth. Hobbits Frodo and Sam reach Mordor in their quest to destroy the `one ring', while Aragorn leads the forces of good against Sauron's evil army at the stone city of Minas Tirith. ",Action
Inception,"Dom Cobb (Leonardo DiCaprio) is a thief with the rare ability to enter people's dreams and steal their secrets from their subconscious. His skill has made him a hot commodity in the world of corporate espionage but has also cost him everything he loves. Cobb gets a chance at redemption when he is offered a seemingly impossible task: Plant an idea in someone's mind. If he succeeds, it will be the perfect crime, but a dangerous enemy anticipates Cobb's every move. ",Action
The Lord of the Rings: The Two Towers,"The sequel to the Golden Globe-nominated and AFI Award-winning ""The Lord of the Rings: The Fellowship of the Ring,"" ""The Two Towers"" follows the continuing quest of Frodo (Elijah Wood) and the Fellowship to destroy the One Ring. Frodo and Sam (Sean Astin) discover they are being followed by the mysterious Gollum. Aragorn (Viggo Mortensen), the Elf archer Legolas and Gimli the Dwarf encounter the besieged Rohan kingdom, whose once great King Theoden has fallen under Saruman's deadly spell. ",Action
The Lord of the Rings: The Fellowship of the Ring,"The future of civilization rests in the fate of the One Ring, which has been lost for centuries. Powerful forces are unrelenting in their search for it. But fate has placed it in the hands of a young Hobbit named Frodo Baggins (Elijah Wood), who inherits the Ring and steps into legend. A daunting task lies ahead for Frodo when he becomes the Ringbearer - to destroy the One Ring in the fires of Mount Doom where it was forged. ",Action
The Matrix,"Neo (Keanu Reeves) believes that Morpheus (Laurence Fishburne), an elusive figure considered to be the most dangerous man alive, can answer his question -- What is the Matrix? Neo is contacted by Trinity (Carrie-Anne Moss), a beautiful stranger who leads him into an underworld where he meets Morpheus. They fight a brutal battle for their lives against a cadre of viciously intelligent secret agents. It is a truth that could cost Neo something more precious than his life. ",Action
The Empire Strikes Back,"The adventure continues in this ""Star Wars"" sequel. Luke Skywalker (Mark Hamill), Han Solo (Harrison Ford), Princess Leia (Carrie Fisher) and Chewbacca (Peter Mayhew) face attack by the Imperial forces and its AT-AT walkers on the ice planet Hoth. While Han and Leia escape in the Millennium Falcon, Luke travels to Dagobah in search of Yoda. Only with the Jedi master's help will Luke survive when the dark side of the Force beckons him into the ultimate duel with Darth Vader (David Prowse). ",Action
Terminator 2: Judgment Day,"In this sequel set eleven years after ""The Terminator,"" young John Connor (Edward Furlong), the key to civilization's victory over a future robot uprising, is the target of the shape-shifting T-1000 (Robert Patrick), a Terminator sent from the future to kill him. Another Terminator, the revamped T-800 (Arnold Schwarzenegger), has been sent back to protect the boy. As John and his mother (Linda Hamilton) go on the run with the T-800, the boy forms an unexpected bond with the robot. ",Action
Star Wars,"The Imperial Forces -- under orders from cruel Darth Vader (David Prowse) -- hold Princess Leia (Carrie Fisher) hostage, in their efforts to quell the rebellion against the Galactic Empire. Luke Skywalker (Mark Hamill) and Han Solo (Harrison Ford), captain of the Millennium Falcon, work together with the companionable droid duo R2-D2 (Kenny Baker) and C-3PO (Anthony Daniels) to rescue the beautiful princess, help the Rebel Alliance, and restore freedom and justice to the Galaxy. ",Action
Seppuku,"An Olympic hopeful falls into the spirit world, where she must pass a test or die. ",Action
Kaithi,A man and his fellow inmates plan a prison break. ,Action
Gladiator,"Commodus (Joaquin Phoenix) takes power and strips rank from Maximus (Russell Crowe), one of the favored generals of his predecessor and father, Emperor Marcus Aurelius, the great stoical philosopher. Maximus is then relegated to fighting to the death in the gladiator arenas. ",Action
Vikram,Members of a black ops team must track and eliminate a gang of masked murderers. ,Action
Avengers: Endgame,"Adrift in space with no food or water, Tony Stark sends a message to Pepper Potts as his oxygen supply starts to dwindle. Meanwhile, the remaining Avengers -- Thor, Black Widow, Captain America and Bruce Banner -- must figure out a way to bring back their vanquished allies for an epic showdown with Thanos -- the evil demigod who decimated the planet and the universe. ",Action
Avengers: Infinity War,"Iron Man, Thor, the Hulk and the rest of the Avengers unite to battle their most powerful enemy yet -- the evil Thanos. On a mission to collect all six Infinity Stones, Thanos plans to use the artifacts to inflict his twisted will on reality. The fate of the planet and existence itself has never been more uncertain as everything the Avengers have fought for has led up to this moment. ",Action
Top Gun: Maverick,"After more than thirty years of service as one of the Navy’s top aviators, Pete “Maverick” Mitchell (Tom Cruise) is where he belongs, pushing the envelope as a courageous test pilot and dodging the advancement in rank that would ground him. When he finds himself training a detachment of Top Gun graduates for a specialized mission the likes of which no living pilot has ever seen, Maverick encounters Lt. Bradley Bradshaw (Miles Teller), call sign: “Rooster,” the son of Maverick’s late friend and Radar Intercept Officer Lt. Nick Bradshaw, aka “Goose”. Facing an uncertain future and confronting the ghosts of his past, Maverick is drawn into a confrontation with his own deepest fears, culminating in a mission that demands the ultimate sacrifice from those who will be chosen to fly it. ",Action
The Dark Knight Rises,"It has been eight years since Batman (Christian Bale), in collusion with Commissioner Gordon (Gary Oldman), vanished into the night. Assuming responsibility for the death of Harvey Dent, Batman sacrificed everything for what he and Gordon hoped would be the greater good. However, the arrival of a cunning cat burglar (Anne Hathaway) and a merciless terrorist named Bane (Tom Hardy) force Batman out of exile and into a battle he may not be able to win. ",Action
Shershaah,"The life of Indian Army Capt. Vikram Batra, awarded with the Param Vir Chakra, India's highest award for valor for his actions during the 1999 Kargil War. ",Action
Raiders of the Lost Ark,"Dr. Indiana Jones, a renowned archeologist and expert in the occult, is hired by the U.S. Government to find the ark of the covenant, which is believed to still hold the Ten Commandments. Unfortunately, Hitler's agents are also after the ark. Indy and his ex-flame Marion escape from various close scrapes in a quest that takes them from Nepal to Cairo. ",Action
Vikram Vedha,The lives of a police officer and a North Madras rowdy. ,Action
Dangal,"After his failure at winning a gold medal for the country, Mahavir Phogat vows to realize his dreams by training his daughters for the Commonwealth Games despite societal pressures. ",Action
Heat,Four high school friends who come together after a long separation have no way to know that their reunion will drastically change their lives. ,Action
North by Northwest,"This classic suspense film finds New York City ad executive Roger O. Thornhill (Cary Grant) pursued by ruthless spy Phillip Vandamm (James Mason) after Thornhill is mistaken for a government agent. Hunted relentlessly by Vandamm's associates, the harried Thornhill ends up on a cross-country journey, meeting the beautiful and mysterious Eve Kendall (Eva Marie Saint) along the way. Soon Vandamm's henchmen close in on Thornhill, resulting in a number of iconic action sequences. ",Action
Major,"MAJOR is based on the life of Major Sandeep Unnikrishnan, who was martyred in action during the November, 2008 Mumbai attacks. Major Sandeep Unnikrishnan was consequently awarded the ""Ashoka Chakra"", India's highest peacetime gallantry award, on 26th January 2009. ",Action
Uri: The Surgical Strike,Indian soldiers avenge a deadly terrorist attack. ,Action
Baahubali 2: The Conclusion,"Shiva, the son of Bahubali, begins to search for answers after he learns about his heritage. ",Action
Gangs of Wasseypur,"A gangster (Manoj Bajpayee) clashes with the ruthless, coal-mining kingpin (Tigmanshu Dhulia) who killed his father (Jaideep Ahlawat). ",Action
Paan Singh Tomar,"Forced to give up his athletic career, a former champion becomes a bandit and terrorizes India's infamous Chambal region. ",Action
Warrior,A disabled Army combat veteran struggles to raise her three boys while dealing with the loss of her leg and substance abuse. ,Action
V for Vendetta,"Following world war, London is a police state occupied by a fascist government, and a vigilante known only as V (Hugo Weaving) uses terrorist tactics to fight the oppressors of the world in which he now lives. When V saves a young woman named Evey (Natalie Portman) from the secret police, he discovers an ally in his fight against England's oppressors. ",Action
Batman Begins,"A young Bruce Wayne (Christian Bale) travels to the Far East, where he's trained in the martial arts by Henri Ducard (Liam Neeson), a member of the mysterious League of Shadows. When Ducard reveals the League's true purpose -- the complete destruction of Gotham City -- Wayne returns to Gotham intent on cleaning up the city without resorting to murder. With the help of Alfred (Michael Caine), his loyal butler, and Lucius Fox (Morgan Freeman), a tech expert at Wayne Enterprises, Batman is born. ",Action
Jurassic Park,"In Steven Spielberg's massive blockbuster, paleontologists Alan Grant (Sam Neill) and Ellie Sattler (Laura Dern) and mathematician Ian Malcolm (Jeff Goldblum) are among a select group chosen to tour an island theme park populated by dinosaurs created from prehistoric DNA. While the park's mastermind, billionaire John Hammond (Richard Attenborough), assures everyone that the facility is safe, they find out otherwise when various ferocious predators break free and go on the hunt. ",Action
Indiana Jones and the Last Crusade,"An art collector appeals to Jones to embark on a search for the Holy Grail. He learns that another archaeologist has disappeared while searching for the precious goblet, and the missing man is his own father, Dr. Henry Jones. The artifact is much harder to find than they expected, and its powers are too much for those impure in heart. ",Action
Die Hard,"New York City policeman John McClane (Bruce Willis) is visiting his estranged wife (Bonnie Bedelia) on Christmas Eve. He joins her at a holiday party in the headquarters of the Japanese-owned business she works for. But the festivities are interrupted by a group of terrorists who take over the exclusive high-rise, and everyone in it. Very soon McClane realizes that there's no one to save the hostages -- but him. ",Action
Ran,"At the age of seventy, after years of consolidating his empire, the Great Lord Hidetora Ichimonji (Tatsuya Nakadai) decides to abdicate and divide his domain amongst his three sons. Taro (Akira Terao), the eldest, will rule. Jiro (Jinpachi Nezu), his second son, and Saburo (Daisuke Ryu) will take command of the Second and Third Castles but are expected to obey and support their elder brother. Saburo defies the pledge of obedience and is banished. ",Action
The General,"When Jewish federal prosecutor Fritz Bauer sets out to root out Nazi war criminals in post-war Germany, he learns about a conspiracy in the government. Therefore, when Adolf Eichmann shows up in Argentina, Bauer turns to the Mossad. ",Action
Everything Everywhere All at Once,"Directed by Daniel Kwan and Daniel Scheinert, collectively known as Daniels, the film is a hilarious and big-hearted sci-fi action adventure about an exhausted Chinese American woman (Michelle Yeoh) who can't seem to finish her taxes. ",Action
Bajrangi Bhaijaan,"Pavan, a devoted follower of Lord Hanuman, faces numerous challenges when he tries to reunite Munni with her family in Pakistan after she gets lost while traveling back home with her mother. ",Action
Rush,A beefy road warrior (Conrad Nichols) frees slave laborers from a tyrant's (Gordon Mitchell) oil refinery 10 years after nuclear war. ,Action
Ford v Ferrari,"American automotive designer Carroll Shelby and fearless British race car driver Ken Miles battle corporate interference, the laws of physics and their own personal demons to build a revolutionary vehicle for the Ford Motor Co. Together, they plan to compete against the race cars of Enzo Ferrari at the 24 Hours of Le Mans in France in 1966. ",Action
Mad Max: Fury Road,"Years after the collapse of civilization, the tyrannical Immortan Joe enslaves apocalypse survivors inside the desert fortress the Citadel. When the warrior Imperator Furiosa (Charlize Theron) leads the despot's five wives in a daring escape, she forges an alliance with Max Rockatansky (Tom Hardy), a loner and former captive. Fortified in the massive, armored truck the War Rig, they try to outrun the ruthless warlord and his henchmen in a deadly high-speed chase through the Wasteland. ",Action
A Wednesday,"A retired police commissioner recounts the most memorable case of his career, wherein he was informed about a bomb scare in Mumbai. ",Action
How to Train Your Dragon,"Hiccup (Jay Baruchel) is a Norse teenager from the island of Berk, where fighting dragons is a way of life. His progressive views and weird sense of humor make him a misfit, despite the fact that his father (Gerard Butler) is chief of the clan. Tossed into dragon-fighting school, he endeavors to prove himself as a true Viking, but when he befriends an injured dragon he names Toothless, he has the chance to plot a new course for his people's future. ",Animation
Pirates of the Caribbean: The Curse of the Black Pearl,"Capt. Jack Sparrow (Johnny Depp) arrives at Port Royal in the Caribbean without a ship or crew. His timing is inopportune, however, because later that evening the town is besieged by a pirate ship. The pirates kidnap the governor's daughter, Elizabeth (Keira Knightley), who's in possession of a valuable coin that is linked to a curse that has transformed the pirates into the undead. A gallant blacksmith (Orlando Bloom) in love with Elizabeth allies with Sparrow in pursuit of the pirates. ",Action
Hera Pheri,"Vijay and Ajay sever their relationship after Vijay learns that his father's killer may be Ajay's long-lost father. Once the friendship is over, a bloody saga of familial revenge is set into motion. ",Action
Sarfarosh,"When terrorists kill a cop's (Aamir Khan) brother and disable his father, he fights back against the smuggling of guns and drugs which plagues his country. ",Action
The Iron Giant,"In this animated adaptation of Ted Hughes' Cold War fable, a giant alien robot (Vin Diesel) crash-lands near the small town of Rockwell, Maine, in 1957. Exploring the area, a local 9-year-old boy, Hogarth, discovers the robot, and soon forms an unlikely friendship with him. When a paranoid government agent, Kent Mansley, becomes determined to destroy the robot, Hogarth and beatnik Dean McCoppin (Harry Connick Jr.) must do what they can to save the misunderstood machine. ",Animation
The Terminator,"Disguised as a human, a cyborg assassin known as a Terminator (Arnold Schwarzenegger) travels from 2029 to 1984 to kill Sarah Connor (Linda Hamilton). Sent to protect Sarah is Kyle Reese (Michael Biehn), who divulges the coming of Skynet, an artificial intelligence system that will spark a nuclear holocaust. Sarah is targeted because Skynet knows that her unborn son will lead the fight against them. With the virtually unstoppable Terminator in hot pursuit, she and Kyle attempt to escape. ",Action
Blade Runner,"Deckard (Harrison Ford) is forced by the police Boss (M. Emmet Walsh) to continue his old job as Replicant Hunter. His assignment: eliminate four escaped Replicants from the colonies who have returned to Earth. Before starting the job, Deckard goes to the Tyrell Corporation and he meets Rachel (Sean Young), a Replicant girl he falls in love with. ",Action
Sholay,"In the village of Ramgarh, retired police chief Thakur Baldev Singh (Sanjeev Kumar) plots to bring down the notorious bandit Gabbar Singh (Amjad Khan) and enlists the help of two lesser criminals, Jai (Amitabh Bachchan) and Veeru (Dharmendra). When Gabbar attacks the village, however, Jai and Veeru wonder why Thakur does nothing to help them. They soon learn that he has no arms, and that Gabbar was the one who cut them off. Enraged by this, they redouble their efforts to help. ",Action
White Heat,"Gang leader Cody Jarrett (James Cagney) lives for his mother, planning heists between horrible headaches. During a train robbery that goes wrong, Cody shoots an investigator. Realizing Cody will never be stopped if he knows he's being pursued, authorities plant undercover agent Hank (Edmond O'Brien) in Cody's cell. When his mother dies, a distraught Cody breaks out of jail, bringing Hank along to join his gang. With Hank in communication with the police, Cody plans a payroll heist. ",Action
Arjun Reddy,A brilliant medical student starts down a self-destructive path after his girlfriend is forced to marry another man. ,Action
Kaththi,"The story of two look-a-likes Kathiresan and Jeevanantham, focusing on the burning issues of farmers committing suicide due to corporate encroachment. ",Action
Haider,"In Kashmir, a young man discovers not only that his mother is having an affair with his uncle but also that the man is responsible for his father's gruesome murder. ",Action
Thuppakki,"In a bomb blast, an army officer apprehends a sleeper agent who confesses that more bomb attacks are planned around the city. The officer impedes the subsequent blasts and devices a plan to capture the mastermind behind these attacks. ",Action
Guardians of the Galaxy,"Brash space adventurer Peter Quill (Chris Pratt) finds himself the quarry of relentless bounty hunters after he steals an orb coveted by Ronan, a powerful villain. To evade Ronan, Quill is forced into an uneasy truce with four disparate misfits: gun-toting Rocket Raccoon, treelike-humanoid Groot, enigmatic Gamora, and vengeance-driven Drax the Destroyer. But when he discovers the orb's true power and the cosmic threat it poses, Quill must rally his ragtag group to save the universe. ",Action
Blade Runner 2049,"Officer K (Ryan Gosling), a new blade runner for the Los Angeles Police Department, unearths a long-buried secret that has the potential to plunge what's left of society into chaos. His discovery leads him on a quest to find Rick Deckard (Harrison Ford), a former blade runner who's been missing for 30 years. ",Action
Deadpool,"Wade Wilson (Ryan Reynolds) is a former Special Forces operative who now works as a mercenary. His world comes crashing down when evil scientist Ajax (Ed Skrein) tortures, disfigures and transforms him into Deadpool. The rogue experiment leaves Deadpool with accelerated healing powers and a twisted sense of humor. With help from mutant allies Colossus and Negasonic Teenage Warhead (Brianna Hildebrand), Deadpool uses his new skills to hunt down the man who nearly destroyed his life. ",Action
Ip Man,"The life story of Yip Man, the first person to teach the Chinese martial art of Wing Chun. ",Action
Tropa de Elite,"The captain (Wagner Moura) of a special Brazilian police force considers which of two new recruits (André Ramiro, Caio Junqueira) would make a suitable successor. ",Action
Casino Royale,"After receiving a license to kill, British Secret Service agent James Bond (Daniel Craig) heads to Madagascar, where he uncovers a link to Le Chiffre (Mads Mikkelsen), a man who finances terrorist organizations. Learning that Le Chiffre plans to raise money in a high-stakes poker game, MI6 sends Bond to play against him, gambling that their newest ""00"" operative will topple the man's organization. ",Action
The Incredibles,"In this lauded Pixar animated film, married superheroes Mr. Incredible (Craig T. Nelson) and Elastigirl (Holly Hunter) are forced to assume mundane lives as Bob and Helen Parr after all super-powered activities have been banned by the government. While Mr. Incredible loves his wife and kids, he longs to return to a life of adventure, and he gets a chance when summoned to an island to battle an out-of-control robot. Soon, Mr. Incredible is in trouble, and it's up to his family to save him. ",Animation
Andaz Apna Apna,"Amar and Prem belong to middle-class families but dream big. Both of them vie to win over Raveena, a multimillionaire's daughter and along the way, they run into a local gangster, Teja. ",Action
Akira,"In 1988 the Japanese government drops an atomic bomb on Tokyo after ESP experiments on children go awry. In 2019, 31 years after nuking the city, Kaneda, a bike gang leader, tries to save his friend Tetsuo from a secret government project. He battles against anti-government activists, greedy politicians, irresponsible scientists and a powerful military leader until Tetsuo's supernatural power suddenly manifest. A final battle is fought in Tokyo Olympiad exposing the experiment's secrets. ",Animation
Sanjuro,"Toshiro Mifune swaggers and snarls to brilliant comic effect in Kurosawa's tightly paced, beautifully composed ""Sanjuro."" In this companion piece and sequel to ""Yojimbo,"" jaded samurai Sanjuro helps an idealistic group of young warriors weed out their clan's evil influences, and in the process turns their image of a proper samurai on its ear. ",Action
Minnal Murali,"Set in the 90s, Minnal Murali is an origin story of an ordinary man-turned-superhero Murali, who is struck by a bolt of lightning, which bestows him with special powers. ",Action
Airlift,"Ranjit Katiyal, an Indian businessman, leads a happy and successful life in Kuwait with his family. However, when Iraq invades Kuwait, he decides to risk his life to save his stranded countrymen. ",Action
Baby,"Billed as a dark fairytale, Baby is set in a modern town nestled deep in an eerie forest. There, a young drug addict hits rock bottom when she sells her new-born baby to child traffickers. She soon regrets her decision and finds the courage to get him back. To do so, she must break in a house where the old lady she met, her albino servant and a little girl, all live together. Nothing could have prepared her for what she will discover. ",Action
Thor: Ragnarok,"Imprisoned on the other side of the universe, the mighty Thor finds himself in a deadly gladiatorial contest that pits him against the Hulk, his former ally and fellow Avenger. Thor's quest for survival leads him in a race against time to prevent the all-powerful Hela from destroying his home world and the Asgardian civilization. ",Action
Vishwaroopam,Nirupama (Pooja Kumar) marries a dance instructor (Kamal Hassan) and she wants to end the marriage after three years to pursue her higher education. ,Action
The Batman,"Batman ventures into Gotham City's underworld when a sadistic killer leaves behind a trail of cryptic clues. As the evidence begins to lead closer to home and the scale of the perpetrator's plans become clear, he must forge new relationships, unmask the culprit and bring justice to the abuse of power and corruption that has long plagued the metropolis. ",Action
Edge of Tomorrow,"When Earth falls under attack from invincible aliens, no military unit in the world is able to beat them. Maj. William Cage (Tom Cruise), an officer who has never seen combat, is assigned to a suicide mission. Killed within moments, Cage finds himself thrown into a time loop, in which he relives the same brutal fight -- and his death -- over and over again. However, Cage's fighting skills improve with each encore, bringing him and a comrade (Emily Blunt) ever closer to defeating the aliens. ",Action
District 9,"Thirty years ago, aliens arrive on Earth -- not to conquer or give aid, but -- to find refuge from their dying planet. Separated from humans in a South African area called District 9, the aliens are managed by Multi-National United, which is unconcerned with the aliens' welfare but will do anything to master their advanced technology. When a company field agent (Sharlto Copley) contracts a mysterious virus that begins to alter his DNA, there is only one place he can hide: District 9. ",Action
Star Trek,"Aboard the USS Enterprise, the most-sophisticated starship ever built, a novice crew embarks on its maiden voyage. Their path takes them on a collision course with Nero (Eric Bana), a Romulan commander whose mission of vengeance threatens all mankind. If humanity would survive, a rebellious young officer named James T. Kirk (Chris Pine) and a coolly logical Vulcan named Spock (Zachary Quinto) must move beyond their rivalry and find a way to defeat Nero before it is too late. ",Action
Letters from Iwo Jima,"Long-buried missives from the island reveal the stories of the Japanese troops who fought and died there during World War II. Among them are Saigo (Kazunari Ninomiya), a baker; Baron Nishi (Tsuyoshi Ihara), an Olympic champion; and Shimizu (Ryô Kase), an idealistic soldier. Though Lt. Gen. Tadamichi Kuribayashi (Ken Watanabe) knows he and his men have virtually no chance of survival, he uses his extraordinary military skills to hold off American troops as long as possible. ",Action
Iron Man,"A billionaire industrialist and genius inventor, Tony Stark (Robert Downey Jr.), is conducting weapons tests overseas, but terrorists kidnap him to force him to build a devastating weapon. Instead, he builds an armored suit and upends his captors. Returning to America, Stark refines the suit and uses it to combat crime and terrorism. ",Action
Children of Men,"When infertility threatens mankind with extinction and the last child born has perished, a disillusioned bureaucrat (Clive Owen) becomes the unlikely champion in the fight for the survival of Earth's population; He must face down his own demons and protect the planet's last remaining hope from danger. ",Action
The Blues Brothers,"After his release from prison, Jake (John Belushi) reunites with his brother, Elwood (Dan Aykroyd) -- collectively known as the ""Blues Brothers."" Jake's first task is to save the orphanage the brothers grew up in from closing, by raising $5,000 to pay back taxes. The two are convinced they can earn the money by getting their old band back together. However, after playing several gigs and making a few enemies, including the police, the brothers face daunting odds to deliver the money on time. ",Action
The Wild Bunch,"In this gritty Western classic, aging outlaw Pike Bishop (William Holden) prepares to retire after one final robbery. Joined by his gang, which includes Dutch Engstrom (Ernest Borgnine) and brothers Lyle (Warren Oates) and Tector Gorch (Ben Johnson), Bishop discovers the heist is a setup orchestrated in part by his old partner, Deke Thornton (Robert Ryan). As the remaining gang takes refuge in Mexican territory, Thornton trails them, resulting in fierce gunfights with plenty of casualties. ",Action
The Adventures of Robin Hood,Robin Hood and Maid Marion work to stop the evil Sheriff's thievery and return the King to his rightful throne. ,Action
The Gentlemen,"Mickey Pearson is an American expatriate who became rich by building a highly profitable marijuana empire in London. When word gets out that he's looking to cash out of the business, it soon triggers an array of plots and schemes -- including bribery and blackmail -- from shady characters who want to steal his domain. ",Action
Dunkirk,"A group of soldiers lead by Corporal ""Tubby"" Bins (John Mills), stranded in France, must make their way to the shores of Dunkirk in hopes of a rescue. Back in Britain, Charles Foreman (Bernard Lee), a newspaper reporter, desperately tries to raise awareness among the public of the horrible reality of the war. When the British navy calls for all civilian ships to aid in a rescue, Foreman takes out his own small boat and attempts to bring Tubby and his men home safely. ",Action
Rogue One,"Former scientist Galen Erso lives on a farm with his wife and young daughter, Jyn. His peaceful existence comes crashing down when the evil Orson Krennic takes him away from his beloved family. Many years later, Galen becomes the Empire's lead engineer for the most powerful weapon in the galaxy, the Death Star. Knowing that her father holds the key to its destruction, Jyn joins forces with a spy and other resistance fighters to steal the space station's plans for the Rebel Alliance. ",Action
Captain America: Civil War,"Political pressure mounts to install a system of accountability when the actions of the Avengers lead to collateral damage. The new status quo deeply divides members of the team. Captain America (Chris Evans) believes superheroes should remain free to defend humanity without government interference. Iron Man (Robert Downey Jr.) sharply disagrees and supports oversight. As the debate escalates into an all-out feud, Black Widow (Scarlett Johansson) and Hawkeye (Jeremy Renner) must pick a side. ",Action
Big Hero 6,"Robotics prodigy Hiro (Ryan Potter) lives in the city of San Fransokyo. Next to his older brother, Tadashi, Hiro's closest companion is Baymax (Scott Adsit), a robot whose sole purpose is to take care of people. When a devastating turn of events throws Hiro into the middle of a dangerous plot, he transforms Baymax and his other friends, Go Go Tamago (Jamie Chung), Wasabi (Damon Wayans Jr.), Honey Lemon (Genesis Rodriguez) and Fred (T.J. Miller) into a band of high-tech heroes. ",Animation
Captain America: The Winter Soldier,"After the cataclysmic events in New York with his fellow Avengers, Steve Rogers, aka Captain America (Chris Evans), lives in the nation's capital as he tries to adjust to modern times. An attack on a S.H.I.E.L.D. colleague throws Rogers into a web of intrigue that places the whole world at risk. Joining forces with the Black Widow (Scarlett Johansson) and a new ally, the Falcon, Rogers struggles to expose an ever-widening conspiracy, but he and his team soon come up against an unexpected enemy. ",Action
How to Train Your Dragon 2,"Five years have passed since Hiccup and Toothless united the dragons and Vikings of Berk. Now, they spend their time charting the island's unmapped territories. During one of their adventures, the pair discover a secret cave that houses hundreds of wild dragons -- and a mysterious dragon rider who turns out to be Hiccup's long-lost mother, Valka (Cate Blanchett). Hiccup and Toothless then find themselves at the center of a battle to protect Berk from a power-hungry warrior named Drago. ",Animation
Captain Phillips,"In April 2009, the U.S. containership Maersk Alabama sails toward its destination on a day that seems like any other. Suddenly, Somali pirates race toward the vessel, climb aboard and take everyone hostage. The captain of the ship, Richard Phillips (Tom Hanks), looks to protect his crew from the hostile invaders, and their leader, Muse (Barkhad Abdi). The pirates are after millions of dollars, and Phillips must use his wits to make sure everyone survives and returns home safely. ",Action
Thirteen Lives,"Thirteen Lives recounts the incredible true story of the tremendous global effort to rescue a Thai soccer team who become trapped in the Tham Luang cave during an unexpected rainstorm. Faced with insurmountable odds, a team of the world's most skilled and experienced divers -- uniquely able to navigate the maze of flooded, narrow cave tunnels -- join with Thai forces and more than 10,000 volunteers to attempt a harrowing rescue of the twelve boys and their coach. With impossibly high stakes and the entire world watching, the group embarks on their most challenging dive yet, showcasing the limitlessness of the human spirit in the process. ",Action
Skyfall,"When James Bond's (Daniel Craig) latest assignment goes terribly wrong, it leads to a calamitous turn of events: Undercover agents around the world are exposed, and MI6 is attacked, forcing M (Judi Dench) to relocate the agency. With MI6 now compromised inside and out, M turns to the one man she can trust: Bond. Aided only by a field agent (Naomie Harris), Bond takes to the shadows and follows a trail to Silva (Javier Bardem), a man from M's past who wants to settle an old score. ",Action
The Fighter,"For Micky Ward (Mark Wahlberg), boxing is a family affair. His tough-as-nails mother is his manager. His half-brother, Dicky (Christian Bale), once a promising boxer himself, is his very unreliable trainer. Despite Micky's hard work, he is losing and, when the latest fight nearly kills him, he follows his girlfriend's advice and splits from the family. Then Micky becomes a contender for the world title and he -- and his family -- earns a shot at redemption. ",Action
Taken,"Bryan Mills (Liam Neeson), a former government operative, is trying to reconnect with his daughter, Kim (Maggie Grace). Then his worst fears become real when sex slavers abduct Kim and her friend shortly after they arrive in Paris for vacation. With just four days until Kim will be auctioned off, Bryan must call on every skill he learned in black ops to rescue her. ",Action
Drive,A bionic man (Mark Dacascos) from Hong Kong enlists help from a hostage (Kadeem Hardison) and a woman (Brittany Murphy) to evade villains in San Francisco. ,Action
Avatar,"James Cameron's Academy Award®-winning 2009 epic adventure ""Avatar"", returns to theaters September 23 in stunning 4K High Dynamic Range. On the lush alien world of Pandora live the Na'vi, beings who appear primitive but are highly evolved. Because the planet's environment is poisonous, human/Na'vi hybrids, called Avatars, must link to human minds to allow for free movement on Pandora. Jake Sully (Sam Worthington), a paralyzed former Marine, becomes mobile again through one such Avatar and falls in love with a Na'vi woman (Zoe Saldana). As a bond with her grows, he is drawn into a battle for the survival of her world. ",Action
Apocalypto,"The Mayan kingdom is at the height of its opulence and power but the foundations of the empire are beginning to crumble. The leaders believe they must build more temples and sacrifice more people or their crops and citizens will die. Jaguar Paw (Rudy Youngblood), a peaceful hunter in a remote tribe, is captured along with his entire village in a raid. He is scheduled for a ritual sacrifice until he makes a daring escape and tries to make it back to his pregnant wife and son. ",Action
Hot Fuzz,"As a former London constable, Nicholas Angel (Simon Pegg) finds if difficult to adapt to his new assignment in the sleepy British village of Sandford. Not only does he miss the excitement of the big city, but he also has a well-meaning oaf (Nick Frost) for a partner. However, when a series of grisly accidents rocks Sandford, Nick smells something rotten in the idyllic village. ",Action
Serenity,"In this continuation of the television series ""Firefly,"" a group of rebels travels the outskirts of space aboard their ship, Serenity, outside the reach of the Alliance, a sinister regime that controls most of the universe. After the crew takes in Simon (Sean Maher) and his psychic sister, River (Summer Glau), whom he has just rescued from Alliance forces, they find themselves being pursued by the Operative (Chiwetel Ejiofor), an Alliance agent who will stop at nothing to find them. ",Action
The Fugitive,"Set during the U.S. Civil War, two soldiers from opposing sides become separated from their units and face off against each other. ",Action
Batman: Mask of the Phantasm,"In this animated feature set in the 1940s, the troubled yet heroic Batman (Kevin Conroy) is pitted against a mysterious figure who is rubbing out Gotham City's most dangerous criminals, and who many believe is the caped crusader himself. Batman's alter ego, millionaire Bruce Wayne, is about to get married to the lovely Andrea Beaumont (Dana Delany), who helps him recover from his need to avenge his parents' murder -- meaning that his crime-fighting days may be numbered. ",Animation
Predator,"Dutch (Arnold Schwarzenegger), a soldier of fortune, is hired by the U.S. government to secretly rescue a group of politicians trapped in Guatemala. But when Dutch and his team, which includes weapons expert Blain (Jesse Ventura) and CIA agent George (Carl Weathers), land in Central America, something is gravely wrong. After finding a string of dead bodies, the crew discovers they are being hunted by a brutal creature with superhuman strength and the ability to disappear into its surroundings. ",Action
Ghostbusters,"After the members of a team of scientists (Harold Ramis, Dan Aykroyd, Bill Murray) lose their cushy positions at a university in New York City, they decide to become ""ghostbusters"" to wage a high-tech battle with the supernatural for money. They stumble upon a gateway to another dimension, a doorway that will release evil upon the city. The Ghostbusters must now save New York from complete destruction. ",Action
Raazi,An Indian spy marries a Pakistani man during the Indo-Pakistan War of 1971. ,Action
Deadpool 2,"Wisecracking mercenary Deadpool meets Russell, an angry teenage mutant who lives at an orphanage. When Russell becomes the target of Cable -- a genetically enhanced soldier from the future -- Deadpool realizes that he'll need some help saving the boy from such a superior enemy. He soon joins forces with Bedlam, Shatterstar, Domino and other powerful mutants to protect young Russell from Cable and his advanced weaponry. ",Action
Udta Punjab,"The insurgence of substance abuse among the young in the Indian state of Punjab through the stories of a rock star, a migrant laborer, a doctor and a policeman. ",Action
Kubo and the Two Strings,"Young Kubo's (Art Parkinson) peaceful existence comes crashing down when he accidentally summons a vengeful spirit from the past. Now on the run, Kubo joins forces with Monkey (Charlize Theron) and Beetle (Matthew McConaughey) to unlock a secret legacy. Armed with a magical instrument, Kubo must battle the Moon King (Ralph Fiennes) and other gods and monsters to save his family and solve the mystery of his fallen father, the greatest samurai warrior the world has ever known. ",Animation
Kingsman: The Secret Service,"Gary ""Eggsy"" Unwin (Taron Egerton), whose late father secretly worked for a spy organization, lives in a South London housing estate and seems headed for a life behind bars. However, dapper agent Harry Hart (Colin Firth) recognizes potential in the youth and recruits him to be a trainee in the secret service. Meanwhile, villainous Richmond Valentine (Samuel L. Jackson) launches a diabolical plan to solve the problem of climate change via a worldwide killing spree. ",Action
The Lego Movie,"Emmet (Chris Pratt), an ordinary LEGO figurine who always follows the rules, is mistakenly identified as the Special -- an extraordinary being and the key to saving the world. He finds himself drafted into a fellowship of strangers who are on a mission to stop an evil tyrant's (Will Ferrell) plans to conquer the world. Unfortunately for Emmet, he is hopelessly -- and hilariously -- unprepared for such a task, but he'll give it his all nonetheless. ",Animation
Star Trek Into Darkness,"The crew of the Starship Enterprise returns home after an act of terrorism within its own organization destroys most of Starfleet and what it represents, leaving Earth in a state of crisis. With a personal score to settle, Capt. James T. Kirk (Chris Pine) leads his people (Zachary Quinto, Karl Urban, Zoë Saldana) on a mission to capture a one-man weapon of mass destruction, thereby propelling all of them into an epic game of life and death. ",Action
3:10 to Yuma,"Outlaw Ben Wade (Russell Crowe) terrorizes 1800s Arizona, especially the Southern Railroad, until he is finally captured. Wade must be brought to trial, so Dan Evans (Christian Bale), the owner of a drought-stricken ranch, volunteers to escort him to the train. Along the trail, a grudging respect forms between the men, but danger looms at every turn, and the criminal's men are in pursuit. ",Action
Man on Fire,"In a Mexico City wracked by a recent wave of kidnappings, ex-CIA operative John Creasy (Denzel Washington) reluctantly accepts a job as a bodyguard for 9-year-old Lupita (Dakota Fanning), the daughter of wealthy businessman Samuel Ramos (Marc Anthony). Just as Creasy begins to develop a fondness for the young girl, a bloodthirsty gunman (Jesús Ochoa) kidnaps her. Now, Creasy must pick off a succession of corrupt cops and criminals to reach his ultimate object of vengeance. ",Action
Black Hawk Down,"The film takes place in 1993 when the U.S. sent special forces into Somalia to destabilize the government and bring food and humanitarian aid to the starving population. Using Black Hawk helicopters to lower the soldiers onto the ground, an unexpected attack by Somalian forces brings two of the helicopters down immediately. From there, the U.S. soldiers must struggle to regain their balance while enduring heavy gunfire. ",Action
The Count of Monte Cristo,Edmond Dantes (Jean Marais) escapes to seek revenge on his three persecutors and reunite with his former sweetheart (Lia Amanda). ,Action
Minority Report,"Based on a story by famed science fiction writer Philip K. Dick, ""Minority Report"" is an action-detective thriller set in Washington D.C. in 2054, where police utilize a psychic technology to arrest and convict murderers before they commit their crime. Tom Cruise plays the head of this Precrime unit and is himself accused of the future murder of a man he hasn't even met. ",Action
Training Day,"Police drama about a veteran officer who escorts a rookie on his first day with the LAPD's tough inner-city narcotics unit. ""Training Day"" is a blistering action drama that asks the audience to decide what is necessary, what is heroic and what crosses the line in the harrowing gray zone of fighting urban crime. Does law-abiding law enforcement come at the expense of justice and public safety? If so, do we demand safe streets at any cost? ",Action
The Last of the Mohicans,A hunter and his Mohican family become involved in the French-Indian conflict in this adaptation of the classic novel. ,Action
Star Trek II: The Wrath of Khan,"As Adm. James T. Kirk (William Shatner) and Capt. Spock (Leonard Nimoy) monitor trainees at Starfleet Academy, another vessel from the United Federation of Planets is about to try out the planet-creating Genesis Device in a seemingly deserted portion of space. In the process, two of Kirk's officers are captured by Khan (Ricardo Montalban), an enemy Kirk thought he'd never see again. Once more, Kirk takes the Enterprise's helm, where he meets Khan's ship in an intergalactic showdown. ",Action
First Blood,"Vietnam veteran and drifter John J. Rambo (Sylvester Stallone) wanders into a small Washington town in search of an old friend, but is met with intolerance and brutality by the local sheriff, Will Teasle (Brian Dennehy). When Teasle and his deputies restrain and shave Rambo, he flashes back to his time as a prisoner of war and unleashes his fury on the officers. He narrowly escapes the manhunt, but it will take his former commander (Richard Crenna) to save the hunters from the hunted. ",Action
Badlands,"Inspired by real-life killers Charles Starkweather and Caril-Ann Fugate, this tale of crime and love begins in a dead-end town. Teenage girl Holly (Sissy Spacek) angers her father (Warren Oates) when she begins dating an older and rebellious boy (Martin Sheen). After a conflict between Holly and her father erupts in murder, the young lovers are forced to flee. In the ensuing crime spree, they journey through the Midwest to the Badlands of Montana, eluding authorities along the way. ",Action
The French Connection,"New York Detective ""Popeye"" Doyle (Gene Hackman) and his partner (Roy Scheider) chase a French heroin smuggler. ",Action
Dirty Harry,Cop Harry Callahan (Clint Eastwood) attempts to track down a psychopathic rooftop killer before a kidnapped girl dies. When he is found Harry abuses the murderer's civil rights putting him back on the streets. Once he is released he hijacks a school bus and Harry must go after him again. The only way to stop this vicious killer is in cold blood. ,Action
The Dirty Dozen,"As D-Day approaches, Colonel Breed hands the roguish Major Reisman (Lee Marvin) an important assignment: He must train a team of soldiers to parachute across enemy lines and assassinate German personnel at a French chateau. The soldiers, recruited from murderers, rapists and criminals on death row, are promised commuted sentences. In spite of their history, the 12 men prove a spirited and courageous unit. Led by Major Reisman, they will exact revenge. ",Action
Bonnie and Clyde,"Small-time crook Clyde Barrow (Warren Beatty) tries to steal a car and winds up with its owner's daughter, dissatisfied small-town girl Bonnie Parker (Faye Dunaway). Their crimes quickly spiral from petty theft to bank robbery, but tensions between the couple and the other members of their gang--hapless driver C.W. (Michael J. Pollard), Clyde's suave older brother Buck (Gene Hackman) and Buck's flibbertigibbet wife, Blanche (Estelle Parsons) --could destroy them all. ",Action
Goldfinger,"Special agent 007 (Sean Connery) comes face to face with one of the most notorious villains of all time, and now he must outwit and outgun the powerful tycoon to prevent him from cashing in on a devious scheme to raid Fort Knox -- and obliterate the world's economy. ",Action
The Magnificent Seven,"Looking to mine for gold, greedy industrialist Bartholomew Bogue seizes control of the Old West town of Rose Creek. With their lives in jeopardy, Emma Cullen and other desperate residents turn to bounty hunter Sam Chisolm (Denzel Washington) for help. Chisolm recruits an eclectic group of gunslingers to take on Bogue and his ruthless henchmen. With a deadly showdown on the horizon, the seven mercenaries soon find themselves fighting for more than just money once the bullets start to fly. ",Action
Key Largo,"This classic film noir by John Huston stars Humphrey Bogart as World War II vet Frank McCloud. Visiting Key Largo to pay his respects to the family of his late war buddy, McCloud attempts to comfort his comrade's widow, Nora (Lauren Bacall), and father, James Temple (Lionel Barrymore), who operate a hotel. But McCloud realizes that mobsters, led by the infamous Johnny Rocco (Edward G. Robinson), are staying in the hotel. When the criminals take over the establishment, conflict is inevitable. ",Action
Scarface,"After getting a green card in exchange for assassinating a Cuban government official, Tony Montana (Al Pacino) stakes a claim on the drug trade in Miami. Viciously murdering anyone who stands in his way, Tony eventually becomes the biggest drug lord in the state, controlling nearly all the cocaine that comes through Miami. But increased pressure from the police, wars with Colombian drug cartels and his own drug-fueled paranoia serve to fuel the flames of his eventual downfall. ",Action
Ludo,"They say you don't meet people by accident, they are meant to cross your path for a reason. Following the journey of four different lives who meet at a crossroads, Ludo is much more than just a mere coincidence. ",Action
Busanhaeng,"A man (Gong Yoo), his estranged daughter and other passengers become trapped on a speeding train during a zombie outbreak in South Korea. ",Action
Hotel Mumbai,"November 26, 2008 ... terror struck the heart of India. From the producer of Sicario and Wind River. ",Action
Baby Driver,"Talented getaway driver Baby (Ansel Elgort) relies on the beat of his personal soundtrack to be the best in the game. After meeting the woman (Lily James) of his dreams, he sees a chance to ditch his shady lifestyle and make a clean break. Coerced into working for a crime boss (Kevin Spacey), Baby must face the music as a doomed heist threatens his life, love and freedom. ",Action
Only the Brave,"Troubled Australian teen Alex (Elena Mandalis) finds solace in her friendship with Vicki (Dora Kaskanis), who comes from an even more dysfunctional and abusive family. While Alex is bookish and excels in her studies, Vicki reveals a tendency towards pyromania, with both inclinations playing a part in their increasingly close relationship, which verges on romance. However, when Alex witnesses a horrible and humiliating incident involving Vicki, it sets the stage for tragedy. ",Action
Incredibles 2,"Telecommunications guru Winston Deavor enlists Elastigirl to fight crime and make the public fall in love with superheroes once again. That leaves Mr. Incredible with one of his greatest challenges ever -- staying home and taking care of three rambunctious children. As Violet, Dash and Jack-Jack offer him a new set of headaches, a cybercriminal named Screenslaver launches his dastardly plan -- hypnotizing the world through computer screens. ",Animation
Sicario,A teenager who is tired of living in poverty decides to resort to violence in becoming the best assassin. ,Action
Creed,"Adonis Johnson (Michael B. Jordan) never knew his famous father, boxing champion Apollo Creed, who died before Adonis was born. However, boxing is in his blood, so he seeks out Rocky Balboa (Sylvester Stallone) and asks the retired champ to be his trainer. Rocky sees much of Apollo in Adonis, and agrees to mentor him, even as he battles an opponent deadlier than any in the ring. With Rocky's help, Adonis soon gets a title shot, but whether he has the true heart of a fighter remains to be seen. ",Action
Dawn of the Planet of the Apes,"Ten years after simian flu wiped out much of the world's homosapiens, genetically enhanced chimpanzee Caesar (Andy Serkis) and his ever-growing band of followers have established a thriving colony just outside San Francisco in Muir Woods. Meanwhile, a small band of human survivors emerges, which forces Caesar -- as leader -- to grapple with the dual challenge of protecting his people and re-establishing a relationship with the remaining human population -- the latter being Caesar's secret wish. ",Action
El cuerpo,A detective searches for a femme fatale's body after it goes missing from the morgue. ,Action
End of Watch,"Longtime LAPD partners and friends, Brian Taylor (Jake Gyllenhaal) and Mike Zavala (Michael Peña) patrol one of the most dangerous neighborhoods in Los Angeles. Though they may bend the rules, their honor and dedication to the job are unquestioned. Taylor and Zavala always have each other's back, even if Taylor's surreptitious filming of their daily activities for a college course is a bit ill-advised. All hell breaks loose for the officers when they run afoul of a vicious Mexican cartel. ",Action
Rise of the Planet of the Apes,"Will Rodman (James Franco), a scientist in San Francisco, is experimenting with a drug that he hopes will cure his father's (John Lithgow) Alzheimer's disease. After his work is deemed a failure, Will becomes the guardian of Caesar, an infant chimp who was exposed in-utero to Will's drug. Caesar displays unusual intelligence, and Will decides to continue his experiments secretly. But as Caesar's intellect and abilities grow, he comes to represent a threat to man's dominion over Earth. ",Action
Zombieland,"After a virus turns most people into zombies, the world's surviving humans remain locked in an ongoing battle against the hungry undead. Four survivors -- Tallahassee (Woody Harrelson) and his cohorts Columbus (Jesse Eisenberg), Wichita (Emma Stone) and Little Rock (Abigail Breslin) -- abide by a list of survival rules and zombie-killing strategies as they make their way toward a rumored safe haven in Los Angeles. ",Action
Sherlock Holmes,Holmes and Watson chase a killer. ,Action
United 93,"On Sept. 11, 2001, terrorists seize control of United Airlines Flight 93 and three other planes. As realization of the imminent horror dawns on passengers, crew and loved ones on the ground, the courageous acts by those held hostage in the air count down in actual time. ",Action
Kung Fu Panda,"Po the panda (Jack Black) works in his family's noodle shop and dreams of becoming a kung-fu master. His dream becomes a reality when, unexpectedly, he must fulfill an ancient prophecy and study the skills with his idols, the Furious Five. Po needs all the wisdom, strength and ability he can muster to protect his people from an evil snow leopard. ",Animation
300,"In 480 B.C. a state of war exists between Persia, led by King Xerxes (Rodrigo Santoro), and Greece. At the Battle of Thermopylae, Leonidas (Gerard Butler), king of the Greek city state of Sparta, leads his badly outnumbered warriors against the massive Persian army. Though certain death awaits the Spartans, their sacrifice inspires all of Greece to unite against their common enemy. ",Action
Watchmen,"In an alternate 1985 America, costumed superheroes are part of everyday life. When one of his former comrades is murdered, masked vigilante Rorschach (Jackie Earle Haley) uncovers a plot to kill and discredit all past and present superheroes. As he reconnects with his retired associates, only one of which has true powers, Rorschach glimpses a far-reaching conspiracy involving their shared past and catastrophic consequences for the world's future. ",Action
Vampire Hunter D: Bloodlust,"In a dark and distant future, when the undead have arisen from apocalyptic ashes, an original story unfolds. Ten thousand years in the future, vampires rule the night. They once ruled outright but their numbers are in decline. Vampire hunters now threaten the vampires with extinction. ",Animation
Enemy at the Gates,"Vassili (Jude Law) is a young Russian sharpshooter who becomes a legend when a savvy polical officer (Joseph Fiennes) makes him the hero of his propaganda campaign. Their friendship is threatened when both men fall in love with a beautiful female soldier (Rachel Weisz). As the battle for the city rages, Vassili faces the ultimate challenge when the Nazi command dispatches its most elite marksman (Ed Harris) to hunt down and kill the man who has become the hope of all Russia. ",Action
The Fifth Element,"In the 23rd century, a New York City cabbie, Korben Dallas (Bruce Willis), finds the fate of the world in his hands when Leeloo (Milla Jovovich) falls into his cab. As the embodiment of the fifth element, Leeloo needs to combine with the other four to keep the approaching Great Evil from destroying the world. Together with Father Vito Cornelius (Ian Holm) and zany broadcaster Ruby Rhod (Chris Tucker), Dallas must race against time and the wicked industrialist Zorg (Gary Oldman) to save humanity. ",Action
Star Trek: First Contact,"The Enterprise and its crew follow a Borg ship through a time warp to prevent the Borg from taking over the Earth in a past era. Stuck in the past, Geordi La Forge (LeVar Burton) helps a pioneer of space travel (James Cromwell) in his efforts to create the first warp drive while Capt. Picard (Patrick Stewart) and Cmdr. Data (Brent Spiner) battle the Borg Queen (Alice Krige) as she tries to take over the Enterprise. ",Action
Die Hard: With a Vengeance,"Detective John McClane (Bruce Willis) is now divorced, alcoholic and jobless after getting fired for his reckless behavior and bad attitude. He is called back into action, however, when a cryptic terrorist (Jeremy Irons) takes New York City hostage in a lethal game of ""Simon Says"" and refuses to speak with anyone but McClane. Teaming up with a street-savvy electrician named Zeus Carver (Samuel L. Jackson), McClane dashes through the city, trying to stay one step ahead of a murderous plot. ",Action
Falling Down,"A middle-aged man dealing with both unemployment and divorce, William Foster (Michael Douglas) is having a bad day. When his car breaks down on a Los Angeles highway, he leaves his vehicle and begins a trek across the city to attend his daughter's birthday party. As he makes his way through the urban landscape, William's frustration and bitterness become more evident, resulting in violent encounters with various people, including a vengeful gang and a dutiful veteran cop (Robert Duvall). ",Action
RoboCop,"In 2028, OmniCorp is at the center of robot technology. While its drones have long been used by the military overseas, their use is forbidden in American law enforcement. However, OmniCorp gets a golden opportunity to crack that market when Detroit cop Alex Murphy (Joel Kinnaman) is critically injured in the line of duty. By transforming Murphy into a cyborg, OmniCorp executives hope to rake in billions for their shareholders, but they forget one thing: There's still a man inside the machine. ",Action
Lethal Weapon,"Following the death of his wife, Los Angeles police detective Martin Riggs (Mel Gibson) becomes reckless and suicidal. When he is reassigned and partnered with Roger Murtaugh (Danny Glover), Riggs immediately clashes with the older officer. Together they uncover a massive drug-trafficking ring. As they encounter increasingly dangerous situations, Riggs and Murtaugh begin to form a bond. Riggs' volatile behavior might just help them apprehend the criminals -- if it doesn't kill them both first. ",Action
Rupan sansei: Kariosutoro no shiro,"In this animated feature, Arsene Lupin III, the world's most daring thief, pulls off a heist at a Monte Carlo casino. But, when he discovers his haul is nothing more than a pile of counterfeit bills, Lupin traces the money to a villainous count in the small country of Cagliostro. With his trusty comrades, Lupin travels to Cagliostro, where he meets a beautiful but unhappy princess. As Lupin tries to unravel the count's secrets, he find himself drawn into a bigger mystery. ",Animation
Escape from Alcatraz,"Frank Morris (Clint Eastwood), a hardened con with a history of prison breaks, is sent to serve the rest of his life sentence at Alcatraz -- America's most infamously brutal and inescapable maximum security prison. Morris quickly realizes the prison's dehumanizing effects and clashes with its cruel warden (Patrick McGoohan). Fed up with life at Alcatraz, Morris and two convict brothers (Fred Ward, Jack Thibeau) meticulously plan the unthinkable: an escape from the island. ",Action
The Taking of Pelham One Two Three,"In New York City, a criminal gang led by the ruthless ""Mr. Blue"" (Robert Shaw) hijacks a subway car and threatens to start shooting one passenger per minute unless they receive a million dollars in cash from the city within an hour. On the other end of the line, crusty veteran transit policeman Zachary Garber (Walter Matthau) has his hands full dealing with the mayor's office and his hotheaded fellow cops, while also trying to deliver the ransom before the deadline expires. ",Action
Enter the Dragon,Bruce Lee plays a martial-arts expert determined to help capture the narcotics dealer whose gang was responsible for the death of his sister. Lee enters a kung fu competition in an attempt to fight his way to the dealer's headquarters with the help of some friends. ,Action
Where Eagles Dare,"A crack team of Allied soldiers stages a daring rescue during World War II. A U.S. general is being held captive in an imposing castle fort, high in the Bavarian Alps. The audacious plan calls for Lt. Schaffer (Clint Eastwood), Maj. Smith (Richard Burton) and other operatives to parachute down wearing Nazi disguises. They'll penetrate the mountain outpost while undercover operatives assist them from within. But their mission changes when they discover that there's a traitor in their midst. ",Action
Tanhaji: The Unsung Warrior,"Chhatrapati Shivaji's right-hand man, braveheart Subhedar Tanhaji Malusare, pits his sharp acumen against the brawn of ruthless and hedonistic Mughal chieftain Udaybhan Singh Rathore to recapture Kondhana for the Maratha empire. ",Action
Mersal,"An Indian doctor living in Europe comes back home to solve a healthcare threat that is looming over the country, and in the process,he unravels the mystery surrounding his father's death. ",Action
Fury,Wannabe musicians make plans to hold their first concert in an old building that -- unbeknown to them -- houses the vengeful spirit of a lynching victim. ,Action
The Hunger Games: Catching Fire,"After arriving safely home from their unprecedented victory in the 74th Annual Hunger Games, Katniss Everdeen (Jennifer Lawrence) and Peeta Mellark (Josh Hutcherson) discover that they must do a quick turnaround and begin a Victors Tour. As she and Peeta travel throughout the districts, Katniss senses a rebellion is stirring. However, President Snow (Donald Sutherland) proves that he is still very much in control when word comes of a cruel change in the rules for the upcoming 75th Hunger Games. ",Action
Delhi Belly,"Three unsuspecting, average guys find themselves on the hit list of one of India's most-powerful crime syndicates. ",Action
Waar,Maj. Mujtaba is brought out of retirement to help the army prevent a devastating terrorist attack. ,Action
Lone Survivor,"In 2005 Afghanistan, Navy SEALs Marcus Luttrell (Mark Wahlberg), Michael Murphy (Taylor Kitsch), Danny Dietz (Emile Hirsch) and Matthew ""Axe"" Axelson (Ben Foster) deploy on a mission of surveillance and to take out Taliban leader Ahmad Shah. Though spotted by goatherds, Luttrell and his team decide not to kill them. But one of the Afghans alerts a group of Taliban fighters to the invaders, and a terrible battle ensues, in which the SEALs find themselves hopelessly outnumbered and outgunned. ",Action
Source Code,"Helicopter pilot Colter Stevens (Jake Gyllenhaal) is part of a top-secret military operation that enables him to experience the last few minutes in the life of Sean Fentress, a man who died in a commuter-train explosion. The purpose of Colter's mission is to learn the identity of the bomber and prevent a similar catastrophe. As Colter lives Sean's final moments, he becomes more certain that he can prevent the first tragedy from occurring -- as long as he doesn't run out of time. ",Action
Grindhouse,"Filmmakers Quentin Tarantino and Robert Rodriguez pay tribute to exploitation films of the 1970s with two features in one. Tarantino directs ""Death Proof,"" a slasher film, and Rodriguez directs ""Planet Terror,"" a zombie movie. Fictitious ads and movie trailers run during each feature's intermission. ",Action
Jodhaa Akbar,"Epic romance, set in 16th-century India, about the love story between Jalaluddin Mohammad Akbar, the Mughal Emperor of Hindustan, and Rajput princess Jodhaa. In order to extend his empire, Akbar agrees to a marriage of alliance to young and fiery Jodhaa but soon realizes he has to defend his choice of bride as his courtiers voice their displeasure at the idea of their Muslim Emperor marrying a Hindu. ",Action
Munich,"After the murder of 11 Israeli athletes and their coach at the 1972 Olympics, the Israeli government secretly assigns Avner Kaufman (Eric Bana) to carry out a series of strategic retaliations. With the help of a driver (Daniel Craig), a forger (Hanns Zischler), a bomb-maker (Mathieu Kassovitz) and a former soldier (Ciarán Hinds), Avner conducts a worldwide operation, targeting 11 individuals. As the assassinations pile up, Avner begins to doubt the morality of his actions. ",Action
Harry Potter and the Order of the Phoenix,"Now in his fifth year at Hogwarts, Harry (Daniel Radcliffe) learns that many in the wizarding community do not know the truth of his encounter with Lord Voldemort. Cornelius Fudge, minister of Magic, appoints his toady, Dolores Umbridge, as Defense Against the Dark Arts teacher, for he fears that professor Dumbledore will take his job. But her teaching is deficient and her methods, cruel, so Harry prepares a group of students to defend the school against a rising tide of evil. ",Action
Collateral,"A cab driver realizes his current fare is a hit man that has been having him drive around from mark to mark until the last witness to a crime is dead. When the cabbie finally figures out the truth, he must prevent the assassin from wiping out his last witness without becoming the next in the professional killer's line of casualties. ",Action
Total Recall,"Douglas Quaid (Arnold Schwarzenegger) is a bored construction worker in the year 2084 who dreams of visiting the colonized Mars. He visits ""Rekall,"" a company that plants false memories into people's brains, in order to experience the thrill of Mars without having to travel there. But something goes wrong during the procedure; Quaid discovers that his entire life is actually a false memory and that the people who implanted it in his head now want him dead. ",Action
Midnight Run,"When Eddie Moscone (Joe Pantoliano) hires tight-lipped bounty hunter Jack Walsh (Robert De Niro) to locate a mob accountant named ""The Duke"" (Charles Grodin) and bring him to L.A., Eddie tells Jack that the job will be simple, or a ""midnight run."" But when Jack finds The Duke, the FBI and the mob are anxious to get their hands on him. In a cross-country chase, Jack must evade the authorities, hide from the mob and prevent The Duke's erratic personality from driving him mad. ",Action
Indiana Jones and the Temple of Doom,The second of the Lucas/Spielberg Indiana Jones epics is set a year or so before the events in Raiders of the Lost Ark. Indy needs to retrieve a precious gem and several kidnapped young boys on behalf of a remote East Indian village. This time he teams up with a night club singer and a 12-year old boy. ,Action
Nobody,"A morgue worker spends his nights doing menial tasks, coping with a brash co-worker and wishing he could talk to his crush, the hospital porter. ",Action
John Wick: Chapter 2,"Retired super-assassin John Wick's plans to resume a quiet civilian life are cut short when Italian gangster Santino D'Antonio shows up on his doorstep with a gold marker, compelling him to repay past favors. Ordered by Winston, kingpin of secret assassin society The Continental, to respect the organization's ancient code, Wick reluctantly accepts the assignment to travel to Rome to take out D'Antonio's sister, the ruthless capo atop the Italian Camorra crime syndicate. ",Action
War for the Planet of the Apes,"Caesar (Andy Serkis) and his apes are forced into a deadly conflict with an army of humans led by a ruthless colonel (Woody Harrelson). After the apes suffer unimaginable losses, Caesar wrestles with his darker instincts and begins his own mythic quest to avenge his kind. As the journey finally brings them face to face, Caesar and the colonel are pitted against each other in an epic battle that will determine the fate of both of their species and the future of the planet. ",Action
John Wick,"Legendary assassin John Wick (Keanu Reeves) retired from his violent career after marrying the love of his life. Her sudden death leaves John in deep mourning. When sadistic mobster Iosef Tarasov (Alfie Allen) and his thugs steal John's prized car and kill the puppy that was a last gift from his wife, John unleashes the remorseless killing machine within and seeks vengeance. Meanwhile, Iosef's father (Michael Nyqvist) -- John's former colleague -- puts a huge bounty on John's head. ",Action
Predestination,A temporal agent (Ethan Hawke) embarks on a final time-traveling assignment to prevent an elusive criminal from launching an attack that kills thousands of people. ,Action
How to Train Your Dragon: The Hidden World,"When the sudden appearance of a female Light Fury coincides with the darkest threat their village has ever faced, Hiccup and Toothless must journey to a hidden world thought only to exist in myth. The two friends will soon discover their true destinies as dragon and rider fight together to protect everything they've grown to treasure. ",Animation
Ready Player One,"In 2045, the planet is on the brink of chaos and collapse, but people find salvation in the OASIS, an expansive virtual reality universe created by James Halliday. When Halliday dies, he promises his immense fortune to the first person to discover a digital Easter egg that's hidden somewhere in the OASIS. When young Wade Watts joins the contest, he finds himself becoming an unlikely hero in a reality-bending treasure hunt through a fantastical world of mystery, discovery and danger. ",Action
Sherlock Holmes: A Game of Shadows,"When Austria's crown prince is found dead, evidence seems to point to suicide. However, detective Sherlock Holmes (Robert Downey Jr.) deduces that the prince was murdered and that the crime is but a piece of a puzzle designed by an evil genius named Moriarty (Jared Harris). Holmes and his friend Dr. Watson (Jude Law), who are accompanied by a Gypsy (Noomi Rapace) whose life Holmes saved, chase Moriarty across Europe in the hope that they can thwart his plot before it can come to fruition. ",Action
Looper,"In a future society, time-travel exists, but it's only available to those with the means to pay for it on the black market. When the mob wants to eliminate someone, it sends the target into the past, where a hit man known as a looper lies in wait to finish the job. Joe (Joseph Gordon-Levitt) is one such hired gun, and he does his job well -- until the day his bosses decide to ""close the loop"" and send Joe's future self (Bruce Willis) back in time to be killed. ",Action
Law Abiding Citizen,"Clyde Shelton (Gerard Butler) is an honorable family man, until the day his wife and daughter are murdered in a home invasion. He hopes for justice, but a rising prosecutor named Nick Rice (Jamie Foxx) cuts a deal with one of the killers in exchange for testimony. Ten years later, that man is found dead and Shelton coolly admits his guilt. Then he hands Rice an ultimatum: Fix the broken legal system or suffer the consequences. ",Action
Black Dynamite,"After ""The Man"" kills his brother and poisons the neighborhood with tainted liquor, a kung fu fighter (Michael Jai White) wages a war that takes him all the way to Nixon's White House. ",Action
Wonder Woman,A powerful woman (Keri Russell) fights fellow Amazons to return a man (Nathan Fillion) back to civilization. ,Action
A History of Violence,"When a pair of petty criminals attempt to rob his small-town diner, Tom Stall (Viggo Mortensen) quickly and easily kills them both. In the flush of news coverage of Tom's seemingly heroic actions, a threatening stranger named Carl Fogarty (Ed Harris) comes to town, fingering the unassuming family man as long-missing Philadelphia mobster Joey Cusack. To the horror of his wife, Edie (Maria Bello), and teenage son, Jack (Ashton Holmes), Tom finds he must confront his violent past. ",Action
Open Range,"Boss Spearman (Robert Duvall) and his cowhands Charley (Kevin Costner) and Mose (Abraham Benrubi) are driving cattle across a large expanse of country. When Mose ventures into a sparse village to buy a few necessities, he is met with violent hostility from Denton Baxter (Michael Gambon), an affluent landowner, and his right-hand man, Poole (James Russo). When Mose doesn't come back, Boss and Charley realize he's in trouble, so they plot to get him back and get revenge on those who captured him. ",Action
Master and Commander: The Far Side of the World,"In 1805, aboard the H.M.S. Surprise, the brash Captain Jack Aubrey (Russell Crowe) and his trusted friend, the ship's scholarly surgeon, Stephen Maturin (Paul Bettany), are ordered to hunt down and capture a powerful French vessel off the South American coast. Though Napoleon is winning the war and the men and their crew face an onslaught of obstacles, including their own internal battles, ""Lucky Jack"" is determined that nothing will stop the Surprise from completing its mission. ",Action
X2,"Stryker (Brian Cox), a villianous former Army commander, holds the key to Wolverine's (Hugh Jackman) past and the future of the X-Men. This threat re-ignites the call for a mutant registration act. Stryker starts a full-out assault on Professor Xavier's (Patrick Stewart) mansion and school. After escaping his plastic cell, Magneto (Ian McKellen) proposes a partnership with Xavier and the X-Men to combat this new formidable enemy they both have in common. ",Action
The Rock,"In a time when no one will talk about Jesus, a rock persuades a teenager to start talking. ",Action
Thief,"A veteran burglar (Richard Crenna) wants to quit, but he can't until he pays off a gambling debt. ",Action
Superman,A man with superhuman abilities sets out to foil a criminal's plan when the latter decides to destroy parts of India with natural disasters. ,Action
Get Carter,"Jack Carter (Michael Caine) is a cold-blooded London gangster, and not the sort of man you want to cross. When Carter's brother winds up dead, he travels to Newcastle to arrange the funeral. Convinced that his brother was murdered, Carter questions local thug Eric (Ian Hendry), who eventually leads him to kingpin Kinnear. From there, Carter carves a bloody trail of revenge through the seedy underbelly of Newcastle in search of his brother's killer. ",Action
Bullitt,"Senator Walter Chalmers (Robert Vaughn) is aiming to take down mob boss Pete Ross (Vic Tayback) with the help of testimony from the criminal's hothead brother Johnny (Pat Renella), who is in protective custody in San Francisco under the watch of police lieutenant Frank Bullitt (Steve McQueen). When a pair of mob hitmen enter the scene, Bullitt follows their trail through a maze of complications and double-crosses. This thriller includes one of the most famous car chases ever filmed. ",Action
From Russia with Love,"Agent 007 (Sean Connery) is back in the second installment of the James Bond series, this time battling a secret crime organization known as SPECTRE. Russians Rosa Klebb (Lotte Lenya) and Kronsteen are out to snatch a decoding device known as the Lektor, using the ravishing Tatiana (Daniela Bianchi) to lure Bond into helping them. Bond willingly travels to meet Tatiana in Istanbul, where he must rely on his wits to escape with his life in a series of deadly encounters with the enemy. ",Action
El Camino: A Breaking Bad Movie,Jesse Pinkman flees from the police and tries to escape his inner turmoil. ,Action
Tenet,"A secret agent embarks on a dangerous, time-bending mission to prevent the start of World War III. ",Action
Raya and the Last Dragon,"Long ago, in the fantasy world of Kumandra, humans and dragons lived together in harmony. But when sinister monsters known as the Druun threatened the land, the dragons sacrificed themselves to save humanity. Now, 500 years later, those same monsters have returned and it's up to a lone warrior, Raya, to track down the last dragon in order to finally stop the Druun for good. However, along her journey, she'll learn that it'll take more than dragon magic to save the world--it's going to take trust as well. ",Animation
13 Hours,Personal problems and a blizzard beset passengers of a plane heading from New York to the West Coast. ,Action
The Lego Batman Movie,"There are big changes brewing in Gotham, but if Batman (Will Arnett) wants to save the city from the Joker's (Zach Galifianakis) hostile takeover, he may have to drop the lone vigilante thing, try to work with others and maybe, just maybe, learn to lighten up. Maybe his superhero sidekick Robin (Michael Cera) and loyal butler Alfred (Ralph Fiennes) can show him a thing or two. ",Animation
Okja,"For 10 idyllic years, young Mija has been caretaker and constant companion to Okja - a massive animal and an even bigger friend - at her home in the mountains of South Korea. But that changes when family-owned, multinational conglomerate Mirando Corporation takes Okja for themselves and transports her to New York, where an image-obsessed and self-promoting CEO has big plans for Mija's dearest friend. With no particular plan but single-minded in intent, Mija sets out on a rescue mission. ",Action
The Nice Guys,Holland March (Ryan Gosling) is a down-on-his-luck private eye in 1977 Los Angeles. Jackson Healy (Russell Crowe) is a hired enforcer who hurts people for a living. Fate turns them into unlikely partners after a young woman named Amelia (Margaret Qualley) mysteriously disappears. Healy and March soon learn the hard way that some dangerous people are also looking for Amelia. Their investigation takes them to dark places as anyone else who gets involved in the case seems to wind up dead. ,Action
Avengers: Age of Ultron,"When Tony Stark (Robert Downey Jr.) jump-starts a dormant peacekeeping program, things go terribly awry, forcing him, Thor (Chris Hemsworth), the Incredible Hulk (Mark Ruffalo) and the rest of the Avengers to reassemble. As the fate of Earth hangs in the balance, the team is put to the ultimate test as they battle Ultron, a technological terror hell-bent on human extinction. Along the way, they encounter two mysterious and powerful newcomers, Pietro and Wanda Maximoff. ",Action
No Time to Die,A Texas industrialist (Christopher Mitchum) tries to steal a laser cannon from a soldier of fortune (John Phillip Law) and engineer (Horst Janson) in Indonesia. ,Action
American Sniper,"U.S. Navy SEAL Chris Kyle (Bradley Cooper) takes his sole mission -- protect his comrades -- to heart and becomes one of the most lethal snipers in American history. His pinpoint accuracy not only saves countless lives but also makes him a prime target of insurgents. Despite grave danger and his struggle to be a good husband and father to his family back in the States, Kyle serves four tours of duty in Iraq. However, when he finally returns home, he finds that he cannot leave the war behind. ",Action
The Accountant,A hard-pressed farmer brings in a mysterious accountant with a knack for numbers and a love of beer. ,Action
Eye in the Sky,"A lieutenant general (Alan Rickman) and a colonel (Helen Mirren) face political opposition after ordering a drone missile strike to take out a group of suicide bombers in Nairobi, Kenya. ",Action
Southpaw,"Filmmaker Liam McGrath profiles the Olympic boxer, an Irish Traveller who fought against racism in Ireland. ",Action
Fast Five,"Ever since ex-cop Brian O'Conner (Paul Walker) and Mia Torretto (Jordana Brewster) broke her brother Dom (Vin Diesel) out of custody, they've traveled border to border to evade authorities. In Rio de Janeiro, they must do one final job before they can gain their freedom for good. Assembling their elite team of car racers, Brian and Dom know they must confront the corrupt businessman who wants them dead, before the federal agent (Dwayne Johnson) on their trail finds them. ",Action
The Next Three Days,"Life for John and Lara Brennan (Russell Crowe, Elizabeth Banks) is miserable after she is convicted of a murder she says she did not commit. Three years later while struggling with the demands of work and raising his son alone, John is still trying to establish her innocence. When her final appeal is rejected, Lara becomes suicidal, forcing John to exercise the only option he has left: Break her out of prison. ",Action
Bullet Train,"Terrorist Tetsuo Okita (Ken Takakura) rounds up a gang of misfits and malcontents to help stage an elaborate ransom scheme. They plant a bomb on one of Japan's ""bullet trains"" and demand $5 million, adding that the bomb will detonate if the train's speed for any reason dips below 80 kph. Transit Chief Kuromochi (Ken Utsui) does his best to handle the situation from afar, while, on board, train conductor Aoki (Shinichi Chiba) tries to locate the device before it's too late. ",Action
Ghajini,"A man, who loses his memory every 15 minutes, has photographs, notes and tattoos to remind him to kill the man who brutally murdered his sweetheart. ",Action
Master,A Qi Gong master goes back to his Chinese homeland to teach kung fu to his granddaughter. ,Action
Invictus,"Following the fall of apartheid, newly elected President Nelson Mandela (Morgan Freeman) faces a South Africa that is racially and economically divided. Believing he can unite his countrymen through the universal language of sport, Mandela joins forces with Francois Pienaar (Matt Damon), captain of the rugby team, to rally South Africans behind a bid for the 1995 World Cup Championship. ",Action
Megamind,"Though he is the most-brilliant supervillain the world has known, Megamind (Will Ferrell) is the least-successful. Thwarted time and again by heroic Metro Man (Brad Pitt), Megamind is more surprised than anyone when he actually manages to defeat his longtime enemy. But without Metro Man, Megamind has no purpose in life, so he creates a new opponent, who quickly decides that it's more fun to be a bad guy than a hero. ",Animation
The Adventures of Tintin,"While shopping at an outdoor market, young reporter Tintin (Jamie Bell), accompanied by his faithful dog, Snowy, buys a model of an old ship called the Unicorn. A shady character named Sakharine (Daniel Craig) and later an American named Barnaby (Joe Starr) try to buy the model from him, but Tintin refuses. The lad discovers that the ship contains a clue about a hidden treasure, but before he can locate it, Tintin is kidnapped and given over to the custody of drunken Capt. Haddock (Andy Serkis). ",Animation
Alita: Battle Angel,"Set several centuries in the future, the abandoned Alita is found in the scrapyard of Iron City by Ido, a compassionate cyber-doctor who takes the unconscious cyborg Alita to his clinic. When Alita awakens, she has no memory of who she is, nor does she have any recognition of the world she finds herself in. As Alita learns to navigate her new life and the treacherous streets of Iron City, Ido tries to shield her from her mysterious past. ",Action
Running Scared,"Troops ready to invade Cuba search the Everglades for two men (Ken Wahl, Judge Reinhold) who have aerial photos of their base. ",Action
Layer Cake,"An unnamed mid-level cocaine dealer (Daniel Craig) in London makes plans to step away from the criminal life. Before he can cut ties, the dealer's supplier Jimmy Price (Kenneth Cranham) draws him into a complicated pair of jobs involving kidnapping the teenage daughter of a rival gangster (Michael Gambon) and brokering the purchase of a large shipment of ecstasy pills from a dealer known as ""the Duke"" (Jamie Foreman), leading to a series of elaborate double-crosses from all corners. ",Action
Dawn of the Dead,"When her husband is attacked by a zombified neighbor, Ana (Sarah Polley) manages to escape, only to realize her entire Milwaukee neighborhood has been overrun by the walking dead. After being questioned by cautious policeman Kenneth (Ving Rhames), Ana joins him and a small group that gravitates to the local shopping mall as a bastion of safety. Once they convince suspicious security guards that they are not contaminated, the group bands together to fight the undead hordes. ",Action
Equilibrium,"In a futuristic world, a regime has eliminated war by suppressing emotions: books, art and music are strictly forbidden and feeling is a crime punishable by death. Clerick John Preston (Christian Bale) is a top-ranking government agent responsible for destroying those who resist these rules. When he misses a dose of Prozium, a mind-altering drug that hinders emotion, Preston, who has been trained to enforce strict laws of the new regime, suddenly becomes the one capable of overthrowing it. ",Action
The Negotiator,"Danny Roman (Samuel L. Jackson) is considered the best police hostage negotiator in Chicago. After a friend warns him that someone is embezzling from a disability fund, the person is found dead. Internal affairs investigator Niebaum (J.T. Walsh) discovers the gun used had been handled by Roman. When no one believes his innocence, Roman takes Niebaum hostage. When Chris Sabian (Kevin Spacey) arrives to hear Roman's demands, the two skilled negotiators begin a tense stand-off. ",Action
Enemy of the State,"Corrupt National Security Agency official Thomas Reynolds (Jon Voight) has a congressman assassinated to assure the passage of expansive new surveillance legislation. When a videotape of the murder ends up in the hands of Robert Clayton Dean (Will Smith), a labor lawyer and dedicated family man, he is framed for murder. With the help of ex-intelligence agent Edward ""Brill"" Lyle (Gene Hackman), Dean attempts to throw Reynolds off his trail and prove his innocence. ",Action
Starship Troopers,"In the distant future, the Earth is at war with a race of giant alien insects. Little is known about the Bugs except that they are intent on the eradication of all human life. But there was a time before the war... A Mobile Infantry travels to distant alien planets to take the war to the Bugs. They are a ruthless enemy with only one mission: Survival of their species no matter what the cost... ",Action
Men in Black,"They are the best-kept secret in the universe. Working for a highly funded yet unofficial government agency, Kay (Tommy Lee Jones) and Jay (Will Smith) are the Men in Black, providers of immigration services and regulators of all things alien on Earth. While investigating a series of unregistered close encounters, the MIB agents uncover the deadly plot of an intergalactic terrorist who is on a mission to assassinate two ambassadors from opposing galaxies currently in residence in New York City. ",Action
Grosse Pointe Blank,"After assassin Martin Blank (John Cusack) has trouble focusing on his work, resulting in a failed assignment, he returns to his hometown, Grosse Point, Mich., for his 10-year high school reunion. There he meets Debi Newberry (Minnie Driver), an old girlfriend that he stood up for the prom. Martin's secretary (Joan Cusack) sets up a hit for him while he is in town, but Martin starts to reconsider his life. Meanwhile, he is hounded by an unstable rival hit man, Grocer (Dan Aykroyd). ",Action
Crimson Tide,"After the Cold War, a breakaway Russian republic with nuclear warheads becomes a possible worldwide threat. U.S. submarine Capt. Frank Ramsey (Gene Hackman) signs on a relatively green but highly recommended Lt. Cmdr. Ron Hunter (Denzel Washington) to the USS Alabama, which may be the only ship able to stop a possible Armageddon. When Ramsay insists that the Alabama must act aggressively, Hunter, fearing they will start rather than stop a disaster, leads a potential mutiny to stop him. ",Action
True Lies,"Secretly a spy but thought by his family to be a dull salesman, Harry Tasker (Arnold Schwarzenegger) is tracking down nuclear missiles in the possession of Islamic jihadist Aziz (Art Malik). Harry's mission is complicated when he realizes his neglected wife, Helen (Jamie Lee Curtis), is contemplating an affair with Simon (Bill Paxton), a used-car salesman who claims he's a spy. When Aziz kidnaps Harry and Helen, the secret agent must save the world and patch up his marriage at the same time. ",Action
Speed,People use various modes of transportation to reach high velocity. ,Action
Nikita,"Convicted felon Nikita (Anne Parillaud), instead of going to jail, is given a new identity and trained to be a secret police assassin controlled by the government. Her lonely life is warmed when she falls in love with a man who knows nothing of her mysterious life. ",Action
Star Trek IV: The Voyage Home,"Living in exile on the planet Vulcan, the ragtag former crew of the USS Enterprise steal a starship after receiving a planetary distress call from Earth: a space probe has entered into orbit around Earth, disabled global power on the planet and evaporated the oceans. Captain Kirk (William Shatner), Spock (Leonard Nimoy) and the rest of the officers travel back in time to retrieve now-extinct humpback whales, which Spock has deduced will communicate with the probe and send it away from Earth. ",Action
Beverly Hills Cop,"After his childhood buddy is murdered while visiting Detroit, rebellious cop Axel Foley (Eddie Murphy) follows the leads to Beverly Hills, Calif., under the auspices of a vacation. He checks in with old friend Jenny Summers (Lisa Eilbacher) and starts to believe her boss, art dealer Victor Maitland (Steven Berkoff), might somehow be involved in the murder. However, Lt. Bogomil (Ronny Cox) of the Beverly Hills Police Department does not trust Foley, and hinders his search for evidence. ",Action
Assault on Precinct 13,"While en route to prison, a bus carrying criminals Marion (Laurence Fishburne), Beck (John Leguizamo) and Anna (Aisha Hinds) is rerouted to Detroit's soon-to-be-closed Precinct 13 because of a dangerous winter storm. All communications with the outside world are cut off, and Jake (Ethan Hawke), an emotionally volatile police sergeant who is haunted by his past, is forced to work with the criminals in order to survive an attack on the precinct by a group of armed men. ",Action
The Getaway,"Gay couples with divergent personalities receive invites for what's billed as a relaxing retreat, which turns into a weekend they'll never live down. ",Action
The Suicide Squad,"Welcome to hell--a.k.a. Belle Reve, the prison with the highest mortality rate in the US of A. Where the worst Super-Villains are kept and where they will do anything to get out--even join the super-secret, super-shady Task Force X. Today's do-or-die assignment? Assemble a collection of cons, including Bloodsport, Peacemaker, Captain Boomerang, Ratcatcher 2, Savant, King Shark, Blackguard, Javelin and everyone's favorite psycho, Harley Quinn. Then arm them heavily and drop them (literally) on the remote, enemy-infused island of Corto Maltese. Trekking through a jungle teeming with militant adversaries and guerrilla forces at every turn, the Squad is on a search-and-destroy mission with only Colonel Rick Flag on the ground to make them behave...and Amanda Waller's government techies in their ears, tracking their every movement. And as always, one wrong move and they're dead (whether at the hands of their opponents, a teammate, or Waller herself). If anyone's laying down bets, the smart money is against them--all of them. ",Action
Anthropoid,"In December 1941, two Czech soldiers (Cillian Murphy, Jamie Dornan) parachute into their occupied homeland to assassinate Nazi officer Reinhard Heydrich (Detlef Bothe). ",Action
The Siege of Jadotville,"An Irish commander and his battalion of 150 men withstand a siege by 3,000 Congolese troops led by French and Belgian mercenaries working for mining corporations. ",Action
Bajirao Mastani,"The heroic Peshwa Bajirao, married to Kashibai, falls in love with Mastani, a warrior princess in distress. They struggle to make their love triumph amid opposition from his conservative family. ",Action
Holiday,"Johnny (Cary Grant) seems like a solid match for Julia (Doris Nolan), the socialite daughter of Edward Seton (Henry Kolker). Assured that Johnny is a worthy suitor, Edward approves of the pairing. But, as Johnny's wanderlust surfaces -- he is more interested in traveling than in business -- Edward starts to have doubts. Johnny also begins to wonder if he might not be a better match for Linda (Katharine Hepburn), Julia's outspoken younger sister, with whom he has much more in common. ",Action
Unbroken,"As a boy, Louis ""Louie"" Zamperini is always in trouble, but with the help of his older brother, he turns his life around and channels his energy into running, later qualifying for the 1936 Olympics. When World War II breaks out, Louie enlists in the military. After his plane crashes in the Pacific, he survives an incredible 47 days adrift in a raft, until his capture by the Japanese navy. Sent to a POW camp, Louie becomes the favorite target of a particularly cruel prison commander. ",Action
War Horse,"Albert (Jeremy Irvine) and his beloved horse, Joey, live on a farm in the British countryside. At the outbreak of World War I, Albert and Joey are forcibly parted when Albert's father sells the horse to the British cavalry. Against the backdrop of the Great War, Joey begins an odyssey full of danger, joy and sorrow, and he transforms everyone he meets along the way. Meanwhile Albert, unable to forget his equine friend, searches the battlefields of France to find Joey and bring him home. ",Action
Rise of the Guardians,"Generation after generation, immortal Guardians like Santa Claus (Alec Baldwin), the Easter Bunny (Hugh Jackman) and the Tooth Fairy (Isla Fisher) protect the world's children from darkness and despair. However, an evil boogeyman named Pitch Black (Jude Law) schemes to overthrow the Guardians by obliterating children's belief in them. It falls to a winter sprite named Jack Frost (Chris Pine) to thwart Pitch's plans and save the Guardians from destruction. ",Animation
The Hunger Games,"In what was once North America, the Capitol of Panem maintains its hold on its 12 districts by forcing them each to select a boy and a girl, called Tributes, to compete in a nationally televised event called the Hunger Games. Every citizen must watch as the youths fight to the death until only one remains. District 12 Tribute Katniss Everdeen (Jennifer Lawrence) has little to rely on, other than her hunting skills and sharp instincts, in an arena where she must weigh survival against love. ",Action
Harry Brown,A retired soldier and widower (Michael Caine) doles out his own brand of justice after young hoodlums murder his best friend. ,Action
Old Henry,"Old Henry is an action-Western about a widowed farmer and his son who warily take in a mysterious, injured man with a satchel of cash. When a posse of men claiming to be the law come for the money, the farmer must decide whom to trust. Defending against a siege of his homestead, he reveals a talent for gunslinging that surprises everyone, calling his true identity into question. ",Action
21 Jump Street,The captain of a police undercover unit leads rookies as they infiltrate groups of high-school criminals. ,Action
Rango,"A chameleon (Johnny Depp) who has lived as a sheltered family pet finds himself in the grip of an identity crisis. Rango wonders how to stand out when it is his nature to blend in. When he accidentally winds up in a frontier town called Dirt, he takes the first step on a transformational journey as the town's new sheriff. Though at first Rango only role-plays, a series of thrilling situations and outrageous encounters forces him to become a real hero. ",Animation
The Witcher: Nightmare of the Wolf,"The world of The Witcher expands in this anime origin story: Before Geralt, there was his mentor Vesemir -- a swashbuckling young witcher who escaped a life of poverty to slay monsters for coin. But when a strange new monster begins terrorizing a politically-fraught kingdom, Vesemir finds himself on a frightening adventure that forces him to confront the demons of his past. ",Animation
RocknRolla,"Old-school mobster Lenny Cole (Tom Wilkinson) rules London's underworld with an iron fist and a score of well-greased palms. As big-time gangsters and petty crooks all scramble to get their cut of a Russian mobster's crooked land deal, street-wise hustler One Two (Gerard Butler) tries to play both sides of the fence as the lucrative deal falls into the lap of Lenny's presumed-dead son. ",Action
I Am Legend,"Robert Neville (Will Smith), a brilliant scientist, is a survivor of a man-made plague that transforms humans into bloodthirsty mutants. He wanders alone through New York City, calling out for other possible survivors, and works on finding a cure for the plague using his own immune blood. Neville knows he is badly outnumbered and the odds are against him, and all the while, the infected wait for him to make a mistake that will deliver Neville into their hands. ",Action
The Equalizer,"Robert McCall (Denzel Washington), a man of mysterious origin who believes he has put the past behind him, dedicates himself to creating a quiet new life. However, when he meets Teri (Chloë Grace Moretz), a teenager who has been manhandled by violent Russian mobsters, he simply cannot walk away. With his set of formidable skills, McCall comes out of self-imposed retirement and emerges as an avenging angel, ready to take down anyone who brutalizes the helpless. ",Action
Mongol,"This fact-based epic traces the early and tumultuous years of legendary warrior Genghis Khan, then known as Temudgin (Tadanobu Asano). Despite the killing of his father, the betrayal of his friend, and even being forced to serve as a slave, Temudgin still creates his own path for future greatness. He hones his battle skills and marries Borte (Khulan Chuluun), whose love and reliability are crucial, often overlooked elements to his historic success as a conqueror. ",Action
Friday Night Lights,"A small, turbulent town in Texas obsesses over their high school football team to an unhealthy degree. When the star tailback, Boobie Miles (Derek Luke), is seriously injured during the first game of the season, all hope is lost, and the town's dormant social problems begin to flare up. It is left to the inspiring abilities of new coach Gary Gaines (Billy Bob Thornton) to instill in the other team members -- and, by proxy, the town itself -- a sense of self-respect and honor. ",Action
Team America: World Police,"When North Korean ruler Kim Jong-il (Trey Parker) orchestrates a global terrorist plot, it's up to the heavily armed marionettes of the highly specialized Team America unit to stop his dastardly scheme. The group, which includes the thespian-averse technology expert Chris (Matt Stone), not only has to face off against Jong-il, but they must also contend with F.A.G., the Film Actors Guild, a cadre of Hollywood liberals at odds with Team America's ""policing the world"" tactics. ",Action
King Kong,"Peter Jackson's expansive remake of the 1933 classic follows director Carl Denham (Jack Black) and his crew on a journey from New York City to the ominous Skull Island to film a new movie. Accompanying him are playwright Jack Driscoll (Adrien Brody) and actress Ann Darrow (Naomi Watts), who is whisked away by the monstrous ape, Kong, after they reach the island. The crew encounters dinosaurs and other creatures as they race to rescue Ann, while the actress forms a bond with her simian captor. ",Action
Kingdom of Heaven,"Still in grief over his wife's sudden death, village blacksmith Balian (Orlando Bloom) joins his long-estranged father, Baron Godfrey (Liam Neeson), as a crusader on the road to Jerusalem. After a perilous journey to the holy city, the valiant young man enters the retinue of the leprous King Baldwin IV (Edward Norton), which is rife with dissent led by the treacherous Guy de Lusignan (Marton Csokas), who wishes to wage war against the Muslims for his own political and personal gain. ",Action
The Matrix Reloaded,"Freedom fighters Neo (Keanu Reeves), Trinity (Carrie-Anne Moss) and Morpheus (Laurence Fishburne) continue to lead the revolt against the Machine Army, unleashing their arsenal of extraordinary skills and weaponry against the systematic forces of repression and exploitation. In their quest to save the human race from extinction, they gain greater insight into the construct of The Matrix and Neo's pivotal role in the fate of mankind. ",Action
The Patriot,"The final days of the mad, tyrannical Czar Paul I of Russia (Emil Jannings) are recounted. As the Czar behaves erratically and goes after his mistress (Vera Voronina), Count Pahlen (Lewis Stone), his friend, plots to kill the ruler and liberate the Russians. Pahlen convinces palace guard Stefan (Harry Cording) to carry out the murder. This semi-biographical story is based on three plays: ""Paul I"" by Dmitri Merezhkovsky, ""Der Patriot"" by Alfred Neumann and ""The Patriot"" by Ashley Dukes. ",Action
Arlington Road,"Widowed when his FBI agent wife is killed by an extremist group, college professor Michael Faraday (Jeff Bridges) becomes obsessed with the culture of these groups -- especially when his new all-American neighbors, Oliver (Tim Robbins) and Cheryl Lang (Joan Cusack), start acting suspiciously. With each twist, the mystery deepens and questions loom as to whether Faraday is consumed by fear and driven by paranoia, or whether a lethal conspiracy has been born on Arlington Road. ",Action
Ronin,"Deirdre (Natascha McElhone) puts together a team of experts that she tasks with stealing a valuable briefcase, the contents of which are a mystery. The international team includes Sam (Robert De Niro), an ex-intelligence officer, along with Vincent (Jean Reno), Gregor (Stellan Skarsgard) and others. As their operation gets underway, several team members are found to be untrustworthy, and everyone must complete the mission with a watchful eye on everyone else. ",Action
From Dusk Till Dawn,"On the run from a bank robbery that left several police officers dead, Seth Gecko (George Clooney) and his paranoid, loose-cannon brother, Richard (Quentin Tarantino), hightail it to the Mexican border. Kidnapping preacher Jacob Fuller (Harvey Keitel) and his kids, the criminals sneak across the border in the family's RV and hole up in a topless bar. Unfortunately, the bar also happens to be home base for a gang of vampires, and the brothers and their hostages have to fight their way out. ",Action
GoldenEye,"When a powerful satellite system falls into the hands of Alec Trevelyan, AKA Agent 006 (Sean Bean), a former ally-turned-enemy, only James Bond (Pierce Brosnan) can save the world from an awesome space weapon that -- in one short pulse -- could destroy the earth! As Bond squares off against his former compatriot, he also battles Trevelyan's stunning ally, Xenia Onatopp (Famke Janssen), an assassin who uses pleasure as her ultimate weapon. ",Action
Natural Born Killers,"Woody Harrelson and Juliette Lewis are two young, attractive serial killers who become tabloid-TV darlings, thanks to a sensationalistic press led by Robert Downey Jr. The press reports the pair as they go on a 52 people killing spree. A controversial look at the way the media portrays criminals. ",Action
In the Line of Fire,"A Secret Service agent is taunted by calls from a would-be killer who has detailed information about the agent - including the fact that he failed to save President John F. Kennedy from assassination. The caller is revealed as an ex-CIA assassin, and the agent, who is investigating a threat to the current president, is determined not to let history repeat itself. ",Action
Star Trek VI: The Undiscovered Country,"Capt. James Kirk (William Shatner) and the crew of the USS Enterprise are carrying Klingon Chancellor Gorkon (David Warner) to Earth to negotiate a peace treaty with the United Federation of Planets. The ship appears to fire on a Klingon vessel, and Gorkon is killed in the subsequent confusion. Kirk and the ship's doctor, Leonard McCoy (DeForest Kelley), are arrested for murder, leaving Spock (Leonard Nimoy) to figure out who is behind the attack and save the negotiations. ",Action
Point Break,"After a string of bizarre bank robberies in Southern California, with the crooks donning masks of various former presidents, a federal agent, Johnny Utah (Keanu Reeves), infiltrates the suspected gang. But this is no ordinary group of robbers. They're surfers -- led by the charismatic Bodhi (Patrick Swayze) -- who are addicted to the rush of thievery. But when Utah falls in love with a female surfer, Tyler (Lori Petty), who is close to the gang, it complicates his sense of duty. ",Action
Lethal Weapon 2,"South African smugglers find themselves being hounded and harassed by Riggs and Murtaugh, two mismatched Los Angeles police officers. However, the South Africans are protected by diplomatic immunity, and so the two are assigned to witness-protection duty in an attempt by their captain to keep his job. It is only when this witness reveals to them that he has already dealt with the smugglers that the trouble really starts. ",Action
Willow,"Enter the world of ""Willow."" Journey to the far corners of your imagination, to a land of myth and magic, where dream and reality live side by side ... to a place that never existed, a time that never was. It is a world where a young man named Willow lives out an adventure that explodes beyond the boundaries of his own hopes and fears. ",Action
They Live,"Nada (Roddy Piper), a wanderer without meaning in his life, discovers a pair of sunglasses capable of showing the world the way it truly is. As he walks the streets of Los Angeles, Nada notices that both the media and the government are comprised of subliminal messages meant to keep the population subdued, and that most of the social elite are skull-faced aliens bent on world domination. With this shocking discovery, Nada fights to free humanity from the mind-controlling aliens. ",Action
The Hitcher,"While transporting a car from Chicago to San Diego, Jim Halsey (C. Thomas Howell) picks up a hitchhiker named John Ryder (Rutger Hauer), who claims to be a serial killer. After a daring escape, Jim hopes to never see Ryder again. But when he witnesses the hitchhiker murdering an entire family, Jim pursues Ryder with the help of truck-stop waitress Nash (Jennifer Jason Leigh), pitting the rivals against each other in a deadly series of car chases and brutal murders. ",Action
Big Trouble in Little China,"Kurt Russell plays hard-boiled truck driver Jack Burton, who gets caught in a bizarre conflict within, and underneath, San Francisco's Chinatown. An ancient Chinese prince and Chinatown crime lord has kidnapped a beautiful green-eyed woman, who is the fiancee to Jack's best friend. Jack must help his friend rescue the girl before the evil Lo Pan uses her to break the ancient curse that keeps him a fleshless and immortal spirit. ",Action
Silverado,"Rambling man Emmett (Scott Glenn) assembles a group of misfit cowboys (Kevin Costner), (Kevin Kline, Danny Glover). After helping a group of settlers track down a pack of thieves, Emmett and his men descend on the troubled town of Silverado to seek their fortunes. Soon after arriving, they discover that the town has fallen into the grasp of greedy rancher Ethan McKendrick (Ray Baker) and corrupt Sheriff Cobb (Brian Dennehy) with whom many of Emmett's men have unfinished business. ",Action
Runaway Train,"Escaped convicts (Jon Voight, Eric Roberts) and a stowaway girl (Rebecca De Mornay) ride an unmanned diesel speeding out of control through Alaska. ",Action
Magnum Force,"Rogue San Francisco cop ""Dirty Harry"" Callahan (Clint Eastwood) doesn't believe in blind obedience to the rules, but when a vigilante group starts executing criminals who have escaped punishment on technicalities, that's going too far. Against the orders of his commanding officer, Lt. Briggs (Hal Holbrook), Callahan begins investigating his hunch that another policeman is behind the killings -- with his primary suspect being his tightly wound ex-partner, Charlie McCoy (Mitchell Ryan). ",Action
Vanishing Point,"Vietnam War hero Kowalski (Barry Newman) has become a pill-addicted driver for hire. Transporting a car from Colorado to California, he enlivens the journey by making a wager with his drug dealer: If the trip takes under 15 hours, Kowalski's latest amphetamine purchase is free. But Kowalski's recklessness on the road results in a much-publicized police chase. Radio jock Super Soul (Cleavon Little) covers the pursuit and turns Kowalski, who refuses to pull over, into a martyr for freedom. ",Action
Django,Stranger Django (Franco Nero) rides into the middle of a border fray between Mexican bandits and the Ku Klux Klan. ,Action
Mosul,An Iraqi journalist joins an army of uneasy allies in the battle to liberate the city of Mosul from the Islamic State. ,Action
Black Adam,"Nearly 5,000 years after he was bestowed with the almighty powers of the ancient gods--and imprisoned just as quickly--Black Adam (Dwayne Johnson) is freed from his earthly tomb, ready to unleash his unique form of justice on the modern world. ",Action
Free Guy,"In ""Free Guy,"" a bank teller who discovers he is actually a background player in an open-world video game, decides to become the hero of his own story... one he rewrites himself. Now in a world where there are no limits, he is determined to be the guy who saves his world his way... before it is too late. ",Action
Brawl in Cell Block 99,"A former boxer loses his job as an auto mechanic, and his troubled marriage is about to expire. At this crossroads in his life, he feels that he has no better option than to work as a drug courier. He soon finds himself in a gunfight between police officers and his own ruthless allies. When the smoke clears, Bradley is badly hurt and thrown in prison, where his enemies force him to commit acts of violence that turn the place into a savage battleground. ",Action
Kaabil,A blind man seeks revenge on his girlfriend's killers. ,Action
Allied,"Max Vatan (Brad Pitt) and Marianne Beauséjour (Marion Cotillard) are World War II operatives who never reveal their true identities. After falling in love during a risky mission, they hope to leave all that double-dealing behind them and start new lives. Instead, suspicion and danger envelop their marriage as both husband and wife become pitted against each other in an escalating, potentially lethal test that has global consequences. ",Action
American Made,Tensions rise when a Sikh family's car breaks down on a remote desert highway. ,Action
Kraftidioten,A mild-mannered snowplow driver (Stellan Skarsgard) ignites an underworld gang war when he seeks revenge for the murder of his son. ,Action
Kung Fu Panda 3,"Living large and loving life, Po (Jack Black) realizes that he has a lot to learn if he's going to fulfill the next challenge from his beloved instructor (Dustin Hoffman). After reuniting with his long-lost father (Bryan Cranston), Po must transition from student to teacher and train a group of fun-loving, clumsy pandas to become martial-arts fighters. Together, the kung-fu brethren unite to take on the evil Kai (J.K. Simmons), a supernatural warrior who becomes stronger with each battle. ",Animation
God Bless America,"Fed up with the cruelty and stupidity of American culture, an unlikely duo (Joel Murray, Tara Lynne Barr) team up to whack reality TV stars, bigots and others they find repugnant. ",Action
Deepwater Horizon,"On April 20, 2010, the Deepwater Horizon drilling rig explodes in the Gulf of Mexico, igniting a massive fireball that kills several crew members. Chief electronics technician Mike Williams (Mark Wahlberg) and his colleagues find themselves fighting for survival as the heat and the flames become stifling and overwhelming. Banding together, the co-workers must use their wits to make it out alive amid all the chaos. ",Action
Snowpiercer,A post-apocalyptic ice age forces humanity's last survivors aboard a globe-spanning supertrain. One man (Chris Evans) will risk everything to lead a revolt for control of the engine and the future of the world. ,Action
Dredd,"Mega City One is a vast, violent metropolis where felons rule the streets. The only law lies with cops called ""judges,"" who act as judge, jury and executioner, and Dredd (Karl Urban) is one of the city's most feared. One day, Dredd is partnered with Cassandra (Olivia Thirlby), a rookie with powerful psychic abilities. A report of a terrible crime sends Dredd and Cassandra to a dangerous area controlled by Ma-Ma (Lena Headey), a drug lord who will stop at nothing to protect her empire. ",Action
Enthiran,"After countless weeks of seclusion in his laboratory, the brilliant Dr. Vaseegaran (Rajnikanth) emerges with his latest invention: Chitti (also Rajnikanth), an android created in his own image. But in the place of applause, Vaseegaran is greeted by the scornful gaze of his neglected fiancée, Sana (Aishwarya Rai). With the faithful Chitti at his side, the desperate Vaseegaran struggles to regain Sana's favor. But soon the robot-servant starts developing feelings for his master's beautiful love. ",Action
JCVD,Weary action star Jean-Claude Van Damme (Jean-Claude Van Damme) returns to Belgium to find relief from his troubles but instead stumbles into a bank robbery. ,Action
The Northman,"The Northman is an epic revenge thriller, that explores how far a Viking prince will go to seek justice for his murdered father. ",Action
Wrath of Man,"A mysterious and wild-eyed new cash truck security guard (Jason Statham) surprises his coworkers during a heist in which he unexpectedly unleashes precision skills. The crew is left wondering who he is and where he came from. Soon, the marksman's ultimate motive becomes clear as he takes dramatic and irrevocable steps to settle a score. ",Action
Planet Terror,"An ordinary evening in a small Texas town becomes a grisly nightmare when a horde of flesh-eating zombies goes on the prowl. Cherry (Rose McGowan), a go-go dancer, and Wray (Freddy Rodriguez), her ex-lover, band together with other survivors in a no-holds barred effort to escape the carnage. The odds become a bit more even when Cherry, who lost her leg to a hungry ghoul, gets a machine-gun appendage and lets the bullets fly. ",Action
Shooter,"A top Marine sniper, Bob Lee Swagger (Mark Wahlberg), leaves the military after a mission goes horribly awry and disappears without a trace. Swagger is coaxed back into service after high-profile government officials convince him to help thwart a plot against the President of the United States. Swagger realizes he has been betrayed and becomes the target of a nationwide manhunt. Instead of hiding, he seeks revenge against some of the most powerful and corrupt leaders in the free world. ",Action
Man of Steel,A young man from a very affluent family seeks the gift of faith. ,Action
Rocky Balboa,"Now long-retired, Rocky (Sylvester Stallone) runs a Philadelphia eatery and mourns the loss of his beloved wife, Adrian. Yearning to recapture a bit of his glory days, he plans to re-enter the ring for a few low-profile, local matches. All that changes when Rocky accepts a challenge to fight the world's reigning heavyweight champion, Mason ""the Line"" Dixon (Antonio Tarver). ",Action
Don,A young man goes through college life and finds love. ,Action
Deja Vu,The team of top-secret program brings ATF agent Doug Carlin (Denzel Washington) into its midst to capture the terrorist (Jim Caviezel) responsible for a ferry bombing that left hundreds dead. Its amazing technology lets the team fold time four days backward and see the madman's movements as he plots to kill a woman who could give him away. Doug realizes that the technology could allow him to do what law-enforcement officers dream of -- go back in time to prevent the crime. ,Action
Flags of Our Fathers,"In February and March of 1945, U.S. troops fight and win one of the most crucial and costly battles of the war on the island of Iwo Jima. A photo of U.S. servicemen raising the flag on Mount Suribachi becomes an iconic symbol of victory to a war-weary nation. The individuals themselves become heroes, though not all survive the war and realize it. ",Action
Live Free or Die Hard,"As the nation prepares to celebrate Independence Day, veteran cop John McClane (Bruce Willis) carries out another routine assignment: bringing in a computer hacker (Justin Long) for questioning. Meanwhile, a tech-savvy villain named Thomas Gabriel (Timothy Olyphant) launches an attack on America's computer infrastructure. As chaos descends around him, McClane must use old-fashioned methods to fight the high-tech threat. ",Action
We Were Soldiers,"Based upon the best-selling book ""We Were Soldiers Once ... and Young"" by Lt. Gen. Harold G. Moore (Ret.) and journalist Joseph L. Galloway, this compelling war drama depicts the true story of the first major battle between the United States and North Vietnamese forces. It is a film about uncommon valor and nobility under fire, loyalty among soldiers, and the heroism and sacrifice of men and women both home and abroad. ",Action
Pitch Black,"When their ship crashes on an unexplored planet, the survivors of the crash soon discover that this planet that is normally always day is going to soon be in a state of eclipse that will bring out deadly nocturnal creatures. Will a prison convict (Vin Diesel) being transported on the ship end up being the one man who can lead the survivors off the planet? ",Action
Payback,A wealthy teenager is the victim of a brutal assault. He goes off the deep end in his thirst for revenge. ,Action
Blade,"Driven by revenge, a one-armed swordsman (Wing Zhao) with a sawed-off blade and a martial arts manual pursues villains. ",Action
Three Kings,"Just after the end of the Gulf War, four American soldiers decide to steal a cache of Saddam Hussein's hidden gold. Led by cynical Sergeant Major Archie Gates (George Clooney), three of the men are rescued by rebels, but Sergeant Troy Barlow (Mark Wahlberg) is captured and tortured by Iraqi intelligence. The Iraqi rebels beg for the American trio to help fight against the impending arrival of Hussein's Elite Guard. The men agree to fight in return for help rescuing Troy. ",Action
Mission: Impossible,"When U.S. government operative Ethan Hunt (Tom Cruise) and his mentor, Jim Phelps (Jon Voight), go on a covert assignment that takes a disastrous turn, Jim is killed, and Ethan becomes the prime murder suspect. Now a fugitive, Hunt recruits brilliant hacker Luther Stickell (Ving Rhames) and maverick pilot Franz Krieger (Jean Reno) to help him sneak into a heavily guarded CIA building to retrieve a confidential computer file that will prove his innocence. ",Action
Desperado,"Mariachi (Antonio Banderas) plunges headfirst into the dark border underworld when he follows a trail of blood to the last of the infamous Mexican drug lords, Bucho (Joaquim de Almeida), for an action-packed, bullet-riddled showdown. With the help of his best friend (Steve Buscemi) and a beautiful bookstore owner (Salma Hayek), the Mariachi tracks Bucho, takes on his army of desperados, and leaves a trail of blood of his own. ",Action
Batman Returns,"The monstrous Penguin (Danny DeVito), who lives in the sewers beneath Gotham, joins up with wicked shock-headed businessman Max Shreck (Christopher Walken) to topple the Batman (Michael Keaton) once and for all. But when Shreck's timid assistant, Selina Kyle (Michelle Pfeiffer), finds out, and Shreck tries to kill her, she is transformed into the sexy Catwoman. She teams up with the Penguin and Shreck to destroy Batman, but sparks fly unexpectedly when she confronts the caped crusader. ",Action
Die Hard 2,"A year after his heroics in L.A, detective John McClane (Bruce Willis) is mixed up in another terrorist plot, this time at Washington Dulles International Airport, where he is waiting for his wife (Bonnie Bedelia). That same night, South American politico and drug profiteer Ramon Esperanza (Franco Nero) is arriving in U.S. custody. McClane takes action when a treasonous ex-colonel (William Sadler) seizes control of the airport, threatening to crash every inbound flight unless Esperanza is freed. ",Action
Casualties of War,"Pvt. Max Eriksson (Michael J. Fox) is stationed in Vietnam under Sgt. Tony Meserve (Sean Penn). Though Meserve saves Eriksson's life during battle, the two men clash when the callous senior officer orders the abduction of Than Thi Oanh (Thuy Thu Le), a young Vietnamese woman, to be used as a sex slave. When Eriksson refuses to take part in the abuse of Oanh, tensions between him, Meserve and the rest of the unit heat up and finally explode during a firefight with Viet Cong troops. ",Action
Highlander,"When the mystical Russell Nash (Christopher Lambert) kills a man in a sword fight in a New York City parking lot, he leaves a sliver of an ancient weapon lodged in a car in the process. After brilliant forensics specialist Brenda Wyatt (Roxanne Hart) recovers evidence of the mysterious weapon, she and her partner, Lt. Frank Moran (Alan North), embark on an investigation Of Nash that will land them in the middle of a dangerous, centuries-old feud between powerful immortals. ",Action
WarGames,"High school student David Lightman (Matthew Broderick) unwittingly hacks into a military supercomputer while searching for new video games. After starting a game of Global Thermonuclear War, Lightman leads the supercomputer to activate the nation's nuclear arsenal in response to his simulated threat as the Soviet Union. Once the clueless hacker comes to his senses, Lightman, with help from his girlfriend (Ally Sheedy), must find a way to alert the authorities to stop the onset of World War III. ",Action
Doctor Strange in the Multiverse of Madness,"In Marvel Studios' ""Doctor Strange in the Multiverse of Madness,"" the MCU unlocks the Multiverse and pushes its boundaries further than ever before. Journey into the unknown with Doctor Strange, who, with the help of mystical allies both old and new, traverses the mind-bending and dangerous alternate realities of the Multiverse to confront a mysterious new adversary. ",Action
Kabir Singh,A house surgeon goes into a self-destructive spiral after his girlfriend is forced to marry another man. ,Action
Greyhound,"U.S. Navy Cmdr. Ernest Krause is assigned to lead an Allied convoy across the Atlantic during World War II. His convoy, however, is pursued by German U-boats. Although this is Krause's first wartime mission, he finds himself embroiled in what would come to be known as the longest, largest and most complex naval battle in history: The Battle of the Atlantic. ",Action
Logan Lucky,West Virginia family man Jimmy Logan teams up with his one-armed brother Clyde and sister Mellie to steal money from the Charlotte Motor Speedway in North Carolina. Jimmy also recruits demolition expert Joe Bang to help them break into the track's underground system. Complications arise when a mix-up forces the crew to pull off the heist during a popular NASCAR race while also trying to dodge a relentless FBI agent. ,Action
Sicario: Day of the Soldado,"FBI agent Matt Graver calls on mysterious operative Alejandro Gillick when Mexican drug cartels start to smuggle terrorists across the U.S. border. The war escalates even further when Alejandro kidnaps a top kingpin's daughter to deliberately increase the tensions. When the young girl is seen as collateral damage, the two men will determine her fate as they question everything that they are fighting for. ",Action
Sultan,A poor child grows up to become a military correspondent at an elite brigade. ,Action
Spy,A young intellectual finds himself caught in the turbulence of 1916 Russia. ,Action
A Most Violent Year,"In 1981 New York, a fuel supplier (Oscar Isaac) tries to adhere to his own moral compass amid the rampant violence, corruption and decay that threaten his family and his business. ",Action
Star Trek Beyond,"A surprise attack in outer space forces the Enterprise to crash-land on a mysterious world. The assault came from Krall (Idris Elba), a lizard-like dictator who derives his energy by sucking the life out of his victims. Krall needs an ancient and valuable artifact that's aboard the badly damaged starship. Left stranded in a rugged wilderness, Kirk (Chris Pine), Spock (Zachary Quinto) and the rest of the crew must now battle a deadly alien race while trying to find a way off their hostile planet. ",Action
22 Jump Street,"Although they made their way through high school successfully, an investigation at a local college brings big changes for undercover officers Jenko (Channing Tatum) and Schmidt (Jonah Hill). When Jenko meets a kindred spirit on the football team and Schmidt infiltrates the bohemian art-major scene, both men begin to question their partnership. Not only do they have to crack the case, but now the two overgrown adolescents must learn how to behave like adults. ",Action
Chronicle,"Andrew (Dane DeHaan) is a socially awkward, introverted teen whose main form of escape and expression is a video camera. But things begin to change when Andrew, his cousin Matt (Alex Russell) and popular classmate Steve (Michael B. Jordan) discover a mysterious substance that leaves them with incredible powers. As their abilities become more powerful, the teens' lives spin out of control when their darker sides begin to emerge. Andrew's camera captures the unfolding events. ",Action
Super 8,"In 1979 Ohio, several youngsters (Elle Fanning, Joel Courtney, Gabriel Basso) are making a zombie movie with a Super-8 camera. In the midst of filming, the friends witness a horrifying train derailment and are lucky to escape with their lives. They soon discover that the catastrophe was no accident, as a series of unexplained events and disappearances soon follows. Deputy Jackson Lamb (Kyle Chandler), the father of one of the kids, searches for the terrifying truth behind the crash. ",Action
The Foreigner,A computer game tournament in Ohio becomes a heated battle between Korean and American gamers. ,Action
Oblivion,A sheriff's empathetic son (Richard Joseph Paul) defends a futuristic Western town from a reptilian alien (Andrew Divoff). ,Action
Filth,"The story of Abigail Bunu, a young woman working in Nigeria as a clinical psychologist with more than her clients' personal problems on her mind. ",Action
Don 2,"Having conquered the Asian underworld, crime boss Don (Shah Rukh Khan) sets in motion a plan that will give him dominion over Europe. ",Action
Den of Thieves,"Nick O'Brien is the hard-drinking leader of the Regulators, an elite unit of the Los Angeles County Sheriff's Department. Ray Merrimen is the recently paroled leader of the Outlaws, a gang of ex-military men who use their expertise and tactical skills to evade the law. O'Brien, Merrimen and their crews soon find themselves on a direct collision course as the criminals hatch an elaborate plan for a seemingly impossible heist -- the city's Federal Reserve Bank. ",Action
RED,"After surviving an assault from a squad of hit men, retired CIA agent Frank Moses (Bruce Willis) reassembles his old team for an all-out war. Frank reunites with old Joe (Morgan Freeman), crazy Marvin (John Malkovich) and wily Victoria (Helen Mirren) to uncover a massive conspiracy that threatens their lives. Only their expert training will allow them to survive a near-impossible mission -- breaking into CIA headquarters. ",Action
Bronson,"In this drama based on a true story, there's no one tougher or more brutal in the English penal system than prisoner Michael Peterson, aka Charles Bronson (Tom Hardy). First incarcerated after robbing a jewelry store, the married Bronson is sentenced to seven years. But his incorrigible, savage behavior quickly gets him in trouble with guards, fellow inmates and even a dog. The only place where Bronson can't do any harm is in solitary confinement, where he spends most of his time. ",Action
Public Enemies,"Ma Barker (Theresa Russell) and her sons rob banks, shoot people and wind up at the top of the FBI's ""most wanted"" list in the 1930s. ",Action
The Unbearable Weight of Massive Talent,"Nicolas Cage stars as... Nick Cage in the action-comedy The Unbearable Weight of Massive Talent. Creatively unfulfilled and facing financial ruin, the fictionalized version of Cage must accept a $1 million offer to attend the birthday of a dangerous superfan (Pedro Pascal). Things take a wildly unexpected turn when Cage is recruited by a CIA operative (Tiffany Haddish) and forced to live up to his own legend, channeling his most iconic and beloved on-screen characters in order to save himself and his loved ones. With a career built for this very moment, the seminal award-winning actor must take on the role of a lifetime: Nick Cage. ",Action
Cloverfield,"As a group of New Yorkers (Michael Stahl-David, Mike Vogel, Odette Yustman) enjoy a going-away party, little do they know that they will soon face the most terrifying night of their lives. A creature the size of a skyscraper descends upon the city, leaving death and destruction in its wake. Using a handheld video camera, the friends record their struggle to survive as New York crumbles around them. ",Action
Death Proof,"Stuntman Mike (Kurt Russell) is a professional body double who likes to take unsuspecting women for deadly drives in his free time. He has doctored his car for maximum impact; when Mike purposely causes wrecks, the bodies pile up while he walks away with barely a scratch. The insane Mike may be in over his head, though, when he targets a tough group of female friends, including real-life stuntwoman Zoe Bell (who served as Uma Thurman's double in ""Kill Bill""), who plays herself. ",Action
Tropic Thunder,"Tugg Speedman (Ben Stiller), pampered action superstar, sets out for Southeast Asia to take part in the biggest, most-expensive war movie produced, but soon after filming begins, he and his co-stars, Oscar-winner Kirk Lazarus (Robert Downey Jr.), comic Jeff Portnoy (Jack Black) and the rest of the crew, must become real soldiers when fighting breaks out in that part of the jungle. ",Action
Son of Rambow,"In 1980s England, schoolboys Will Proudfoot (Bill Milner) and Lee Carter (Will Poulter) meet by chance in a hallway. Though the boys are polar opposites, Lee asks Will to help him make a homemade action movie, inspired by Sylvester Stallone's hit, ""Rambo: First Blood."" Will, who lives in a strict religious environment, is only too happy to oblige his new friend. ",Action
World War Z,"When former U.N. investigator Gerry Lane (Brad Pitt) and his family get stuck in urban gridlock, he senses that it's no ordinary traffic jam. His suspicions are confirmed when, suddenly, the city erupts into chaos. A lethal virus, spread through a single bite, is turning healthy people into something vicious, unthinking and feral. As the pandemic threatens to consume humanity, Gerry leads a worldwide search to find the source of the infection and, with luck, a way to halt its spread. ",Action
Thor,"As the son of Odin (Anthony Hopkins), king of the Norse gods, Thor (Chris Hemsworth) will soon inherit the throne of Asgard from his aging father. However, on the day that he is to be crowned, Thor reacts with brutality when the gods' enemies, the Frost Giants, enter the palace in violation of their treaty. As punishment, Odin banishes Thor to Earth. While Loki (Tom Hiddleston), Thor's brother, plots mischief in Asgard, Thor, now stripped of his powers, faces his greatest threat. ",Action
Jack Reacher,"One morning in an ordinary town, five people are shot dead in a seemingly random attack. All evidence points to a single suspect: an ex-military sniper who is quickly brought into custody. The man's interrogation yields one statement: Get Jack Reacher (Tom Cruise). Reacher, an enigmatic ex-Army investigator, believes the authorities have the right man but agrees to help the sniper's defense attorney (Rosamund Pike). However, the more Reacher delves into the case, the less clear-cut it appears. ",Action
Body of Lies,"CIA agent Roger Ferris (Leonardo DiCaprio) hatches a bold but dangerous plan to capture terrorist Al-Saleem. With the help of Ed Hoffman (Russell Crowe) who is a master of subterfuge, Ferris creates a fake terrorist organization to prompt Al-Saleem out of hiding. At the same time, Ferris must keep his plan secret from Hani (Mark Strong), the head of Jordanian intelligence, because Ferris will lose his own life if Hani finds out. ",Action
Rambo,"A car dealer (Sharan) uses a trained pig to run into cars, then finds a body inside one such vehicle. ",Action
Real Steel,"Charlie Kenton (Hugh Jackman) used to be a prizefighter but lost his chance to win a title when heavy, towering robots took over the boxing ring. Now working as a small-time promoter, Charlie pieces together scrap metal into low-end fighters, barely earning enough to make it from one underground venue to the next. After hitting rock bottom, Charlie reluctantly teams with his estranged son, Max (Dakota Goyo), to build and train a championship robot for a last shot at redemption. ",Action
The Kingdom,"Charged with the most important assignment of his career, federal agent Ron Fleury (Jamie Foxx) has one week to assemble a team, infiltrate and destroy a terrorist cell based in Riyadh, Saudi Arabia. Culture shock and opposition from local law enforcement combine to hinder his progress and that of his elite team (Chris Cooper, Jennifer Garner, Jason Bateman), but a sympathetic Saudi police captain becomes an unexpected comrade-in-arms. ",Action
Constantine,"As a suicide survivor, demon hunter John Constantine (Keanu Reeves) has literally been to hell and back -- and he knows that when he dies, he's got a one-way ticket to Satan's realm unless he can earn enough goodwill to climb God's stairway to heaven. While helping policewoman Angela Dodson (Rachel Weisz) investigate her identical twin's apparent suicide, Constantine becomes caught up in a supernatural plot involving both demonic and angelic forces. Based on the DC/Vertigo ""Hellblazer"" comics. ",Action
Unleashed,"In the forests of Transylvania, an elite hunting party takes a gruesome turn when a local is accidentally shot and left for dead. ",Action
Underworld,"Under cover of night, vampires engage in an age-old battle with their sworn enemies, the Lycans, a clan of violent werewolves. Selene (Kate Beckinsale), a vampire orphaned in the wake of a bloody Lycan attack, works for the vampire clan as a trained killer. When the Lycans take a mysterious interest in Michael Corvin (Scott Speedman), an exceptional mortal doctor, Selene struggles to save him from Lucian (Michael Sheen), a ruthless Lycan leader hellbent on ending the vampire bloodline. ",Action
Spy Game,"Redford stars as CIA operative Nathan Muir, who is on the brink of retirement from the field, when he learns his protégé Tom Bishop has been arrested in China on a charge of espionage. No stranger to the machinations of the CIA's top echelon, Muir hones all his skills and irreverent manner in order to find a way to free Bishop. ",Action
Taxi,"After a slew of traffic accidents, police detective Andy Washburn is demoted and has his driver's license revoked by his lieutenant. While on duty one day, Andy learns of a bank robbery and hails a taxi driven by new cabbie Belle. They lose the robbers in a chase through New York City, and Belle's taxi is impounded. Andy promises to get the car back for Belle if she helps him catch the thieves. ",Action
Rush Hour,"When a Chinese diplomat's daughter is kidnapped in Los Angeles, he calls in Hong Kong Detective Inspector Lee (Jackie Chan) to assist the FBI with the case. But the FBI doesn't want anything to do with Lee, and they dump him off on the LAPD, who assign wisecracking Detective James Carter (Chris Tucker) to watch over him. Although Lee and Carter can't stand each other, they choose to work together to solve the case on their own when they figure out they've been ditched by both the FBI and police. ",Action
Fallen,"Filmmaker Thomas Marchese examines stories of fallen police officers and the effects on families, colleagues and communities. ",Action
Independence Day,A black couple from Tennessee run into countless obstacles while trying to make a life for themselves in Los Angeles. ,Action
Stargate,"In modern-day Egypt, professor Daniel Jackson (James Spader) teams up with retired Army Col. Jack O'Neil (Kurt Russell) to unlock the code of an interstellar gateway to an ancient Egypt-like world. They arrive on a planet ruled by the despotic Ra (Jaye Davidson), who holds the key to the Earth travelers' safe return. Now, in order to escape from their intergalactic purgatory, Jackson and O'Neil must convince the planet's people that Ra must be overthrown. ",Action
Maverick,"This film update of the ""Maverick"" TV series finds the title cardsharp (Mel Gibson) hoping to join a poker contest with an impressive payoff. In order to enter, Maverick must first put up a large cash sum. He scams hopeful contestants Annabelle (Jodie Foster) and Angel (Alfred Molina) in a preliminary card game to win the money he needs, making enemies of both players. While trying to evade Annabelle and Angel, the crafty Maverick realizes a cunning marshal (James Garner) is also on his tail. ",Action
Dragon: The Bruce Lee Story,"Bruce Lee's (Jason Scott Lee) rise begins in Hong Kong, as a young boy receiving traditional Chinese martial arts training. After an altercation compels young Bruce to leave the country, his father (Ric Young) sends him to the United States, imploring him to seek success that even Hong Kong will recognize. Bruce begins by teaching martial arts to American students, and eventually becomes a popular actor on the ""Green Hornet"" television series, known in Hong Kong as ""The Kato Show."" ",Action
Juice,"Four Harlem friends -- Bishop (Tupac Shakur), Q (Omar Epps), Steel (Jermaine Hopkins) and Raheem (Khalil Kain) -- dabble in petty crime, but they decide to go big by knocking off a convenience store. Bishop, the magnetic leader of the group, has the gun. But Q has different aspirations. He wants to be a DJ and happens to have a gig the night of the robbery. Unfortunately for him, Bishop isn't willing to take no for answer in a game where everything's for keeps. ",Action
The Last Boy Scout,"Once a first-rate Secret Service agent, Joe Hallenbeck (Bruce Willis) is now a gruff private investigator whose latest gig is protecting a pole dancer (Halle Berry). When she's murdered, he grudgingly teams up with her boyfriend, Jimmy Dix (Damon Wayans), an ex-quarterback with a gambling problem, and the two go after her killers. Before long, they stumble onto a plot by a well-known football magnate (Noble Willingham) to bribe federal legislators into legalizing sports gambling. ",Action
Thunderbolt and Lightfoot,"While stealing a car, free-spirited drifter Lightfoot (Jeff Bridges) crosses paths with legendary thief Thunderbolt (Clint Eastwood) in the midst of his own escape. Thunderbolt's old partners in crime, Red (George Kennedy) and Eddie (Geoffrey Lewis), believe he double-crossed them after they robbed a Montana bank vault several years ago. After Thunderbolt successfully pleads his innocence and is let off the hook, Lightfoot rallies them together as a group to rob the very same bank again. ",Action
The War of the Worlds,"Scientist Clayton Forrester (Gene Barry) and Sylvia Van Buren (Ann Robinson) are the first to arrive at the site of a meteorite crash. Soon after, an alien war machine emerges and begins killing at random. The Marines are called in, but they're no match for the aliens' force field. Forrester and Van Buren, however, are able to wound one of the creatures and procure a sample of its blood. They take it to Los Angeles where they hope, through testing, to be able to discover the aliens' weakness. ",Action
Outlaw King,"After being crowned King of Scotland, legendary warrior Robert the Bruce is forced into exile by the English and leads a band of outlaws to help him reclaim the throne. ",Action
Dragged Across Concrete,Police partners descend into the criminal underworld after they are suspended for assaulting a suspect on video. ,Action
The Night Comes for Us,"Ito, a gangland enforcer, is caught amidst a treacherous and violent insurrection within his Triad crime family. ",Action
Solo: A Star Wars Story,"Young Han Solo finds adventure when he joins forces with a gang of galactic smugglers and a 190-year-old Wookie named Chewbacca. Indebted to the gangster Dryden Vos, the crew devises a daring plan to travel to the mining planet Kessel to steal a batch of valuable coaxium. In need of a fast ship, Solo meets Lando Calrissian, the suave owner of the perfect vessel for the dangerous mission -- the Millennium Falcon. ",Action
Fan,A man (Shah Rukh Khan) develops a dangerous obsession with a movie star who looks just like him. ,Action
Slow West,A bounty hunter (Michael Fassbender) keeps his true motive a secret from the naive Scottish teenager (Kodi Smit-McPhee) he's offered to serve as bodyguard and guide while the youth searches for his beloved in 1800s Colorado. ,Action
Game Night,"Max and Annie's weekly game night gets kicked up a notch when Max's brother Brooks arranges a murder mystery party -- complete with fake thugs and federal agents. So when Brooks gets kidnapped, it's all supposed to be part of the game. As the competitors set out to solve the case, they start to learn that neither the game nor Brooks are what they seem to be. The friends soon find themselves in over their heads as each twist leads to another unexpected turn over the course of one chaotic night. ",Action
Jumanji: Welcome to the Jungle,Movie ,Action
Love and Monsters,"Seven years after the Monsterpocalypse, Joel Dawson, along with the rest of humanity, has been living underground ever since giant creatures took control of the land. After reconnecting over the radio with his high school girlfriend, Aimee, who is now 80 miles away at a coastal colony, Joel begins to fall for her again. As Joel realizes that there's nothing left for him underground, he decides to venture out to Aimee, despite all the dangerous monsters that stand in his way. ",Action
All Is Lost,"During a solo voyage in the Indian Ocean, a veteran mariner (Robert Redford) awakes to find his vessel taking on water after a collision with a stray shipping container. With his radio and navigation equipment disabled, he sails unknowingly into a violent storm and barely escapes with his life. With any luck, the ocean currents may carry him into a shipping lane -- but, with supplies dwindling and the sharks circling, the sailor is forced to face his own mortality. ",Action
Get the Gringo,A youngster helps an American career criminal (Mel Gibson) learn to survive behind the walls of a brutal Mexican prison. ,Action
In the Heart of the Sea,"In 1820, crewmen (Chris Hemsworth, Benjamin Walker, Cillian Murphy) aboard the New England vessel Essex face a harrowing battle for survival when a whale of mammoth size and strength attacks with force, crippling their ship and leaving them adrift in the ocean. Pushed to their limits and facing storms, starvation, panic and despair, the survivors must resort to the unthinkable to stay alive. Their incredible tale ultimately inspires author Herman Melville to write ""Moby-Dick."" ",Action
Ghostbusters,"After the members of a team of scientists (Harold Ramis, Dan Aykroyd, Bill Murray) lose their cushy positions at a university in New York City, they decide to become ""ghostbusters"" to wage a high-tech battle with the supernatural for money. They stumble upon a gateway to another dimension, a doorway that will release evil upon the city. The Ghostbusters must now save New York from complete destruction. ",Action
Iron Man 2,"With the world now aware that he is Iron Man, billionaire inventor Tony Stark (Robert Downey Jr.) faces pressure from all sides to share his technology with the military. He is reluctant to divulge the secrets of his armored suit, fearing the information will fall into the wrong hands. With Pepper Potts (Gwyneth Paltrow) and ""Rhodey"" Rhodes (Don Cheadle) by his side, Tony must forge new alliances and confront a powerful new enemy. ",Action
Jackass Forever,"Celebrating the joy of being back together with your best friends and a perfectly executed shot to the dingdong, the original jackass crew return for another round of hilarious, wildly absurd, and often dangerous displays of comedy with a little help from some exciting new cast. ",Action
Free State of Jones,"In 1863, Mississippi farmer Newt Knight serves as a medic for the Confederate Army. Opposed to slavery, Knight would rather help the wounded than fight the Union. After his nephew dies in battle, Newt returns home to Jones County to safeguard his family but is soon branded an outlaw deserter. Forced to flee, he finds refuge with a group of runaway slaves hiding out in the swamps. Forging an alliance with the slaves and other farmers, Knight leads a rebellion that would forever change history. ",Action
Traitor,"When straight-arrow agent Roy Clayton (Guy Pearce) assumes command of a special FBI task force, he becomes entangled in a web of covert operations. All the clues in Clayton's investigation point to Samir Horn (Don Cheadle), a former Special Ops soldier who now aids terrorists. But as Clayton digs deeper and contradictory evidence begins to emerge, he begins to question Horn's motives. ",Action
Pineapple Express,"Stoner Dale Denton's (Seth Rogen) enjoyment of a rare strain of marijuana may prove fatal when he drops his roach in a panic after witnessing a murder. Upon learning that the fancy weed can be traced back to them, Dale and his dealer (James Franco) go on the lam, with a dangerous drug lord (Gary Cole) and crooked cop (Rosie Perez) hot on their heels. ",Action
Crank,"Chev Chelios (Jason Statham), a hit man wanting to go straight, lets his latest target slip away, then he awakes the next morning to a phone call that informs him he has been poisoned and has only an hour to live unless he keeps adrenaline coursing through his body while he searches for an antidote. ",Action
Alan Partridge: Alpha Papa,"Radio host Alan Partridge (Steve Coogan) gets a chance to boost his sagging career by serving as a liaison between police and his former co-host (Colm Meaney), who has taken hostages at their radio station. ",Action
28 Weeks Later,"Six months after the original epidemic, the rage virus has all but annihilated the population of the British Isles. Nevertheless the U.S. Army declares the danger past, and American soldiers arrive to restore order and begin reconstruction. Refugees return to British soil, but one of them carries a deadly secret: The virus is not gone and is even more dangerous than before. ",Action
Captain America: The First Avenger,"It is 1941 and the world is in the throes of war. Steve Rogers (Chris Evans) wants to do his part and join America's armed forces, but the military rejects him because of his small stature. Finally, Steve gets his chance when he is accepted into an experimental program that turns him into a supersoldier called Captain America. Joining forces with Bucky Barnes (Sebastian Stan) and Peggy Carter (Hayley Atwell), Captain America leads the fight against the Nazi-backed HYDRA organization. ",Action
The Guardian,A young girl (Nicolette Groen) receives a strange message of hope when she puts aside her grief to help a homeless man (Wayne DeHart). ,Action
Jurassic World,"Located off the coast of Costa Rica, the Jurassic World luxury resort provides a habitat for an array of genetically engineered dinosaurs, including the vicious and intelligent Indominus rex. When the massive creature escapes, it sets off a chain reaction that causes the other dinos to run amok. Now, it's up to a former military man and animal expert (Chris Pratt) to use his special skills to save two young brothers and the rest of the tourists from an all-out, prehistoric assault. ",Action
National Treasure,"Historian and code-breaker Ben Gates (Nicolas Cage) has been searching his whole life for a rumored treasure dating back to the creation of the United States. Joining an expedition led by fellow treasure hunter Ian Howe (Sean Bean), Gates finds an ice-locked Colonial ship in the Arctic Circle that contains a clue linking the treasure to the Declaration of Independence. But when Howe betrays him, Gates has to race to get to the document ahead of his so-called colleague. ",Action
Atlantis: The Lost Empire,"An inexperienced young adventurer becomes the key to unraveling an ancient mystery when he joins up with a group of daredevil explorers to find the legendary lost empire of Atlantis. A naive-but-determined museum cartographer Milo Thatch (Michael J. Fox), dreams of completing the quest begun by his late grandfather, a famous explorer. When a journal surfaces, an eccentric billionaire funds an expedition and the action shifts to high gear. ",Animation
The Edge,"Exploring the ruthless intensity of cricket and the extreme price of success. Between 2009 and 2013, the England Test cricket team rose from the depths of the rankings to become the first and only English side to reach the top ranking in the world. ",Action
Con Air,"Just-paroled army ranger Cameron Poe (Nicolas Cage) is headed back to his wife (Monica Potter), but must fly home aboard a prison transport flight dubbed ""Jailbird"" with some of the worst criminals living. Along with Diamond Dog (Ving Rhames) and Baby-O (Mykelti Williamson), genius serial killer Cyrus ""The Virus"" Grissom (John Malkovich) unleashes a violent escape plot in mid-flight. Secretly working with U.S. Marshall Vince Larkin (John Cusack), Poe tries to foil Grissom's plan. ",Action
The Mask,A psychiatrist enters a dream world of horror when he experiments with an ancient Aztec mask sent to him by a patient. ,Action
Clear and Present Danger,"Agent Jack Ryan (Harrison Ford) becomes acting deputy director of the CIA when Admiral Greer (James Earl Jones) is diagnosed with cancer. When an American businessman, and friend of the president, is murdered on a yacht, Ryan starts discovering links between the man and drug dealers. As CIA agent John Clark (Willem Dafoe) is sent to Colombia to kill drug kingpins in retaliation, Ryan must fight through multiple cover-ups to figure out what happened and who's responsible. ",Action
Robin Hood: Prince of Thieves,"Nobleman crusader Robin of Locksley (Kevin Costner) breaks out of a Jerusalem prison with the help of Moorish fellow prisoner Azeem (Morgan Freeman) and travels back home to England. But upon arrival he discovers his dead father in the ruins of his family estate, killed by the vicious sheriff of Nottingham (Alan Rickman). Robin and Azeem join forces with outlaws Little John (Nick Brimble) and Will Scarlett (Christian Slater) to save the kingdom from the sheriff's villainy. ",Action
Memphis Belle,Footage of actual bombing missions highlights William Wyler's account of the U.S. Air Force's work during World War II. ,Action
Top Gun,"The Top Gun Naval Fighter Weapons School is where the best of the best train to refine their elite flying skills. When hotshot fighter pilot Maverick (Tom Cruise) is sent to the school, his reckless attitude and cocky demeanor put him at odds with the other pilots, especially the cool and collected Iceman (Val Kilmer). But Maverick isn't only competing to be the top fighter pilot, he's also fighting for the attention of his beautiful flight instructor, Charlotte Blackwood (Kelly McGillis). ",Action
Romancing the Stone,"A dowdy romantic-adventure writer is hurled into a real-life adventure in the Colombian jungle in order to save her sister, who will be killed if a treasure map is not delivered to her captors. She is helped out by a brash mercenary, and together they search for the priceless gem located in the map. ",Action
Repo Man,"After being fired from his job, Los Angeles slacker and punk rocker Otto (Emilio Estevez) lands a gig working for an eccentric repossession agent named Bud (Harry Dean Stanton). At first, Otto is reluctant to work as a repo man, but he grows to love the fast-paced job. After learning of a Chevy Malibu that has been given a $20,000 price tag, Otto embarks on a quest to find the car with the beautiful Leila (Olivia Barash), who claims the trunk's contents are otherworldly. ",Action
Conan the Barbarian,"Orphaned boy Conan (Arnold Schwarzenegger) is enslaved after his village is destroyed by the forces of vicious necromancer Thulsa Doom (James Earl Jones), and is compelled to push ""The Wheel of Pain"" for many years. Once he reaches adulthood, Conan sets off across the prehistoric landscape of the Hyborian Age in search of the man who killed his family and stole his father's sword. With beautiful warrior Valeria (Sandahl Bergman) and archer Subotai (Gerry Lopez), he faces a supernatural evil. ",Action
Clash of the Titans,"Perseus (Harry Hamlin), son of the Greek god Zeus (Laurence Olivier), grows up on a deserted island. His destiny is to marry Princess Andromeda (Judi Bowker), who will someday rule the city of Joppa. But as long as the satyr Calibos (Neil McCarthy) -- who uses a giant vulture to kidnap Andromeda's soul every night -- is alive, no one can marry her. Perseus travels to Joppa, where he must defeat Calibos and other mythological monsters to rescue Andromeda. ",Action
Smokey and the Bandit,"Big Enos (Pat McCormick) wants to drink Coors at a truck show, but in 1977 it was illegal to sell Coors east of the Mississippi River without a permit. Truck driver Bo ""Bandit"" Darville (Burt Reynolds) agrees to pick up the beer in Texas and drive it to Georgia within 28 hours. When Bo picks up hitchhiker Carrie (Sally Field), he attracts the attention of Sheriff Buford T. Justice (Jackie Gleason). Angry that Carrie will not marry his son, Justice embarks on a high-speed chase after Bandit. ",Action
Death Wish,"Once a mild-mannered liberal, New York City architect Paul Kersey (Charles Bronson) snaps when intruders break into his home, murdering his wife (Hope Lange) and violently raping his daughter. A business trip to Tucson, Ariz., lands him a gift from a client, a revolver he uses to patrol the streets when he returns home. Frustrated that the police cannot find the intruders, he become a vigilante, gunning down any criminal that crosses his path. The public finds this vigilantism heroic. ",Action
Westworld,"Westworld is a futuristic theme park where paying guests can pretend to be gunslingers in an artificial Wild West populated by androids. After paying a sizable entrance fee, Blane (James Brolin) and Martin (Richard Benjamin) are determined to unwind by hitting the saloons and shooting off their guns. But when the system goes haywire and Blane is killed in a duel with a robotic gunslinger (Yul Brynner), Martin's escapist fantasy suddenly takes on a grim reality. ",Action
Thunderball,"Led by one-eyed evil mastermind Emilio Largo (Adolfo Celi), the terrorist group SPECTRE hijacks two warheads from a NATO plane and threatens widespread nuclear destruction to extort 100 million pounds. The dashing Agent 007, James Bond (Sean Connery), is sent to recover the warheads from the heart of Largo's lair in the Bahamas, facing underwater attacks from sharks and men alike. He must also convince the enchanting Domino (Claudine Auger), Largo's mistress, to become a key ally. ",Action
Ready or Not,"Four college buddies have a bachelor part in Las Vegas and wake up penniless in Mexico, then are chased all the way back to the border. ",Action
Boss Level,"Trapped in a time loop that constantly repeats the day of his murder, former special forces agent Roy Pulver (Frank Grillo) uncovers clues about a secret government project that could unlock the mystery behind his untimely death. In a race against the clock, Pulver must hunt down Colonel Ventor (Mel Gibson), the powerful head of the government program, while outrunning skilled ruthless assassins determined to keep him from the truth in order to break out of the loop, save his family and live once again for tomorrow. ",Action
News of the World,"Five years after the end of the Civil War, Capt. Jefferson Kyle Kidd crosses paths with a 10-year-old girl taken by the Kiowa people. Forced to return to her aunt and uncle, Kidd agrees to escort the child across the harsh and unforgiving plains of Texas. However, the long journey soon turns into a fight for survival as the traveling companions encounter danger at every turn -- both human and natural. ",Action
Spies in Disguise,"Super spy Lance Sterling and scientist Walter Beckett are almost exact opposites. Lance is smooth, suave and debonair. Walter is not. But what Walter lacks in social skills he makes up for in smarts and invention, creating the awesome gadgets Lance uses on his epic missions. But when events take an unexpected turn, Walter and Lance suddenly have to rely on each other in a whole new way. And if this odd couple can't learn to work as a team, the whole world is in peril. ",Animation
Captain Marvel,"Captain Marvel is an extraterrestrial Kree warrior who finds herself caught in the middle of an intergalactic battle between her people and the Skrulls. Living on Earth in 1995, she keeps having recurring memories of another life as U.S. Air Force pilot Carol Danvers. With help from Nick Fury, Captain Marvel tries to uncover the secrets of her past while harnessing her special superpowers to end the war with the evil Skrulls. ",Action
The Outpost,"Thinking she is to be promoted, a woman is instead sent to a remote mountain outpost. ",Action
The Magnificent Seven,"Looking to mine for gold, greedy industrialist Bartholomew Bogue seizes control of the Old West town of Rose Creek. With their lives in jeopardy, Emma Cullen and other desperate residents turn to bounty hunter Sam Chisolm (Denzel Washington) for help. Chisolm recruits an eclectic group of gunslingers to take on Bogue and his ruthless henchmen. With a deadly showdown on the horizon, the seven mercenaries soon find themselves fighting for more than just money once the bullets start to fly. ",Action
Spectre,An American (Alexandra Paul) tries to free his wife (Greg Evigan) and daughter (Briana Evigan) from the influence of evil spirits inhabiting their Irish mansion. ,Action
Thor: The Dark World,"In ancient times, the gods of Asgard fought and won a war against an evil race known as the Dark Elves. The survivors were neutralized, and their ultimate weapon -- the Aether -- was buried in a secret location. Hundreds of years later, Jane Foster (Natalie Portman) finds the Aether and becomes its host, forcing Thor (Chris Hemsworth) to bring her to Asgard before Dark Elf Malekith (Christopher Eccleston) captures her and uses the weapon to destroy the Nine Realms -- including Earth. ",Action
Chappie,"In the near future, a mechanized police force patrols the streets and deals with lawbreakers -- but now, the people are fighting back. When one police droid is stolen and given new programming, he acquires the ability to feel and think for himself. While the robot, dubbed ""Chappie (Sharlto Copley),"" puzzles out human behavior, the authorities begin to see him as a danger to mankind and order; they will stop at nothing to ensure that Chappie is the last of his kind. ",Action
The Maze Runner,"Thomas (Dylan O'Brien), a teenager, arrives in a glade at the center of a giant labyrinth. Like the other youths dumped there before him, he has no memory of his previous life. Thomas quickly becomes part of the group and soon after demonstrates a unique perspective that scores him a promotion to Runner status -- those who patrol the always-changing maze to find an escape route. Together with Teresa (Kaya Scodelario), the only female, Thomas tries to convince his cohorts that he knows a way out. ",Action
The Grey,"A woman of Tehran discovers her husband has been unfaithful, destroying the marriage. ",Action
What Happened to Monday,"In a world where families are allowed only one child due to overpopulation, resourceful identical septuplets must avoid governmental execution and dangerous infighting while investigating the disappearance of one of their own. ",Action
Aquaman,"Once home to the most advanced civilization on Earth, the city of Atlantis is now an underwater kingdom ruled by the power-hungry King Orm. With a vast army at his disposal, Orm plans to conquer the remaining oceanic people -- and then the surface world. Standing in his way is Aquaman, Orm's half-human, half-Atlantean brother and true heir to the throne. With help from royal counselor Vulko, Aquaman must retrieve the legendary Trident of Atlan and embrace his destiny as protector of the deep. ",Action
Unknown,"When five men awake in a locked warehouse, none of them can remember his identity or how he ended up locked inside with the others. They must determine who is good and who is bad, in order to stay alive. The film's events take place in reverse order, in a style reminiscent of ""Memento."" ",Action
Tron,"When talented computer engineer Kevin Flynn (Jeff Bridges) finds out that Ed Dillinger (David Warner), an executive at his company, has been stealing his work, he tries to hack into the system. However, Flynn is transported into the digital world, where he has to face off against Dillinger's computerized likeness, Sark, and the imposing Master Control Program. Aided by Tron (Bruce Boxleitner) and Yori (Cindy Morgan), Flynn becomes a freedom fighter for the oppressed programs of the grid. ",Action
The Book of Eli,"Thirty years after war turned the world into a wasteland, a lone warrior named Eli (Denzel Washington) marches across the ruined landscape, carrying hope for humanity's redemption. Only one other man (Gary Oldman) understands the power of what Eli carries, and he is determined to take it for himself. Though Eli prefers peace, he will risk death to protect his precious cargo, for he must fulfill his destiny to help restore mankind. ",Action
Hanna,"Raised by her father (Eric Bana) in the Finnish wilderness, teenage Hanna (Saoirse Ronan) has trained all her life to be the perfect assassin. Her father sends her on a mission, and she stealthily makes her way across Europe while evading agents sent after her by a ruthless operative named Marissa (Cate Blanchett), who once worked with Hanna's father. As she draws closer to her target, Hanna faces startling revelations about her existence and begins to question her humanity. ",Action
We Own the Night,"In 1988, New York's police wage an all-out war on drugs, and guilty and innocent alike become casualties. Bobby Green (Joaquin Phoenix), manager of a nightclub that is often frequented by gangsters, tries to remain neutral but hides a potentially fatal secret: His brother (Mark Wahlberg) and father (Robert Duvall) are both cops. After his brother is wounded in an assassination attempt, Bobby can no longer remain neutral. He joins forces with his brother for an all-out assault on the mob. ",Action
Unstoppable,"Following a traumatic experience, former Special Forces member Dean Cage (Wesley Snipes) is trying to pick up the pieces of his fractured life. With the help of detective Amy Knight (Jacqueline Obradors), Dean tries to block out the painful wartime memories, including the death of his best friend. Everything goes awry, however, when Dean is mistaken for a rogue CIA agent. He is abducted and given a truth serum, and now he must find an antidote to the debilitating psychotropic drug. ",Action
Harsh Times,Jim (Christian Bale) is a Gulf War veteran and he believes it is his sworn duty to protect Americans by policing the streets of Los Angeles. His dreams are shattered when he is rejected by the Los Angeles Police Department leaving him and his Mexican paramour in the lurch. Jim is soon offered a position in the Department of Homeland Security leading him to recruit his unemployed best friend Mike (Freddy Rodriquez) to carve a path of devastation across the city. ,Action
Four Brothers,"When an inner-city Detroit foster mother (Fionnula Flanagan) is murdered in a botched holdup, four of her now-grown adopted children suspect it was no random killing. Rising musician Jack (Garrett Hedlund), former-Marine Angel (Tyrese Gibson), hotheaded hockey player Bobby (Mark Wahlberg) and settled-down husband and father Jeremiah (André Benjamin) go on the hunt for neighborhood criminal kingpin Victor Sweet (Chiwetel Ejiofor) while being trailed themselves by the local beat cops. ",Action
Street Kings,"Tom Ludlow (Keanu Reeves), a veteran member of the LAPD, is still mourning the loss of his wife and trying to navigate through a world that does not make much sense anymore. When evidence implicates him in the death of a fellow officer, Ludlow begins to question the loyalties of everyone around him. ",Action
The Island,"In 2019 a mercenary (Djimon Hounsou) pursues two clones (Ewan McGregor, Scarlett Johansson) who escaped from a research facility after learning their true fate. ",Action
Dog Soldiers,"During a routine nighttime training mission in the Scottish Highlands, a small squad of British soldiers expected to rendezvous with a special ops unit instead find a bloody massacre with a sole survivor. The savage attackers of the special ops team return, and the men are rescued by Megan (Emma Cleasby), a zoologist who identifies what hunts them as werewolves. Without transport or communications, the group is forced to retreat to a farmhouse to wait for the full moon to disappear at dawn. ",Action
The Fast and the Furious,"Dominic Toretto (Vin Diesel) enjoys the adrenaline of street car racing and his fans treat him like a rock star. After a blazing encounter with the ruthless Johnny Tran, Dom decides to take Brian (Paul Walker), a newcomer to street racing, under his wing. Dom's sister Mia sees something she likes in Brian, too. Trouble is, neither of them realize he's an undercover cop, and Dominic and his rival Johnny Tran are both the prime suspects in a case involving dirty money and big-rig hijacking. ",Action
The Score,"Two small time crooks, Mike and Troy, are on a mission -- the 'score' -- that they both expect will transform their circumstances. At a roadside café, as they wait for a rendezvous hand-over, Troy falls in love with the waitress, Gloria, and begins to question his life choices... while the threat of real danger is driving to meet them. ",Action
Hellboy,"At the end of World War II, the Nazis attempt to open a portal to a paranormal dimension in order to defeat the Allies, but are only able to summon a baby demon who is rescued by Allied forces and dubbed ""Hellboy"" (Ron Perlman). Sixty years later, Hellboy serves as an agent in the Bureau of Paranormal Research and Defense, where he, aided by Abe Sapien (Doug Jones), a merman with psychic powers, and Liz Sherman (Selma Blair), a woman with pyrokinesis, protects America against dark forces. ",Action
Bad Boys,"Hiroshi (Yukio Yamada) runs with a gang of disaffected street toughs. The law gets their hands on him after he attempts a robbery. A psychiatrist examines him and recommends to the authorities that he be sent to reform school. Within this juvenile prison, Hiroshi encounters a rigid hierarchy among the teenage inmates; newcomers, inevitably, must suffer at the bottom. As Hiroshi struggles to prove himself, flashbacks illuminate his past and reveal a society in a state of violent flux. ",Action
Patriot Games,"When former CIA agent Jack Ryan (Harrison Ford) hampers an IRA terrorist attack in London, he kills one of the terrorists. The dead man's brother, another member of the group named Sean Miller (Sean Bean), is arrested but quickly escapes. Vowing revenge against Ryan, Miller travels to the United States, where he forces Ryan's wife (Anne Archer) and daughter (Thora Birch) into a car accident that badly injures them. This convinces Ryan to rejoin the CIA in order to track down Miller. ",Action
El mariachi,"El Mariachi (Carlos Gallardo) is a traveling guitar player with the modest desire to play music for a living. Looking for a job, he stops at a bar in a tiny town, where his simple, peaceful lifestyle is interrupted. Local hit men, expecting enemy assassin Azul (Reinol Martinez) to invade their town, believe that the visiting musician is the professional killer they are looking for. Unwittingly embroiled in vicious mob warfare, El Mariachi must shoot his way out of town if he is to survive. ",Action
Young Guns,"The year is 1878, Lincoln County. John Tunstall, a British ranch owner, hires six rebellious boys as ""regulators"" to protect his ranch against the ruthless Santa Fe Ring. When Tunstall is killed in an ambush, the Regulators, led by the wild-tempered Bill the Kid (Emilio Estevez), declare war on the Ring. As their vendetta turns into a bloody rampage, they are branded outlaws, becoming the objects of the largest manhunt in Western history. ",Action
Innerspace,"A scientifically miniaturized marine unexpectedly finds himself floating around the body of a hypochondriac, and trying to outwit saboteurs who want the device that shrank him. Attempts by his colleagues to retrieve the little man - protected inside a tiny submersible - are hampered by the would-be thieves. ",Action
Bloodsport,"U.S. soldier Frank Dux (Jean-Claude Van Damme) has come to Hong Kong to be accepted into the Kumite, a highly secret and extremely violent martial-arts competition. While trying to gain access into the underground world of clandestine fighters, he also has to avoid military officers who consider him to be AWOL. After enduring a difficult training and beginning a romance with journalist Janice Kent (Leah Ayres), Frank is given the opportunity to fight. But can he survive? ",Action
Enemy Mine,"During a war between humans and the reptilian Drac race, spaceship pilot Willis Davidge (Dennis Quaid) ends up stranded on an alien world, along with enemy fighter Jeriba Shigan (Louis Gossett Jr.). While both Willis and his Drac counterpart can breathe on the planet, the environment and its creatures are relatively hostile, forcing the two to work together to survive. As time goes by, Willis and Jeriba become unlikely friends, though their unique relationship faces considerable challenges. ",Action
Superman II,"Superman (Christopher Reeve) foils the plot of terrorists by hurtling their nuclear device into outer space, but the bomb's shock waves free the Kryptonian villain General Zod (Terence Stamp) and his henchmen Ursa (Sarah Douglas) and Non (Jack O'Halloran) from their imprisonment. Traveling to Earth, they threaten the planet with destruction at the same time that Superman decides to renounce his superpowers in order to live a normal life as Clark Kent with his new love, Lois Lane (Margot Kidder). ",Action
Mad Max,"In a not-too-distant dystopian future, when man's most precious resource -- oil -- has been depleted and the world plunged into war, famine and financial chaos, the last vestiges of the law in Australia attempt to restrain a vicious biker gang. Max (Mel Gibson), an officer with the Main Force Patrol, launches a personal vendetta against the gang when his wife (Joanne Samuel) and son are hunted down and murdered, leaving him with nothing but the instincts for survival and retribution. ",Action
You Only Live Twice,"During the Cold War, American and Russian spacecrafts go missing, leaving each superpower believing the other is to blame. As the world teeters on the brink of nuclear war, British intelligence learns that one of the crafts has landed in the Sea of Japan. After faking his own death, secret agent James Bond (Sean Connery) is sent to investigate. In Japan, he's aided by Tiger Tanaka (Tetsuro Tamba) and the beautiful Aki (Akiko Wakabayashi), who help him uncover a sinister global conspiracy. ",Action
Extraction,The only survivor of a botched prisoner-extraction mission must fight his way out of a maximum-security Chechen facility and simultaneously keep his captive alive long enough to catch a terrorist arms dealer. ,Action
Jumanji: The Next Level,"When Spencer goes back into the fantastical world of Jumanji, pals Martha, Fridge and Bethany re-enter the game to bring him home. But the game is now broken -- and fighting back. Everything the friends know about Jumanji is about to change, as they soon discover there's more obstacles and more danger to overcome. ",Action
Midway,"In this dramatization of the Battle of Midway during World War II, U.S. Navy Adm. Chester Nimitz (Henry Fonda) leads an outnumbered unit in the Pacific to break Japanese encryption codes. They soon discover that Adm. Yamamoto (Toshirô Mifune) plans an ambush of the U.S. base on the island of Midway. Capt. Matt Garth (Charlton Heston) helps devise the Navy's strategy, while his pilot son, Tom (Edward Albert), falls in love with a Japanese-American woman who is headed for an internment camp. ",Action
Bumblebee,"On the run in the year 1987, Bumblebee the Autobot seeks refuge in a junkyard in a small California beach town. Charlie, on the brink of turning 18 years old and trying to find her place in the world, soon discovers the battle-scarred and broken Bumblebee. When Charlie revives him, she quickly learns that this is no ordinary yellow Volkswagen. ",Action
Kingsman: The Golden Circle,"With their headquarters destroyed and the world held hostage, members of Kingsman find new allies when they discover a spy organization in the United States known as Statesman. In an adventure that tests their strength and wits, the elite secret agents from both sides of the pond band together to battle a ruthless enemy and save the day, something that's becoming a bit of a habit for Eggsy. ",Action
Harriet,"From her escape from slavery through the dangerous missions she led to liberate hundreds of slaves through the Underground Railroad, the story of heroic abolitionist Harriet Tubman is told. ",Action
The Equalizer 2,"If you have a problem and there is nowhere else to turn, the mysterious and elusive Robert McCall will deliver the vigilante justice you seek. This time, however, McCall's past cuts especially close to home when thugs kill Susan Plummer -- his best friend and former colleague. Now out for revenge, McCall must take on a crew of highly trained assassins who'll stop at nothing to destroy him. ",Action
Jungle,"An Indian princess (Marie Windsor), her adviser (Cesar Romero) and a white hunter (Rod Cameron) fight woolly mammoths. Filmed in sepia. ",Action
Turbo Kid,"In a post-apocalyptic wasteland, an orphaned teen (Munro Chambers) must battle a ruthless warlord (Michael Ironside) to save the girl (Laurence Leboeuf) of his dreams. ",Action
Black Widow,"When Brandy discovers that her husband has been cheating on her, she looks for cheating married men on Tinder in order to exact revenge. ",Action
Hardcore Henry,"A man wakes up in a Moscow laboratory to learn that he's been brought back from the dead as a half-human, half-robotic hybrid. With no memory of his former life, a woman who claims to be his wife tells him that his name is Henry. Before she can activate his voice, armed thugs storm in and kidnap her. As Henry starts to understand his new abilities, he embarks on a bloody rampage through the city to save his spouse from a psychopath (Danila Kozlovsky) who plans to destroy the world. ",Action
The Guest,A servant boy's world is turned upside down by the arrival of a guest. ,Action
The Salvation,"After shooting the man who murdered his wife, a Danish settler (Mads Mikkelsen) incurs the wrath of the man's brother (Jeffrey Dean Morgan), a ruthless land baron who rules their frontier town. ",Action
The Adam Project,A time-traveling pilot teams up with his younger self and his late father to come to terms with his past while saving the future. ,Action
The Finest Hours,"On Feb. 18, 1952, a massive storm splits the SS Pendleton in two, trapping more than 30 sailors inside the tanker's sinking stern. Engineer Ray Sybert bravely takes charge to organize a strategy for his fellow survivors. As word of the disaster reaches the Coast Guard in Chatham, Mass., Chief Warrant Officer Daniel Cluff orders a daring rescue mission. Despite the ferocious weather, coxswain Bernie Webber takes three men on a lifeboat to try and save the crew against seemingly impossible odds. ",Action
King Arthur: Legend of the Sword,"After the murder of his father, young Arthur's power-hungry uncle Vortigern seizes control of the crown. Robbed of his birthright, he grows up the hard way in the back alleys of the city, not knowing who he truly is. When fate leads him to pull the Excalibur sword from stone, Arthur embraces his true destiny to become a legendary fighter and leader. ",Action
No Escape,The warden of a 2022 prison sends an ex-Marine (Ray Liotta) to a jungle island where inmates are left to die. ,Action
In Time,"In a future where time is money and the wealthy can live forever, Will Salas (Justin Timberlake) is a poor man who rarely has more than a day's worth of life on his time clock. When he saves Henry Hamilton (Matt Bomer) from time thieves, Will receives the gift of a century. However, such a large transaction attracts the attention of the authorities, and when Will is falsely accused of murder, he must go on the run, taking the daughter (Amanda Seyfried) of an incredibly wealthy man with him. ",Action
Machine Gun Preacher,"Sam Childers (Gerard Butler), a former biker, decides to go to East Africa to help repair homes destroyed by civil war. Transformed by the horrors he sees, Sam ignores the warnings of more experienced aide workers and breaks ground for an orphanage in the heart of territory controlled by a brutal renegade militia. But establishing a shelter is not enough; determined to save as many lives as possible, Sam leads armed missions into enemy territory to rescue kidnapped children. ",Action
Zombieland: Double Tap,"Zombie slayers Tallahassee, Columbus, Wichita and Little Rock leave the confines of the White House to travel to Graceland in Memphis, Tenn. Along the way, they encounter other post-apocalyptic warriors and a group of survivors who find refuge in a commune. The scrappy fighters must now rely on their wits and weapons more than ever as they soon find themselves in a relentless battle against smarter, faster and seemingly indestructible zombies. ",Action
Super,"For failing to fix his New York City tenement, slumlord Louie Kritski (Joe Pesci) is sentenced to live in one of his units. If repairs aren't completed in 120 days, he'll go to jail. As Louie confronts the decrepit conditions in which his tenants live -- from giant rats to nights without heat -- he begins to have a change of heart. But avoiding jail time will mean convincing his money-grubbing father, the building's true owner, to invest money for repairs. ",Action
Antim: The Final Truth,"Rahulya is a penniless village boy with a dream of being Pune's biggest don. His closest friend, Ganya, is beside him through it all, while his parents shun their violent son. Policeman Rajveer Singh watches this unassuming boy rise up the ranks and is frustrated as Rahulya manages to use his connections to slip out of police custody time and again. With Rajveer at his heels, Rahulya still manages to easily reach the top, but soon loses sight of why he ever wanted to ascend the ranks. As the power goes to his head, he ruins relations with his family and ladylove. His only solace is Ganya and Sidhu, an orphan boy he adopts. Will Rajveer manage to bring down Rahulya, or will his own past catch up with him first? Only at the end is the final truth revealed, as lines of loyalty and loathing intertwine. ",Action
2 Guns,"For the past year, DEA agent Bobby Trench (Denzel Washington) and U.S. Navy intelligence officer Marcus Stigman (Mark Wahlberg) have been working under cover as members of a narcotics syndicate. The twist: Neither man knows that the other is an undercover agent. When their attempt to infiltrate a Mexican drug cartel and recover millions goes haywire, the men are disavowed by their superiors. Trench and Stigman must go on the run lest they wind up in jail or in a grave. ",Action
Wild Target,"Longing to get out of the assassination business, a hit man (Bill Nighy) decides not to follow through with his latest assignment to kill a pretty art thief (Emily Blunt). ",Action
Escape Plan,"Tough and chiseled Ray Breslin (Sylvester Stallone) knows how to infiltrate a prison -- and bust out of one. His latest job leads to a double-cross, leaving him stuck in a high-tech facility with the worst that society has to offer. Luckily for Ray, he meets Emil Rottmayer (Arnold Schwarzenegger), an inmate who secretly helps him hatch a plot to win his freedom. Only sadistic warden Hobbes (Jim Caviezel) stands in the way of the two men successfully making it out alive. ",Action
Out of the Furnace,"Steelworker Russell Baze (Christian Bale) works a dead-end job and holds tight to his sense of family, duty and loyalty. Rodney Baze (Casey Affleck), Russell's brother, returns home after serving in Iraq and, with his debts piling up, becomes entangled with a vicious crime lord (Woody Harrelson). Soon afterward, Rodney disappears mysteriously. The police fail to solve the case, so Russell -- feeling he has little left to lose -- puts his life on the line to bring his brother home. ",Action
Pandorum,"Astronauts Payton (Dennis Quaid) and Bower (Ben Foster) awake in a hypersleep chamber with no memory of who they are or what their mission might be. While Payton stays behind to monitor the radio transmitter, Bower ventures out of the chamber into the seemingly abandoned spaceship. The men quickly realize that they are not alone and that the fate of mankind hinges on what they do next. ",Action
Om Shanti Om,Two actors are reincarnated after a fire destroys their studio. ,Action
Death Sentence,"Nick Hume (Kevin Bacon) is on his way home from a hockey game with his son, Brendan, and stops for gasoline. Helplessly he sees a street thug kill Brendan while robbing the station. Believing the justice system will fail him, Nick goes after the killer himself, setting off a war between him and the killer's older brother (Garrett Hedlund). ",Action
Warcraft,"Looking to escape from his dying world, the orc shaman Gul'dan utilizes dark magic to open a portal to the human realm of Azeroth. Supported by the fierce fighter Blackhand, Gul'dan organizes the orc clans into a conquering army called the Horde. Uniting to protect Azeroth from these hulking invaders are King Llane, the mighty warrior Anduin Lothar (Travis Fimmel) and the powerful wizard Medivh. As the two races collide, leaders from each side start to question if war is the only answer. ",Action
Appaloosa,"In this classic Western, buffalo hunter Matt Fletcher (Marlon Brando) plans on starting a horse breeding farm with his friend Paco (Rafael Campos) in the border town of Ojo Prieto. But when a Mexican bandit (John Saxon) steals his prized Appaloosa stallion, Matt crosses the border determined to get revenge. In search of his beloved horse, Matt falls in love with a beautiful woman (Anjanette Comer), battles a band of bandits and faces poisonous scorpions. ",Action
Wanted,"When a wanted man rides into the small western town of Dutchman, all of the wrong people sit up and take notice. ",Action
The Brave One,"New York radio host Erica Bain (Jodie Foster) endures a brutal attack that leaves her badly injured and her beloved fiance dead. The tragedy haunts her, and she sets forth on a personal quest for revenge. Her exploits captivate city residents but, as a determined detective (Terrence Howard) closes in on her, Erica wonders if she is now no better than those she hunts. ",Action
Underworld: Evolution,"Seductive vampire Selene (Kate Beckinsale) and renegade werewolf Michael (Scott Speedman) love one another, but find themselves abhorred by the members of their own clans. Seeking clues that might provide a key to healing the rift between their species, they are hounded by Marcus (Tony Curran), an ancient creature obsessed with perpetuating the war between them. Continually beset by enemies from both sides, the lovers explore their pasts as they seek their destiny. ",Action
Blood and Bone,An ex-con fulfills a promise to a dead friend by taking the underground fighting world in Los Angeles by storm. ,Action
Hidalgo,"Rugged cowboy Frank Hopkins (Viggo Mortensen) is an expert horseman who performs in Buffalo Bill's Wild West Show. When affluent Sheik Riyadh (Omar Sharif), piqued by tales of Hopkins' talent, challenges Hopkins to prove himself in a treacherous long-distance horse race called the Ocean of Fire, Hopkins is forced to oblige. In the Middle East with his American mustang, he must race against thoroughbred horses ridden by the best riders in the world with his reputation -- and his life -- at stake. ",Action
The Matrix Revolutions,"In a dystopia overrun by robots, Neo (Keanu Reeves), mankind's greatest hope, is trapped in a limbo world. Meanwhile, the majority of the planet's population remains in a state of suspended virtual reality. The few humans who are cognizant of the grim realities of the world desperately try to hold off their mechanical enemies long enough for Neo to escape and save the day, but things turn disastrous when all-powerful computer program Agent Smith (Hugo Weaving) arrives in the flesh. ",Action
Blade II,"Exploding from the pages of Marvel Comics comes the thrilling follow-up to the blockbuster ""Blade."" Half Man ... half vampire, and consumed by a desire to avenge the curse of his birth and save the human race from a blood-drenched Armageddon. In this newest action-packed adventure, Blade (Wesley Snipes) is forced to team up with the very vampires he hates in order to overcome a new type of monster which threatens to eradicate both races. ",Action
Armageddon,"When an asteroid threatens to collide with Earth, NASA honcho Dan Truman (Billy Bob Thornton) determines the only way to stop it is to drill into its surface and detonate a nuclear bomb. This leads him to renowned driller Harry Stamper (Bruce Willis), who agrees to helm the dangerous space mission provided he can bring along his own hotshot crew. Among them is the cocksure A.J. (Ben Affleck), who Harry thinks isn't good enough for his daughter (Liv Tyler), until the mission proves otherwise. ",Action
Nothing to Lose,"Convicted of murdering his father and sister, Johan (Theo Maassen) is living in a psychiatric prison. When he loses his parole hearing, he learns that he will be transferred to a long-term prison for the criminally insane, where he will spend the rest of his life. Out of options, Johan escapes from custody and goes looking for his mother (Pim Lambeau), who he believes can prove his innocence. When the police get close to apprehending him, Johan takes a young girl (Lisa Smit) hostage. ",Action
Conspiracy Theory,"New York City cabbie Jerry Fletcher (Mel Gibson) is an expert on paranoid conspiracy theories. He is also infatuated with government lawyer Alice Sutton (Julia Roberts), who permits his attention because he once rescued her from a mugging. However, when Jerry is captured and put through psychotic tests by Dr. Jonas (Patrick Stewart), he realizes there is an actual conspiracy. After escaping, Jerry enlists Alice's help, but she wonders whether he has uncovered a real threat or is just insane. ",Action
Absolute Power,"While robbing the home of aging billionaire Walter Sullivan (E.G. Marshall), Luther Whitney (Clint Eastwood) is interrupted by an amorous couple entering the building. As Whitney hides, he sees Sullivan's young wife, Christy (Melora Hardin), and the U.S. President, Alan Richmond (Gene Hackman). When their affection turns violent, Christy is killed by the Secret Service. Although Whitney flees, he is framed for the murder. Now, he seeks justice with the help of detective Seth Frank (Ed Harris). ",Action
Ransom,A Southwestern millionaire (Stuart Whitman) hires a hit man (Oliver Reed) to fix a $5 million problem that won't go away. ,Action
Demolition Man,"With innocent victims caught in the crossfire in Los Angeles' intensifying war on crime, both cop John Spartan (Sylvester Stallone) and violent thug Simon Phoenix (Wesley Snipes) are sentenced to a state of frozen incarceration known as ""CryoPrison."" When Spartan is finally thawed 36 years later, it's 2032, and Los Angeles is now a pacifist utopia called San Angeles. But with Phoenix again on the loose, Spartan must team up with future cop Lenina (Sandra Bullock) to apprehend the killer. ",Action
Lethal Weapon 3,"Veteran police detective Roger Murtaugh (Danny Glover) is only days away from retiring when he and his tough partner, Martin Riggs (Mel Gibson), are roped into an important internal affairs case. Working with the beautiful, no-nonsense Sergeant Lorna Cole (Rene Russo) and aided by the shifty informant Leo Getz (Joe Pesci), Murtaugh and Riggs begin to close in on a black-market weapons operation involving corrupt cop and arms dealer Jack Travis (Stuart Wilson). ",Action
Backdraft,"Chicago firefighting brothers Stephen (Kurt Russell) and Brian (William Baldwin) have been rivals since childhood. Brian, struggling to prove himself, transfers to the arson unit. There he aids Don (Robert De Niro) in his investigation into a spate of fires involving oxygen-induced infernos called backdrafts. But when a conspiracy implicating a crooked politician and an arsonist leads Brian back to Stephen, he is forced to overcome his brotherly competitiveness in order to crack the case. ",Action
Teenage Mutant Ninja Turtles,"Splinter, the rat sensei, senses something amiss in New York City. His disciples, Leonardo, Donatello, Raphael and Michelangelo have grown apart since their last adventure. The teenage terrapins must somehow renew and strengthen their bond if they are to have any hope of defeating an evil industrialist's army of ancient monsters. ",Action
Colors,A young student falls madly in love with her college professor because he is a good and inspiring man who helps unite many lovers. ,Action
Stakeout,A man with a criminal record plots to kidnap his boss' son after being threatened with the loss of his job. ,Action
Hamburger Hill,"Over the course of 10 days in May 1969, an infantry squad led by Lt. Frantz (Dylan McDermott) and composed of both seasoned troops and new recruits, attempts to take a hill during the Vietnam War. In between attacks, the squad members deal with the other psychological stresses of the war, including the effect on morale of the antiwar movement back home and flashes of racial hostility between white and African-American soldiers, all mediated by the cool-headed medic, Doc (Courtney B. Vance). ",Action
Commando,"Chander, a commando in the army, attempts to expose the corruption of his commander who is in cahoots with an international crime don. ",Action
The Last Starfighter,"After finally achieving the high score on Starfighter, his favorite arcade game, everyday teenager Alex Rogan (Lance Guest) meets the game's designer, Centauri (Robert Preston) -- who reveals that he created Starfighter as a training ground for developing and recruiting actual pilots to help fight a war in space. Whisked away from the banality of his trailer park life to a distant alien planet, Alex struggles to use his video game-playing skills to pilot a real ship, with real lives at stake. ",Action
TRON,"When talented computer engineer Kevin Flynn (Jeff Bridges) finds out that Ed Dillinger (David Warner), an executive at his company, has been stealing his work, he tries to hack into the system. However, Flynn is transported into the digital world, where he has to face off against Dillinger's computerized likeness, Sark, and the imposing Master Control Program. Aided by Tron (Bruce Boxleitner) and Yori (Cindy Morgan), Flynn becomes a freedom fighter for the oppressed programs of the grid. ",Action
For Your Eyes Only,"When a British ship is sunk in foreign waters, the world's superpowers begin a feverish race to find its cargo: a nuclear submarine control system. And 007 (Roger Moore) is thrust into one of his most riveting adventures as he rushes to join the search ... and prevent global devastation! ",Action
The Enforcer,"Police officer ""Dirty Harry"" Callahan (Clint Eastwood) is reassigned from homicide to personnel after his latest use of excessive force. Meanwhile, a terrorist group calling themselves the People's Revolutionary Strike Force organizes a series of crimes in San Francisco, hoping to enrich themselves. When they kidnap the mayor (John Crawford) and steal rockets and rifles for their next attack, Harry and his new female partner, Inspector Kate Moore (Tyne Daly), must stop the terrorists. ",Action
Live and Let Die,"When Bond (Roger Moore) investigates the murders of three fellow agents, he finds himself a target, evading vicious assassins as he closes in on powerful Kananga (Yaphet Kotto). Known on the streets as Mr. Big, Kananga is coordinating a global threat, using tons of self-produced heroin. As Bond tries to unravel the mastermind's plan, he meets Solitaire (Jane Seymour), a beautiful tarot-card reader, whose magic is crucial to the crime lord. ",Action
21 Bridges,"After uncovering a massive conspiracy, an embattled NYPD detective joins a citywide manhunt for two young cop killers. As the night unfolds, he soon becomes unsure of who to pursue -- and who's in pursuit of him. When the search intensifies, authorities decide to take extreme measures by closing all of Manhattan's 21 bridges to prevent the suspects from escaping. ",Action
Enola Holmes,"While searching for her missing mother, intrepid teen Enola Holmes uses her sleuthing skills to outsmart big brother Sherlock and help a runaway lord. ",Action
The Old Guard,"A group of mercenaries, all centuries-old immortals with the ablity to heal themselves, discover someone is onto their secret, and they must fight to protect their freedom. ",Action
Anna,"In 1815, Anna, an enslaved woman, is sold to slave traders, taken to Washington and locked in a tavern. ",Action
Adrift,"Tami Oldham and Richard Sharp couldn't anticipate that they would be sailing directly into one of the most catastrophic hurricanes in recorded history. In the aftermath of the storm, Tami awakens to find Richard badly injured and their boat in ruins. With no hope of rescue, Tami must now find the strength and determination to save herself and the only man she has ever loved. ",Action
The Aeronauts,"In 1862 headstrong scientist James Glaisher and wealthy young widow Amelia Wren mount a balloon expedition to fly higher than anyone in history. As their perilous ascent reduces their chances of survival, the unlikely duo soon discover things about themselves -- and each other -- that help both of them find their place in the world. ",Action
The Fate of the Furious,"With Dom and Letty married, Brian and Mia retired and the rest of the crew exonerated, the globe-trotting team has found some semblance of a normal life. They soon face an unexpected challenge when a mysterious woman named Cipher forces Dom to betray them all. Now, they must unite to bring home the man who made them a family and stop Cipher from unleashing chaos. ",Action
The Girl with All the Gifts,"In the future, a strange fungus has changed nearly everyone into a thoughtless, flesh-eating monster. When a scientist and a teacher find a girl who seems to be immune to the fungus, they all begin a journey to save humanity. ",Action
Overlord,"Private Tom Beddoes (Brian Stirner) is a delicate, unprepossessing young man who gets called to join the British army during World War II. With the Blitz on, he leaves home for training camp and, while not an exceptional soldier, is nevertheless toughened up a bit. Once out, he quietly endures the tedious shuffle of military life and even manages to meet a nice girl (Julie Neesam) while on leave. His happiness is alloyed, however, when he learns he's been chosen for the D-Day invasion. ",Action
Alpha,"As punishment, a woman must sit under a hanged rotting corpse in the middle of a burnt forest. ",Action
Jason Bourne,"It's been 10 years since Jason Bourne (Matt Damon) walked away from the agency that trained him to become a deadly weapon. Hoping to draw him out of the shadows, CIA director Robert Dewey assigns hacker and counterinsurgency expert Heather Lee to find him. Lee suspects that former operative Nicky Parsons is also looking for him. As she begins tracking the duo, Bourne finds himself back in action battling a sinister network that utilizes terror and technology to maintain unchecked power. ",Action
Kong: Skull Island,"Scientists, soldiers and adventurers unite to explore a mythical, uncharted island in the Pacific Ocean. Cut off from everything they know, they venture into the domain of the mighty Kong, igniting the ultimate battle between man and nature. As their mission of discovery soon becomes one of survival, they must fight to escape from a primal world where humanity does not belong. ",Action
The Lego Movie 2: The Second Part,"The citizens of Bricksburg face a dangerous new threat when LEGO DUPLO invaders from outer space start to wreck everything in their path. The battle to defeat the enemy and restore harmony to the LEGO universe takes Emmet, Lucy, Batman and the rest of their friends to faraway, unexplored worlds that test their courage and creativity. ",Animation
Raees,"Threat looms over bootlegger Raees Alam and his business after ACP Majmudar decides to get the better of him. In order to survive and keep his trade thriving, Raees must overcome these obstacles. ",Action
Red Sparrow,"Prima ballerina Dominika Egorova faces a bleak and uncertain future after she suffers an injury that ends her career. She soon turns to Sparrow School, a secret intelligence service that trains exceptional young people to use their minds and bodies as weapons. Egorova emerges as the most dangerous Sparrow after completing the sadistic training process. As she comes to terms with her new abilities, Dominika meets a CIA agent who tries to convince her that he is the only person she can trust. ",Action
The Heat,"FBI Special Agent Sarah Ashburn (Sandra Bullock) is a methodical investigator with a long-standing reputation for excellence -- and arrogance. In contrast, foul-mouthed, hot-tempered detective Shannon Mullins (Melissa McCarthy) goes with her gut instincts and street smarts to remove criminals from the streets of Boston. Sparks fly when these polar opposites have to work together to capture a drug lord, but in the process, they become the last thing anyone expected -- buddies. ",Action
Run All Night,"Longtime hit man Jimmy Conlon (Liam Neeson), best friend of mob boss Shawn Maguire (Ed Harris), has seen better days. He's haunted both by the sins of his past and a police detective who's been breathing down his neck for 30 years, and the only comfort Jimmy has is whiskey. However, when his estranged son (Joel Kinnaman) becomes a mob target, Jimmy figures that the only way to atone for his past mistakes is to make sure that his son doesn't wind up at the wrong end of a gun. ",Action
Hunter Killer,"American submarine Capt. Joe Glass is on the hunt for a U.S. sub in distress in the Arctic Ocean. He soon learns that a secret Russian coup is in the offing, a conspiracy that threatens to dismantle the world order. With crew and country on the line, Glass must assemble an elite group of Navy SEALs to sneak through enemy waters, rescue the kidnapped Russian president and prevent World War III. ",Action
Divergent,"Tris Prior (Shailene Woodley) lives in a futuristic world in which society is divided into five factions. As each person enters adulthood, he or she must choose a faction and commit to it for life. Tris chooses Dauntless -- those who pursue bravery above all else. However, her initiation leads to the discovery that she is a Divergent and will never be able to fit into just one faction. Warned that she must conceal her status, Tris uncovers a looming war which threatens everyone she loves. ",Action
The Informer,A police sergeant heads a drug smuggling investigation and asks his brother to infiltrate the gang when the primary informer is murdered. ,Action
RED 2,"Former CIA black-ops agent Frank Moses (Bruce Willis) and his old partner, Marvin Boggs (John Malkovich), are caught in the grip of retirement -- but that soon changes when a powerful Cold War weapon known as Nightshade resurfaces decades after its disappearance. With assassins hot on their trail, Frank and his team set out to find the one scientist (Anthony Hopkins) who can unravel the mystery of Nightshade and help them save themselves -- and the world. ",Action
The Expendables 2,"Mercenary leader Barney Ross (Sylvester Stallone), Lee Christmas (Jason Statham) and the rest of the Expendables team reunite when Mr. Church (Bruce Willis) hires them for a seemingly easy job. But things go terribly wrong, compelling the mercenaries to seek revenge for a comrade's murder. With the odds against them, Barney and his team are hell-bent on payback and cut a path of destruction through opposing forces, only to encounter an unexpected threat: six pounds of weapons-grade plutonium. ",Action
Man on a Ledge,"When disgraced ex-cop Nick Cassidy (Sam Worthington) steps onto the ledge of the highest floor of New York's famous Roosevelt Hotel, more than just his life is at risk; he threatens to bring the city to its knees. There are some very nervous people around with some very big secrets to hide. As police negotiator Lydia Spencer (Elizabeth Banks) tries to talk Nick in from the ledge, she begins to suspect that he has an ulterior motive behind his actions. ",Action
Elysium,A troubled runaway (Erin Biszak) and a homeless immigrant (Christian Briceno) join forces to survive. ,Action
Attack the Block,"South London teenagers (John Boyega, Alex Esmail, Leeon Jones) defend their neighborhood from malevolent extraterrestrials. ",Action
Pirates of the Caribbean: On Stranger Tides,"The checkered past of Capt. Jack Sparrow (Johnny Depp) catches up to him when he encounters Angelica (Penélope Cruz), a beautiful pirate that Jack once loved then left. Angelica forces him to accompany her to the Queen Anne's Revenge, the ship of the notorious Blackbeard (Ian McShane). Accompanied by a zombie crew, the trio sets sail to find the legendary Fountain of Youth. However, Jack's rival, Barbossa (Geoffrey Rush), also seeks the fountain, as does a ship from Spain. ",Action
Venom,A venomous journey into three different scenarios. ,Action
Edge of Darkness,"When the only daughter of a Boston homicide detective, Thomas Craven (Mel Gibson), is shot on his doorstep, everyone assumes that he was the intended target. Then evidence suggests otherwise, and Craven sets out to find her killer and, in the process, uncovers her secret life, corporate coverups, government collusion, and murder. ",Action
The Bourne Legacy,"When the actions of Jason Bourne spark a fire that threatens to burn down decades of research across a number of secret intelligence agencies, Eric Byer (Edward Norton), the man who built the programs, decides he must sacrifice one of them: Outcome. Aaron Cross (Jeremy Renner), one of Outcome's six agents, and research scientist Marta Shearing (Rachel Weisz) go on the run when Byer targets them for termination. But Cross proves to be a far deadlier target than Byer realizes. ",Action
The Harder They Fall,"When outlaw Nat Love (Jonathan Majors) discovers that his enemy Rufus Buck (Idris Elba) is being released from prison he rounds up his gang to track Rufus down and seek revenge. Those riding with him in this assured, righteously new school Western include his former love Stagecoach Mary (Zazie Beetz), his right and left hand men--hot-tempered Bill Pickett (Edi Gathegi) and fast drawing Jim Beckwourth (R.J. Cyler)--and a surprising adversary-turned-ally. Rufus Buck has his own fearsome crew, including ""Treacherous"" Trudy Smith (Regina King) and Cherokee Bill (LaKeith Stanfield), and they are not a group that knows how to lose. ",Action
Eagle Eye,"Jerry Shaw (Shia LaBeouf) and Rachel Holloman (Michelle Monaghan) are two strangers whose lives are suddenly thrown into turmoil by a mysterious woman they have never met. Threatening their lives and family, the unseen caller uses everyday technology to control their actions and push them into increasing danger. As events escalate, Jerry and Rachel become the country's most-wanted fugitives and must figure out what is happening to them. ",Action
Machete,"After nearly being killed during a violent fight with a powerful drug lord, a former Mexican Federale known as Machete (Danny Trejo) roams Texas streets as a vigilante and sometime day-laborer. Hired to perform a covert hit, he is double-crossed and forced to go on the run. Machete may be down, but not out, and he carves a path of blood, bullets and broken hearts in his quest to settle the score. ",Action
Robin Hood,A thief steals from the rich to help the poor people of England. ,Action
Jungle Cruise,"Join fan favorites Dwayne Johnson and Emily Blunt for the adventure of a lifetime on Disney's JUNGLE CRUISE, a rollicking thrill-ride down the Amazon with wisecracking skipper Frank Wolff and intrepid researcher Dr. Lily Houghton. Lily travels from London, England to the Amazon jungle and enlists Frank's questionable services to guide her downriver on La Quila--his ramshackle-but-charming boat. Lily is determined to uncover an ancient tree with unparalleled healing abilities--possessing the power to change the future of medicine. Thrust on this epic quest together, the unlikely duo encounters innumerable dangers and supernatural forces, all lurking in the deceptive beauty of the lush rainforest. But as the secrets of the lost tree unfold, the stakes reach even higher for Lily and Frank and their fate--and mankind's--hangs in the balance. ",Action
Epic,A boy and girl raised by wild dogs search for the secret of life in the days of the dinosaurs. ,Animation
Quantum of Solace,"Following the death of Vesper Lynd, James Bond (Daniel Craig) makes his next mission personal. The hunt for those who blackmailed his lover leads him to ruthless businessman Dominic Greene (Mathieu Amalric), a key player in the organization which coerced Vesper. Bond learns that Greene is plotting to gain total control of a vital natural resource, and he must navigate a minefield of danger and treachery to foil the plan. ",Action
The Incredible Hulk,"Scientist Bruce Banner (Edward Norton) desperately seeks a cure for the gamma radiation that contaminated his cells and turned him into The Hulk. Cut off from his true love Betty Ross (Liv Tyler) and forced to hide from his nemesis, Gen. Thunderbolt Ross (William Hurt), Banner soon comes face-to-face with a new threat: a supremely powerful enemy known as The Abomination (Tim Roth). ",Action
Seraphim Falls,"Gideon (Pierce Brosnan), a former Union officer, finds himself the prey of a manhunt led by Carver (Liam Neeson), Gideon's Civil-War nemesis. Carver blames Gideon for a horrible war crime and refuses to give up the chase until his vengeance is complete. Gideon, though wounded, manages to stay one step ahead of his pursuers, until he and his mortal enemy meet in a final inevitable showdown. ",Action
16 Blocks,"Boozy and world-weary, NYPD Detective Jack Mosley (Bruce Willis) draws a routine assignment to transport trial witness Eddie Bunker (Mos Def) to the courthouse by 10 a.m. The task quickly becomes a deadly game of cat-and-mouse when some of Jack's fellow officers arrive to kill Eddie so that he cannot testify against them. Jack sees a way to redeem his wasted life by protecting the affable Eddie from the would-be assassins. ",Action
Vantage Point,"Witnesses with different points of view try to unravel an assassination attempt on the U.S. president. Special Agents Thomas Barnes (Dennis Quaid) and Kent Taylor (Matthew Fox) are assigned to protect President Ashton during a summit in Spain on the war on terror. Moments after the leader's arrival, shots ring out, and Ashton is down. In the resulting chaos, an American tourist (Forest Whitaker) comes forward with his camcorder, which he believes contains an image of the shooter. ",Action
Flushed Away,"After an ignoble landing in Ratropolis, a pampered rodent (Hugh Jackman) enlists the help of a sewer scavenger (Kate Winslet) in finding his way back to his posh London flat. Getting home is not the only problem, however; a rodent-hating toad (Ian McKellen) wants his notorious cousin, Le Frog (Jean Reno), to exterminate the pair. ",Animation
John Carter,"When Civil War veteran John Carter (Taylor Kitsch) mysteriously awakes on the surface of Mars -- also called Barsoom -- he little expects the adventure that awaits him. Carter reluctantly becomes embroiled in an epic conflict among the red planet's inhabitants, including Tars Tarkas (Willem Dafoe) and Princess Dejah Thoris (Lynn Collins). As Barsoom is poised on the brink of collapse, war-weary Carter rediscovers his humanity when he realizes that everyone's fate is in his hands. ",Action
30 Days of Night,"In the far Northern Hemisphere, the small town of Barrow, Alaska, experiences a solid month of darkness every year. Though most of the residents head south for the winter, some townspeople remain behind. However, those that stay regret their decision when, one year, hungry vampires descend on Barrow to feed. Sheriff Eben (Josh Hartnett), his wife (Melissa George) and a dwindling band of survivors must try to last until dawn breaks over Barrow's monthlong twilight. ",Action
The Rundown,"Beck (The Rock) is a tight-lipped bounty hunter who doesn't like to use a gun and accepts any job without asking questions. When Beck's employer, Walker (William Lucking), sends him to the Amazon to locate Walker's cocky son, Travis (Seann William Scott), Beck discovers a population controlled by a tyrannical treasure hunter (Christopher Walken). To survive, Beck and Travis must work together, without their affections for a mysterious rebel (Rosario Dawson) getting in the way. ",Action
Tears of the Sun,"The Nigerian government has fallen, and the country is on the verge of civil war. Lt. A.K. Waters (Bruce Willis) has been assigned to lead a team of soldiers into the Nigerian jungle to rescue Dr. Lena Kendricks (Monica Bellucci). When Waters and his team locate Kendricks, she tells them she won't leave her helpless patients to be slaughtered by rebels. The team incurs the wrath of both U.S. and Nigerian forces when they side with Kendricks and attempt to march the refugees to safety. ",Action
Wasabi,"When his former lover dies, a French policeman (Jean Reno) travels to Tokyo to take care of his estranged daughter (Ryôko Hirosue). ",Action
Kiss of the Dragon,"Jet Li plays Liu Jiuan, China's top government agent, who arrives in Paris from Shanghai to carry out a sensitive, top-secret mission. Liu is in Paris to assist Richard (Tcheky Karyo), an unorthodox police official with a small army to back him up. The mission goes horribly wrong, as the man Liu had come to help, betrays him. ",Action
Rush Hour 2,"After an explosion at the US Embassy in Hong Kong kills two customs agents investigating currency smuggling, Inspector Lee (Jackie Chan) and James Carter (Chris Tucker) search for the mastermind. Ricky Tan (John Lone), head of the Fu-Cang-Long Triad, sends out his minions to insure that Carter and Lee don't solve the case. ",Action
Joy Ride,"It's summer break and college freshman Lewis Thomas (Paul Walker) has decided to embark on a cross-country road trip to pick up the girl of his dreams, Venna (Leelee Sobieski). But Lewis' romantic hopes hit a detour when he stops on the way to rescue his older brother, Fuller (Steve Zahn), who goads him into playing a practical joke on a lonely trucker, over a CB radio. Now, that trucker, an unseen and terrifying force known only by his CB handle, Rusty Nail, wants the last laugh and revenge. ",Action
Shanghai Noon,"Bumbling Chon Wang (Jackie Chan) works as an Imperial guard in the Forbidden City of China. When Princess Pei Pei (Lucy Liu) is taken hostage, Wang pursues her captors to the wild frontier land of Nevada, where he meets good-natured thief and occasional cowboy Roy O'Bannon (Owen Wilson). Using O'Bannon's love of money, Wang convinces him to help recover the princess, and together the two form a curious partnership -- the likes of which the West has never seen. ",Action
Bad Boys II,"The drug ecstasy is flowing into Miami, and the police want it stopped. Police Detective Marcus Burnett (Martin Lawrence) and his partner, Mike Lowrey (Will Smith), are just the men to do it. They track the drugs to a Cuban smuggler, Johnny Tapia (Jordi Mollà), who is also involved in a bloody war with Russian and Haitian mobsters. If that isn't bad enough, there's tension between the two cops because Lowrey is romantically involved with Burnett's sister, Syd (Gabrielle Union). ",Action
Austin Powers: The Spy Who Shagged Me,"In his second screen adventure, British super spy Austin Powers must return to 1969, as arch-nemesis Dr. Evil has ventured back to that year and successfully stolen Austin's ""mojo"" and set up a powerful laser and aimed it at Earth. With the help of gorgeous agent Felicity Shagwell, the newly single Austin must now not only contend with Dr. Evil, but also Evil's vicious, pint-size attack-clone, Mini-Me. ",Action
Lethal Weapon 4,"Detective Riggs (Mel Gibson) tries to settle down with his pregnant girlfriend, Lorna (Rene Russo), while his partner, Murtaugh (Danny Glover), comes to grips with the marriage of his pregnant daughter, Rianne (Traci Wolfe), to fellow cop Butters (Chris Rock). But they find themselves and their families targeted by Chinese mobsters, led by Wah Sing Ku (Jet Li). Riggs, Murtaugh, Butters and private eye Getz (Joe Pesci) decide to go on the offensive before the gangsters get to their loved ones. ",Action
Resident Evil,"Based on the popular video game, Milla Jovovich and Michelle Rodriguez star as the leaders of a commando team who must break into ""the hive,"" a vast underground genetics laboratory operated by the powerful Umbrella Corporation. There, a deadly virus has been unleashed, killing the lab's personnel and resurrecting them as the evil Un-dead. The team has just three hours to shut down the lab's supercomputer and close the facility before the virus threatens to overrun the Earth. ",Action
Courage Under Fire,"During the 1991 Gulf War, Lieutenant Colonel Nathaniel Serling (Denzel Washington) accidentally caused a friendly fire incident, a mistake that was hushed up by his superiors. Following the war, he is assigned to investigate the case of Army Captain Karen Walden (Meg Ryan), killed in action when her Medevac unit was attempting to rescue the crew of a downed helicopter. But, as Serling interviews the members of Walden's crew, he realizes their stories about the incident don't add up. ",Action
Outbreak,"A dangerous airborne virus threatens civilization in this tense thriller. After an African monkey carrying a lethal virus is smuggled into the U.S., an outbreak occurs in a California town. To control the spread of the disease, a team of doctors is brought in that includes a contagious disease expert (Dustin Hoffman) and his ex-wife (Rene Russo). Once the Army intervenes to handle the situation, though, the doctors must fight against the clock to save the town and its residents. ",Action
Star Trek: Generations,"In the 23rd century, the Starship Enterprise is dispatched to the scene of a giant energy field about to engulf two ships. Capt. Kirk (William Shatner) averts calamity, but is exposed to the field and presumed dead. Years later, the Enterprise's new commander, Capt. Picard (Patrick Stewart), learns that one of the disaster's survivors, Dr. Soran (Malcolm McDowell), plans to enter the field by destroying a neighboring star. Picard now must collaborate with an unlikely ally in order to stop him. ",Action
New Jack City,"Drug tycoon Nino Brown (Wesley Snipes) and his minions, known collectively as the Cash Money Brothers, have rapidly risen to the top of the New York City narcotics trade. Under Nino's heartless leadership, the drug operation has grown into a multimillion-dollar empire. Scotty (Ice-T) and Nick (Judd Nelson), two police officers who know their way around the streets of Harlem, aim to bring Nino and his cohorts down. To do so, though, they'll have to play by Nino's rules and go undercover. ",Action
Road House,"In this adrenaline-fueled reimagining of the 80s cult classic, ex-UFC fighter Dalton (Jake Gyllenhaal) takes a job as a bouncer at a Florida Keys roadhouse, only to discover that this paradise is not all it seems. ",Action
Licence to Kill,"James Bond (Timothy Dalton) takes on his most-daring adventure after he turns renegade and tracks down one of the international drug cartel's most-brutal and powerful leaders. After the murder of his just-married friend, he is fighting not only for country and justice, but for personal revenge! ",Action
Black Rain,"New York City policemen Nick (Michael Douglas) and Charlie (Andy Garcia) witness a murder in a bar and quickly apprehend the assailant. The killer, named Sato (Yusaku Matsuda), is a member of Japan's infamous Yakuza mob, and Nick and Charlie must transport the gangster back to Osaka for his murder trial. There, Sato's fellow gangsters free him from police custody, forcing Nick and Charlie to scour Japan's dangerous underworld of organized crime in search of their fugitive. ",Action
The Running Man,"In the year 2019, America is a totalitarian state where the favorite television program is ""The Running Man"" -- a game show in which prisoners must run to freedom to avoid a brutal death. Having been made a scapegoat by the government, an imprisoned Ben Richards (Arnold Schwarzenegger) has the opportunity to make it back to the outside again by being a contestant on the deadly show, although the twisted host, Damon Killian (Richard Dawson), has no intention of letting him escape. ",Action
Crocodile Dundee,"A New York reporter heads to Australia to interview the living legend Mike Dundee (Paul Hogan). When she finally locates him, she is so taken with him that she brings him back with her to New York. In New York, Mike Dundee is amazed by the wonders of the city and the interesting people there. ",Action
Star Trek III: The Search for Spock,"Adm. James T. Kirk (William Shatner) has defeated his archenemy but at great cost. His friend Spock has apparently been killed, the USS Enterprise is being scrapped, and starship physician Dr. Leonard ""Bones"" McCoy (DeForest Kelley) has taken ill. McCoy's odd behavior is evidence he's harboring Spock's katra, or animating spirit, and Kirk seeks to take the Enterprise back to the Genesis Planet and find his friend. Rebuffed, Kirk takes dramatic action that results in war with deadly Klingons. ",Action
Sudden Impact,"Jennifer Spencer (Sondra Locke) was gang raped, but the crime went unpunished. Now she demands revenge, killing off the men that attacked her years before. The murders attract the attention of Harry Callahan (Clint Eastwood), who is on a forced vacation due to his violent approach to police work. The case gets complicated when Harry develops a relationship with Jennifer, and it's up to Harry to make the right decision when Jennifer's life is threatened for a second time. ",Action
Outland,"Thriller about an honest marshal in a corrupt mining colony on Io, Jupiter's sunless third moon, who is determined to confront a violent drug ring even though it may cost him his life. After his wife angrily deserts him, he waits alone for the arrival of killers hired by the company to eliminate him. Futuristic remake of ""High Noon"". ",Action
Rollerball,"The year is 2018 in a futuristic society where corporations have replaced countries. A violent futuristic game known as Rollerball is the recreational sport of the world, with teams representing various areas. One player, Jonathan E., fights for his personal freedom and threatens the corporate control. ",Action
The Tomorrow War,"In The Tomorrow War, the world is stunned when a group of time travelers arrive from the year 2051 to deliver an urgent message: Thirty years in the future mankind is losing a global war against a deadly alien species. The only hope for survival is for soldiers and civilians from the present to be transported to the future and join the fight. Among those recruited is high school teacher and family man Dan Forester (Chris Pratt). Determined to save the world for his young daughter, Dan teams up with a brilliant scientist (Yvonne Strahovski) and his estranged father (J.K. Simmons) in a desperate quest to rewrite the fate of the planet. ",Action
The Hunt,"After being accused of killing his friend, a man finds that he is being pursued by the real murderer. ",Action
War,"After his partner and family are killed, FBI agent Jack Crawford (Jason Statham) becomes obsessed with revenge on an assassin named Rogue (Jet Li). Rogue's return sparks a violent war between rival Asian mobsters Chang (John Lone) and Shiro (Ryo Ishibashi), while the ultimate showdown between Crawford and Rogue reveals the truth. ",Action
Mandy,"Six-year-old Mandy Garland (Mandy Miller) was born deaf and has been mute all her life. Postwar English society sees her as disabled, but her mother, Christine (Phyllis Calvert), believes she can learn to talk if enrolled in a school for the deaf. To do so, she has to battle her husband (Terence Morgan), his meddling mother (Marjorie Fielding) and his stern father (Godfrey Tearle), and eventually she has to leave with Mandy. Christine's sacrifice is doubled when she's accused of adultery. ",Action
Sonic the Hedgehog,From the producer of The Fast and the Furious. ,Action
Nerve,"Having found his wife in bed with another man just before her death, a man (Christian Clark) decides his only chance of closure is to find her lover so that he can comprehend what they shared. ",Action
Tag,A look at a colorful day in the life of a graffiti artist looking to make a mark. ,Action
The Interview,Two graduate students who are working on a documentary try to secure an interview with an uncaught and still active serial killer. ,Action
Homefront,"Hoping to escape from his troubled past, former DEA agent Phil Broker (Jason Statham) moves to a seemingly quiet backwater town in the bayou with his daughter. However, he finds anything but quiet there, for the town is riddled with drugs and violence. When Gator Bodine (James Franco), a sociopathic druglord, puts the newcomer and his young daughter in harm's way, Broker is forced back into action to save her and their home. Based on a novel by Chuck Logan. ",Action
Olympus Has Fallen,"The unthinkable happens when heavily armed and highly trained terrorists launch a bold daytime attack on the White House. The building is overrun, and President Benjamin Asher (Aaron Eckhart) and his staff are taken hostage. Luckily for Asher, former presidential security officer Mike Banning (Gerard Butler) is on the scene. With time running out, it's up to Banning to locate Asher's son before the extremists do and rescue the president before his captors unleash their ultimate plan. ",Action
Pirates of the Caribbean: Dead Men Tell No Tales,"Thrust into an all-new adventure, a down-on-his-luck Capt. Jack Sparrow feels the winds of ill-fortune blowing even more strongly when deadly ghost sailors led by his old nemesis, the evil Capt. Salazar, escape from the Devil's Triangle. Jack's only hope of survival lies in seeking out the legendary Trident of Poseidon, but to find it, he must forge an uneasy alliance with a brilliant and beautiful astronomer and a headstrong young man in the British navy. ",Action
Fetih 1453,"After the death of his father, Sultan Mehmet II takes the Ottoman throne and gathers his forces to lay siege to Constantinople. ",Action
Safe,Environmental illness sends a California wife (Julianne Moore) to a New Age guru's (Peter Friedman) clinic in New Mexico. ,Action
Premium Rush,"For bike messenger Wilee (Joseph Gordon-Levitt), dodging speeding cars, evading crazy cabdrivers, and blowing by millions of cranky pedestrians is all in a day's work. Wilee is one of the best in a dangerous job, and his bike of choice is a Fixie, a lightweight, single-gear unit without brakes. Though Wilee knows that one day he may end up as a smear on the pavement -- he is unprepared for what happens after his last run of the day turns into a life-or-death chase through Manhattan. ",Action
Bad Boys for Life,"The wife and son of a Mexican drug lord embark on a vengeful quest to kill all those involved in his trial and imprisonment -- including Miami Detective Mike Lowrey. When Mike gets wounded, he teams up with partner Marcus Burnett and AMMO -- a special tactical squad -- to bring the culprits to justice. But the old-school, wisecracking cops must soon learn to get along with their new elite counterparts if they are to take down the vicious cartel that threatens their lives. ",Action
12 Strong,"In the wake of Sept. 11, Capt. Mitch Nelson leads a U.S. Special Forces team into Afghanistan for an extremely dangerous mission. Once there, the soldiers develop an uneasy partnership with the Northern Alliance to take down the Taliban and its al-Qaida allies. Outgunned and outnumbered, Nelson and his forces face overwhelming odds in a fight against a ruthless enemy that takes no prisoners. ",Action
Sonic the Hedgehog 2,"The world's favorite blue hedgehog is back for a next-level adventure in SONIC THE HEDGEHOG 2. After settling in Green Hills, Sonic is eager to prove he has what it takes to be a true hero. His test comes when Dr. Robotnik returns, this time with a new partner, Knuckles, in search for an emerald that has the power to destroy civilizations. Sonic teams up with his own sidekick, Tails, and together they embark on a globe-trotting journey to find the emerald before it falls into the wrong hands. ",Action
Never Back Down,"Jake (Sean Faris) moves to Orlando, Fla., with his mother (Leslie Hope) and brother (Wyatt Smith). He feels like an outsider in his new school and frequently lets his temper flare out of control. But Jake wants to fit in, and he decides to go to a party with his classmate Baja (Amber Heard). There, Jake is pushed into a fight and humiliated. Another classmate (Evan Peters) sees what happened, and encourages Jake to visit martial arts trainer Jean Roqua (Djimon Hounsou). ",Action
The International,A group of poor street performers plans to protest the visiting military council. ,Action
Underworld: Rise of the Lycans,"Viktor (Bill Nighy), the cruel king of the vampires, has persecuted the Lycans for centuries. Young Lycan Lucian (Michael Sheen) rallies his people against Viktor and his Death Dealer warriors. With his secret lover Sonja (Rhona Mitra), a vampire, at his side, Lucian leads the werewolves in a final battle to break free of enslavement -- or die trying. ",Action
The Mechanic,"One of an elite group of assassins, Arthur Bishop (Jason Statham) may be the best in the business. Bishop carries out his assignments with precision, detachment and adherence to a strict code, but when Harry (Donald Sutherland), his close friend and mentor, is murdered, Bishop vows revenge. Harry's son (Ben Foster) comes to him with vengeance in his heart and a desire to learn Bishop's trade, signaling the birth of a deadly partnership. ",Action
National Treasure: Book of Secrets,"When a long-missing page from the diary of assassin John Wilkes Booth suddenly resurfaces, it implicates the great-great grandfather of treasure hunter Ben Gates (Nicolas Cage) as a conspirator in Lincoln's death. Ben's globetrotting quest to prove his ancestor's innocence leads him to a closely guarded book containing the nation's deepest secrets. ",Action
Sin City: A Dame to Kill For,"The damaged denizens of Sin City return for another round of stories from the mind of Frank Miller. In ""Just Another Saturday Night,"" Marv (Mickey Rourke) struggles to recall a nasty run-in with some frat boys. In ""A Dame to Kill For,"" Dwight McCarthy (Josh Brolin) forsakes his battle with his inner demons to help Ava Lord (Eva Green), the woman of his dreams and nightmares. In ""Nancy's Last Dance,"" Nancy Callahan (Jessica Alba), mad with grief and rage over Hartigan's death, vows revenge. ",Action
Flyboys,"Before the United States enters World War I, some American youths volunteer for the French military. Subsequently, they become the first U.S. fighter pilots and form a squadron known as the Lafayette Escadrille, whose exploits and heroism become the stuff of legend. ",Action
Terminator Salvation,"Although Judgment Day has in fact occurred, the future for which John Connor (Christian Bale) was prepared has been partly altered by the appearance of a stranger named Marcus Wright (Sam Worthington). Connor must determine if Wright has been rescued from the past, or sent from the future. As the machines prepare for a final battle, Connor and Wright delve deep into Skynet's heart, uncovering a secret that could lead to the annihilation of mankind. ",Action
Get Smart,"When members of the nefarious crime syndicate KAOS attack the U.S. spy agency Control, the Chief (Alan Arkin) has to promote his eager analyst Maxwell Smart (Steve Carell) to field agent. Smart, partnered with veteran Agent 99 (Anne Hathaway), blends inexperience, enthusiasm and ineptitude as he works to thwart a world-domination plot hatched by the wily KAOS chief, Siegfried (Terence Stamp). ",Action
War of the Worlds,"Dockworker Ray Ferrier (Tom Cruise) struggles to build a positive relationship with his two children, Rachel (Dakota Fanning) and Robbie (Justin Chatwin). When his ex-wife, Mary Ann (Miranda Otto), drops them off at Ferrier's house, it seems as though it will be just another tension-filled weekend. However, when electromagnetic pulses of lightning strike the area, the strange event turns out to be the beginning of an alien invasion, and Ferrier must now protect his children as they seek refuge. ",Action
A Walk Among the Tombstones,"Matt Scudder (Liam Neeson), formerly part of the NYPD, now works as an unlicensed private detective. His latest client is a drug trafficker (Dan Stevens) whose wife was kidnapped and brutally murdered, and as Scudder delves deeper, he finds that the crime's sequence is the modus operandi of the perpetrators. Before they can strike again and destroy other lives, Scudder races through the back streets of New York to catch the killers, blurring the lines between lawful and criminal as he goes. ",Action
Spartan,"When the president's daughter, Laura Newton (Kristen Bell), is kidnapped by a human trafficking ring, high-ranking Secret Service agent Robert Scott (Val Kilmer) takes on the case. With the assistance of his protégé, Curtis (Derek Luke), Robert begins investigating, but the operation is called off when Laura is reported dead. However, Robert and Curtis, who have discovered evidence to the contrary, continue their search, and soon find evidence of an elaborate government cover-up. ",Action
Ladder 49,"After saving the life of one of the civilians inside, firefighter Jack Morrison (Joaquin Phoenix) finds himself trapped in a burning warehouse with a broken leg. As his friend and mentor, Deputy Chief Mike Kennedy (John Travolta), tries to negotiate a rescue from without, Jack flashes back to various events in his life: the first, awkward days on the force, meeting the woman (Jacinda Barrett) who would become his wife and saving a small girl from a burning building. ",Action
Hostage,"The Holy Freedom Party of Allah hijacks a flight to Nairobi; two fathers (Kevin McCarthy, Wings Hauser) stage a hang-gliding rescue. ",Action
Cellular,"Schoolteacher Jessica Martin (Kim Basinger) is abducted by ruthless crook Ethan (Jason Statham) and brought to a remote hideout, where she finds a broken cell phone. Unfortunately, when she tries to use the malfunctioning phone to contact the authorities, she accidentally reaches college student Ryan (Chris Evans) instead. The young man wants to help Jessica, but she has no idea where her captors have taken her, and Ryan must scramble to figure out where she is before his cell phone goes dead. ",Action
Heist,The leader (Rick Jordan) of a Los Angeles gang plans to rob an armored truck to help his brother (Erik David). ,Action
Swordfish,"There exists a world within our world. A world beneath what we call cyberspace. A world protected by firewalls, passwords and the most advanced security systems. In this world we hide our deepest secrets, our most incriminating information, and of course, a whole lot of money. This is the world of ""Swordfish."" The world's most dangerous spy is hired by the CIA to coerce a computer hacker recently released from prison to help steal $6 billion in unused government funds. ",Action
The Four Feathers,An Englishman (Richard Arlen) fights in the Sudan after receiving white feathers of cowardice from his fiancee (Fay Wray) and friends. ,Action
Space Cowboys,"Clint Eastwood, Tommy Lee Jones, Donald Sutherland and James Garner star as a group of pilots whose time has come to serve their country and fulfill their dream of going to space. In 1958, the members of Team Daedalus, a group of top Air Force test pilots, were ready to serve their country as the first Americans in space. When NASA replaced the Air Force for outer atmospheric testing, they were pushed aside for a chimpanzee. The team retired, but the dream of going into space never died. ",Action
Taxi 2,A cabdriver (Samy Naceri) and a cop (Frédéric Diefenthal) race to Paris to rescue a love interest and the Japanese minister of defense from kidnappers. ,Action
The Man in the Iron Mask,A teenage villager finds out that he is the secret twin brother of the unpopular and cruel King Louis XIV of France. ,Action
Tomorrow Never Dies,"Media mogul Elliot Carver (Jonathan Pryce) wants his news empire to reach every country on the globe, but the Chinese government will not allow him to broadcast there. Carver doesn't take no for an answer and plans to use his media empire to fuel flames of war between the Western world and China. Thankfully, James Bond (Pierce Brosnan) is on to the insane news tycoon and travels to China to stop him with the help of Chinese secret agent Wai Lin (Michelle Yeoh). ",Action
Air Force One,"After making a speech in Moscow vowing to never negotiate with terrorists, President James Marshall (Harrison Ford) boards Air Force One with his family (Wendy Crewson, Liesel Matthews) and advisers. When a group of terrorists led by Ivan Korshunov (Gary Oldman) hijacks the flight, the President's principles are put to the test. Feigning escape, ex-solider Marshall stows away in the aircraft and must race against time to rescue his family and everyone else on board. ",Action
Executive Decision,"When terrorists hijack a plane traveling from Greece to Washington, D.C., U.S. Army specialist David Grant (Kurt Russell) and Lt. Colonel Austin Travis (Steven Seagal) join forces to bring the plane to safety. While terrorists on board the plane claim they hijacked the plane to force the U.S. government to release their leader, who was captured by military forces, David and Austin discover that the plane is carrying a bomb full of nerve gas to be released on Washington, D.C. ",Action
The Quick and the Dead,"During World War II, a pair of sisters come to the aid of an American patrol unit that was taken prisoner by the Germans. ",Action
Under Siege,"A heroic loner takes on a group of nuclear terrorists in this seagoing tale. Posing as a rock band, the terrorists get themselves hired for a party aboard the USS Missouri, a battleship en route to Pearl Harbor for decommissioning. They plan to steal the ship's nuclear arsenal but haven't reckoned on the intervention of the ship's chef, a decorated former Navy SEAL. ",Action
The Rocketeer,"A ""Star Wars"" fan goes to extreme lengths to obtain the ultimate collectible. ",Action
Rambo: First Blood Part II,"John Rambo (Sylvester Stallone) is doing hard time in jail when his former boss, Col. Troutman (Richard Crenna), offers him a deal. If Rambo travels to Vietnam to try to find the American prisoners of war, his criminal record will be expunged. Rambo takes the reconnaissance assignment and agrees not to get involved in any of the action. However, when his Vietnamese lover, Co Bao (Julia Nickson), is killed by American forces, Rambo forgets his promise and takes matters into his own hands. ",Action
Octopussy,"James Bond (Roger Moore) may have met his match in Octopussy (Maud Adams), an entrancing beauty involved in a devastating military plot to destroy détente. From the palaces of India to a speeding circus train in Germany and a mid-air battle on the wing of a high-flying jet, only Agent 007 can stop the nightmarish scheme! ",Action
Diamonds Are Forever,"While investigating mysterious activities in the world diamond market, 007 (Sean Connery) discovers that his evil nemesis Blofeld (Charles Gray) is stockpiling the gems to use in his deadly laser satellite. With the help of beautiful smuggler Tiffany Case (Jill St. John), Bond sets out to stop the madman -- as the fate of the world hangs in the balance! ",Action
Batman: The Movie,"Kaaapowie! Holy feature film, Batman ... one based on the tongue-in-cheek, campy 1960's television series. Watch Batman (Adam West) and Robin (Burt Ward) battle sharks, Catwoman, The Joker and The Riddler on the big screen. Can they try to prevent the bad guys from taking over the world? With a wham! and a pow! and a zip! ... our heroes just might win. ",Action
Greenland,"John Garrity, his estranged wife and their young son embark on a perilous journey to find sanctuary as a planet-killing comet hurtles toward Earth. Amid terrifying accounts of cities getting leveled, the Garrity's experience the best and worst in humanity. As the countdown to the global apocalypse approaches zero, their incredible trek culminates in a desperate and last-minute flight to a possible safe haven. ",Action
Peppermint,"When a friend invites him to a party, a preoccupied aircraft-engineer reminisces about events in his life. ",Action
Revenge,"A woman tries ESP to find her husband (Bradford Dillman), imprisoned in a madwoman's (Shelley Winters) basement. ",Action
Angel Has Fallen,"Authorities take Secret Service agent Mike Banning into custody for the failed assassination attempt of U.S. President Allan Trumbull. After escaping from his captors, Banning must evade the FBI and his own agency to find the real threat to the president. Desperate to uncover the truth, he soon turns to unlikely allies to help clear his name and save the country from imminent danger. ",Action
The Angry Birds Movie 2,"Red, Chuck, Bomb and the rest of their feathered friends are surprised when a green pig suggests that they put aside their differences and unite to fight a common threat. Aggressive birds from an island covered in ice are planning to use an elaborate weapon to destroy the fowl and swine way of life. After picking their best and brightest, the birds and pigs come up with a scheme to infiltrate the island, deactivate the device and return to their respective paradises intact. ",Animation
Escape Room,"To celebrate his 30th birthday, Typer and his six friends try an escape room challenge. The special mission for escaping a room in one hour starts, and the members immediately notice that the challenge is deadly and difficult. ",Action
Batman: The Killing Joke,Batman (Kevin Conroy) must save Commissioner Gordon (Ray Wise) from the Joker's (Mark Hamill) twisted quest to drive him insane. ,Animation
Shaft,"John Shaft Jr. may be an FBI cyber security expert, but to uncover the truth behind his best friend's untimely death, he needs an education that only his dad can provide. Absent throughout his childhood, the legendary John Shaft agrees to help his son navigate the heroin-infested underbelly of Harlem, N.Y. Besides, the locked and loaded Shaft has his own score to settle -- both professional and personal. ",Action
Now You See Me 2,"After fleeing from a stage show, the illusionists (Jesse Eisenberg, Woody Harrelson) known as the Four Horsemen find themselves in more trouble in Macau, China. Devious tech wizard Walter Mabry (Daniel Radcliffe) forces the infamous magicians to steal a powerful chip that can control all of the world's computers. Meanwhile, vengeful FBI agent Dylan Rhodes (Mark Ruffalo) hatches his own plot against Thaddeus Bradley (Morgan Freeman), the man he blames for the death of his father. ",Action
Batman v Superman: Dawn of Justice,"It's been nearly two years since Superman's (Henry Cavill) colossal battle with Zod (Michael Shannon) devastated the city of Metropolis. The loss of life and collateral damage left many feeling angry and helpless, including crime-fighting billionaire Bruce Wayne (Ben Affleck). Convinced that Superman is now a threat to humanity, Batman embarks on a personal vendetta to end his reign on Earth, while the conniving Lex Luthor (Jesse Eisenberg) launches his own crusade against the Man of Steel. ",Action
The Purge: Anarchy,"One night per year, the government sanctions a 12-hour period in which citizens can commit any crime they wish -- including murder -- without fear of punishment or imprisonment. Leo, a sergeant who lost his son, plans a vigilante mission of revenge during the mayhem. However, instead of a death-dealing avenger, he becomes the unexpected protector of four innocent strangers who desperately need his help if they are to survive the night. ",Action
Son of a Gun,A woman becomes pregnant after being struck by a stray bullet during the Civil War. ,Action
Need for Speed,"Tobey Marshall (Aaron Paul), a mechanic, races muscle cars in an underground circuit. Struggling to keep his business afloat, he reluctantly partners with wealthy but treacherous Dino Brewster (Dominic Cooper). However, Dino frames Tobey for a crime that sends him to prison. Two years later, Tobey is out and bent on revenge; his only chance to take down Dino is to beat him in a high-stakes race. But to get there in time, he must successfully evade an army of cops and bounty hunters. ",Action
Live by Night,"It's the Roaring `20s and Prohibition hasn't stopped the flow of booze in an underground network of gangster-run speakeasies. The opportunity to gain power and money is there for any man with enough ambition and nerve, and Joe Coughlin, the son of the Boston Police superintendent, long ago turned his back on his strict upbringing for the spoils of being an outlaw. But even among criminals there are rules, and Joe breaks a big one: crossing a powerful mob boss by stealing his money and his moll. ",Action
The Rover,"In the near future, mankind's greed and excesses have pushed civilization to the breaking point. Society is in decline, and the rule of law has disintegrated. Hardened drifter Eric (Guy Pearce) wanders across this dangerous and desolate landscape. When thieves steal Eric's car -- and only remaining possession -- they leave behind Rey (Robert Pattinson), a wounded comrade. Eric forces Rey to help him hunt down the gang in an unrelenting quest to take back the one thing that matters to him. ",Action
Redirected,"Four friends become stranded in Eastern Europe and have to become hit men, prostitutes, corrupt cops, smugglers and more to make it home. ",Action
Valerian and the City of a Thousand Planets,"In the 28th century, special operatives Valerian (Dane DeHaan) and Laureline work together to maintain order throughout the human territories. Under assignment from the minister of defense, the duo embarks on a mission to Alpha, an ever-expanding metropolis where diverse species gather to share knowledge and culture. When a dark force threatens the peaceful city, Valerian and Laureline must race against time to identify the menace that also jeopardizes the future of the universe. ",Action
Dead Man Down,"Rising gangland player Victor (Colin Farrell) infiltrates the criminal empire run by Alphonse (Terrence Howard), but his aim is not to accumulate prestige and power. Instead, Victor's mission is to make Alphonse pay for destroying his once-happy life. Victor's machinations have not gone unnoticed; Beatrice (Noomi Rapace), his neighbor, watches and waits. When she uncovers Victor's secret, she threatens to expose him unless he helps her carry out her own campaign of revenge. ",Action
How I Live Now,"As conflict in Europe escalates, an American teen (Saoirse Ronan) fights to survive in the English countryside. ",Action
Kill List,Events take a darker turn as a contract killer (Neil Maskell) and his business partner (Michael Smiley) carry out a new assignment. ,Action
Colombiana,"In 1992 Bogota, a little girl (Amandla Stenberg) watches crime lord Don Luis (Beto Benites) and his henchman Marco (Jordi Mollà) murder her parents. Fifteen years later, the now-grown Cataleya (Zoe Saldana), who is named for a Colombian orchid, works as a contract killer for her Chicago-based uncle (Cliff Curtis). Leaving a lipstick drawing of her namesake on every victim, Cataleya carries out her assignments with cold, frightening efficiency and dreams of avenging her family. ",Action
Here Comes the Boom,"Once a collegiate wrestler, Scott Voss (Kevin James) is now a 42-year-old, apathetic biology teacher in a failing high school. When cutbacks threaten the school's music program and its teacher (Henry Winkler), Scott springs into action. He dusts off his long-unused wrestling skills and earns money for the program by moonlighting as a mixed martial arts fighter. Though the school nurse (Salma Hayek) thinks he's crazy, Scott gains something he never expected, and the school rallies behind him. ",Action
Savages,"Wendy Savage (Laura Linney), a struggling playwright, has little to do with her brother, Jon (Philip Seymour Hoffman), a college professor and author. However, the siblings must find a way to work together when their father, Lenny (Philip Bosco), slides into senility and must be placed in a nursing home. ",Action
Act of Valor,"When its latest mission leads to the discovery of a deadly terrorist plot against the U.S., an elite team of Navy SEALs sets out on a global manhunt. As the men of Bandito Platoon race to stop an attack that could kill or maim thousands of American civilians, they must balance their commitment to their duty and family back home. Each new piece of intelligence they gather reveals a shocking twist to the plot as they track the terrorist ring to the U.S.- Mexico border. ",Action
Triple Frontier,"Former Special Forces operatives reunite to plan a heist in a sparsely populated multi-border zone of South America. For the first time in their prestigious careers, these unsung heroes undertake this dangerous mission for themselves instead of the country. But when events take an unexpected turn and threaten to spiral out of control, their skills, their loyalties, and their morals are pushed to a breaking point in an epic battle for survival. ",Action
Faster,"MotoGP riders, Max Biaggi, Garry McCoy and John Hopkins come up with plans and machines to beat world champion Valentino Rossi. ",Action
Riddick,"Left for dead on a sun-scorched planet, fugitive Riddick (Vin Diesel) fights for survival against alien predators more lethal than any human he has yet encountered. His only hope for escape is to activate an emergency beacon, but that brings with it a different problem: mercenaries. The first ship carries an especially violent and lethal group; the second is led by a man from Riddick's past. With time running out, Riddick realizes that neither group will leave without his head as trophy. ",Action
The Expendables,"Mercenary leader Barney Ross (Sylvester Stallone) and his loyal men take on what they think is a routine assignment: a covert operation to invade the South American country of Vilena and overthrow its dictator. But, when they learn that the job will be a suicide mission, they must choose redemption or the destruction of their brotherhood. ",Action
Army of Thieves,"In this prequel to Zack Snyder's Army of the Dead, small-town bank teller Dieter gets drawn into the adventure of a lifetime when a mysterious woman recruits him to join a crew of Interpol's most wanted criminals, attempting to heist a sequence of legendary, impossible-to-crack safes across Europe. ",Action
The Lone Ranger,"In 1933 a boy discovers an ancient Native American in a sideshow carnival tent. The Indian is Tonto (Johnny Depp), the old companion of John Reid (Armie Hammer), a lawman more famously known as the Lone Ranger. With this opportunity to set the record straight about his and Reid's adventures, Tonto recalls the day in 1869 when he first encountered the man who would be his trusted friend and tells of their teamwork bringing down Butch Cavendish (William Fichtner) and other Old West outlaws. ",Action
Black Death,New York's mayor puts off panic in the city while a doctor (Kate Jackson) has a pneumonia epidemic on her hands. ,Action
From Paris with Love,"James Reese (Jonathan Rhys Meyers) has a good job as an ambassador's aid in France, but his real passion is a side gig, working in a minor role in the CIA. He would love to be a full-fledged agent and can't believe his luck when he lands an assignment with Charlie Wax (John Travolta). Trigger-happy Charlie soon has James crying for his desk job, but when he learns that the same guys they're trying to catch are after him, James realizes that Charlie may be his only hope of survival. ",Action
Thor: Love and Thunder,"""Thor: Love and Thunder"" finds Thor (Chris Hemsworth) on a journey unlike anything he's ever faced -- a quest for inner peace. But his retirement is interrupted by a galactic killer known as Gorr the God Butcher (Christian Bale), who seeks the extinction of the gods. To combat the threat, Thor enlists the help of King Valkyrie (Tessa Thompson), Korg (Taika Waititi) and ex-girlfriend Jane Foster (Natalie Portman), who -- to Thor's surprise -- inexplicably wields his magical hammer, Mjolnir, as the Mighty Thor. Together, they embark upon a harrowing cosmic adventure to uncover the mystery of the God Butcher's vengeance and stop him before it's too late. ",Action
Salt,"A woman takes slow, agonizing revenge on her abusive, cheating husband. ",Action
Godzilla,"During a nuclear test, the French government inadvertently mutates a lizard nest; years later, a giant lizard makes its way to New York City. Dr. Niko Tatopoulos (Matthew Broderick), an expert on the effects of radiation on animals, is sent by the U.S. government to study the beast. When the creature, dubbed ""Godzilla"" by news outlets, emerges, a massive battle with the military begins. To make matters worse, Niko discovers that Godzilla has laid a nest of 200 eggs, which are ready to hatch. ",Action
Death Race,"Framed for a murder he did not commit, three-time speedway champ Jensen Ames (Jason Statham) finds himself at Terminal Island, the country's toughest prison, but he gets an unexpected chance at freedom when the warden offers a choice: Compete in the Death Race as a mythical driver called Frankenstein, or rot in a cell forever. Riding in a car equipped with flamethrowers and grenade launchers, Ames must survive a gauntlet of vicious criminals to win his freedom -- or die trying. ",Action
Hancock,"A scruffy superhero named Hancock (Will Smith) protects the citizens of Los Angeles but leaves horrendous collateral damage in the wake of every well-intentioned feat. That's OK with Hancock; he doesn't care what people think and is just as likely to be found dozing on a park bench as saving a damsel in distress. However, after saving the life of a PR executive (Jason Bateman) and meeting the man's beautiful wife (Charlize Theron), he realizes that he may have a sensitive side after all. ",Action
Daybreakers,"Ten years after a plague turns most of the world's population into vampires, a critical blood shortage causes panic and gruesome mutations among the reanimated. Edward (Ethan Hawke), a vampire hematologist, tries to develop a blood substitute when he meets Lionel (Willem Dafoe) and Audrey (Claudia Karvan), two fugitive humans who claim to have a possible cure. Edward casts his lot with them in the hope of perfecting the cure before it's too late. ",Action
Chaos,"Chaos is set in a restricted region of the city where gambling, prostitution, and drugs reign, and police dare not enter. ",Action
Blood Work,"FBI profiler Terry McCaleb (Clint Eastwood) was hot on the trail of ""The Code Killer"" when a heart attack put him out of commission. A heart transplant later, Terry spends his time in the harbor on his houseboat -- that is, until he starts to investigate the facts surrounding his transplant. His donor was a murder victim, and the murder is still unsolved. With the help of his seaside neighbor, Buddy (Jeff Daniels), and over the protests of his doctor, Terry reopens the case. ",Action
Basic,"During a special operations training mission in Panama, four U.S. soldiers are killed mysteriously, and their leader, Sgt. Nathan West (Samuel L. Jackson), goes missing. A military investigator, Capt. Julia Osborne (Connie Nielsen), has trouble convincing the two survivors to talk about what happened that night. A more experienced investigator, Tom Hardy (John Travolta), is brought in to crack the case. However, when the survivors do start talking, their stories differ from one another. ",Action
Star Trek: Nemesis,"Capt. Jean-Luc Picard (Patrick Stewart) diverts the starship Enterprise from its scheduled trip to Cmdr. Riker (Jonathan Frakes) and Counselor Troi's (Marina Sirtis) wedding to negotiate a peace treaty with the Romulans. Picard is shocked when Shinzon (Tom Hardy), the new Praetor of the Romulans, admits to being a clone of him. When the crew members discover a break-in on their computer, they are forced into a life-or-death battle to stop Shinzon's Warbird before it can destroy the Earth. ",Action
Rat Race,"In an ensemble film about easy money, greed, manipulation and bad driving, a Las Vegas casino tycoon entertains his wealthiest high rollers -- a group that will bet on anything -- by pitting six ordinary people against each other in a wild dash for $2 million jammed into a locker hundreds of miles away. The tycoon and his wealthy friends monitor each racer's every move to keep track of their favorites. The only rule in this race is that there are no rules. ",Action
The Perfect Storm,"Based on a true story, the film tells of the courageous men and women who risk their lives every working day, pitting their fishing boats and rescue vessels against the capricious forces of nature. Their worst fears are realized at sea on Halloween of 1991, when they are confronted by three raging weather fronts which unexpectedly collide to produce the greatest, fiercest storm in modern history -- ""The Perfect Storm."" ",Action
Final Fantasy: The Spirits Within,"Blurring the lines between reality and computer animation, Final Fantasy: The Spirits Within is the first feature-length motion picture that brings vivid photoRealism to computer-generated, human characters. The thrilling, futuristic action-adventure pits the earth and its people against the ultimate enemy - mysterious aliens that steal the energy from all living things on the planet. ",Animation
Behind Enemy Lines,"During a special forces operation to prevent a Vietnamese general from purchasing nuclear triggers, Mike Weston's (Thomas Ian Griffith) partner, Jones (Chris Mulkey), is taken hostage. Mike escapes with the triggers and quits the Army. A year later, he learns Jones is still a prisoner in the jungle and decides to cooperate with the Army on a mission to rescue his friend. After arriving in Vietnam disguised as a tourist, Mike is captured by the general's men and taken to the prison camp. ",Action
The Siege,"In December 1996, Peruvian guerrillas take hostages at the house of Japanese Ambassador Morihisa Aoki. ",Action
Star Trek: Insurrection,"A Federation mission to the planet Ba'ku takes a dangerous turn when a malfunctioning android, Data (Brent Spiner), takes a cultural task force hostage. When Capt. Picard (Patrick Stewart) and his crew investigate, they uncover the truth about the Federation mission: It was actually a systematic ploy by the Son'a to displace the peaceful inhabitants of Ba'ku. Now Picard and his crew must thwart the plot even while experiencing strange side effects from exposure to the planet's surface. ",Action
Last Man Standing,"Loyal to nobody but himself, John Smith (Bruce Willis) hires his services out to Fredo Strozzi (Ned Eisenberg), a bootlegging gangster who operates in a drab Texas town. However, he is quick to trade information to Strozzi's rival, Doyle (David Patrick Kelly). Then, having learned about Doyle's infatuation with beautiful Felina (Karina Lombard), Smith uses her to push both bosses into full-scale bloodshed. The only one who suspects anything is Hickey (Christopher Walken), Doyle's lieutenant. ",Action
DragonHeart,"Disillusioned knight Bowen (Dennis Quaid) befriends Draco (Sean Connery), the last of the dragons, and the two begin scamming village folk as Bowen repeatedly ""kills"" Draco for money. Bowen soon learns that Draco is the same dragon who once saved his former student, now King Einon (David Thewlis), from death by giving him a piece of his heart. Einon is now a merciless tyrant, and Bowen is compelled to stop him -- but the bond between king and dragon means if one dies, the other does as well. ",Action
The Prophecy,"Evil angel Gabriel (Christopher Walken) has come to earth to strengthen his powers by claiming the wicked spirit of a psychotic veteran. The benevolent angel, Simon (Eric Stoltz), want to stop that from happening, so hides the man's spirit where Gabriel would least expect to find it: in a little girl (Moriah Shining Dove Snyder). Caught in a cosmic battle in which even Lucifer (Viggo Mortensen) plays a part, a liturgically minded cop (Elias Koteas) moves heaven and earth to protect the child. ",Action
Just Cause,"Paul Armstrong (Sean Connery), a law professor who staunchly fights the death penalty, is lured into defending a death row inmate, Bobby Earl Ferguson (Blair Underwood), convicted of rape and murder. Ferguson is there due to a coerced confession at the hands of a snarling local sheriff (Laurence Fishburne). Armstrong starts to suspect that a psychotic serial killer (Ed Harris) may be the real culprit. But the deeper Armstrong gets, the more he realizes he doesn't know who's innocent at all. ",Action
Last Action Hero,"Following the death of his father, young Danny Madigan (Austin O'Brien) takes comfort in watching action movies featuring the indestructible Los Angeles cop Jack Slater (Arnold Schwarzenegger). After being given a magic ticket by theater manager Nick (Robert Prosky), Danny is sucked into the screen and bonds with Slater. When evil fictional villain Benedict (Charles Dance) gets his hands on the ticket and enters the real world, Danny and Jack must follow and stop him. ",Action
Darkman,"When thugs employed by a crime boss lead a vicious assault on Dr. Peyton Wilder (Liam Neeson), leaving him literally and psychologically scarred, an emergency procedure allows him to survive. Upon his recovery, Wilder can find solace only by returning to his scientific work developing synthetic skin, and seeking revenge against the crime boss. He assumes a phantom avenger persona called Darkman, who, with malleable facial qualities, is able to infiltrate and sow terror in the criminal community. ",Action
Lock Up,A Canadian lifer (Winston Rekert) and two other convicts take a prison reformer (Andrée Pelletier) and some of her colleagues hostage. ,Action
The Omega Man,"Led by a former TV newscaster (Anthony Zerbe), light-sensitive mutants stalk the last normal man (Charlton Heston) on Earth. ",Action
Eternals,"Marvel Studios' Eternals features an exciting new team of Super Heroes in the Marvel Cinematic Universe, ancient aliens who have been living on Earth in secret for thousands of years. Following the events of Avengers: Endgame, an unexpected tragedy forces them out of the shadows to reunite against mankind's most ancient enemy, the Deviants. ",Action
My Spy,"Nine-year-old Sophie catches JJ, a hardened CIA operative, spying on her family during a routine surveillance operation. In exchange for not blowing his cover, JJ begrudgingly agrees to show the precocious girl how to be a spy. What at first seems like an easy task soon turns into a battle of wits as Sophie proves you don't need much experience to outsmart a seasoned agent. ",Action
Red Notice,"In the world of international crime, an Interpol agent attempts to hunt down and capture the world's most wanted art thief. ",Action
Guns Akimbo,"Miles is a video game developer who inadvertently becomes the next participant in a real-life death match that streams online. While Miles soon excels at running away from everything, that won't help him outlast Nix, a killer at the top of her game. ",Action
7500,A pilot fights to maintain control of his airliner as terrorists storm the cockpit. ,Action
ARQ,"The oil supply has run dry, and corporations fight against nations for the world's remaining energy supplies. Trapped in a house and surrounded by a gang of mysterious masked intruders, an engineer (Robbie Amell) must protect a technology that could deliver unlimited energy and end the wars that have consumed the world. The only problem is that the technology has created a time loop that condemns him and his friends to relive the same day over and over. ",Action
Bright,"In an alternate present day, humans, orcs, elves and fairies have been coexisting since the beginning of time. Two police officers, one a human, the other an orc, embark on a routine night patrol that will alter the future of their world as they know it. Battling both their own personal differences as well as an onslaught of enemies, they must work together to protect a young female elf and a thought-to-be-forgotten relic, which, in the wrong hands, could destroy everything. ",Action
Free Fire,"When a black-market arms deal goes outrageously wrong, Justine finds herself caught in the crossfire, forced to navigate through a warehouse full of trigger-happy madmen who are all hanging on for dear life. ",Action
Polar,A private detective (Jean-François Balmer) ponders another profession until a mysterious woman hires him to solve her roommate's murder. ,Action
The Shallows,"Still reeling from the loss of her mother, medical student Nancy Adams (Blake Lively) travels to a secluded beach for some much-needed solace. Despite the danger of surfing alone, Nancy decides to soak up the sun and hit the waves. Suddenly, a great white shark attacks, forcing her to swim to a giant rock for safety. Left injured and stranded 200 yards from shore, the frightened young woman must fight for her life as the deadly predator circles her in its feeding ground. ",Action
Maze Runner: The Scorch Trials,"Transported to a remote fortified outpost, Thomas and his fellow teenage Gladers find themselves in trouble after uncovering a diabolical plot from the mysterious and powerful organization WCKD. With help from a new ally, the Gladers stage a daring escape into the Scorch, a desolate landscape filled with dangerous obstacles and crawling with the virus-infected Cranks. The Gladers only hope may be to find the Right Hand, a group of resistance fighters who can help them battle WCKD. ",Action
Risen,A rogue government agent threatens to unleash an unspeakable evil upon humanity. ,Action
Criminal,"The film follows the trials and tribulations of Munna, an orphaned child of a criminal mother, who must rise against the doubts of his foster family that considers him as a criminal in the making. ",Action
Bastille Day,A rogue CIA agent (Idris Elba) forms an unlikely partnership with a pickpocket (Richard Madden) to stop a terrorist conspiracy in Paris. ,Action
White House Down,"Capitol police officer John Cale (Channing Tatum) has just been denied his dream job of protecting President James Sawyer (Jamie Foxx) as a member of the Secret Service. Not wanting to disappoint his young daughter with the bad news, Cale takes her on a tour of the White House. While he and his daughter are there, a heavily armed paramilitary group attacks and seizes control. As the nation's government dissolves in chaos, only Cale can save his daughter, the president and the country. ",Action
Spectral,Soldiers battle supernatural forces in New York. ,Action
Angry Birds,"Flightless birds lead a mostly happy existence, except for Red (Jason Sudeikis), who just can't get past the daily annoyances of life. His temperament leads him to anger management class, where he meets fellow misfits Chuck (Josh Gad) and Bomb. Red becomes even more agitated when his feathered brethren welcome green pigs to their island paradise. As the swine begin to get under his skin, Red joins forces with Chuck and Bomb to investigate the real reason behind their mysterious arrival. ",Animation
Unlocked,An unsuspecting senior in college takes a job as a door-to-door salesman and discovers it's only a scam to rob houses. ,Action
Scouts Guide to the Zombie Apocalypse,"What could possibly go wrong when three buddies (Tye Sheridan, Logan Miller, Joey Morgan) decide to join the Boy Scouts? When bloodthirsty, undead ghouls invade their once-peaceful town, it's up to kindhearted Ben, quick-witted Carter and class clown Augie to save the day. With help from Denise (Sarah Dumont), a beautiful but tough cocktail waitress, the boys must put their scouting skills to the ultimate test to save mankind and earn their zombie-killing badges. ",Action
Triple 9,"Bullets fly on the Atlanta freeway as armed thieves make their getaway following a bank robbery in broad daylight. Unhappy with the results, ruthless gangster Irina Vlaslov orders the men to pull off another job. One member of the team is Marcus Belmont (Anthony Mackie), a crooked cop who gets saddled with Chris Allen (Casey Affleck), his new but incorruptible police partner. As Belmont and his cohorts lay the groundwork for the heist, they come up with a devious plan to use Allen as their pawn. ",Action
Johnny English Reborn,"After a disastrous mission in Mozambique, British agent Johnny English (Rowan Atkinson) has retreated to a Tibetan monastery to try to forget his shame. But when he receives an urgent call from MI-7 to lead a mission that only he can handle, English is back in action. Using his questionable combat skills and an assortment of high-tech gadgets, English, along with his new partner, Agent Tucker (Daniel Kaluuya), must foil a plot to kill the Chinese premier. ",Action
This Means War,"CIA operatives FDR Foster (Chris Pine) and Tuck (Tom Hardy) are inseparable best friends and partners. Together, their good looks, covert abilities and combat skills rank them among the CIA's elite, but their longstanding personal and professional bond is put to the test when they meet Lauren (Reese Witherspoon). FDR and Tuck both fall hard for the beautiful blonde, turning their deadly skills and an array of high-tech gadgetry against each other in an all-out battle for her love. ",Action
The Commuter,"Insurance salesman Michael is on his daily commute home, which quickly becomes anything but routine. After being contacted by a mysterious stranger, Michael is forced to uncover the identity of a hidden passenger on the train before the last stop. As he works against the clock to solve the puzzle, he realizes a deadly plan is unfolding, and he is unwittingly caught up in a criminal conspiracy that carries life and death stakes for everyone on the train. ",Action
The Last Stand,"Posing as a notorious outlaw to join the gang, Tip Douglas goes after cattle rustlers who murdered his father. ",Action
Underworld: Awakening,"In the years since she and her human-lycan lover, Michael, defeated Elder Marcus, vampire warrior Selene (Kate Beckinsale) has been taken captive by humans, while they wage an all-out war against both lycans and vampires. Awakening after more than a decade, Selene discovers that Michael is dead, but that she has given birth to his daughter, Eve. Shunned by nearly all surviving vampires, save one (Theo James), even Selene seems powerless against her latest opponent: a genetically enhanced lycan. ",Action
Central Intelligence,"Bullied as a teen for being overweight, Bob Stone (Dwayne Johnson) shows up to his high school reunion looking fit and muscular. While there, he finds Calvin Joyner (Kevin Hart), a fast-talking accountant who misses his glory days as a popular athlete. Stone is now a lethal CIA agent who needs Calvin's number skills to help him save the compromised U.S. spy satellite system. Together, the former classmates encounter shootouts, espionage and double-crosses while trying to prevent worldwide chaos. ",Action
Uncharted,"Members of a documentary film crew are stranded on a remote island after their plane goes down, and some members of the group begin to fear there is more living on the island than the animals they've come to film. ",Action
The American,"When an assignment in Sweden ends badly, master assassin Jack (George Clooney) retreats to the Italian countryside with the intention of remaining anonymous. In an uncharacteristic move, he becomes friends with a local priest and pursues a torrid romance with a beautiful woman (Violante Placido). But by stepping out of the shadows, Jack may be making a fatal mistake. ",Action
Jack the Giant Slayer,"When young farmhand Jack (Nicholas Hoult) unwittingly opens a portal between his realm and a race of giants, it rekindles an ancient war. Roaming Earth for the first time in centuries, the fearsome giants seek to reclaim the land they lost long ago. Jack has to face an army of foes that he thought existed only in legend, but through his arduous fight for the kingdom and its people, he may win the love of a brave princess, perhaps becoming a legend himself. ",Action
Terminator Genisys,"When John Connor (Jason Clarke), leader of the human resistance against Skynet, sends Kyle Reese (Jai Courtney) back to 1984 to protect his mother, Sarah (Emilia Clarke), from a Terminator assassin, an unexpected turn of events creates an altered timeline. Instead of a scared waitress, Sarah is a skilled fighter and has a Terminator guardian (Arnold Schwarzenegger) by her side. Faced with unlikely allies and dangerous new enemies, Reese sets out on an unexpected new mission: reset the future. ",Action
Ghost in the Shell,"In this Japanese animation, cyborg federal agent Maj. Motoko Kusanagi (Mimi Woods) trails ""The Puppet Master"" (Abe Lasser), who illegally hacks into the computerized minds of cyborg-human hybrids. Her pursuit of a man who can modify the identity of strangers leaves Motoko pondering her own makeup and what life might be like if she had more human traits. With her partner (Richard George), she corners the hacker, but her curiosity about her identity sends the case in an unforeseen direction. ",Action
The Necessary Death of Charlie Countryman,"In Romania, an American tourist (Shia LaBeouf) falls for the estranged wife (Evan Rachel Wood) of a brutal gangster (Mads Mikkelsen). ",Action
Ninja Assassin,"Trained in methods of killing from an early age, Raizo (Rain) is a member of the secret clan of assassins known as the Ozunu. After the Ozunu kill his friend, however, Raizo breaks free from them and vanishes. Meanwhile, Europol agent Mika Coretti (Naomie Harris) discovers a money trail linking the the group to murders. Raizo saves Mika from his former comrades and joins forces with her to bring down the Ozunu forever. ",Action
Death Wish,"Once a mild-mannered liberal, New York City architect Paul Kersey (Charles Bronson) snaps when intruders break into his home, murdering his wife (Hope Lange) and violently raping his daughter. A business trip to Tucson, Ariz., lands him a gift from a client, a revolver he uses to patrol the streets when he returns home. Frustrated that the police cannot find the intruders, he become a vigilante, gunning down any criminal that crosses his path. The public finds this vigilantism heroic. ",Action
Centurion,"In ancient Scotland, the Ninth Legion liberates a Roman officer named Quintus Dias (Michael Fassbender) from his Pict captors. The soldiers are in pursuit of the Pict leader, and Quintus joins their quest. Soon afterward, the Romans' Pict guide betrays them, resulting in the slaughter of all but a handful of men. The Roman survivors try desperately to reach safety, as the indigenous warriors pick them off one by one. ",Action
Knight and Day,"June Havens (Cameron Diaz) chats up her charming seatmate on a flight out of Kansas, but she doesn't realize that she will soon land in the middle of an international adventure. The fellow passenger, Roy Miller (Tom Cruise), is a covert operative who claims he has been set up to take a fall. Now his reluctant partner, June must dodge bullets in Boston, leap rooftops in Austria and evade bulls in Spain, while she and Roy learn that trust is the most important survival skill. ",Action
The Collector,"A young, beautiful Malibu girl pursues countless men to fulfill her desires. ",Action
The Losers,Tackling the darker issues plaguing rural towns of Taiwan from illegal dumping to substance abuse. ,Action
Beowulf,"In the age of heroes, a mighty warrior named Beowulf (Ray Winstone) arrives at the court of King Hrothgar (Anthony Hopkins) and offers to rid the kingdom of a vicious demon called Grendel. He successfully slays the beast but thus incurs the wrath of Grendel's mother (Angelina Jolie), a creature as vicious and vengeful as she is seductive. ",Animation
Sky High,"Immigration officer Grant Newbury (Tom Mix) is sent to investigate the smuggling of Chinese immigrants over the Mexican border. Tipped off to Grant's arrival, the smugglers' leader, Bullet Bates (Sid Jordan), ambushes Grant -- who is then unexpectedly freed by Estelle Halloway (Eva Novak), a young, lost girl he had aided earlier. As Grant flees Bates' camp to summon assistance, Bates takes Estelle hostage, unaware that she is the daughter of his boss, Jim (John Farrell MacDonald). ",Action
Assault on Precinct 13,"While en route to prison, a bus carrying criminals Marion (Laurence Fishburne), Beck (John Leguizamo) and Anna (Aisha Hinds) is rerouted to Detroit's soon-to-be-closed Precinct 13 because of a dangerous winter storm. All communications with the outside world are cut off, and Jake (Ethan Hawke), an emotionally volatile police sergeant who is haunted by his past, is forced to work with the criminals in order to survive an attack on the precinct by a group of armed men. ",Action
Transporter 2,"Mercenary Frank Martin (Jason Statham) has accepted a job that seems easy enough, as chauffeur and bodyguard to young Jack (Hunter Clary), son of crusading politician Jefferson Billings (Matthew Modine). The problem is that Billings is crusading against an international drug cartel. They retaliate by kidnapping Jack and infecting him with a deadly and highly contagious virus. Responsible for the boy, Frank must reclaim him and then find an antidote before scores of innocents are stricken. ",Action
Astro Boy,"In futuristic Metro City, a brilliant scientist named Tenma builds Astro Boy (Freddie Highmore), a robotic child with superstrength, X-ray vision and the ability to fly. Astro Boy sets out to explore the world and find acceptance, learning what being human is all about in the process. Finding that his friends and family in Metro City are in danger, he uses his incredible powers to save all that he loves. ",Animation
Revolver,"Paralyzed by an assassin, an undercover agent (Robert Urich) in a wheelchair goes up against global merchants of death. ",Action
Paycheck,"Michael Jennings (Ben Affleck) is a top-notch reverse engineer. Corporations pay him to crack the secrets of their competitors' products. When the job is done, he has his memory of it erased. Rethrick (Aaron Eckhart), head of a company called Allcom, hires Jennings to reverse-engineer a secret government device. After the job, Jennings wakes from the memory erasure to find himself being chased by various agencies. He soon realizes that the fate of the entire world may be in his hands. ",Action
Once Upon a Time in Mexico,"Return of the mythic guitar-slinging hero, El Mariachi (Antonio Banderas), in the final installment of the Mariachi/Desperado trilogy. The saga continues as El Mariachi makes his way across a rugged landscape on the blood trail of Barrillo (Willem Dafoe), a cartel kingpin with one last score to settle who is planning a coup d'etat against the president of Mexico. Enlisted by Sands (Johnny Depp), a corrupt CIA agent, El Mariachi demands retribution. ",Action
Proof of Life,"In this romantic drama, Peter Bowman, an American engineer in a Latin American country is captured by anti-government forces. When the rebels learn his identity they demand $6 million for his safe return. However, his US employer is on the verge of insolvency and will not provide the ransom. Peter's wife Alice is forced to deal with the matter on her own. She retains the services of freelance professional hostage negotiator Terry Thorne. ",Action
Miss Congeniality,"When a terrorist threatens to bomb the Miss United States pageant, the FBI rushes to find a female agent to go under cover as a contestant. Unfortunately, Gracie is the only female FBI agent who can ""look the part"" despite her complete lack of refinement and femininity. She prides herself in being ""just one of the boys"" and is horrified at the idea of becoming a girly girl. ",Action
Terminator 3: Rise of the Machines,"Now 25, Connor (Nick Stahl) lives with no record of his existence -- no way he can be traced by Skynet. Out of the shadows of the future steps the T-X (Kristanna Loken), Skynet's most sophisticated cyborg killing machine yet. Now Connor's only hope for survival is the Terminator (Arnold Schwarzenegger), his mysterious former assassin. Together, they must triumph over the technologically superior T-X and forestall the looming threat of Judgment Day. ",Action
Osmosis Jones,"A cutting-edge, live action/animated action adventure comedy about one white blood cell's (Chris Rock) race against the biological clock to hunt down and destroy a lethal new virus (Laurence Fishburne). Bill Murray stars as Frank, in whose body the action unfolds. ",Animation
Blue Streak,"When a heist goes wrong, thief Miles (Martin Lawrence) hides a diamond at a construction site before he's arrested. After serving two years, Miles returns to the location of his treasure and finds it is now a police station. Disguising himself as a recently transferred officer to infiltrate the building, Miles stops an escaping thief while trying to retrieve the jewel. Impressed by his quick action, superior Rizzo (Graham Beckel) partners him with the bumbling detective Casey (Luke Wilson). ",Action
Entrapment,"Insurance investigator Virginia ""Gin"" Baker (Catherine Zeta-Jones), looking into a stolen Rembrandt painting, suspects that accomplished thief Robert ""Mac"" MacDougal (Sean Connery) is responsible. She decides to go undercover and help Mac steal an ancient artifact. When a suspicious Mac confronts Gin about her real intentions, she claims that she is, in fact, a thief and that the insurance job is a cover. To prove it, she proposes a new target that could net them $8 billion. ",Action
Nick of Time,"Gene Watson (Johnny Depp) arrives at an L.A. train station with his young daughter, Lynn (Courtney Chase), and is confronted by mysterious Mr. Smith (Christopher Walken) and Ms. Jones (Roma Maffia). They hand him a gun, order him to kill the state governor within 75 minutes and threaten to murder his child if he doesn't comply. Smith accompanies Watson to a hotel where the governor is to speak, while Jones holds the girl. As Watson considers his options, the hour to act draws ever nearer. ",Action
Assassins,"Assassin Robert Rath (Sylvester Stallone) arrives at a funeral to kill a prominent mobster, only to witness rival hired gun Miguel Bain (Antonio Banderas) complete the job for him -- with grisly results. Horrified by the murder of innocent bystanders, Rath decides to take one last job and then return to civilian life. But finding his way out of the world of contract killing grows ever more dangerous as Rath falls for his target, Electra (Julianne Moore), and becomes a marked man himself. ",Action
The Three Musketeers,Young d'Artagnan proves his worth and teams up with three of the finest musketeers to save the Queen of France. ,Action
The Bodyguard,A highland revolutionary must escape the sultan's gangs and deliver plans to Bukhara. ,Action
Predator 2,"Los Angeles is enduring a heat wave and a crime wave, so the pressure on police officer Michael Harrigan (Danny Glover) to solve a strange string of murders is mounting. Harrigan thinks the culprit can be found among the warring gangs and drug cartels, but FBI Special Agent Peter Keyes (Gary Busey) knows the horrible truth: Their killer is a fearsome extraterrestrial (Kevin Peter Hall) with keen hunting abilities that include superior night vision and the power to make itself invisible. ",Action
Red Dawn,"In an alternate 1980s, the United States stands alone as communism grows stronger. When Soviet soldiers invade a small Colorado town, brothers Jed (Patrick Swayze) and Matt Eckert (Charlie Sheen) escape with friends to the forest. With their father, Tom (Harry Dean Stanton), a prisoner of the invading army, the children decide to fight against the Soviets. As the country comes under increasing attack, the group teams up with Lt. Col. Andrew Tanner (Powers Boothe) to take back their town. ",Action
Every Which Way but Loose,"A tough trucker with a cheeky pet orangutan, Philo Beddoe (Clint Eastwood) moonlights as a fighter, with his close friend Orville Boggs (Geoffrey Lewis) setting up matches for him. When Philo begins dating country singer Lynn Halsey-Taylor (Sondra Locke), and she abruptly disappears, he goes off in search of her, his simian companion and Orville in tow. On their cross-country trek, Philo and friends repeatedly clash with bikers, leading up to a violent showdown. ",Action
Escape from the Planet of the Apes,"In this second sequel to ""Planet of the Apes,"" three apes flee their world before it's destroyed, and travel back in time to present-day America. When the humans discover that the trio are intelligent and capable of speech, they treat them as experimental research animals until they attempt to escape. ",Action
Spenser Confidential,"To unravel a twisted murder conspiracy, a former police detective returns to Boston's criminal underworld. ",Action
In the Shadow of the Moon,"In 1961, NASA started its Apollo program to realize President John F. Kennedy's dream of putting a man on the moon. This documentary retells the story of the program's mission through archival footage and interviews with all the surviving astronauts, except Neil Armstrong. With the U.S. racing to beat the Soviet Union into space, NASA began a series of test flights, culminating in Armstrong's 1969 walk on the moon and briefly uniting the world in awe of the United States' accomplishment. ",Action
Kate,"Meticulous and preternaturally skilled, Kate is the perfect specimen of a finely tuned assassin at the height of her game. But when she uncharacteristically blows an assignment targeting a member of the yakuza in Tokyo, she quickly discovers she's been poisoned, a brutally slow execution that gives her less than 24 hours to exact revenge on her killers. As her body swiftly deteriorates, Kate forms an unlikely bond with the teenage daughter of one of her past victims. Starring Mary Elizabeth Winstead and Woody Harrelson, and directed by Cedric Nicolas-Troyan, Kate follows a burned assassin's furious pursuit of one last self-appointed job. ",Action
Stuber,A quick-tempered cop who's recovering from eye surgery recruits a mild-mannered Uber driver to help him catch the heroin dealer who murdered his partner. The mismatched pair soon find themselves in for a wild day of stakeouts and shootouts as they pursue violent criminals through the seedy streets of Los Angeles. ,Action
The Silencing,A reformed hunter and a female sheriff get caught in a deadly game of cat and mouse when they set out to track a killer who may have kidnapped his daughter five years earlier. ,Action
Destroyer,"As a young cop, Erin Bell went under cover to infiltrate a gang in the California desert -- with tragic results. Bell continues to work as a detective for the Los Angeles Police Department, but feelings of anger and remorse leave her worn-down and consumed by guilt. When the leader of that gang suddenly re-emerges, Erin embarks on an obsessive quest to find his former associates, bring him to justice and make peace with her tortured past. ",Action
Johnny English Strikes Again,"The new adventure begins when a cyberattack reveals the identities of all active undercover agents in Britain, leaving Johnny English as the secret service's last hope. Called out of retirement, English dives headfirst into action with the mission to find the mastermind hacker. As a man with few skills and analogue methods, Johnny English must overcome the challenges of modern technology to make this mission a success. ",Action
Terminator: Dark Fate,"In Mexico City, a newly modified liquid Terminator -- the Rev-9 model -- arrives from the future to kill a young factory worker named Dani Ramos. Also sent back in time is Grace, a hybrid cyborg human who must protect Ramos from the seemingly indestructible robotic assassin. But the two women soon find some much-needed help from a pair of unexpected allies -- seasoned warrior Sarah Connor and the T-800 Terminator. ",Action
Copshop,"On the run from a lethal assassin, a wily con artist devises a scheme to hide out inside a small-town police station--but when the hitman turns up at the precinct, an unsuspecting rookie cop finds herself caught in the crosshairs. ",Action
Cold Pursuit,"Nels Coxman's quiet life as a snowplow driver comes crashing down when his beloved son dies under mysterious circumstances. His search for the truth soon becomes a quest for revenge against a psychotic drug lord named Viking and his sleazy henchmen. Transformed from upstanding citizen to coldblooded vigilante, Coxman unwittingly sets off a chain of events that includes a kidnapping, a series of deadly misunderstandings and a turf war between Viking and a rival boss. ",Action
Time Trap,"When some students become trapped inside a mysterious cave, they discover that time passes differently underground than on the surface. ",Action
Maze Runner: The Death Cure,"Thomas leads some escaped Gladers on their final and most dangerous mission yet. To save their friends, they must break into the legendary Last City, a WCKD-controlled labyrinth that may turn out to be the deadliest maze of all. Anyone who makes it out alive will get answers to the questions that the Gladers have been asking since they arrived in the maze. ",Action
Keanu,"Recently dumped by his girlfriend, slacker Rell (Jordan Peele) finds some happiness when a cute kitten winds up on his doorstep. After a heartless thief steals the cat, Rell recruits his cousin Clarence (Keegan-Michael Key) to help him retrieve it. They soon learn that a thug named Cheddar (Method Man) has the animal, and he'll only give it back if the two men agree to work for him. Armed with guns and a gangster attitude, it doesn't take long for the hapless duo to land in big trouble. ",Action
Grimsby,"Dimwitted Nobby (Sacha Baron Cohen) lives in an English fishing town with his loving girlfriend (Rebel Wilson) and nine children. For the last 28 years, he's been searching for his long-lost brother Sebastian (Mark Strong). When the two finally reunite, Nobby finds out that his sibling is a top MI6 agent who's just uncovered a sinister plot. Wrongfully accused and on the run, Sebastian now realizes that he needs Nobby's help to save the world and prove his innocence. ",Action
Inferno,"A young Black man, abused by his mother, must find a way turn his demons into muses. ",Action
Insurgent,"Now on the run from Jeanine (Kate Winslet) and the rest of the power-hungry Erudites, Tris (Shailene Woodley) and Four (Theo James) search for allies and answers in the ruins of Chicago. They must find out what Tris' family sacrificed their lives to protect and why the Erudites will do anything to stop them. Side by side, Tris and Four face one seemingly insurmountable challenge after another, as they unravel the secrets of the past and -- ultimately -- the future of their world. ",Action
The November Man,"Five years into his retirement, CIA veteran Peter Devereaux (Pierce Brosnan) is pulled back into service to help retrieve a Russian agent -- also his former lover -- who has incriminating evidence on Federov, a corrupt Russian leader. When a different CIA team, led by Devereaux's former protege (Luke Bracey), shows up, the mission goes south and Devereaux's ex-lover is killed. Now a rogue agent, Devereaux drags a relief worker (Olga Kurylenko) along on his mission to settle the score. ",Action
Deliver Us from Evil,"Filmmaker Amy Berg documents the case of convicted pedophile Oliver Grady who, as a priest in northern California, molested the children of his parishioners, apparently with the knowledge of his superiors in the diocese. Berg tracks down O'Grady in Ireland, where he lives free under church protection, and allows him to give his own account of his crimes. ",Action
3 Days to Kill,"Facing a terminal disease, spy Ethan Renner (Kevin Costner) has decided to give up his dangerous, high-stakes life in order to rebuild his relationship with his estranged wife and daughter (Hailee Steinfeld), whom he previously pushed away to keep them out of harm's way. However, in exchange for a potentially lifesaving drug, he must complete one final mission: apprehend one of the world's most ruthless terrorists while looking after his teenage offspring in her mother's absence. ",Action
Captain Underpants: The First Epic Movie,"George Beard and Harold Hutchins are two overly imaginative pranksters who spend hours in a treehouse creating comic books. When their mean principal threatens to separate them into different classes, the mischievous boys accidentally hypnotize him into thinking that he's a ridiculously enthusiastic, incredibly dimwitted superhero named Captain Underpants. ",Animation
The Outsider,A woman meets her Japanese boyfriend's family for the first time. ,Action
Parker,"A businessman is mysteriously kidnapped then released during a trip to Munich, Germany. ",Action
Hummingbird,Two non-profit groups give aid to Brazilian women and children in need. ,Action
Dabangg,A corrupt police officer highlights the flaws in the system. ,Action
Transformers: Dark of the Moon,"Sam Witwicky (Shia LaBeouf) and his new girlfriend, Carly (Rosie Huntington-Whiteley), join the fray when the evil Decepticons renew their longstanding war against the Autobots. Optimus Prime (Peter Cullen) believes that resurrecting ancient Transformer Sentinel Prime (Leonard Nimoy), once the leader of the Autobots, may lead to victory. That decision, however, has devastating consequences; the war appears to tip in favor of the Decepticons, leading to a climactic battle in Chicago. ",Action
Taken 2,"Two years ago, retired CIA agent Bryan Mills (Liam Neeson) used his ""particular set of skills"" to rescue his daughter, Kim (Maggie Grace), from kidnappers. Since then, Kim has been learning self-defense from her father, and Bryan has been on a personal mission to reunite with his ex-wife (Famke Janssen). In Istanbul, Bryan and his family cross paths with Murad (Rade Serbedzija), whose son died at Bryan's hand during Kim's rescue. Murad wants revenge, and he'll stop at nothing to get it. ",Action
Total Recall,"Douglas Quaid (Arnold Schwarzenegger) is a bored construction worker in the year 2084 who dreams of visiting the colonized Mars. He visits ""Rekall,"" a company that plants false memories into people's brains, in order to experience the thrill of Mars without having to travel there. But something goes wrong during the procedure; Quaid discovers that his entire life is actually a false memory and that the people who implanted it in his head now want him dead. ",Action
47 Ronin,"In feudal Japan, Lord Asano rules his province with fairness. However, jealous Lord Kira (Tadanobu Asano) fears that the shogun favors Asano over him and hatches a plot that ends with Asano's ritual suicide. After Asano's death, his samurai, led by Oishi (Hiroyuki Sanada), are forced to live as outcasts. Oishi wanders for several years but realizes that he must turn to Kai (Keanu Reeves), a mixed-blood warrior he once rejected, to help him and his ronin comrades take revenge on Lord Kira. ",Action
300: Rise of an Empire,"While King Leonidas and his 300 Spartans have their date with destiny at Thermopylae, another battle against the Persians is brewing, this time at sea. Themistocles (Sullivan Stapleton), a Greek general, sees the threat posed by the God-King Xerxes of Persia. He knows that he must unite all of Greece if he is to stand any chance of repelling the Persian invasion. Even if he accomplishes his mission, Themistocles must still face Artemisia (Eva Green), the ruthless leader of the Persian armada. ",Action
RoboCop,"In 2028, OmniCorp is at the center of robot technology. While its drones have long been used by the military overseas, their use is forbidden in American law enforcement. However, OmniCorp gets a golden opportunity to crack that market when Detroit cop Alex Murphy (Joel Kinnaman) is critically injured in the line of duty. By transforming Murphy into a cyborg, OmniCorp executives hope to rake in billions for their shareholders, but they forget one thing: There's still a man inside the machine. ",Action
Jack Ryan: Shadow Recruit,"To his friends and loved ones, young Jack Ryan (Chris Pine) appears to be an ordinary executive; however, he has secretly worked for the CIA for years. Ryan was originally brought in to crunch global data, but when he uncovers a carefully planned scheme to crash the U.S. economy and spark global chaos, he becomes the only man with the skills to stop it. Now a full operative, Ryan finds himself caught between his secretive handler, his clueless fiancee and a brilliant Russian leader. ",Action
Takers,"Gordon Jennings (Idris Elba) and his friends enjoy a luxurious lifestyle funded by bank robberies, and they avoid capture by sticking to a strict set of rules. As they celebrate the latest job, a former associate arrives with a daring plan to rob an armored car. The lure of so much cash is too tempting to resist but, unbeknown to Gordon's men, this heist puts them on a collision course with Russian mobsters and a detective (Matt Dillon) who will do anything to capture them. ",Action
The Legend of Tarzan,"It's been nearly a decade since Tarzan (Alexander Skarsgård), also known as John Clayton III, left Africa to live in Victorian England with his wife Jane. Danger lurks on the horizon as Leon Rom (Christoph Waltz), a treacherous envoy for King Leopold, devises a scheme that lures the couple to the Congo. Rom plans to capture Tarzan and deliver him to an old enemy in exchange for diamonds. When Jane becomes a pawn in his devious plot, Tarzan must return to the jungle to save the woman he loves. ",Action
Dracula Untold,"In 15th-century Transylvania, Vlad III (Luke Evans), prince of Wallachia, is known as a just ruler. With his beloved wife, Mirena (Sarah Gadon), Vlad has brokered a prolonged period of peace and ensured that his people are protected, especially from the Ottoman Empire. However, when Sultan Mehmed II (Dominic Cooper) demands 1,000 of the country's boys, including Vlad's son, for his army, Vlad makes a deal with a monster that will enable him to defeat the Turks -- but cost him his humanity. ",Action
War,"After his partner and family are killed, FBI agent Jack Crawford (Jason Statham) becomes obsessed with revenge on an assassin named Rogue (Jet Li). Rogue's return sparks a violent war between rival Asian mobsters Chang (John Lone) and Shiro (Ryo Ishibashi), while the ultimate showdown between Crawford and Rogue reveals the truth. ",Action
Rogue,"Rugged American adventure-travel journalist Pete McKell (Michael Vartan) joins a cruise along a crocodile-infested river organized by tomboyish guide Kate Ryan (Radha Mitchell). As if dealing with their fellow travelers -- including obnoxious wannabe photographer Simon (Stephen Curry) and bratty British teen Sherry (Mia Wasikowska) -- wasn't enough aggravation, soon Pete and Kate must match wits against an enormous 25-foot croc that seems cleverer than most. ",Action
Tower Heist,"For more than 10 years, Josh Kovaks (Ben Stiller) has managed one of New York City's most luxurious and well-secured residences. One of the condo's most-notorious residents, Arthur Shaw (Alan Alda), is currently under house arrest for the theft of more than $2 billion from his investors -- including Josh and his co-workers. Determined to reclaim the retirement funds Shaw stole from them, they turn to a petty crook named Slide (Eddie Murphy) to help them break into Shaw's home. ",Action
Hitman,"A professional assassin known only as Agent 47 (Timothy Olyphant) gets caught up in a dangerous political takeover. He flees across Eastern Europe, hoping to find out who set him up and why. However, his growing attachment to a beautiful but traumatized young woman poses as great a threat to his survival as that of the Interpol and Russian agents who are hunting him down. ",Action
Outlander,"When a spacecraft crashes in Norway during the Iron Age, two figures emerge from the wreckage: Kainan (James Caviezel), an alien soldier, and the Moorwen, his mortal enemy. The latter immediately starts cutting a path of destruction through the Norse lands, while Kainan sees a chance to meld his advanced technology with ancient Viking weaponry to destroy the Moorwen before it destroys Earth. ",Action
TMNT,"Splinter, the rat sensei, senses something amiss in New York City. His disciples, Leonardo, Donatello, Raphael and Michelangelo have grown apart since their last adventure. The teenage terrapins must somehow renew and strengthen their bond if they are to have any hope of defeating an evil industrialist's army of ancient monsters. ",Animation
Knowing,"Fifty years after it was buried in a time capsule, a schoolgirl's cryptic document falls into the hands of Caleb Koestler, the son of professor John Koestler (Nicolas Cage). John figures out that the encoded message accurately lists every major disaster from the past five decades, and predicts three future calamities -- one a global cataclysm. When his warnings fall on deaf ears, John enlists the help of the prophetic author's daughter and granddaughter to try to avert the ultimate disaster. ",Action
Next,"Blessed, or cursed, with the ability to see events minutes before they occur, Cris Johnson (Nicolas Cage) earns a living as a magician in Las Vegas and keeps a low profile under an alias. When terrorists threaten to detonate a nuclear weapon in Los Angeles, government agent Callie Ferris (Julianne Moore) goes on the hunt for Cris and hopes to convince him to help her stop the coming apocalypse. ",Action
Resident Evil: Extinction,"Captured by the Umbrella Corp., Alice (Milla Jovovich) receives genetic alterations that leave her with superhuman abilities. Hiding out in the Nevada desert, she joins forces with former cohorts Carlos (Oded Fehr) and L.J. (Mike Epps) as well as new survivors Claire (Ali Larter), K-Mart (Spencer Locke) and Nurse Betty (Ashanti) to eradicate the virus that threatens to turn every human on Earth into a zombie. ",Action
Feast,"Trapped in a remote tavern, a group of strangers (Navi Rawat, Krista Allen, Balthazar Getty, Henry Rollins) must band together for survival. Outside the bar, a horde of ravenous, flesh-eating monsters and trying to break in and dine on the frightened humans inside. ",Action
Zathura: A Space Adventure,"After their father (Tim Robbins) is called into work, two young boys, Walter (Josh Hutcherson) and Danny (Jonah Bobo), are left in the care of their teenage sister, Lisa (Kristen Stewart), and told they must stay inside. Walter and Danny, who anticipate a boring day, are shocked when they begin playing Zathura, a space-themed board game, which they realize has mystical powers when their house is shot into space. With the help of an astronaut (Dax Shepard), the boys attempt to return home. ",Action
Indiana Jones and the Kingdom of the Crystal Skull,"It's the height of the Cold War, and famous archaeologist Indiana Jones (Harrison Ford), returning from his latest adventure, finds out his job at Marshall College is in jeopardy. He meets Mutt (Shia La Beouf), a young man who wants Indy to help him find the legendary Crystal Skull of Akator, and the pair set out for Peru. However, deadly agent Irina Spalko (Cate Blanchett) is searching for the powerful artifact, too, because the Soviets believe it can help them conquer the world. ",Action
After the Sunset,"Having already stolen two from the set of three priceless Napoleon Diamonds, expert jewel thief Max Burdett (Pierce Brosnan) decides to retire on a tropical island with his girlfriend and partner-in-crime, Lola (Salma Hayek). Fate intervenes, however, when Max discovers the third and final diamond is sitting on a docked cruise ship on his very island. It should be a simple job, but FBI agent Stan Lloyd (Woody Harrelson) shows up to make sure Max doesn't get any ideas. ",Action
Walking Tall,"When decorated military officer Chris Vaughn (The Rock) returns to his hometown in the state of Washington to find work, he finds that the lumber mill has closed, and the town's big business is now a seedy casino operated by one of his old schoolmates, Jay Hamilton (Neal McDonough). Aided by his loyal friend Ray Templeton (Johnny Knoxville), Vaughn tries to make a stand against the area's crime and corruption, but, finding no help from the police, he must take matters into his own hands. ",Action
Shanghai Knights,"After taming the wild west in the comedy ""Shanghai Noon,"" Chon Wang (Jackie Chan) and Roy O'Bannon (Owen Wilson) are back in the saddle, but off the range -- this time, they're out to settle a score in civilized London in the sequel, ""Shanghai Knights."" When a Chinese rebel murders Chon's estranged father and escapes to England, Chon and Roy make their way to London with revenge on their minds. ",Action
Austin Powers in Goldmember,"Teaming up with the mysterious yet peculiar Goldmember, Dr. Evil hatches a time-traveling scheme to take over the world, one that involves the kidnapping of Nigel Powers, Austin's beloved father and England's most renowned spy. As he chases the villains through time, Austin visits 1975 and joins forces with his old flame, Foxxy Cleopatra, a streetwise but stylish detective. Together Austin and Foxxy must find a way to save Nigel and stop Dr. Evil and Goldmember from their mischievous mayhem. ",Action
Rush Hour 3,"East meets West again when the assassination of Ambassador Han leads to the reunion of Lee (Jackie Chan) and Carter (Chris Tucker). In Paris, the pair must stay one step ahead of Chinese gangsters, and Lee's childhood friend (Hiroyuki Sanada), as they track down an envelope containing the identity of a powerful crime lord. ",Action
Johnny English,"Pascal Sauvage (John Malkovich), a villain intent on stealing Britain's Crown Jewels, has murdered the country's top undercover agents, and mediocre spy Johnny English (Rowan Atkinson) is ordered to prevent further mayhem. But even with help from quick-thinking sidekick Bough (Ben Miller), the goofy agent lands himself in one precarious situation after another. Only when he meets up with Interpol crime-fighter Lorna Campbell (Natalie Imbruglia) is Johnny able to chip away at Pascal's defenses. ",Action
Reign of Fire,"In present-day London, 12-year-old Quinn watches as his mother wakes an enormous fire-breathing beast from its centuries-long slumber. Twenty years later, much of the world has been scarred by the beast and its offspring. As a fire chief, Quinn (Christian Bale) is responsible for warding off the beasts and keeping a community alive as they eke out a meager existence. Into their midst comes a hotshot American, Van Zan (Matthew McConaughey), who says he has a way to kill the beasts. ",Action
Small Soldiers,"When teenager Alan (Gregory Smith) buys a set of Commando Elite action figures, he's unaware that they have been programmed with military technology. The toys, including leader Chip (Tommy Lee Jones), spring to life and start taking their directives seriously, beginning by ""killing"" their enemies, the toy Gorgonites. But Archer (Frank Langella) and the Gorgonites won't go down without a fight. Alan gets caught in the middle of the war, as does his neighbor and crush, Christy (Kirsten Dunst). ",Action
Deep Impact,"A comet is hurtling toward Earth and could mean the end of all human life. The U.S. government keeps the crisis under wraps, but crack reporter Jenny Lerner (Tea Leoni) uncovers the truth -- forcing U.S. President Beck (Morgan Freeman) to announce his plan. Grizzled astronaut Spurgeon ""Fish"" Tanner (Robert Duvall) and his team will land on the comet and lay explosives, hopefully deterring the object from its doomsday course. If not, humanity will have to prepare for the worst. ",Action
The Saint,A down-and-out factory worker searches for meaning in life. ,Action
Money Talks,"Reporter James (Charlie Sheen) brings petty crook Franklin (Chris Tucker) to justice, but as Franklin is being taken to jail, he is unwittingly drawn into a violent prison break. The police pursue Franklin, mistakenly thinking he killed several officers, so the fugitive turns to James for help. Figuring he has stumbled upon the story of a lifetime, the journalist agrees to prove that Franklin is innocent. Unfortunately, things don't go smoothly, and both men find themselves on the run. ",Action
Alien Resurrection,"Two hundred years have passed since Ellen Ripley (Sigourney Weaver) died on Fiorina 161. Aboard the medical research vessel USM Auriga, a team of scientists clone Ripley from her extracted DNA and removes the alien Queen embryo which was growing inside her at the time of her death. ",Action
Eraser,"John ""The Eraser"" Kruger is the top gun in the US Marshall Witness Protection scheme; he erases their past and deals with their future. His latest assignment is whistle-blower Dr. Lee Cullen, who has evidence against a major arms corporation that's selling weapons to terrorists with the collusion of rogue enemy agents within, but there is danger nearer home for Kruger, from within his own department. ",Action
Waterworld,"After the melting of the polar ice caps, most of the globe is underwater. Some humans have survived, and even fewer still, notably the Mariner (Kevin Costner), have adapted to the ocean by developing gills. A loner by nature, the Mariner reluctantly befriends Helen (Jeanne Tripplehorn) and her young companion, Enola (Tina Majorino), as they escape from a hostile artificial island. Soon the sinister Smokers are pursuing them in the belief that Enola holds the key to finding the mythical Dryland. ",Action
Rising Sun,"When a prostitute is found dead in a Los Angeles skyscraper occupied by a large Japanese corporation, detectives John Conner (Sean Connery) and Web Smith (Wesley Snipes) are called in to investigate. Although Conner has previous experience working in Japan, cultural differences make their progress difficult until a security disc showing the murder turns up. Close scrutiny proves the disc has been doctored, and the detectives realize they're dealing with a cover-up as well. ",Action
Hard Target,"Chance Boudreaux (Jean-Claude Van Damme), a sailor skilled in martial arts, is employed to guard Natasha Binder (Yancy Butler) as she tracks down her father, an itinerant Vietnam veteran living in New Orleans named Douglas (Chuck Pfarrer). They soon uncover a sinister group of wealthy men who hunt the homeless for sport, paying them $10,000 if they can survive a crosstown journey. When Chance discovers that Natasha's father was one of their victims, he decides to destroy the evil hunters. ",Action
Kindergarten Cop,"In this action-comedy, unusual circumstances find big, brawny cop John Kimble (Arnold Schwarzenegger) posing as a kindergarten teacher in order to apprehend major drug lord Cullen Crisp (Richard Tyson), as well as his ruthless accomplice and mother, Eleanor (Carroll Baker). While pretending to be a kid-friendly instructor, Kimble falls for pretty fellow teacher Joyce Palmieri (Penelope Ann Miller) as he battles both unruly children and dangerous bad guys. ",Action
The Dead Pool,"In the fifth installment of the Dirty Harry series, gritty cop Harry Callahan (Clint Eastwood) is fresh off the conviction of a major mob boss. When horror film director Peter Swan (Liam Neeson) develops a ""dead pool"" betting on celebrity deaths, he is shocked when a serial killer begins targeting those named, including TV reporter Samantha Walker (Patricia Clarkson) and Callahan himself. Action and violence abound as Callahan tracks the killer in an attempt to stop the murders. ",Action
The Toxic Avenger,A 98-pound nerd (Mark Torgl) from New Jersey lands in a vat of toxic waste and becomes a benevolent monster (Mitchell Cohen). ,Action
Mad Max Beyond Thunderdome,"In the third of the ""Mad Max"" movies, Max (Mel Gibson) drifts into an evil town ruled by Turner. There he becomes a gladiator and gets dumped in the desert where he is rescued by a band of feral orphans who have been looking for help for years. When several of them take his appearance as a sign and go off into the desert, he follows them back to the town. ",Action
Moonraker,A Cavalier (George Baker) cuts a path through Cromwell's Roundheads for Charles II to reach France in 1661. ,Action
Death Race 2000,"In the year 2000, America is a totalitarian regime on the brink of collapse. The most popular sport in this dystopia is the Transcontinental Road Race, where teams earn points for logging the fastest time and for mowing over the most innocent pedestrians in the process. This year's competitors include Frankenstein (David Carradine), who is rumored to be more machine than man, and the tough-as-nails ""Machine Gun"" Joe Viterbo (Sylvester Stallone). Some have a plan to stop the race. ",Action
Sooryavanshi,The adventures of a police anti-terror squad. ,Action
The Lovebirds,"Six stories of love, life and survival. ",Action
Crawl,A young bar waitress (Georgina Haig) is taken hostage after a seedy bar owner double crosses the Croatian man he hired to commit murder. ,Action
6 Underground,"Six individuals from all around the globe, each the very best at what they do, have been chosen not only for their skill, but for a unique desire to delete their pasts to change the future. ",Action
Dora and the Lost City of Gold,"Having spent most of her life exploring the jungle, nothing could prepare Dora for her most dangerous adventure yet -- high school. Accompanied by a ragtag group of teens and Boots the monkey, Dora embarks on a quest to save her parents while trying to solve the seemingly impossible mystery behind a lost Incan civilization. ",Action
Blood Red Sky,"When a group of terrorists hijacks an overnight transatlantic flight, a mysteriously ill woman must unleash a monstrous secret to protect her young son. ",Action
Code 8,A desperate young man possessing special powers clashes with a police force after committing a petty crime. ,Action
Hotel Artemis,"As rioting rocks Los Angeles in the year 2028, disgruntled thieves make their way to Hotel Artemis -- a 13-story, members-only hospital for criminals. It's operated by the Nurse, a no-nonsense, high-tech healer who already has her hands full with a French assassin, an arms dealer and an injured cop. As the violence of the night continues, the Nurse must decide whether to break her own rules and confront what she's worked so hard to avoid. ",Action
Ambulance,"Over one day across the streets of L.A., three lives will change forever. In this breakneck thriller from director-producer Michael Bay, decorated veteran Will Sharp (Emmy winner Yahya Abdul-Mateen II, Candyman, The Matrix Resurrections), desperate for money to cover his wife's medical bills, asks for help from the one person he knows he shouldn't--his adoptive brother Danny (Oscar® nominee Jake Gyllenhaal, Zodiac, Spider-Man: Far From Home). A charismatic career criminal, Danny instead offers him a score: the biggest bank heist in Los Angeles history: $32 million. With his wife's survival on the line, Will can't say no. But when their getaway goes spectacularly wrong, the desperate brothers hijack an ambulance with a wounded cop clinging to life and ace EMT Cam Thompson (Eiza González, Fast &amp; Furious Presents: Hobbs &amp; Shaw, Baby Driver) onboard. In a high-speed pursuit that never stops, Will and Danny must evade a massive, city-wide law enforcement response, keep their hostages alive, and somehow try not to kill each other, all while executing the most insane escape L.A. has ever seen. ",Action
Jurassic World: Fallen Kingdom,"Three years after the destruction of the Jurassic World theme park, Owen Grady and Claire Dearing return to the island of Isla Nublar to save the remaining dinosaurs from a volcano that's about to erupt. They soon encounter terrifying new breeds of gigantic dinos while uncovering a conspiracy that threatens the entire planet. ",Action
Mile 22,"CIA operative James Silva leads a small but lethal paramilitary team on an urgent and dangerous mission. They must transport a foreign intelligence asset from an American embassy in Southeast Asia to an airfield for extraction -- a distance of 22 miles. Silva and the soldiers soon find themselves in a race against time as the city's military, police and street gangs close in to reclaim the asset. ",Action
Jack Reacher: Never Go Back,"Investigator Jack Reacher (Tom Cruise) springs into action after the arrest of Susan Turner (Cobie Smulders), an Army major accused of treason. Suspecting foul play, Jack embarks on a mission to prove that the head of his old unit is innocent. After crossing paths with the law, Reacher must now go on the lam to uncover the truth behind a major government conspiracy that involves the death of U.S. soldiers. ",Action
American Ultra,"Small-town stoner Mike Howell (Jesse Eisenberg) spends most of his time getting high and writing a graphic novel. What Mike doesn't know is that he was trained by the CIA to be a lethal killing machine. When the agency targets him for termination, his former handler activates his latent skills, turning the mild-mannered slacker into a deadly weapon. Now, the utterly surprised Mike must use his newfound abilities to save himself and his girlfriend from getting smoked. ",Action
Heist,The leader (Rick Jordan) of a Los Angeles gang plans to rob an armored truck to help his brother (Erik David). ,Action
Last Knights,A fallen swordsman (Clive Owen) leads a small army against a sadistic ruler to avenge his dishonored master (Morgan Freeman). ,Action
The Expendables 3,"Years ago, Barney Ross (Sylvester Stallone) co-founded the Expendables with Conrad Stonebanks (Mel Gibson). After Stonebanks became an arms dealer, Ross was forced to kill him -- or so he thought. Now, Stonebanks is back and he's on a mission to end the Expendables. Ross decides that the way to fight old blood is with new blood, so he assembles a team of younger, faster, more tech-savvy recruits. The battle to topple Stonebanks becomes a clash of old-school methods vs. high-tech expertise. ",Action
Rampage,Steve and Jim assassinate a Colombian drug lord and upset the entire cartel. ,Action
San Andreas,"A seemingly ideal day turns disastrous when California's notorious San Andreas fault triggers a devastating, magnitude 9 earthquake, the largest in recorded history. As the Earth cracks open and buildings start to crumble, Ray Gaines (Dwayne Johnson), an LAFD search-and-rescue helicopter pilot, must navigate the destruction from Los Angeles to San Francisco to bring his estranged wife (Carla Gugino) and their only daughter (Alexandra Daddario) to safety. ",Action
Hit and Run,A college student (Laura Breckenridge) faces the wrath of a man that she thought she killed with her car. ,Action
Snow White and the Huntsman,"Queen Ravenna (Charlize Theron), who seized control of her kingdom by marrying and killing its rightful ruler, needs the life force of young maidens to maintain her beauty. However, to become truly immortal, Ravenna must consume the heart of her stepdaughter Snow White (Kristen Stewart). Snow escapes, and Ravenna dispatches a huntsman (Chris Hemsworth) to capture her. But Snow, the Huntsman and a rebel army join forces to destroy Ravenna and restore the balance of life and death. ",Action
Welcome to the Punch,"When a notorious criminal is forced to return to London, it gives a veteran detective one final chance to bring the man to justice. ",Action
Hobo with a Shotgun,"Hoping for heaven but finding an urban hell, a homeless man (Rutger Hauer) takes aim at a crime boss and the man's sadistic sons (Gregory Smith, Nick Bateman). ",Action
30 Minutes or Less,"Nick (Jesse Eisenberg) is a pizza deliverer who lives a fairly ordinary, boring life -- until he crosses paths with two aspiring criminal masterminds (Danny McBride, Nick Swardson), who kidnap him, strap a bomb to his chest and force him to rob a bank for them. Nick doesn't get much time to pull off the difficult task, so he enlists the aid of Chet (Aziz Ansari), his estranged pal. As time ticks away, Nick and Chet face many obstacles, not the least of which is their volatile relationship. ",Action
Mortal Engines,"Hundreds of years after a cataclysmic event destroyed civilization, mysterious young Hester Shaw emerges as the only one who can stop the city of London -- now a giant predator on wheels -- from devouring everything in its path. Feral and fiercely driven by the memory of her mother, Hester joins forces with Tom Natsworthy, an outcast from London, and Anna Fang, a dangerous outlaw with a bounty on her head. ",Action
I Am Number Four,"John Smith (Alex Pettyfer) seems like an ordinary teenager, but he is an alien on the run from merciless enemies hunting him and the eight others like him. Always changing his identity and moving to different towns with his guardian, Henri (Timothy Olyphant), John has no real past and no true home. However, in the small Ohio town where he now lives, he discovers love, powerful new abilities, and a connection to others of his kind. ",Action
Ride Along,"For two years, security guard Ben (Kevin Hart) has tried to convince James (Ice Cube), a veteran cop, that he is worthy of James' sister, Angela. When Ben is finally accepted into the police academy, James decides to test his mettle by inviting him along on a shift deliberately designed to scare the trainee. However, events take an unexpected turn when their wild night leads to Atlanta's most-notorious criminal and Ben's rapid-fire mouth proves as dangerous as the bullets whizzing by them. ",Action
The Lost City,"Reclusive author Loretta Sage writes about exotic places in her popular adventure novels that feature a handsome cover model named Alan. While on tour promoting her new book with Alan, Loretta gets kidnapped by an eccentric billionaire who hopes she can lead him to an ancient city's lost treasure from her latest story. Determined to prove he can be a hero in real life and not just on the pages of her books, Alan sets off to rescue her. ",Action
Day Shift,"Jamie Foxx stars as a hard working blue collar dad who just wants to provide a good life for his quick-witted daughter, but his mundane San Fernando Valley pool cleaning job is a front for his real source of income, hunting and killing vampires as part of an international Union of vampire hunters. ",Action
Broken City,"Former cop Billy Taggart (Mark Wahlberg) sees a chance at redemption for past sins when New York City's Mayor Nicolas Hostetler (Russell Crowe) calls on him for a special job. Hostetler thinks his wife, Cathleen (Catherine Zeta-Jones), is having an affair and that it may hurt his chances for re-election. However, a bigger scandal than expected pulls in Billy right at the start of his investigation. Double-crossed by the mayor, Billy begins a relentless quest for justice. ",Action
Ironclad,"In the 13th century, a dedicated group of Knights Templar defends Rochester Castle against King John. ",Action
Seeking Justice,A stranger (Guy Pearce) approaches a high-school teacher (Nicolas Cage) and offers to punish his wife's (January Jones) attacker. ,Action
Rambo: Last Blood,"Vietnam War veteran John Rambo tries to find some semblance of peace by raising horses on a ranch in Arizona. He's also developed a special familial bond with a woman named Maria and her teenage granddaughter Gabriela. But when a vicious Mexican cartel kidnaps Gabriela, Rambo crosses the border on a bloody and personal quest to rescue her and punish those responsible. ",Action
Crank: High Voltage,"After surviving an incredible plunge to near-certain death, Chev Chelios (Jason Statham) is abducted by Chinese mobsters. Waking up three months later, Chev finds that his nearly indestructible heart has been replaced with a battery-operated device that requires regular jolts of electricity or it will fail. Chev escapes from his captors, reunites with his lover, Eve (Amy Smart), and sets out on a frantic chase through Los Angeles to get his real heart back. ",Action
Solomon Kane,A man (James Purefoy) must renounce his newly taken vows of peace to rescue a young woman (Rachel Hurd-Wood) from an evil sorcerer (Jason Flemyng). ,Action
Red State,"Three horny teenagers -- Travis (Michael Angarano), Jarod (Kyle Gallner) and Billy-Ray (Nicholas Braun) -- can't believe their luck when they meet a woman online who says she wants to hook up with all three of them at once. But the promise of sex is a trap, and the boys find themselves in the hands of Abin Cooper (Michael Parks), a lunatic preacher who spews so much hatred that even neo-Nazis stay away. Cooper means to kill the trio for their sins, prompting a desperate bid for escape. ",Action
Big Stan,A wimpy con artist (Rob Schneider) learns martial arts from a mysterious master (David Carradine) so that he can protect himself in jail. ,Action
Jumper,"Aimless David Rice (Hayden Christensen) has the ability to instantly transport himself to any place he can imagine. He uses that gift to globe-trot, living on money he steals by ""jumping"" into bank vaults. He's captured by the evil Roland Cox (Samuel L. Jackson), who knows how to keep David from jumping. David escapes and reunites with his high school crush, Millie (Rachel Bilson), then forms an alliance with fellow jumper Griffin (Jamie Bell) and prepares for mortal combat with Cox. ",Action
Push,"Exploring why people cannot be allowed to live in cities. The high cost of housing and global investment funds, push people to poverty, stripped of a fundamental right. ",Action
Flight of the Phoenix,"On a flight over the Gobi Desert in Mongolia, Capt. Frank Towns (Dennis Quaid) and co-pilot A.J. (Tyrese Gibson) are unable to keep their cargo plane in the air when a violent sandstorm strikes. Crash-landing in a remote part of the desert, the two pilots and their passengers -- a crew of oil workers and a drifter (Giovanni Ribisi) -- must work together to survive by rebuilding the aircraft. Soon, low supplies and a band of merciless smugglers add greater urgency to their task. ",Action
Superman Returns,"While Lex Luthor (Kevin Spacey) plots to destroy him once and for all, the Man of Steel (Brandon Routh) returns after a long absence to a much-changed world. Lois Lane (Kate Bosworth) has moved on with her life, and society has learned to survive without him. Superman must find a way to reconnect with her and find his place in a world that may no longer need him. ",Action
Resident Evil: Apocalypse,"A deadly virus from a secret Umbrella Corporation laboratory underneath Raccoon City is exposed to the world. Umbrella seals off the city to contain the virus, creating a ghost town where everyone trapped inside turns into a mutant zombie. Alice (Milla Jovovich), a survivor from Umbrella's secret lab, meets former Umbrella security officer Jill Valentine (Sienna Guillory) and mercenary Carlos Oliviera (Oded Fehr). Together, they search for a scientist (Jared Harris) who might be able to help. ",Action
Mortal Kombat,"Lord Rayden (Christopher Lambert) handpicks three martial artists -- federal agent Sonya Blade (Bridgette Wilson), Shaolin monk Lui Kang (Robin Shou) and action movie sensation Johnny Cage (Linden Ashby) -- and mentors them. After intense training, Rayden transports the trio to Outworld, the site of an inter-dimensional fighting tournament. There, the three humans must defeat the demonic warriors of the evil Shang Sung (Cary-Hiroyuki Tagawa) -- or allow Sung to take over the Earth. ",Action
Undisputed,"Tells the story of an undefeated world-champion prize fighter (Ving Rhames) who is convicted of rape and sent to prison, where he must confront and ultimately fight the reigning prison boxing champion (Wesley Snipes). One man fighting for his honor, another fighting for his future ... only one will emerge from the ring ""Undisputed."" ",Action
Die Another Day,"James Bond (Pierce Brosnan) is captured by North Korean agents and must serve a grueling prison sentence. He's finally released, and is convinced that someone in his own agency betrayed him. He escapes from custody and travels to Cuba, hot on the heels of Zao (Rick Yune), the agent who put Bond behind bars. Meanwhile, Bond begins romancing NSA agent Jinx (Halle Berry) as he uncovers a scheme concocted by Zao and British millionaire Graves (Toby Stephens), involving a highly destructive laser. ",Action
Windtalkers,"Marine Joe Enders (Nicolas Cage) is assigned to protect Ben Yahzee (Adam Beach) -- a Navajo code talker, the Marines' new secret weapon. Enders' orders are to protect his code talker, but if Yahzee should fall into enemy hands, he's to protect the code at all costs. Against the backdrop of the horrific Battle of Saipan, when capture is imminent, Enders is forced to make a decision: if he can't protect his fellow Marine, can he bring himself to kill him to protect the code? ",Action
Antitrust,"When Milo (Ryan Phillippe) graduates from college and lands his dream job writing software at a multi-billion dollar computer company, he couldn't be more thrilled. The company's magnetic founder (Tim Robbins) that he worshiped as a child is now his personal mentor. As he settles into his new position, Milo uncovers some dark secrets about the firm and soon learns that he can't trust anyone but himself in the high stakes world of computer technology. ",Action
15 Minutes,"At the center of ""15 Minutes"" is a New York City double murder that must be solved. But the fast-paced story isn't so much about figuring out the truth of the murder, as following who controls that truth. This is the thriller as seen through an eye-popping new lens -- that of the media's hunt for shocking imagery, no matter the cost. In ""15 Minutes,"" as the cops chase the murderers, the media chases the cops, and the whole thing fuels an escalating firestorm. ",Action
Romeo Must Die,"Two families, bound by tradition, are locked in a brutal war. Asian and African American gangs are vying for control of Oakland's waterfront. But when the first casualty is the Asian warlord's son, the gang war becomes more dangerous than either side ever imagined. ",Action
Mystery Men,"Champion City already has a superhero, the appropriately named Captain Amazing (Greg Kinnear), but that doesn't deter the city's seven quirky amateur crime-fighters, who use the Captain's capture at the hands of villain Casanova Frankenstein (Geoffrey Rush) as motivation to prove themselves. The only problem is that their strange powers -- silverware hurling, bowling, shovel skills, incompetent invisibility and deadly flatulence -- aren't doing them any favors. ",Action
Men in Black II,"Kay (Tommy Lee Jones) and Jay (Will Smith) reunite to provide our best line of defense against a seductress who levels the toughest challenge yet to the MIBs mission statement: protecting the earth from the scum of the universe. While investigating a routine crime, Jay uncovers a plot masterminded by Serleena (Boyle), a Kylothian monster who disguises herself as a lingerie model. When Serleena takes the MIB building hostage, there is only one person Jay can turn to -- his former MIB partner. ",Action
Mission: Impossible II,"Tom Cruise returns to his role as Ethan Hunt in the second installment of ""Mission: Impossible."" This time Ethan Hunt leads his IMF team on a mission to capture a deadly German virus before it is released by terrorists. His mission is made impossible due to the fact that he is not the only person after samples of the disease. He must also contest with a gang of international terrorists headed by a turned bad former IMF agent who has already managed to steal the cure. ",Action
Mercury Rising,"""Mercury Rising"" stars Bruce Willis as Art Jeffries, a renegade FBI agent who combats ruthless federal agents to protect Simon (Miko Hughes), a 9-year-old autistic boy who has cracked the government's new unbreakable code. He can read MERCURY, the most advanced encryption code yet created, as easily as other kids read English. This ability renders the new billion-dollar secret code vulnerable, especially if enemies of the United States should learn of Simon's abilities and capture him. ",Action
Sphere,"When psychologist Norman Goodman (Dustin Hoffman) wrote a report for the government on how to deal with extraterrestrial life forces, he didn't expect his recommendations to be used. Now that a secret government agency is investigating what may be an alien spaceship that has been discovered partially buried on the floor of the Pacific Ocean, Norman finds that the plan he outlined is being put into effect and that the team he named in his report has been assembled. ",Action
The Postman,"Years after a major global conflict has left the United States in dystopian disarray, a nomadic traveler who becomes known as the Postman (Kevin Costner) wanders through towns in the Northwest, delivering old mail. Thanks to the Postman's presence, people begin to believe that the U.S. government has been restored. During his travels, the Postman becomes involved with the lovely Abby (Olivia Williams) and clashes with the dictatorial Gen. Bethlehem (Will Patton). ",Action
Murder at 1600,"A secretary is found dead in a White House bathroom during an international crisis, and Detective Harlan Regis is in charge of the investigation. Despite resistance from the Secret Service, Regis partners with agent Nina Chance. As political tensions rise, they learn that the crime could be part of an elaborate cover-up. Framed as traitors, the pair and Regis' partner break into the White House to expose the true culprit. ",Action
Deep Rising,"A newly unveiled ocean liner, the Argonautica sets out on its first cruise, only to encounter dangers both on board and in the ocean depths. While the beautiful thief Trillian (Famke Janssen) attempts to steal riches from the boat's wealthy passengers, the ship encounters major problems, most notably a giant murderous sea creature with tentacles. Eventually, a boat captained by John Finnegan (Treat Williams) comes across the Argonautica, and everyone struggles to survive the monster. ",Action
Point of No Return,A policeman seeks to avenge his partner's death and tracks down a key eyewitness. ,Action
Universal Soldier,"During the Vietnam War, soldier Luc Deveraux (Jean-Claude Van Damme) finds that his superior officer, Andrew Scott (Dolph Lundgren), has turned violently deranged, and the two fight to the death. After their bodies are retrieved, they are placed into a secret program in which they are reanimated and trained to become unquestioning killing machines. While Devereaux and Scott initially have no memory of their former lives, glimpses of their pasts start to return, rekindling their intense conflict. ",Action
Days of Thunder,"In the fast-paced world of NASCAR, a rivalry brews between rookie hotshot Cole Trickle (Tom Cruise) and veteran racer Rowdy Burns (Michael Rooker). When both of them are seriously injured in competition, the former bitter rivals become close friends. With Cole's spirits restored by a romance with neurosurgeon Dr. Claire Lewicki (Nicole Kidman), and Rowdy still sidelined by injuries, Cole decides to race Rowdy's car in the Daytona 500 against underhanded newcomer Russ Wheeler (Cary Elwes). ",Action
Red Heat,East Germans abduct a U.S. coed (Linda Blair) and throw her in a women's prison run by a brutal inmate (Sylvia Kristel). ,Action
Lifeforce,"When a space mission involving American and British astronauts encounters an alien craft, the humanoids within are brought aboard the shuttle. Back on Earth, one of the extraterrestrials, who appears to be a gorgeous woman (Mathilda May), proceeds to suck the life force out of various Londoners, turning the town into a city of roaming half-dead people. When Tom Carlsen (Steve Railsback), a surviving astronaut, realizes what is happening, he sets out to stop the ruthless alien presence. ",Action
Never Say Never Again,"An aging James Bond (Sean Connery) makes an uncharacteristic mistake during a routine training mission, leading M (Edward Fox) to believe that the legendary British Intelligence spy is now past his prime. M indefinitely suspends Bond from active duty. However, when SPECTRE member Fatima Bush (Barbara Carrera) and her fellow terrorists successfully steal two nuclear missiles from the U.S. military, M must reinstate Bond, as he is the only agent who can beat SPECTRE at their own game of espionage. ",Action
Krull,"On the planet of Krull, an evil creature called the Beast decimates the world's army and kidnaps the lovely Princess Lyssa (Lysette Anthony), who is destined to become queen. Her brave beau, Prince Colwyn (Ken Marshall), leads a motley band of warriors, including Ergo (David Battley) and Kegan (Liam Neeson), to rescue his beloved. However, before he can face the Beast, Colwyn must locate a mystical weapon known as the Glaive, which he can use to slay the hideous villain. ",Action
Conquest of the Planet of the Apes,"In this third sequel to ""Planet of the Apes,"" the apes turn the tables on the human Earth population when they lead a revolt against their cruel masters in the distant year of 1990. By doing this it creates the time loop that leads to the first film. ""Conquest of the Planet of the Apes"" is cinematically etched in broad, brash strokes slashing social satire and science fiction suspense with large-scale spectacle. ",Action
Gunpowder Milkshake,"Sam (Karen Gillan) was only 12 years old when her mother Scarlet (Lena Headey), an elite assassin, was forced to abandon her. Sam was raised by The Firm, the ruthless crime syndicate her mother worked for. Now, 15 years later, Sam has followed in her mother’s footsteps and grown into a fierce hit-woman. She uses her “talents” to clean up The Firm’s most dangerous messes. She’s as efficient as she is loyal. But when a high-risk job goes wrong, Sam must choose between serving The Firm and protecting the life of an innocent 8-year-old girl -- Emily (Chloe Colemaan). With a target on her back, Sam has only one chance to survive: Reunite with her mother and her lethal associates: The Librarians (Angela Bassett, Michelle Yeoh and Carla Gugino). These three generations of women must now learn to trust each other, stand up to The Firm and their army of henchmen, and raise hell against those who could take everything from them. ",Action
Birds of Prey and the Fantabulous Emancipation of One Harley Quinn,"It's open season on Harley Quinn when her explosive breakup with the Joker puts a big fat target on her back. Unprotected and on the run, Quinn faces the wrath of narcissistic crime boss Black Mask, his right-hand man, Victor Zsasz, and every other thug in the city. But things soon even out for Harley when she becomes unexpected allies with three deadly women -- Huntress, Black Canary and Renee Montoya. ",Action
Project Power,A former soldier teams up with a cop to find the source behind a dangerous pill that provides temporary superpowers. ,Action
The Spy Who Dumped Me,"Best friends Audrey and Morgan are going about their humdrum lives in Los Angeles -- until Audrey's ex-boyfriend suddenly shows up with a team of deadly assassins on his trail. Unexpectedly thrust into an international conspiracy, the gals soon find themselves dodging killers and a suspicious British agent while hatching a plan to save the world. ",Action
Captive State,"After 10 years of extraterrestrial occupation, residents of Chicago must decide whether to continue to live under alien rule or support the resistance. When young Gabriel Drummond joins the insurgency, he soon finds himself under careful scrutiny from a shadowy figure who's trying to crush the rebellion and its plans for freedom. ",Action
The Promise,"When a powerful crime boss kills his mentor, a young gangster who is on the rise goes to war to get revenge. ",Action
The Purge: Election Year,"As a young woman, Sen. Charlie Roan survived the annual night of lawlessness that took the lives of her family members. As a presidential candidate, Roan is determined to end the yearly tradition of blood lust once and for all. When her opponents hatch a deadly scheme, the senator finds herself trapped on the streets of Washington, D.C., just as the latest Purge gets underway. Now, it's up to Leo Barnes (Frank Grillo), her head of security, to keep her alive during the next 12 hours of mayhem. ",Action
Godzilla: King of the Monsters,A U.S. newsman (Raymond Burr) in Tokyo recounts the story of a huge dinosaur roused from the sea by an atomic blast. ,Action
Those Who Wish Me Dead,"Oscar winner Jolie (""Girl, Interrupted,"" the ""Maleficent"" films) stars as Hannah, a smoke jumper still reeling from the loss of three lives she failed to save from a fire when she comes across a traumatized 12-year-old boy with nowhere else to turn. ",Action
The Lego Ninjago Movie,"The battle for NINJAGO City calls to action young Master Builder Lloyd, aka the Green Ninja, along with his friends, also secret ninja warriors. Led by Master Wu, as wise-cracking as he is wise, they must defeat the evil warlord Garmadon, who also happens to be Lloyd's dad. Pitting father against son, the epic showdown tests these fierce but undisciplined modern-day ninjas as they learn to check their egos and pull together to unleash the inner power of Spinjitzu. ",Animation
Taken 3,"Ex-covert operative Bryan Mills (Liam Neeson) and his ex-wife, Lenore (Famke Janssen), are enjoying a reconciliation when Lenore is brutally murdered. Bryan is framed for the crime and flees, with the CIA, FBI and police all in hot pursuit. For the last time, he channels his rage and particular set of skills into hunting down Lenore's real killers, taking his revenge and protecting the one important thing left in his life: his daughter, Kim (Maggie Grace). ",Action
The Machine,"In an effort to better understand the link between spirit and body, psychiatrist Marc Lacroix (Gérard Depardieu) constructs a device that can probe the brain of anyone attached to it. To test it, Marc recruits murderer Michel Zyto (Didier Bourdon) and connects them both to the machine -- but when their minds swap bodies during the process, the killer escapes. Worried his family is in danger, Marc sends his mistress, Marianne (Natalia Wörner), to warn his wife and child before it is too late. ",Action
Chennai Express,A man's (Shahrukh Khan) trip to fulfill his late grandfather's last wish turns into an unexpected adventure when he meets a unique young woman (Deepika Padukone) from southern India. ,Action
Man of Tai Chi,A young martial artist's amazing skills in tai chi grant him entry into an underworld fight club. ,Action
Honest Thief,"Hoping to cut a deal, a professional bank robber agrees to return all the money he stole in exchange for a reduced sentence. But when two FBI agents set him up for murder, he must now go on the run to clear his name and bring them to justice. ",Action
Erased,A new mother enters a Kafkaesque web of bureaucracy that strips her of her newborn and her existence when she disappears from the hospital computer. ,Action
Murder Mystery,A New York cop and his wife go on a European vacation to reinvigorate the spark in their marriage. A chance encounter leads to them being framed for the murder of an elderly billionaire. ,Action
Lockout,"A man who recently lost his job decides to move his family to an old house in rural Wisconsin, where bizarre events occur. ",Action
Exodus: Gods and Kings,"Egyptian Princes Moses (Christian Bale) and Ramses (Joel Edgerton) are raised together as brothers. When Ramses becomes pharaoh, Moses is his most-trusted adviser. However Moses soon discovers his Hebrew parentage, and Ramses banishes him to the desert -- often a death sentence. But God has a mission for Moses: Free the Israelites from slavery. Moses returns from exile and demands that Ramses let his people go, but the arrogant ruler is unmoved, leading to a battle of divine wills. ",Action
Hercules,"Disney tackles Greek mythology in this animated feature. Hercules (Tate Donovan), a son of gods, was snatched as a baby by Hades (James Woods) and forced to live among mortals as a half-man, half-god. Now a teenager, Hercules needs to perform a rite of passage on Earth to prove himself worthy of living with the gods on Mount Olympus. With his plucky satyr sidekick, Philoctetes (Danny DeVito), along for the ride, Hercules must learn how to use his strength to defeat a series of evil creatures. ",Action
The Tourist,A police inspector (Dominic Raacke) trails a serial killer who preys on vacationers. ,Action
Transporter 3,"Mob courier Frank Martin's (Jason Statham) latest assignment pairs him with Valentina (Natalya Rudakova), the cynical daughter of a Ukrainian official. While her father ponders what to do with three boatloads of toxic waste, Frank must guard the problematic woman and prevent her from wandering too far from his vehicle, or risk triggering the explosive shackles they both wear. ",Action
Thick as Thieves,"Brother-and-sister Canadian pickpockets (Gerry Quigley, Carolyn Dunn) are caught by an officer, who falls for the sister. ",Action
Lightyear,"Legendary space ranger Buzz Lightyear embarks on an intergalactic adventure alongside ambitious recruits Izzy, Mo, Darby, and his robot companion, Sox. As this motley crew tackles their toughest mission yet, they must learn to work together as a team to escape the evil Zurg and his dutiful robot army that are never far behind. ",Animation
Unhinged,"Terry, Nancy and Gloria wreck their car on an isolated road but are taken in by the Penrose family. Their relief is short-lived when they discover that the family has a dark and murderous secret. ",Action
Sucker Punch,A pimp's (Will Sierra) lackey (Paris Campbell) fights for his life after he decides to reform and rescue the prostitute (Christina Caparoula) he loves from their employer's clutches. ,Action
Valhalla Rising,"In 11th-century Scandinavia, an enslaved man dubbed One Eye (Mads Mikkelsen) because of an old facial wound stages a violent uprising against those who imprisoned him. One Eye links up with Eirik (Ewan Stewart) and other Christian fanatics who aim to use their muscle to spread God's word. Headed for Jerusalem, One Eye and his shipmates must cope with crew infighting and attacks from the coastline. But the journey's challenges are only a harbinger of even greater brutality. ",Action
Speed Racer,"Born into a family business of race cars, Speed Racer (Emile Hirsch) is one of the track's hot stars. Sitting at the wheel of his Mach 5, he consistently deflates the competition. When Speed turns down an offer from the head of Royalton Industries, he uncovers a secret. Powerful moguls fix the races to boost profits. Hoping to beat the executive, Speed enters the same arduous cross-country race that killed his brother. ",Action
CHIPS,"Jon Baker and Frank ""Ponch"" Poncherello have just joined the California Highway Patrol in Los Angeles, but for very different reasons. Baker is a former motorbike rider who's trying to put his life and marriage back together. Poncherello is a cocky, undercover FBI agent who's investigating a multimillion dollar heist that may be an inside job. Forced to work together, the inexperienced rookie and hardened veteran begin clashing instead of clicking while trying to nab the bad guys. ",Action
The Tournament,An unusual young Hungarian opponent damages the calm at the Budapest International Chess Tournament. ,Action
The Condemned,An exiled Argentine returns home to help look for the body of a political activist who disappeared during the dictatorship. ,Action
Miami Vice,"A case involving drug lords and murder in South Florida takes a personal turn for undercover detectives Sonny Crockett (Colin Farrell) and Ricardo Tubbs (Jamie Foxx). Unorthodox Crockett gets involved romantically with the Chinese-Cuban wife of a trafficker of arms and drugs, while Tubbs deals with an assault on those he loves. ",Action
Van Helsing,"Famed monster slayer Gabriel Van Helsing (Hugh Jackman) is dispatched to Transylvania to assist the last of the Valerious bloodline in defeating Count Dracula (Richard Roxburgh). Anna Valerious (Kate Beckinsale) reveals that Dracula has formed an unholy alliance with Dr. Frankenstein's monster (Shuler Hensley) and is hell-bent on exacting a centuries-old curse on her family. Together Anna and Van Helsing set out to destroy their common enemy, but uncover some unsettling secrets along the way. ",Action
The Hunted,An unusual relationship develops between a fugitive killer and a runaway orphan on an odyssey across England. ,Action
Jimmy Neutron: Boy Genius,"""Jimmy Neutron: Boy Genius"" tells the simple story of a 10-year-old boy and his robot dog - battling evil, rescuing his parents, saving the Earth - and returning home in time for dinner. Jimmy's always inventing gadgets to make his life in Retroville more interesting. A boy genius with real kid emotions, Jimmy sometimes fantasizes about life on his own. But when the parents of Jimmy's hometown are kidnapped by invading aliens, he quickly discovers that things aren't so great when they're gone. ",Animation
Shaft,"John Shaft Jr. may be an FBI cyber security expert, but to uncover the truth behind his best friend's untimely death, he needs an education that only his dad can provide. Absent throughout his childhood, the legendary John Shaft agrees to help his son navigate the heroin-infested underbelly of Harlem, N.Y. Besides, the locked and loaded Shaft has his own score to settle -- both professional and personal. ",Action
Wrongfully Accused,"Art patron Hibbing Goodhue (Michael York) is murdered, and an accident-prone concert violinist, Ryan Harrison (Leslie Nielsen), is arrested as the main suspect. Harrison didn't do it, but he's convicted of the crime. He's on the bus that will take him to prison, but he manages to escape after a traffic accident. On the run, Harrison tries to clear his name by seeking out the real killer, while the police, led by Lt. Fergus Falls (Richard Crenna), hunt him down. ",Action
Soldier,"To bust an illegal Indian syndicate, an undercover policeman (Bobby Deol) romances an arms dealer's daughter (Preity Zinta). ",Action
The Peacemaker,"An ex-gunslinger (James Mitchell) settles a war between ranchers and farmers, in his new role as parson. ",Action
First Knight,"Handsome swordsman Lancelot (Richard Gere) is incredibly skilled at fighting, but when he meets the lovely Guinevere (Julia Ormond), he can't seem to get past her defenses. She is betrothed to King Arthur (Sean Connery) and plans to go ahead with the wedding, despite her attraction to Lancelot. When the devious warrior Malagant (Ben Cross) rises up against Arthur, Lancelot must try to put his feelings aside and defend his king, Guinevere and all of Camelot. ",Action
The Shadow,A war veteran's mountain-biking vacation turns nightmarish when he is captured by a psychopath. ,Action
Bird on a Wire,"Rick Jarmin (Mel Gibson) is put in witness protection after he helps the FBI bust drug dealer Eugene Sorenson (David Carradine). Fifteen years later, he is living with a new identity as a gas station attendant in Detroit. When an old flame named Marianne (Goldie Hawn) stops at the gas station and recognizes him, his cover gets blown. The recently released Sorenson finds out, and both Jarmin and Marianne have to flee across the country with the vengeful Sorenson in hot pursuit. ",Action
Above the Law,"A martial-arts expert and former CIA agent, Nico Toscani (Steven Seagal) is working as a Chicago cop when a relatively routine drug-trafficking investigation leads to an international conspiracy. Soon Nico and his partner, Delores ""Jax"" Jackson (Pam Grier), are the targets of mysterious and powerful criminals, but he refuses to back down. As Nico gets deeper into the case, he must contend with an old adversary: corrupt CIA operative Kurt Zagon (Henry Silva). ",Action
Firestarter,"As youths, Andy McGee (David Keith) and his future wife, Vicky (Heather Locklear), participated in secret experiments, allowing themselves to be subjected to mysterious medical tests. Years later, the couple's daughter, Charlie (Drew Barrymore), begins to exhibit the ability of setting fires solely with her mind. This volatile talent makes the youngster extremely dangerous and soon she becomes a target for the enigmatic agency known as ""The Shop."" ",Action
Beneath the Planet of the Apes,"The second installment in ""The Planet of the Apes"" series. Here, an earthling sent to find the astronauts of the original film discovers not only a world of intelligent, talking apes, but an underground cult of grotesque ""humans"" who are the survivors of a nuclear blast years ago. ",Action
Venom: Let There Be Carnage,"Tom Hardy returns to the big screen as the lethal protector Venom, one of MARVEL's greatest and most complex characters. ",Action
Tiger Zinda Hai,East Indian agent Tiger joins forces with Pakistani agent Zoya to battle a ruthless militant. ,Action
Braven,"A logger and his father head to their hunting cabin, hoping for a quiet weekend. Instead, they find themselves in a kill-or-be-killed stand for survival when they encounter a gang of ruthless drug traffickers. ",Action
Teenage Mutant Ninja Turtles: Out of the Shadows,"The turtles face a new challenge when Shredder escapes from custody and joins forces with Baxter Stockman, a mad scientist who plans to use a serum to take over the world. Along for the ride are Bebop and Rocksteady, two dimwitted henchmen who provide plenty of muscle. Luckily, the turtles have their own allies in April O'Neil, Vernon Fenwick and Casey Jones, a hockey-masked vigilante. As the pizza-loving heroes prepare for battle, the notorious Krang also emerges to pose an even greater threat. ",Action
London Has Fallen,"After the death of the British prime minister, the world's most powerful leaders gather in London to pay their respects. Without warning, terrorists unleash a devastating attack that leaves the city in chaos and ruins. Secret Service agent Mike Banning (Gerard Butler) springs into action to bring U.S. President Benjamin Asher (Aaron Eckhart) to safety. When Asher falls into the hands of the sinister organization, it's up to Banning to save his commander in chief from a horrible fate. ",Action
Ride Along 2,"Rookie lawman Ben Barber (Kevin Hart) aspires to become a detective like James Payton (Ice Cube), his future brother-in-law. James reluctantly takes Ben to Miami to follow up on a lead that's connected to a drug ring. The case brings them to a homicide detective and a computer hacker who reveals evidence that implicates a respected businessman. It's now up to James and Ben to prove that charismatic executive Antonio Pope is actually a violent crime lord who rules southern Florida's drug trade. ",Action
Keeping Up with the Joneses,"The Gaffneys' lives are interrupted by the arrival of new neighbors, whose stunning looks are matched only by the worldly sophistication of their lives. Tim Jones is an accomplished travel writer whose hobbies include blowing glass, and his wife, Natalie, is a social media consultant, cooking blogger and heroine to Sri Lankan orphans. The Gaffneys soon find themselves in the center of a storm of international espionage that gives them a breathtaking glimpse of life outside their cul-de-sac. ",Action
The Great Wall,China's first emperor uses brutality to unite his nation and begins construction on his country's most impressive man-made achievement. ,Action
Gone,"Two tenacious lawyers (Joel Klug, Dirk Been) head to the Philippines just days before the end of the world. ",Action
The Double,"After his friend is murdered, a man returns to England and poses as his dead pal in order to acquire his inheritance. ",Action
The Last Witch Hunter,"The modern world holds many secrets, the most astounding being that witches still live among us. Centuries ago, Kaulder (Vin Diesel) managed to slay the all-powerful Witch Queen, decimating her followers in the process. Before her death, she cursed the valiant warrior with her own immortality, separating him from his beloved wife and daughter in the afterlife. Her resurrection now threatens the survival of the human race as Kaulder, the only one of his kind remaining, faces her vengeful wrath. ",Action
Abraham Lincoln: Vampire Hunter,"While still a boy, Abraham Lincoln loses his mother to a vampire's bite. He vows revenge, but fails in the attempt, narrowly escaping with his life. He is rescued by Henry (Dominic Cooper), a charismatic vampire hunter who instructs Abe in the fine art of dispatching bloodsuckers. Abe (Benjamin Walker) continues his fight against the undead well into adulthood and his presidency, making a last stand against the ultimate vampire foe (Rufus Sewell) on the eve of the Civil War's defining battle. ",Action
Kidnap,"After stumbling across illegality, a photojournalist is in danger. The only person standing between the two is a singer at a pub. ",Action
Suicide Squad,A rescue-patrol leader (Norman Foster) and his men brave daily disasters in a major city. ,Action
Star Wars: The Clone Wars,"As more star systems get swept into the Clone Wars, the valiant Jedi knights struggle to maintain order. Anakin Skywalker and his Padawan learner Ahsoka Tano embark on a mission that brings them face-to-face with Jabba the Hutt. Plotting against them is evil Count Dooku and his agent, Asajj Ventress, who would ensure that the Jedis fail. Meanwhile, Yoda and Obi-Wan Kenobi lead the clone army against the forces of the Dark Side. ",Animation
Transformers: Revenge of the Fallen,"Two years after he and his Autobot friends saved the Earth from the Decepticons, Sam Witwicky (Shia LaBeouf) faces a new battle: college. Meanwhile, Optimus Prime and the Autobots are working with a secret military organization and trying to make a home for themselves on Earth. When an ancient Decepticon known as The Fallen rises up to wreak vengeance, Sam and his girlfriend, Mikaela, must figure out the history of the Transformers on Earth and find a way to defeat The Fallen once and for all. ",Action
Iron Sky,The Nazis build a moon base in 1945 and hide there until 2018 when they plan to return to power. ,Action
Fatman,"To save his declining business, Chris Cringle, also known as Santa Claus, is forced into a partnership with the U.S. military. Making matters worse, Chris gets locked into a deadly battle of wits against a highly skilled assassin, hired by a precocious 12-year-old, after receiving a lump of coal in his stocking. ",Action
Sanctum,"Though the South Pacific's Esa-ala Caves are some of the least-accessible on Earth, expert diver Frank McGuire (Richard Roxburgh) has explored them for months. On one such expedition, Frank is joined by his teenage son, Josh (Rhys Wakefield), and financier Carl Hurley (Ioan Gruffudd). When a flash flood cuts off their exit, they are caught in a life-or-death situation. With supplies dwindling, the divers must navigate a treacherous labyrinth to find a new escape route or die in the process. ",Action
Red Tails,"During World War II, the Civil Aeronautics Authority selects 13 black cadets to become part of an experimental program at the Tuskegee Institute in Alabama. The program aims at training ""colored personnel"" to become fighter pilots for the Army. However, discrimination, lack of institutional support and the racist belief that these men lacked the intelligence and aptitude for the job dog their every step. Despite this, the Tuskegee Airmen, as they become known, more than prove their worth. ",Action
Doomsday,"When the first outbreak of the Reaper virus hit Scotland, Eden Sinclair was one of the last to escape containment and had to leave her mother behind. Twenty-five years later, Maj. Eden Sinclair (Rhona Mitra) leads a team back into the hot zone to find a counteragent to the virus, which has re-emerged in London. She and her comrades wage a desperate battle for survival against feral survivors, as they try to prevent it from ushering in a new dark age. ",Action
Punisher: War Zone,"Frank Castle, aka The Punisher (Ray Stevenson), turns the streets of New York City red as he wages a one man war against the crime syndicate responsible for the death of his wife and two kids. Aided by his trusted sidekick, Microchip (Wayne Knight), he almost kills Billy Russoti (Dominic West) and leaves him horribly disfigured. Billy renames himself Jigsaw and with the help of his crazed brother Loony Bin Jim, recruits criminals from every corner of the city to do battle with Frank. ",Action
Domino,"In this film loosely based on a true story, Domino Harvey (Keira Knightley), a former model, is now a bounty hunter who has been arrested for robbing an armored car. During interrogation, she claims innocence and tells her story. Harvey became a pupil of Ed Moseby (Mickey Rourke), who ran a course for aspiring bounty hunters. Along with Choco (Edgar Ramírez), the three of them became a successful team. But, when a bail bondsman (Delroy Lindo) offered a job, they faced a complicated frame-up. ",Action
Into the Blue,"Divers Sam (Jessica Alba) and Jared (Paul Walker) love life in the Bahamas. But when friends Bryce (Scott Caan) and Amanda (Ashley Scott) visit, the couple take them on a treasure-hunting trip, where they discover more than they bargained for: a downed airplane full of cocaine alongside a famous shipwreck. Unknown to Sam and Jared, Bryce makes a fatal mistake and decides to sell the cocaine -- which angers a group of drug dealers, who are now in hot pursuit of the divers. ",Action
2 Fast 2 Furious,"This sequel focuses on ex-police officer Brian O'Conner (Paul Walker), who relocates from Los Angeles to Miami to start over. Becoming involved in the street-racing scene in his new city, Brian befriends car-savvy Tej (Chris ""Ludacris"" Bridges) and Suki (Devon Aoki), but his competitive streak ends when federal agents apprehend him and he must enter into a deal with the FBI. Working with new partner Roman Pearce (Tyrese), Brian begins a dangerous mission to take down a powerful drug dealer. ",Action
Undercover Brother,"Blasted from the past and ready to take care of business, ""Undercover Brother"" is recruited to infiltrate a sinister underground movement headed by The Man. Partnered with the sassy, stunning Sistah Girl (Aunjanue Ellis), our hero must first undergo the ultimate attitude adjustment and trade in his 'fro and platforms for tennis sweaters and penny loafers. Once the transformation is complete, he's ready to take on the evil perpetrators of Operation Whitewash. ",Action
The One,"In a stunning dual role, international star Jet Li portrays Gabriel Yulaw, a police officer confronted with a sinister form of himself escaped from an advanced, parallel universe and intent on killing Gabriel. His alter ego's hunt culminates in a fateful battle between good and evil that changes Gabriel's perception of reality and forces him to examine the evil hidden within himself. ",Action
3000 Miles to Graceland,"It's International Elvis Week in Las Vegas, where the strip is flooded by a sea of King wannabes decked out in jumpsuits and sideburns. But five of the impersonators swaggering into the Riviera Hotel are toting heavy weaponry in their guitar cases. It's the heist of a lifetime, orchestrated by ex-con Michael (Kurt Russell) and his cunning former cellmate, Murphy (Kevin Costner). The crooked Elvises steal away with $3.2 million, leaving the hotel in ruins and a high body count in their wake. ",Action
The 6th Day,"A world of the very near future in which cattle, fish and even family pet can be cloned. But cloning humans is illegal -- that is until family man Adam Gibson comes home from work one day to find a clone has replaced him. Taken from his family and plunged into a sinister world he doesn't understand, Gibson must not only save himself from the assassins who must now destroy him to protect their secret, but uncover who and what is behind the horrible things happening to him. ",Action
Vertical Limit,"Feeling responsible for his father's death, which occurred during a climbing expedition, Peter Garrett (Chris O'Donnell) has quit the pursuit in favor of photography, while his sister, Annie (Robin Tunney), has become a top climber. After Annie is hired by wealthy businessman Elliot Vaughn (Bill Paxton) to lead a trek, inclement weather causes the crew to become trapped. Facing his fears, Peter assembles a rescue team, including experienced climber Montgomery Wick (Scott Glenn), to save them. ",Action
Jurassic Park III,"After being persuaded by a wealthy businessman to conduct an aerial tour of Isla Sorna, InGen's second site for a failed Jurassic Park experiment, Dr. Alan Grant (Sam Neill) discovers the true reason for his invitation. A tragic accident maroons the party of seven, and they must attempt to escape with their lives. ",Action
Six Days Seven Nights,"In the South Pacific island of Makatea, career-driven magazine editor Robin Monroe (Anne Heche) is on a week-long vacation getaway with her boyfriend, Frank Martin (David Schwimmer). A work assignment in neighboring Tahiti requires Robin to hire a cargo plane piloted by the cantankerous Quinn Harris (Harrison Ford). But when a powerful storm forces Quinn to make an emergency landing on a nearby deserted island, the dissimilar pair learn to set aside their differences in order to find rescue. ",Action
Hard Rain,"The small town of Huntingburg is forced to evacuate when torrential rains bring rising flood waters. The local sheriff (Randy Quaid) and town residents, having been through this before, are all too familiar with the looting and petty thefts that take place in an abandoned town. What they are not aware of, however, is the planned heist of an armored car sent to transport the $3 million from local banks. ",Action
Daylight,A group of armed robbers fleeing the police head for the New Jersey Tunnel and run right into trucks transporting toxic waste. The spectacular explosion that follows results in both ends of the tunnel collapsing and the handful of people who survived the explosion are now in peril. Kit Latura is the only man with the skill and knowledge to lead the band of survivors out of the tunnel before the structure collapses. ,Action
The Net,"A British scientist's (James Donald) team works behind barbed wire on hush-hush Project M7, open to treachery. ",Action
Timecop,"When mankind perfects time travel, the government establishes the Time Enforcement Commission to thwart criminal attempts to alter the timeline. Police officer Walker (Jean-Claude Van Damme) is recruited by TEC Cmdr. Matuzak (Bruce McGill), but soon finds his investigation of Senator Aaron McComb (Ron Silver) being thwarted by elements within the government. When Walker's wife, Melissa (Mia Sara), is attacked, he must travel across time to rescue her and save the future. ",Action
Fortress,"As the teacher at a small school in rural Australia, Sally Jones (Rachel Ward) leads a rather mundane life. However, for her and nine of her students, all of that changes when a band of criminals breaks into their school to take them hostage. Dragging the teacher and children to the outback, the kidnappers intend to hold their victims for ransom. But Jones has other plans. Leading her pupils, Jones turns on her captors and fights to first survive and then escape. ",Action
Passenger 57,"John Cutter (Wesley Snipes) is a former policeman flying to Los Angeles to start his new job working for the anti-terrorism unit of a major airline. However, apprehended terrorist Charles Rane (Bruce Payne) is on the flight, too, being transported by the FBI. After Rane's accomplices kill the FBI agents and free him, Cutter realizes the entire flight is in danger. With the help of flight attendant Marti Slayton (Alex Datcher), Cutter tries to capture Rane and free the passengers. ",Action
The Rookie,"A true story about a coach who discovers that it's never too late for dreams to come true. Jim Morris (Dennis Quaid) never made it out of the minor leagues before a shoulder injury ended his pitching career twelve years ago. Now a married-with-children high-school chemistry teacher and baseball coach in Texas, Jim's team makes a deal with him: if they win the district championship, Jim will try out with a major-league organization. ",Action
Conan the Destroyer,"In his second cinematic adventure, the mighty warrior Conan (Arnold Schwarzenegger) is tricked into working for the scheming Queen Taramis (Sarah Douglas). Along with finding a mystical horn, Conan and his allies, which include the fierce fighter, Zula (Grace Jones), and the wisecracking sorcerer, Akiro (Mako), must protect the beautiful young Princess Jehnna (Olivia d'Abo). With deception and danger at every turn, Conan has to use all of his power to defeat the evil foes that stand in his way. ",Action
Firefox,"Mitchell Gant (Clint Eastwood) is a veteran American pilot who becomes involved in a top-secret mission to steal a high-tech Russian fighter plane known as ""Firefox."" Covertly entering the Soviet Union, Gant receives help from dissidents within the country, most notably a group of scientists who have been working on the plane. As Gant reaches his goal of heisting the aircraft, enemy pilots are quick to follow, leading to a sequence of soaring dogfights as he attempts to elude Soviet jets. ",Action
The Black Hole,Mattie Carver experiences auditory and visual hallucinations as she witnesses the collapse of space and time. ,Action
Samrat Prithviraj,The heroism of the fearless King Prithviraj Chauhan as he faces off against Muhammad of Ghor. ,Action
Underwater,"Along with his partner, Dominic (Gilbert Roland), and his lovely wife, Theresa (Jane Russell), intrepid treasure hunter Johnny Gray (Richard Egan) embarks on a quest for sunken treasure in the Caribbean. Outfitted with advanced scuba gear, the team struggles to pinpoint the location of the rumored shipwreck of a centuries-old galleon loaded down with priceless antiques. When a group of money-hungry pirates takes a sudden interest in their expedition, the Grays find themselves in deep trouble. ",Action
Skyscraper,Slim pretends to be interested in Blondy's sweetheart to help him recover his spirit. ,Action
Morgan,"Volatile artist Morgan Delt (David Warner) returns to London after having been institutionalized, hoping to reconcile with his wife, Leonie (Vanessa Redgrave). When he learns she is leaving him for art dealer Charles Napier (Robert Stephens), Morgan is determined to win her back. While stalking Leonie, Morgan becomes obsessed with Marxism and gorillas. In his new monkey costume, the artist begins a campaign of harassment against Leonie and Charles. ",Action
Extinction,A struggling single mother is forced to choose between morality and law when she finds out that a gentle farmhand is more than what he seems. ,Action
Into the Storm,"From 1940-1945, British Prime Minister Winston Churchill (Brendan Gleeson) leads his country against Nazi aggression. ",Action
Noah,"When God decides that mankind has become too sinful and must be wiped off the Earth, he chooses Noah (Russell Crowe), a pious man, for a great task. Noah must build an ark large enough to hold his wife (Jennifer Connelly), adopted daughter (Emma Watson), sons (Logan Lerman, Douglas Booth, Leo McHugh Carroll) and their wives -- plus breeding pairs of every animal. When the task is completed, Noah and his family witness God's wrath in the form of an apocalyptic flood. ",Action
The Mortal Instruments: City of Bones,"In New York City, a seemingly ordinary teenager named Clary Fray (Lily Collins) learns that she is descended from a line of Shadowhunters -- half-angel warriors who protect humanity from evil forces. After her mother (Lena Headey) disappears, Clary joins forces with a group of Shadowhunters and enters Downworld, an alternate realm filled with demons, vampires and a host of other creatures. Clary and her companions must find and protect an ancient cup that holds the key to her mother's future. ",Action
The Host,"Earth has been colonized by the Souls, an alien race that wipes out the minds of humans and turns their bodies into hosts for interstellar travelers. Most of mankind has been eradicated, but some, like Melanie (Saoirse Ronan) and her family, have survived and are hiding. Melanie is captured by a Seeker and has a Soul named Wanderer implanted in her body, but she refuses to relinquish control. When Wanderer betrays her people to save Melanie, the Seeker sets out in relentless pursuit. ",Action
Haywire,"Behind the perfect family facade and glamorous lifestyle, Brooke Hayward (Deborah Raffin) is miserable. Her mother, famous actress Margaret Sullavan (Lee Remick), is trying to keep her crumbling marriage together, but her depression and insecurity are taking over. Brooke's father, Broadway playwright Leland Hayward (Jason Robards), is emotionally cruel and tries to buy her love with expensive gifts. As Margaret becomes increasingly unstable, Brooke and her siblings pay the ultimate price. ",Action
Battleship,"Lt. Alex Hopper (Taylor Kitsch) is a weapons officer aboard the destroyer USS John Paul Jones, while his older brother, Stone (Alexander Skarsgård), is the commanding officer of the USS Sampson. Unknown to Alex, Stone or the rest of the U.S. Navy, alien invaders have arrived on Earth with plans to steal Earth's resources. When a confrontation with the invaders knocks out the Navy's radar capability, American and Japanese forces must work together to find a way to save the planet. ",Action
Pride and Prejudice and Zombies,"In the 19th century, a mysterious plague turns the English countryside into a war zone. No one is safe as the dead come back to life to terrorize the land. Fate leads Elizabeth Bennet (Lily James), a master of martial arts and weaponry, to join forces with Mr. Darcy (Sam Riley), a handsome but arrogant gentleman. Elizabeth can't stand Darcy, but respects his skills as a zombie killer. Casting aside their personal differences, they unite on the blood-soaked battlefield to save their country. ",Action
Oldboy,"Dae-Su is an obnoxious drunk bailed from the police station yet again by a friend. However, he's abducted from the street and wakes up in a cell, where he remains for the next 15 years, drugged unconscious when human contact is unavoidable, otherwise with only the television as company. And then, suddenly released, he is invited to track down his jailor with a denouement that is simply stunning. ",Action
Teenage Mutant Ninja Turtles,"Splinter, the rat sensei, senses something amiss in New York City. His disciples, Leonardo, Donatello, Raphael and Michelangelo have grown apart since their last adventure. The teenage terrapins must somehow renew and strengthen their bond if they are to have any hope of defeating an evil industrialist's army of ancient monsters. ",Action
Resident Evil: Afterlife,"In a world overrun with the walking dead, Alice (Milla Jovovich) continues her battle against Umbrella Corp., rounding up survivors along the way. Joined by an old friend, Alice and her group set out for a rumored safe haven in Los Angeles. Instead of sanctuary, they find the city overrun with zombies, and a trap about to spring. ",Action
2012,"Earth's billions of inhabitants are unaware that the planet has an expiration date. With the warnings of an American scientist (Chiwetel Ejiofor), world leaders begin secret preparations for the survival of select members of society. When the global cataclysm finally occurs, failed writer Jackson Curtis (John Cusack) tries to lead his family to safety as the world starts falling apart. ",Action
The Man from Toronto,A woman poses as a maid in an attempt to get a true picture of the man she must marry to collect her inheritance. ,Action
Saw V,"As the apparently last disciple and heir apparent of Jigsaw, Hoffman (Costas Mandylor) goes on the hunt to protect his secret. Using a series of increasingly bizarre and grisly traps, Hoffman eliminates his enemies one by one to protect the Jigsaw legacy. ",Action
Straw Dogs,"David Sumner (Dustin Hoffman), a mild-mannered academic from the United States, marries Amy (Susan George), an Englishwoman. In order to escape a hectic stateside lifestyle, David and his wife relocate to the small town in rural Cornwall where Amy was raised. There, David is ostracized by the brutish men of the village, including Amy's old flame, Charlie (Del Henney). Eventually the taunts escalate, and two of the locals rape Amy. This sexual assault awakes a shockingly violent side of David. ",Action
Clash of the Titans,"Perseus (Harry Hamlin), son of the Greek god Zeus (Laurence Olivier), grows up on a deserted island. His destiny is to marry Princess Andromeda (Judi Bowker), who will someday rule the city of Joppa. But as long as the satyr Calibos (Neil McCarthy) -- who uses a giant vulture to kidnap Andromeda's soul every night -- is alive, no one can marry her. Perseus travels to Joppa, where he must defeat Calibos and other mythological monsters to rescue Andromeda. ",Action
Without Remorse,"An elite Navy SEAL uncovers an international conspiracy while seeking justice for the murder of his pregnant wife in Tom Clancy's Without Remorse, the explosive origin story of action hero John Clark -- one of the most popular characters in author Tom Clancy's Jack Ryan universe. When a squad of Russian soldiers kills his family in retaliation for his role in a top-secret op, Sr. Chief John Kelly (Michael B. Jordan) pursues the assassins at all costs. Joining forces with a fellow SEAL (Jodie Turner-Smith) and a shadowy CIA agent (Jamie Bell), Kelly's mission unwittingly exposes a covert plot that threatens to engulf the U.S. and Russia in an all-out war. Torn between personal honor and loyalty to his country, Kelly must fight his enemies without remorse if he hopes to avert disaster and reveal the powerful figures behind the conspiracy. ",Action
Wild Hogs,"Tired of their humdrum lives, some middle-aged friends (Tim Allen, John Travolta, Martin Lawrence) decide to temporarily ditch their responsibilities and take a motorcycle trip. The freedom of the open road holds many surprises for the group, including an encounter with the Del Fuegos, a hardcore gang, who take a dim view of the novice bikers. ",Action
Firewall,"Bank security expert Jack Stanfield (Harrison Ford) builds a career on his expertise in designing theft-proof computer systems for financial institutions. However, a criminal mastermind (Paul Bettany) kidnaps his family, and he must work feverishly to find a way to break into his own system and steal $100 million, for the lives of his loved ones hang in the balance. ",Action
Journey to the Center of the Earth,"A geologist (James Mason) and his assistant (Pat Boone) set off on an expedition to the center of the earth. Following directions found in an inscription hidden in volcanic rock, the explorers travel to a volcano in Iceland to begin their journey. Along the way, a widow of a famous scientist (Arlene Dahl) and an Icelander (Peter Ronson) join their party. However, the treacherous terrain and prehistoric monsters are not their only concern when a rival scientist (Thayer David) is on their trail. ",Action
Blade: Trinity,"The war between humans and vampires continues, but the humans' best hope, human-vampire hybrid warrior Blade (Wesley Snipes), has been framed for countless murders, turning popular sentiment against him. The vampire leader responsible for Blade's bad publicity is Danica Talos (Parker Posey), who's determined to finally lead her bloodthirsty compatriots to victory. Now Blade must team up with a band of rogue vampire hunters (Ryan Reynolds, Jessica Biel) to save humanity. ",Action
Around the World in 80 Days,"Phileas Fogg (Steve Coogan) is an inventor living in Victorian England. He believes he can travel around the world in 80 days. Another inventor (Jim Broadbent) challenges him to make the trip, and Phileas agrees. Accompanying Phileas on his journey are his loyal manservant, Passepartout (Jackie Chan), and Monique (Cécile de France), a beautiful navigator. Utilizing a variety of transportation means and Passepartout's martial arts skills, the trio embarks on a globe-spanning adventure. ",Action
Cradle 2 the Grave,"Master thief Anthony Fait (DMX) pulls off a major jewel heist and somehow manages to escape from the SWAT team that's pursuing him. A Taiwanese agent named Su (Jet Li) is on Fait's tail and wants to take him down so that he can retrieve the stolen black diamonds. But when Fait's daughter (Paige Hurd) is kidnapped by a rival criminal and Su's ex-partner (Mark Dacascos), Su must work with Fait to save the thief's daughter and get his revenge in the process. ",Action
Taxi 3,A cabdriver (Samy Naceri) and a policeman (Frédéric Diefenthal) pursue a gang of Chinese criminals committing robberies throughout France. ,Action
xXx,"Vin Diesel stars as former extreme sports athlete Xander ""XXX"" Cage, notorious for his death-defying public stunts. Betting he can succeed where other conventional spies have failed, Xander is recruited by NSA Agent Gibbons (Samuel L. Jackson) to become a different kind of undercover agent. Enlisted for a dangerous covert mission, he must use all his extreme skills to combat a clever, organized, and ruthless enemy far beyond the scope of his experience. ",Action
Reindeer Games,"Just released from prison, all Rudy Duncan (Ben Affleck) wants is to start a new life with Ashley (Charlize Theron), the girl of his dreams, whom he met through pen pal letters in prison. But between them and happiness stands her crazy brother, Gabriel (Gary Sinise), and his motley crue of deadly criminals who think Rudy has some inside information about a casino where he once had a job -- a casino Gabriel and his short-fused posse plan to take down. ",Action
Hollow Man,The thought of human invisibility has intrigued man for centuries. Highly gifted scientist Sebastian Caine develops a serum that induces complete invisibility. His remarkable transformation results in unimaginable power that seems to suffocate his sense of morality and leads to a furious and frightening conclusion. ,Action
End of Days,"With the millennium approaching, a series of disturbing signs suggests that Satan (Arnold Schwarzenegger) has returned to Earth and is walking the streets of New York City. It seems that Satan needs to find a woman who will bear his child, as the time for the arrival of the anti-Christ draws near. ",Action
Bulletproof,"Bulletproof explores the complexities of violence in schools by looking at the strategies employed to prevent it. The film observes the longstanding rituals that take place in and around American schools: homecoming parades, basketball practice, morning announcements, and math class. Unfolding alongside these scenes are a collection of newer traditions: lockdown drills, teacher firearms training, metal detector screenings, and school safety trade shows. Bulletproof asks what these rituals reflect back at us, looking beyond immediate causes and responses to mass shootings in a cinematic meditation on the array of forces that shape the culture of violence in the United States. ",Action
Sudden Death,Duke Smith (Robert Conrad) refuses to investigate the murder of Ed's family until Ed is killed in an explosion. ,Action
Species,"When government scientist Xavier Fitch (Ben Kingsley) intercepts a space transmission containing the genetic sequence for an alien life form, he uses it to produce ""Sil"" (Natasha Henstridge) -- a gorgeous alien-human hybrid. As Fitch's team grows concerned at her rapid rate of growth, Sil wrecks the laboratory and begins a violent quest for a suitable male human to impregnate her. The U.S. government dispatches top assassin Preston Lennox (Michael Madsen) and a team of experts to stop her. ",Action
Mortal Kombat,"Lord Rayden (Christopher Lambert) handpicks three martial artists -- federal agent Sonya Blade (Bridgette Wilson), Shaolin monk Lui Kang (Robin Shou) and action movie sensation Johnny Cage (Linden Ashby) -- and mentors them. After intense training, Rayden transports the trio to Outworld, the site of an inter-dimensional fighting tournament. There, the three humans must defeat the demonic warriors of the evil Shang Sung (Cary-Hiroyuki Tagawa) -- or allow Sung to take over the Earth. ",Action
Striking Distance,"Sgt. Tom Hardy (Bruce Willis) denounces his partner, Jimmy Detillo (Robert Pastorelli), for brutally interrogating a suspect. After Jimmy falls to his death from a bridge, Tom is transferred from homicide to the river rescue team. Two years later, the bodies of murdered young women begin turning up in the water -- all of whom were previously romantically linked to Tom. With the help of his new partner, Jo Christman (Sarah Jessica Parker), Tom sets out to find the killer. ",Action
RoboCop 2,"Cyborg Detroit policeman Alex Murphy (Peter Weller) is the sole officer on duty after the police force goes on strike against evil conglomerate Omni Consumer Products and its push to foreclose on the city of Detroit. Aside from dealing with the normal level of crime, Murphy must take on crime boss Cain (Tom Noonan), the spread of a dangerous new drug called ""Nuke"" and the attempt by psychologist Dr. Juliette Faxx (Belinda Bauer) to create another Robocop using a hardened criminal. ",Action
Hard to Kill,"When police detective Mason Storm (Steven Seagal) uncovers ties among corrupt cops, the mob and charismatic politician Vernon Trent (Bill Sadler), a hit is ordered on his family. During the attack, Storm's wife is killed, and the cop himself is severely injured. After waking up from a years-long coma, Storm, aided by gorgeous nurse Andy Stewart (Kelly LeBrock), slowly gets back on his feet and plots revenge against those who wronged him, particularly the duplicitous Sen. Trent. ",Action
Air America,"Despite having just had his Los Angeles pilot's license revoked, Billy Covington (Robert Downey Jr.) is hired by Air America, a clandestine airline operating out of Laos run by the CIA. He soon discovers that his mission is to covertly transport illicit goods in and out of Southeast Asia and that his copilot will be the wild-flying Gene Ryack (Mel Gibson). But when Covington begins expressing doubt about the dubious morality of their operation, the two hotheaded pilots become at odds. ",Action
Rambo III,"Col. Sam Trautman (Richard Crenna) travels to Thailand, hoping to convince veteran John Rambo (Sylvester Stallone) to accompany him on a training mission in Afghanistan. When Rambo refuses, Trautman decides to go alone -- but, while trying to help the mujahideen, Trautman is captured by a ruthless Russian colonel (Marc de Jonge) who submits him to torture. Hearing the news, Rambo volunteers for a top secret undercover mission to rescue his longtime friend. ",Action
Over the Top,A trucker (Sylvester Stallone) yanks his snooty son (David Mendenhall) out of military school and goes to Las Vegas to arm-wrestle. ,Action
Cobra,"Los Angeles policeman Lt. Marion ""Cobra"" Cobretti (Sylvester Stallone) finds himself at the center of a spate of murders carried out by a secret society called New Order: killers who select ""weak"" members of society for extermination. As the murder rate rises, Cobra takes model Ingrid (Brigitte Nielsen) into protective custody after she witnesses New Order's leader in action. As Cobra falls for Ingrid, they find shelter in a small town, but must soon fight for survival. ",Action
1941,"After Japan's attack on Pearl Harbor, residents of California descend into a wild panic, afraid that they might be the next target. Among them are Wild Bill Kelso (John Belushi), a crazed National Guard pilot; Sgt. Frank Tree (Dan Aykroyd), a patriotic, straight-laced tank crew commander; Ward Douglas (Ned Beatty), a civilian willing to help with the American war effort at any cost; and Maj. Gen. Joseph W. Stilwell (Robert Stack), who tries his hardest to maintain sanity amid the chaos. ",Action
Escape Room: Tournament of Champions,"Escape Room: Tournament of Champions is the sequel to the box office hit psychological thriller that terrified audiences around the world. In this installment, six people unwittingly find themselves locked in another series of escape rooms, slowly uncovering what they have in common to survive... and discovering they've all played the game before. ",Action
Jurassic World Dominion,"This summer, experience the epic conclusion to the Jurassic era as two generations unite for the first time. Chris Pratt and Bryce Dallas Howard are joined by Oscar®-winner Laura Dern, Jeff Goldblum and Sam Neill in Jurassic World Dominion, a bold, timely and breathtaking new adventure that spans the globe. From Jurassic World architect and director Colin Trevorrow, Dominion takes place four years after Isla Nublar has been destroyed. Dinosaurs now live--and hunt--alongside humans all over the world. This fragile balance will reshape the future and determine, once and for all, whether human beings are to remain the apex predators on a planet they now share with history's most fearsome creatures. ",Action
Dark Phoenix,"The X-Men face their most formidable and powerful foe when one of their own, Jean Grey, starts to spiral out of control. During a rescue mission in outer space, Jean is nearly killed when she's hit by a mysterious cosmic force. Once she returns home, this force not only makes her infinitely more powerful, but far more unstable. The X-Men must now band together to save her soul and battle aliens that want to use Grey's new abilities to rule the galaxy. ",Action
Samaritan,Nice guy Adam (Joseph O'Brien) stops to help a man on the side of the road. That act of compassion turns into something surreal when the stranger asks him to kill his wife -- or he will find and kill Adam's wife. ,Action
Close,Jost and Anna struggle through the world; on meeting they find shelter in each other. ,Action
Mulan,"Fearful that her ailing father will be drafted into the Chinese military, Mulan (Ming-Na Wen) takes his spot -- though, as a girl living under a patriarchal regime, she is technically unqualified to serve. She cleverly impersonates a man and goes off to train with fellow recruits. Accompanied by her dragon, Mushu (Eddie Murphy), she uses her smarts to help ward off a Hun invasion, falling in love with a dashing captain along the way. ",Action
The Darkest Minds,"When teens mysteriously develop powerful new abilities, they are declared a threat by the government and detained. One of the most powerful young people, Ruby, escapes from her camp and joins a group of runaways who are seeking a safe haven. Betrayed by the adults in power, this newfound family soon realizes that running is not enough -- they must use their collective powers to wage a resistance and take back their future. ",Action
Mechanic: Resurrection,"Living under cover in Brazil, master assassin Arthur Bishop (Jason Statham) springs back into action after an old enemy (Sam Hazeldine) kidnaps the woman (Jessica Alba) he loves. To save her life, Bishop must kill an imprisoned African warlord, a human trafficker (Toby Eddington) and an arms dealer (Tommy Lee Jones), all while making the deaths look like accidents. When things don't go exactly as planned, Bishop turns the tables on the people who forced him out of retirement. ",Action
Allegiant,"On the eve of his unit's deployment to Iraq, an officer (Seth Gabel) learns that one of his men plans to go AWOL to visit his sick child. ",Action
Hitman: Agent 47,"Genetically engineered from conception to be the perfect killing machine, he's the culmination of decades of research, endowed with unprecedented strength, speed, stamina and intelligence. Known only as Agent 47 (Rupert Friend), his latest target is a corporation that plans to unlock the secret of his past to create an army of killers even more powerful than him. With help from a young woman, the elite assassin confronts revelations about his own origins in an epic battle with his deadliest foe. ",Action
Cooties,"Elementary-school teachers (Elijah Wood, Alison Pill, Rainn Wilson) come under attack from children who have been turned into vicious monsters by contaminated chicken nuggets. ",Action
Chaos Walking,"In the not-too-distant future, Todd Hewitt (Tom Holland) discovers Viola (Daisy Ridley), a mysterious girl who crash lands on his planet, where all the women have disappeared and the men are afflicted by ""the Noise"" -- a force that puts all their thoughts on display. In this dangerous landscape, Viola's life is threatened -- and as Todd vows to protect her, he will have to discover his own inner power and unlock the planet's dark secrets. ",Action
Sabotage,"In June 1815, Napoleon Bonaparte and Duke Wellington set out to confront each other over more than the fate of Europe. ",Action
Wrath of the Titans,Calibus returns from the dead and seeks revenge against Perseus and his newborn son. ,Action
Bloodshot,"A torrid night of passion and terror awaits Phillip (Danny Dyer -- Eastenders, The Football Factory) after a chance meeting with a beautiful stranger, whose shocking secret past threatens to destroy them both. Little does he know he will soon be drawn into a nightmare more terrifying than even he can imagine. ",Action
Only God Forgives,"In Thailand, a drug trafficker's (Ryan Gosling) icy mother (Kristin Scott Thomas) sends him on a mission to avenge his older brother, who was killed for beating an underage prostitute to death. ",Action
The Three Musketeers,Young d'Artagnan proves his worth and teams up with three of the finest musketeers to save the Queen of France. ,Action
Journey 2: The Mysterious Island,"Now 17, Sean Anderson (Josh Hutcherson) receives a coded distress signal from an island where none should exist. Knowing that he will not be able to dissuade Sean from tracking the signal to its source, Hank (Dwayne Johnson), Sean's new stepfather, joins the teen on a quest to the South Pacific. Together with helicopter pilot Gabato (Luis Guzmán) and Gabato's feisty daughter, Kailani (Vanessa Hudgens), they set out to find the island and rescue its sole human inhabitant (Michael Caine). ",Action
Bullet to the Head,"When veteran hit man Jimmy Bobo (Sylvester Stallone) and his partner, Louis (Jon Seda), kill a corrupt ex-cop, Louis in turn loses his life to an ex-mercenary named Keegan (Jason Momoa). Detective Taylor Kwon (Sung Kang) senses a connection between the two killings and seeks out Bobo, who subsequently saves Kwon from an assassination attempt. The pair join forces against a common enemy: a ruthless real-estate developer named Robert Nkomo Morel (Adewale Akinnuoye-Agbaje). ",Action
Battle: Los Angeles,"For many years, humans have reported various UFO sightings around the world, fueling speculation about the existence of life on other worlds. In 2011, mankind learns the truth the hard way when alien invaders attack. One by one, the world's great cities fall, leaving Los Angeles as the battleground for humanity's last stand. It's up to a Marine staff sergeant (Aaron Eckhart) and his platoon to draw a line in the sand against a powerful enemy unlike any previously encountered. ",Action
The Matrix Resurrections,"To find out if his reality is a physical or mental construct, Mr. Anderson, aka Neo, will have to choose to follow the white rabbit once more. If he's learned anything, it's that choice, while an illusion, is still the only way out of -- or into -- the Matrix. Neo already knows what he has to do, but what he doesn't yet know is that the Matrix is stronger, more secure and far more dangerous than ever before. ",Action
Race to Witch Mountain,"Jack Bruno (Dwayne Johnson), a Las Vegas taxi driver, is swept up in the adventure of a lifetime when he meets Sara (AnnaSophia Robb) and Seth (Alexander Ludwig), a pair of extraterrestrial youths who possess paranormal powers. In order to prevent an invasion of Earth, Jack must help the youths reach their spaceship, which is buried within Witch Mountain. But the task will not be easy, for government operatives and an alien bounty hunter are fast on their trail. ",Action
Gamer,"Each week Kable (Gerard Butler), a death-row inmate, battles his fellow prisoners in a violent online game called ""Slayers,"" his every move controlled by a young gamer's remote device. To the players, Kable and the other inmates are just simulated characters. But, to a resistance group that opposes the game's inventor, Kable is a critical component of their plan to end the inventor's form of high-tech slavery. ",Action
Gemini Man,"Endowed with the power of invisibility following a freak accident, an agent uses his gift to track a gang of saboteurs. ",Action
Army of the Dead,An archaeological dig accidentally unleashes an ancient curse that reanimates an army of skeletal conquistadors who were lost centuries earlier while searching for El Dorado. ,Action
Armored,"Following his return from Iraq, Ty Hackett (Columbus Short) takes a job at the same armored-car company where his father worked. At the end of his probation period, his mentor and godfather, Mike Cochrane (Matt Dillon), reveals to Ty his plan to rob one of the company's trucks. Faced with the loss of his house and his younger brother to foster care, Ty reluctantly agrees to the plan, but when the heist goes badly, it's every man for himself. ",Action
Priest,"In a society ravaged by centuries of war between humans and vampires, a legendary warrior priest (Paul Bettany), a veteran of the last conflict, lives in an enclosed city ruled by the church. When a murderous pack of vampires kidnaps his niece (Lily Collins), the priest breaks his sacred vows and sets out to rescue her before the bloodsuckers put the bite on her. Joining him on his quest are his niece's boyfriend (Cam Gigandet) and a former priestess (Maggie Q) with supernatural fighting skills. ",Action
Drillbit Taylor,"For three misfit freshmen, the first day of high school becomes a living hell when Filkins (Alex Frost), the school bully, zeroes in on them. Chubby Ryan (Troy Gentile), diminutive Emmit (David Dorfman) and skinny Wade (Nate Hartley) all feel the wrath of Filkins. Realizing that their own chance for survival is to hire a bodyguard, the pals place an ad in the newspaper. Answering the call is Drillbit Taylor (Owen Wilson) ; armed, dangerous and completely fake. ",Action
Bandidas,"In 19th-century Mexico two women (Penélope Cruz, Salma Hayek) from vastly different backgrounds join forces against a ruthless U.S. bank magnate (Dwight Yoakam) who is stealing land from defenseless peasants so that he can build a railroad. A New York detective (Steve Zahn) arrives on the scene to bring the ladies in, but instead they win him over to their side. ",Action
Poseidon,"After a huge tidal wave capsizes a luxury liner in the North Atlantic, individual survivors (Josh Lucas, Kurt Russell, Jacinda Barrett) band together and traverse a hazardous upside-down maze that they hope will take them to safety. As the wrecked vessel fills with water, the survivors must call on hidden strengths and skills to face the fight of their lives. ",Action
Red Planet,"Mission Commander Kate Bowman is the pilot and commander of the most important mission of the 21st century: saving the human race. It's 2050, earth is dying, and colonizing Mars is the only alternative to obliteration. Bowman and her crew have made this journey to investigate what went wrong with the malfunctioning Mars Terraforming Project, and to repair it. But what happens when they get there is far more terrifying than anyone could have guessed. ",Action
Lara Croft: Tomb Raider,"This live action feature is inspired by the most successful interactive video-game character in history -- Lara Croft. Beautiful and brainy, Lara (Angelina Jolie) is the heroine of Eidos Interactive's phenomenally successful ""Tomb Raider"" game series. It is one woman's fearless quest criss-crossing the globe, in an amazing attempt to save the world. ",Action
Lake Placid,"When a mysterious creature violently kills a man in a Maine lake, Jack Wells (Bill Pullman), the local game warden, looks into the bizarre case, along with Sheriff Hank Keough (Brendan Gleeson) and visiting paleontologist Kelly Scott (Bridget Fonda). Looking for clues in a tooth that the beast left behind, Kelly and the others eventually locate the monster, a massive and vicious reptile eager to devour anything in its path. Can the crocodile-like creature be stopped? ",Action
Fantastic Four,"Scientist Reed Richards (Ioan Gruffudd) persuades his arrogant former classmate, Victor von Doom (Julian McMahon), to fund his experiments with cosmic energy. On von Doom's space station, the crew -- including astronaut Ben Grimm (Michael Chiklis), researcher Sue Storm (Jessica Alba) and pilot Johnny Storm (Chris Evans) -- are exposed to a mysterious cosmic storm that bestows super powers upon them. As they cope with their transformations, von Doom vows his revenge. ",Action
Money Train,"Charlie (Woody Harrelson) is a New York City transit cop with a mountain of gambling debts, and John (Wesley Snipes) is his responsible, and frequently exasperated, foster brother. They compete amicably for the affections of fellow officer Grace (Jennifer Lopez), but things become more serious when Charlie decides to rob the ""money train"" that carries the Transit Authority's daily proceeds. John must decide whether to prevent Charlie's crime or to join in on the heist. ",Action
Cutthroat Island,"Feisty Morgan Adams (Geena Davis) inherits her late buccaneer father's galleon and one-third of a map to buried treasure located on Cutthroat Island. The map had been tattooed on her father's scalp, and to find the treasure, she must locate and scalp his two brothers. But Morgan's swashbuckling uncle, Dawg Brown (Frank Langella), wants the treasure for himself, and does battle with his headstrong niece and her unwilling accomplice, Latin-speaking physician William Shaw (Matthew Modine). ",Action
Hudson Hawk,"Thief extraordinaire Hudson Hawk (Bruce Willis) has just been released from prison and all he wants is a nice cappuccino. However, before he can savor his favorite beverage, the highly eccentric and wealthy Darwin Mayflower (Richard E. Grant) and his equally odd wife, Minerva (Sandra Bernhard), rope Hawk into an ambitious series of heists. Soon Hawk is stealing no less than major works by Leonardo Da Vinci, priceless pieces that the Mayflowers plan to use in an exceedingly nefarious way. ",Action
Jay and Silent Bob Reboot,Jay and Silent Bob embark on a cross-country mission to stop Hollywood from filming a reboot based on them. ,Action
Brahmastra Part One: Shiva,"BRAHMĀSTRA - the Trilogy, is a 3-part film franchise and the beginning of India's first original universe -- the Astraverse. It is a new original cinematic universe inspired by deeply rooted concepts and tales in Indian mythology but set in the modern world, with epic storytelling of fantasy, adventure, good vs evil, love and hope; all told using cutting edge technology and never-seen-before visual spectacles. BRAHMĀSTRA: PART ONE, is the story of SHIVA -- a young man and our protagonist, who is on the brink of an epic love, with a girl named... Isha. But their world is turned upside down, because Shiva learns that he has a mysterious connection to the Brahmāstra... and a great power within him that he doesn't understand just yet -- the power of Fire. Experience Shiva's adventures as he journeys into the world of Astras and in turn, discovers his destiny as the DIVINE HERO of the universe. ",Action
Hold the Dark,"Summoned to a remote Alaskan village to search for the wolves that killed three children, a wolf expert soon finds himself unraveling a harrowing mystery. ",Action
The Meg,"Previously thought to be extinct, a massive creature attacks a deep-sea submersible, leaving it disabled and trapping the crew at the bottom of the Pacific. With time running out, a visionary oceanographer recruits rescue diver Jonas Taylor to save the crew and the sea itself from an unimaginable threat -- a 75-foot-long prehistoric shark known as the Megalodon. ",Action
The Ice Road,"After a remote diamond mine collapses in far northern Canada, a 'big-rig' ice road driver (Liam Neeson) must lead an impossible rescue mission over a frozen ocean to save the trapped miners. Contending with thawing waters and a massive storm, they discover the real threat is one they never saw coming. ",Action
Survivor,"A space-shuttle astronaut (Chip Mayer) sees total U.S./Soviet nuclear war from space, then returns to Earth. ",Action
Pacific Rim: Uprising,"Jake Pentecost is a once-promising Jaeger pilot whose legendary father gave his life to secure humanity's victory against the monstrous Kaiju. Jake has since abandoned his training only to become caught up in a criminal underworld. But when an even more unstoppable threat is unleashed to tear through cities and bring the world to its knees, Jake is given one last chance by his estranged sister, Mako Mori, to live up to his father's legacy. ",Action
Men in Black: International,"The Men in Black have expanded to cover the globe but so have the villains of the universe. To keep everyone safe, decorated Agent H and determined rookie M join forces -- an unlikely pairing that just might work. When aliens that can take the form of any human arrive on Earth, H and M embark on a globe-trotting adventure to save the agency -- and ultimately the world -- from their mischievous plans. ",Action
Wild Card,A young hipster who can't get over his ex-boyfriend agrees to join a blind dating service and ends up going on a series of the worst dates of all time. ,Action
Pixels,"When aliens intercept video feeds of classic arcade games and misinterpret them as a declaration of war, they attack Earth, using the games as models. Knowing that he must employ a similar strategy, President Will Cooper (Kevin James) recruits his childhood pal, former video-game champ and home-theater installer Sam Brenner (Adam Sandler), to lead a team of old-school arcade players and a military specialist (Michelle Monaghan) in an all-out battle to save the planet. ",Action
Transformers: Age of Extinction,"After an epic battle, a great city lies in ruins, but the Earth itself is saved. As humanity begins to pick up the pieces, a shadowy group emerges to try to take control of history. Meanwhile, an ancient and powerful new menace sets its sights on Earth. A new group of humans, led by Cade Yeager (Mark Wahlberg), helps Optimus Prime (Peter Cullen) and the Autobots rise up to meet their most fearsome challenge yet: a worldwide war of good versus evil. ",Action
Sleepless,An insomniac detective (Max von Sydow) comes out of retirement to track a serial killer who copies a string of old murders. ,Action
Machete Kills,"When the president (Carlos Estevez) of the United States has a mission that would be impossible for just any mortal man, the person he needs is Machete (Danny Trejo), a knife-wielding ex-Federale agent. Machete's mission is to take down Voz (Mel Gibson), a madman revolutionary and an eccentric billionaire arms dealer who has come up with a plot to start a nuclear war. Facing death at every turn from assassins, Machete pulls out all of his skills to get the job done. ",Action
Fire with Fire,A boy (Craig Sheffer) from a backwoods parole camp has a forest encounter with a girl (Virginia Madsen) from a school run by nuns. ,Action
The Dark Tower,"While working at a circus, a man (Herbert Lom) hypnotizes a trapezist to kill her partner. ",Action
MacGruber,"In the decade since his fiancee was killed, an Army Ranger, Green Beret and Navy SEAL rolled into one (Will Forte) has sworn off fighting crime, preferring instead to rock his mullet as a man of peace. But when his sworn enemy, Dieter Von Cunth, steals a nuclear warhead, only MacGruber and his crack team of experts (Kristen Wiig, Ryan Phillippe) are equal to the task of bringing the villain to justice. ",Action
Brick Mansions,"In a dystopian Detroit, grand houses that once housed the wealthy are now homes of the city's most-dangerous criminals. Surrounding the area is a giant wall to keep the rest of Detroit safe. For undercover cop Damien Collier (Paul Walker), every day is a battle against corruption as he struggles to bring his father's killer, Tremaine (RZA), to justice. Meanwhile, Damien and an ex-con named Lino (David Belle) work together to save the city from a plot to destroy it. ",Action
12 Rounds,"When New Orleans cop Danny Fisher (John Cena) prevents a brilliant thief from successfully carrying out his latest heist, the thief's girlfriend is accidentally killed. Hungry for revenge, the criminal mastermind breaks out of prison and kidnaps Danny's fiancee. To save her, Danny must successfully navigate his way through an elaborate series of tasks and puzzles, or else watch the love of his life die. ",Action
Toofaan,The story of a championship boxer. ,Action
Beckett,"While vacationing in Greece, American tourist Beckett (John David Washington) becomes the target of a manhunt after a devastating accident. Forced to run for his life and desperate to get across the country to the American embassy to clear his name, tensions escalate as the authorities close in, political unrest mounts, and Beckett falls even deeper into a dangerous web of conspiracy. ",Action
Jolt,"Lindy is a beautiful, sardonically-funny woman with a painful secret: Due to a lifelong, rare neurological disorder, she experiences sporadic rage-filled, murderous impulses that can only be stopped when she shocks herself with a special electrode device. Unable to find love and connection in a world that fears her bizarre condition, she finally trusts a man long enough to fall in love, only to find him murdered the next day. Heartbroken and enraged, she embarks on a revenge-filled mission to find his killer, while also being pursued by the police as the crime’s prime suspect. ",Action
The Contract,A rift grows between a husband and wife as they search for a surrogate mother. ,Action
Alexander,"The story is an epic that is as daring and ambitious as its subject, a relentless conqueror who by the age of 32 had amassed the greatest empire the world had ever seen. Past and present collide to form the puzzle of the protagonist, a tapestry of triumphs and tragedies in which childhood memories and Alexander's rise to power unfold side by side with the later day expansion of his empire, and its ultimate downfall. ",Action
Timeline,"While working at the site of an archaeological dig, Professor Johnston (Billy Connolly) stumbles into a wormhole and plunges back in time to 14th-century France. Mad scientist Robert Doniger (David Thewlis), who accidentally created the wormhole while developing a teleportation device, sends the professor's son, Chris (Paul Walker), and protégé Kate (Frances O'Connor) back in time to retrieve him. Unfortunately, their rescue mission is sidetracked by a bloody battle between France and England. ",Action
Hulk,"Eric Bana (""Black Hawk Down"") stars as scientist Bruce Banner, whose inner demons transform him in the aftermath of a catastrophic experiment; Jennifer Connelly portrays Betty Ross, whose scientific genius unwittingly helps unleash the Hulk; Nick Nolte plays Banner's brilliant father, who passes on a tragic legacy to his son; and Sam Elliott portrays the commander of a top-secret military research center. ",Action
Bad Company,"For Sadatomo Kozu (Yamato Okitsu) and his two best friends, skipping class and committing petty crimes are as much about escaping the horrifying environment of their school as rebellion. After all, their chief tormentor at school is their teacher, Kobayashi (Mikio Shimizu), whose approach to education starts and ends with obedience to authority -- those who do not submit are ""delinquents"" and ""scum"" deserving punishment. Inevitably, a war of wills between Sadatomo and Kobayashi ensues. ",Action
National Security,"Earl Montgomery (Martin Lawrence), a bombastic police academy reject, and Hank Rafferty (Steve Zahn), a disgraced, mild-mannered cop, can't seem to escape each other. They met on opposite sides of the law during a routine traffic stop that escalated out of control; now as lowly security guards they're thrown together to bust a smuggling operation. ",Action
Exit Wounds,"Steven Seagal stars as maverick Detroit police detective Orin Boyd, whose take-no-prisoners approach to domestic terrorism gets him booted downtown to the city's toughest precinct. Multi-Platinum hip hop star DMX stars as the powerful and mysterious crime lord Latrell Walker, whose dicey connections and seemingly unlimited cash make him everyone's target. Together the two men take on a conspiracy that reaches all the way through the ranks to the heart of the precinct. ",Action
Spy Kids,"Two young kids become spies in attempt to save their parents, who are ex-spies, from an evil mastermind. Armed with a bag of high tech gadgets and out-of-this world transportation, Carmen (Alexa Vega) and Juni (Daryl Sabara) will bravely jet through the air, dive under the seas and crisscross the globe in a series of thrilling adventures on a mission to save their parents ... and maybe even the world. ",Action
Chain Reaction,A peaceful accountant discovers an embezzlement plot at his company. He winds up involved in a corruption network connected to Brazil's political system. ,Action
Johnny Mnemonic,"In this film based on the William Gibson story, Johnny (Keanu Reeves) is a data courier who has a secret stash of information implanted into his mind. However, the data will kill Johnny if he cannot retrieve it within 48 hours. Accompanied by physically enhanced bodyguard Jane (Dina Meyer), Johnny sets out to acquire the passwords he needs to save himself. Worse yet, he is hunted by gangster Shinji (Denis Akiyama) and businessman Takahashi (Takeshi), both of whom seek the data Johnny possesses. ",Action
Buffy the Vampire Slayer,"For Buffy Summers (Kristy Swanson), nothing is the same after she meets Merrick Jamison-Smythe (Donald Sutherland). Merrick tells the teen that he's been sent to train her to fight vampires, and he proves himself by displaying his supernatural powers. Buffy is a quick study, and soon takes fellow student Oliver Pike (Luke Perry) under her wing, repeatedly saving him from fierce bloodsuckers. But, when a very dangerous vampire (Rutger Hauer) gets rambunctious, she must go to war again. ",Action
Double Impact,"Nearly 25 years after seeing his father killed by Hong Kong crime boss Raymond Zhang (Philip Chan Yan Kin), Chad Wagner (Jean-Claude Van Damme) is living in Los Angeles as a flourishing yet peaceful martial arts trainer. But Chad has a twin brother, Alex (also Van Damme), who suddenly reunites with his less-aggressive sibling and wants to avenge their father's death. As the pair plan their payback against Zhang, they also struggle to overcome their personal differences. ",Action
The 355,"When a top-secret weapon falls into mercenary hands, wild card CIA agent Mason ""Mace"" Brown (Oscar®-nominated actress Jessica Chastain) will need to join forces with rival badass German agent Marie (Diane Kruger, In the Fade), former MI6 ally and cutting-edge computer specialist Khadijah (Oscar® winner Lupita Nyong'o), and skilled Colombian psychologist Graciela (Oscar® winner Penélope Cruz) on a lethal, breakneck mission to retrieve it, while also staying one-step ahead of a mysterious woman, Lin Mi Sheng (Bingbing Fan, X-Men: Days of Future Past), who is tracking their every move. As the action rockets around the globe from the cafes of Paris to the markets of Morocco to the opulent auction houses of Shanghai, the quartet of women will forge a tenuous loyalty that could protect the world--or get them killed. ",Action
Mortdecai,"Charismatic British aristocrat and part-time shady art dealer Charlie Mortdecai (Johnny Depp) suffers from a constant lack of funds to support his lush lifestyle, so when Alistair Maitland (Ewan McGregor), a college friend and officer in MI5, asks him to find a stolen Goya painting, he accepts. But Charlie's not the only one with designs on the painting; an American heiress and a revolutionary want it too, for the artwork is rumored to contain the code to a bank account filled with Nazi gold. ",Action
Resident Evil: The Final Chapter,"The T-virus unleashed by the evil Umbrella Corp. has spread to every corner of the globe, infesting the planet with zombies, demons and monsters. Alice (Milla Jovovich), a former Umbrella employee turned rogue warrior, joins her friends on a last-chance mission to storm the company's headquarters located deep underneath what used to be Raccoon City. But the Red Queen (Ever Anderson) knows that Alice is coming, and the final battle will determine if the rest of mankind lives or dies. ",Action
The Cloverfield Paradox,"A crew aboard a space station finds itself alone after a scientific experiment causes the Earth to disappear. When a space shuttle appears, the space station's crew must determine if it is carrying friends or foes. ",Action
Ek Tha Tiger,Cupid's arrow pierces the heart of a no-nonsense superspy (Salman Khan) after he meets a beautiful dance student (Katrina Kaif). ,Action
Stolen,"In 1990 two people dressed as police officers steal 13 pieces from the Isabella Stewart Gardner Museum in Boston. The job is one of the most successful art thefts in history, and none of the loot has been recovered. Among the 13 priceless works stolen is Vermeer's ""The Concert,"" one of only 35 of the master's surviving works. ",Action
Baywatch,An old nemesis threatens Mitch's (David Hasselhoff) wedding day as his friends and fellow lifeguards reunite. ,Action
Cop Out,"Veteran detective Jimmy Monroe (Bruce Willis) needs money to pay for his daughter's upcoming wedding, so he decides it's time to sell his prized '52 Pafko baseball card. Before he can turn it into cash, it's stolen, and Jimmy and his partner, Paul (Tracy Morgan), confront a gangster who is obsessed with sports memorabilia. First, Jimmy and Paul have to rescue a beautiful murder-witness who has the key to a fortune in offshore bank accounts. ",Action
Green Lantern,"Sworn to preserve intergalactic order, the Green Lantern Corps has existed for centuries. Its newest recruit, Hal Jordan (Ryan Reynolds), is the first human to join the ranks. The Green Lanterns have little regard for humans, who have thus far been unable to harness the powers of the ring each member wears. But Jordan, a gifted and cocky test pilot, may be the corps' only hope when a new enemy called Parallax threatens the universal balance of power. ",Action
Seventh Son,"Centuries ago, a supernatural champion named Master Gregory (Jeff Bridges) defeated Mother Malkin (Julianne Moore), a malevolent witch. Now, she has escaped imprisonment and thirsts for vengeance. She summons her followers and prepares to unleash her wrath on humanity. Only one thing stands in her way: Master Gregory. Gregory takes Tom Ward (Ben Barnes) as his new apprentice, but he has only until the next full moon to teach Tom what usually takes years: how to prevail against dark magic. ",Action
Fighting,"Shawn MacArthur (Channing Tatum) barely makes a living selling counterfeit goods on the streets of New York. But he has a natural talent for street fighting, which con-man Harvey Boarden (Terrence Howard) wants to put to good use. Forming an uneasy alliance with Boarden, Shawn becomes top dog in the bare-knuckle-brawl circuit, taking down pro boxers, martial artists and ultimate fighters one by one. Shawn wants out of this dark world, but he faces the fight of his life to get there. ",Action
Sweet Girl,"Devoted family man Ray Cooper, vows justice against the pharmaceutical company responsible for pulling a potentially life saving drug from the market just before his wife (Adria Arjona) dies from cancer. But when his search for the truth leads to a deadly encounter that puts Ray and his daughter Rachel (Isabela Merced) in harm's way, Ray's mission turns into a quest for vengeance in order to protect the only family he has left. ",Action
Gunjan Saxena: The Kargil Girl,"The life of Air Force pilot, Gunjan Saxena, the first Indian female pilot in combat. ",Action
Snakes on a Plane,"FBI agent Nelville Flynn (Samuel L. Jackson) boards a flight from Hawaii to Los Angeles, escorting a witness to trial. An on-board assassin releases a crate of deadly serpents in an attempt to kill the witness. Flynn and a host of frightened passengers and crew must band together to survive the slithery threat. ",Action
The Man,"Seeking the gunrunners who killed his partner, undercover cop Derrick Vann (Samuel L. Jackson) sets up a sting. He arranges to meet an arms dealer at a diner, where he'll be the only one reading USA Today. But dentist Andy Fiddler (Eugene Levy), who's in Detroit for a conference, is there reading the same paper, and the dealer mistakes him for Vann and sets up the deal. When Vann realizes this, he drags the baffled Andy into the operation, forcing him to pose as the fake buyer. ",Action
Whiteout,A couple see a strange man wandering around in a snowstorm. ,Action
Lara Croft Tomb Raider: The Cradle of Life,"Fearless explorer Lara Croft (Angelina Jolie) tries to locate Pandora's box before criminals Jonathan Reiss (Ciarán Hinds) and Chen Lo (Simon Yam) use it for evil. According to myth, the box holds deadly organisms that could kill millions of people. With her old partner, Terry (Gerard Butler), Croft goes on a hunt that takes her from Europe to Asia to Africa, where pal Kosa (Djimon Hounsou) helps her. Along the way, Croft rappels down cliffs, scuba dives and decimates many male opponents. ",Action
Showtime,"Unpredicted opportunities come to Darius and Hakeem, who are trying to escape the crime-riddled streets of Harlem. ",Action
Eight Legged Freaks,The residents of a rural mining town discover that an unfortunate chemical spill has caused hundreds of little spiders to mutate overnight to the size of SUVs. It's up to mining engineer Chris McCormack (David Arquette) and Sheriff Sam Parker (Kari Wuhrer) to mobilize an eclectic group of townspeople into battle against the bloodthirsty eight-legged beasts. ,Action
Volcano,"A series of odd coincidences leaves Lukas, an interpreter for an OSCE military checkpoint inspection tour, stranded near a small southern Ukrainian town. With nowhere to turn, this city boy finds shelter at the home of a colorful local named Vova. ",Action
Metro,"Disgusted by the rash of robberies in his home city of Chennai, a man vows to combat the criminal menace by taking the law into his own hands. ",Action
Beverly Hills Ninja,"When a young American boy washes ashore near a village populated by skilled Japanese warriors, they raise the child as one of them and instruct him in the ways of ninjitsu. Unfortunately, he grows up to be the overweight and inept but very enthusiastic Haru (Chris Farley), who remains intent on becoming a real ninja. Haru's first assignment -- protecting a beautiful woman from California -- doesn't go smoothly, since he's both uncoordinated and completely unaccustomed to Western culture. ",Action
The Quest,"Americans Dan (Perry King), Art (Noah Beery Jr.), Cody and Carrie (Karen Austin) vie for the throne of a tiny kingdom. ",Action
Virtuosity,"A former cop who has been imprisoned for murdering the psychopath who killed his family, Parker Barnes (Denzel Washington) is recruited to test out a new virtual-reality program where the goal is to apprehend a computer-generated being called SID 6.7 (Russell Crowe), who has been modeled on hundreds of deranged criminals. When SID manages to escape into the real world, Barnes must capture or destroy him before the soulless entity can go on a killing spree. ",Action
Under Siege 2: Dark Territory,"Former U.S. Navy SEAL Casey Ryback (Steven Seagal) has left the armed forces to lead a quiet life as a chef in Denver. While taking time off from his new job, Ryback decides to go on a scenic train trip with his niece Sarah (Katherine Heigl). When the arrival of evil genius Travis Dane (Eric Bogosian) and an international team of hijackers interrupts their relaxing journey through the majestic Rocky Mountains, Ryback must get involved and save the day. ",Action
Judge Dredd,"In the crime-plagued future, the only thing standing between order and chaos is Judge Joseph Dredd (Sylvester Stallone). His duty: police the violent metropolitan sprawls that crowd the decaying earth, and kill criminals on the spot if necessary. The tables are turned, however, when maniacal ex-Judge Rico (Armand Assante) frames Dredd for murder. But, as his opponents soon discover, not even a prison sentence can stop Dredd from doling out his signature brand of justice. ",Action
Star Trek V: The Final Frontier,"A renegade Vulcan makes Kirk (William Shatner), Spock (Leonard Nimoy), McCoy (DeForest Kelley) and the Enterprise go to a planet at the center of the galaxy. ",Action
Raw Deal,"A crooked politician hires two gunslingers (Gerard Kennedy, Gus Mercurio) to hunt religious bushrangers in 1870s Australia. ",Action
Spiderhead,"In a state-of-the-art penitentiary run by brilliant visionary Steve Abnesti (Chris Hemsworth), inmates wear a surgically attached device that administers dosages of mind-altering drugs in exchange for commuted sentences. There are no bars, no cells, or orange jumpsuits. In Spiderhead, incarcerated volunteers are free to be themselves. Until they're not. At times, they're a better version. Need to lighten up? There's a drug for that. At a loss for words? There's a drug for that, too. But when two subjects, Jeff (Miles Teller) and Lizzy (Jurnee Smollett), form a connection, their path to redemption take a twistier turn, as Abnesti's experiments start to push the limits of free will altogether. ",Action
Ava,"During her summer vacation on the Atlantic coast, 13-year-old Ava learns that she is going to lose her vision. Her mother reacts to the news by ignoring it, but Ava approaches the problem on her own terms. ",Action
Wonder Woman 1984,"Diana Prince lives quietly among mortals in the vibrant, sleek 1980s -- an era of excess driven by the pursuit of having it all. Though she's come into her full powers, she maintains a low profile by curating ancient artifacts, and only performing heroic acts incognito. But soon, Diana will have to muster all of her strength, wisdom and courage as she finds herself squaring off against Maxwell Lord and the Cheetah, a villainess who possesses superhuman strength and agility. ",Action
Infinite,"For Evan McCauley (Mark Wahlberg), skills he has never learned and memories of places he has never visited haunt his daily life. Self-medicated and on the brink of a mental breakdown, Evan is sought by a secret group that call themselves “Infinites,” revealing to him that his memories may be real--but they are from multiple past lives. The Infinites bring Evan into their extraordinary world, where a gifted few are given the ability to be reborn with their memories and knowledge accumulated over centuries. With critical secrets buried in his past, Evan must work with the Infinites to unlock the answers in his memories in a race against time to save humanity from one of their own (Chiwetel Ejiofor) who seeks to end all life to stop what he views as the cursed, endless cycle of reincarnation. ",Action
Blackhat,"After a Hong Kong nuclear plant and the Mercantile Trade Exchange in Chicago are hacked by unknown perpetrators, a federal agent (Viola Davis) proposes that the FBI work with China to find the cyber-criminals. The leader of the Chinese team, Chen Dawai, insists that convicted hacker Nick Hathaway (Chris Hemsworth) be released from prison to help with the investigation. As Nick and his comrades chase their quarry, it becomes evident that the hackers have a sinister motive for their actions. ",Action
Gods of Egypt,"The survival of mankind hangs in the balance when Set (Gerard Butler), the merciless god of darkness, usurps Egypt's throne and plunges the prosperous empire into chaos and conflict. Hoping to save the world and rescue his true love, a defiant mortal named Bek (Brenton Thwaites) forms an unlikely alliance with the powerful god Horus (Nikolaj Coster-Waldau). Their battle against Set and his henchmen takes them into the afterlife and across the heavens for an epic confrontation. ",Action
Big Game,A murderous ex-convict (C. Thomas Howell) abducts and tortures human prey. ,Action
Vampire Academy,"Teenager Rose Hathaway (Zoey Deutch) is a Dhampir -- a human/vampire hybrid. Her best friend is Lissa Dragomir (Lucy Fry), a princess of the Moroi -- mortal, peaceful vampires. Both teens attend St. Vladamir's Academy, a secret haven for those like them. Rose trains with a handsome mentor (Danila Kozlovsky) to guarantee her place as Lissa's guardian -- although she may have to sacrifice everything to protect Lissa from enemies both within St. Vladamir's walls and outside them. ",Action
Drive Angry,"Thrown into hell for his crimes, brutal felon John Milton (Nicolas Cage) escapes from the fiery pit after cultists murder his daughter and take her baby. Intent on rescuing the child, Milton joins forces with a waitress, who gives him her ex-lover's fire-red muscle car. In it, the two pursue the cult leader, who plans to sacrifice the infant and unleash hell on Earth. However, the hunters become the hunted when Satan sends his merciless henchman (William Fichtner) to drag Milton back. ",Action
Killing Season,A U.S. veteran (Robert De Niro) and a former Serbian soldier (John Travolta) play cat-and-mouse games in the remote wilderness. ,Action
The Happytime Murders,"Detective Phil Philips is a down-on-his-luck puppet who used to work for the Los Angeles Police Department. When two puppets from an old TV show wind up dead, Phil suspects something is afoot and rejoins the LAPD as a consultant. Reunited with Connie Edwards, his former human partner, the bickering duo soon find themselves in a race against time to protect other former cast members before the killer strikes again. ",Action
The Man with the Iron Fists,"In 19th-century China, a stranger (RZA) settles in a jungle village and becomes its blacksmith. Radical tribal factions force him to fashion elaborate tools of destruction, and the clans' conflict soon erupts into a full war. Knowing he must take action, the blacksmith channels an ancient energy to transform himself into a human weapon. Fighting beside iconic heroes, the blacksmith harnesses this incredible power to defend his adopted people from an army of soulless villains. ",Action
Outside the Wire,"Set in the future, Harp (Damson Idris), a drone pilot, is sent into a deadly militarized zone where he finds himself working for Leo (Anthony Mackie), an android officer, tasked to locate a doomsday device before the insurgents do. ",Action
The Forever Purge,"Adela (Ana de la Reguera, Cowboys &amp; Aliens) and her husband Juan (Tenoch Huerta, Days of Grace) live in Texas, where Juan is working as a ranch hand for the wealthy Tucker family. Juan impresses the Tucker patriarch, Caleb (Will Patton, Halloween), but that fuels the jealous anger of Caleb’s son, Dylan (Josh Lucas, Ford v Ferrari). On the morning after The Purge, a masked gang of killers attacks the Tucker family--including Dylan’s wife (Cassidy Freeman, HBO’s The Righteous Gemstones), and his sister (Leven Rambin, The Hunger Games), forcing both families to band together and fight back as the country spirals into chaos and the United States begins to disintegrate around them. ",Action
Season of the Witch,"When Mary and her two children, Alice and Sam, return to their hometown, Maiden Hollow, after the death of Mary's father, they discover a small, isolated village. Upon the arrival, the locals seem hostile to them. ",Action
Pathfinder,"A Viking boy, nicknamed Ghost (Karl Urban), is adopted by the Wampanoag tribe after surviving a shipwreck despite a legend that death and destruction will follow the boy wherever he travels. Over the course of a decade, the young Norseman grows into a fierce warrior and battles against rampaging Vikings who slaughter the tribes. He defends the woman he loves (Moon Bloodgood) by waging a one-man war against his countrymen and becomes the savior and defender of the Wampanoag people. ",Action
I Spy,"When the Switchblade, the most sophisticated prototype stealth fighter created yet, is stolen from the U.S. government, one of the United States' top spies, Alex Scott (Owen Wilson), is called to action. What he doesn't expect is to get teamed up with a cocky civilian, World Class Boxing Champion Kelly Robinson (Eddie Murphy), on a dangerous top secret espionage mission. Their assignment: using equal parts skill and humor, catch Arnold Gundars, one of the world's most successful arms dealers. ",Action
Bulletproof Monk,"For 60 years, a mysterious monk with no name (Chow Yun-Fat) has zigzagged the globe to protect an ancient scroll -- a scroll that holds the key to unlimited power. Now the Monk must look for a new scroll keeper. Kar (Seann William Scott) is an unlikely candidate, a streetwise young man whose only interest is himself. But when he inadvertently saves the Bulletproof Monk from capture, the two become partners in a scheme to save the world from the scroll's most avid pursuer. ",Action
Godzilla,"During a nuclear test, the French government inadvertently mutates a lizard nest; years later, a giant lizard makes its way to New York City. Dr. Niko Tatopoulos (Matthew Broderick), an expert on the effects of radiation on animals, is sent by the U.S. government to study the beast. When the creature, dubbed ""Godzilla"" by news outlets, emerges, a massive battle with the military begins. To make matters worse, Niko discovers that Godzilla has laid a nest of 200 eggs, which are ready to hatch. ",Action
D3: The Mighty Ducks,"Having achieved a modicum of fame from their earlier adventures, all the members of the Mighty Ducks hockey team are awarded scholarships to a prestigious prep school. But they must now play in the school's uniforms and renounce their freewheeling style for the more disciplined approach of their new coach, Ted Orion (Jeffrey Nordling). After star player Charlie (Joshua Jackson) quits the team, their old coach, Gordon Bombay (Emilio Estevez), must return to reinvigorate the Ducks' spirit. ",Action
Batman Forever,"Batman (Val Kilmer) faces off against two foes: the schizophrenic, horribly scarred former District Attorney Harvey Dent, aka Two-Face (Tommy Lee Jones), and the Riddler (Jim Carrey), a disgruntled ex-Wayne Enterprises inventor seeking revenge against his former employer by unleashing his brain-sucking weapon on Gotham City's residents. As the caped crusader also deals with tortured memories of his parents' murder, he has a new romance, with psychologist Chase Meridian (Nicole Kidman). ",Action
Maximum Overdrive,"After a comet causes a radiation storm on Earth, machines come to life and turn against their makers. Holed up in a North Carolina truck stop, a group of survivors must fend for themselves against a mass of homicidal trucks. A diner cook, Bill Robinson (Emilio Estevez), emerges as the unlikely leader of the pack, attempting to find an escape plan for himself and the survivors, who include his boss, Bubba Hendershot (Pat Hingle), and a newlywed couple. ",Action
Battle for the Planet of the Apes,"""Battle for the Planet of the Apes"" is the final chapter in the sci-fi movie series. In this chapter, a tribute of human atomic bomb mutations are out to make life miserable for the peaceful ape tribe. The story is told primarily in flashback with the opening and closing taking place in the year 2670. ",Action
The New Mutants,"Five teenage mutants -- Mirage, Wolfsbane, Cannonball, Sunspot and Magik -- undergo treatments at a secret institution that will cure them of their dangerous powers. Invited by Dr. Cecilia Reyes to share their stories, their memories soon turn into terrifying realities as they start to question why they're being held and who's trying to destroy them. ",Action
Robin Hood,A thief steals from the rich to help the poor people of England. ,Action
The Predator,"From the outer reaches of space to the small-town streets of suburbia, the hunt comes home. The universe's most lethal hunters are stronger, smarter and deadlier than ever before, having genetically upgraded themselves with DNA from other species. When a boy accidentally triggers their return to Earth, only a ragtag crew of ex-soldiers and an evolutionary biologist can prevent the end of the human race. ",Action
Kick,A high-school football star (Russell Page) satisfies his secret passion for ballet by taking the lead role in a local production. ,Action
Point Break,"After a string of bizarre bank robberies in Southern California, with the crooks donning masks of various former presidents, a federal agent, Johnny Utah (Keanu Reeves), infiltrates the suspected gang. But this is no ordinary group of robbers. They're surfers -- led by the charismatic Bodhi (Patrick Swayze) -- who are addicted to the rush of thievery. But when Utah falls in love with a female surfer, Tyler (Lori Petty), who is close to the gang, it complicates his sense of duty. ",Action
Geostorm,"After an unprecedented series of natural disasters threatened the planet, the world's leaders came together to create an intricate network of satellites to control the global climate and keep everyone safe. But now, something has gone wrong: the system built to protect Earth is attacking it, and it becomes a race against the clock to uncover the real threat before a worldwide geostorm wipes out everything and everyone along with it. ",Action
Resident Evil: Retribution,"As Umbrella Corp.'s deadly T-virus continues to turn the world's population into legions of flesh-eating zombies, Alice (Milla Jovovich), the human race's last hope, awakes deep within Umbrella's secret operations facility. The further she delves into the complex, the more of her mysterious past is unveiled. Her global hunt for those responsible for the outbreak leads to a mind-blowing revelation; Aided by friends old and new, Alice fights to escape from a world on the edge of oblivion. ",Action
Jupiter Ascending,"Jupiter Jones (Mila Kunis) was born under signs that predicted future greatness, but her reality as a woman consists of cleaning other people's houses and endless bad breaks. Caine (Channing Tatum), a genetically engineered hunter, arrives on Earth to locate her, making Jupiter finally aware of the great destiny that awaits her: Jupiter's genetic signature marks her as the next in line for an extraordinary inheritance that could alter the balance of the cosmos. ",Action
One for the Money,"New Jersey native Stephanie Plum (Katherine Heigl) has plenty of attitude, even if she is broke after six months of unemployment. Desperate for money, Stephanie convinces her cousin to give her a job as a recovery agent with his bail-bond company. What she lacks in experience she makes up for in moxie, and she intends to bring in her cousin's biggest bail-jumper: Joe Morelli (Jason O'Mara), a former vice cop and murder suspect who broke Stephanie's heart when she was in high school. ",Action
Red Dawn,"In an alternate 1980s, the United States stands alone as communism grows stronger. When Soviet soldiers invade a small Colorado town, brothers Jed (Patrick Swayze) and Matt Eckert (Charlie Sheen) escape with friends to the forest. With their father, Tom (Harry Dean Stanton), a prisoner of the invading army, the children decide to fight against the Soviets. As the country comes under increasing attack, the group teams up with Lt. Col. Andrew Tanner (Powers Boothe) to take back their town. ",Action
The Colony,Secretive Malibu residents scramble to locate the confidential patient files of a murdered psychotherapist. ,Action
Bangkok Dangerous,"Remorseless assassin Joe (Nicolas Cage) is in Thailand to complete a series of contract killings for a crime boss called Surat (Nirattisai Kaljaruek). He hires a street punk named Kong (Shahkrit Yamnam) to run errands for him, all the while planning to kill the youth at the conclusion of his assignment. Instead, Joe becomes Kong's unlikely mentor,and begins a tentative romance with a local shop girl. But as Joe begins to let his guard down, Surat decides it is time to clean house. ",Action
Max Payne,"After the murders of his family and his partner, maverick cop Max (Mark Wahlberg) becomes hell-bent on revenge. Teamed with beautiful and deadly Russian mobster Mona Sax (Mila Kunis), Max journeys into a dark underworld to find the truth, but forces -- both worldly and supernatural -- align against him, determined to silence Max forever. ",Action
Hollywood Homicide,"After music mogul Antoine Sartain's (Isaiah Washington) rappers are murdered, Sgt. Joe Gavilan (Harrison Ford) and police Detective K.C. Calden (Josh Hartnett) start to investigate. Initially distracted -- Joe by his real estate transactions, K.C. by his acting aspirations -- the partners pull together when internal affairs officer Bennie Macko (Bruce Greenwood) starts hounding Joe. The two men prove skilled at police work, but they'll also need help from Joe's psychic gal pal (Lena Olin). ",Action
Daredevil,"Attorney Matt Murdock (Ben Affleck) is blind, but his other four senses function with superhuman sharpness. By day, Murdock represents the downtrodden. At night, he is Daredevil, a masked vigilante, a relentless avenger of justice. When Wilson Fisk (Michael Clarke Duncan) hires Bullseye (Colin Farrell) to kill Daredevil, Murdock must rely on his own senses and search out the conspirators against justice -- which may include his own girlfriend, Elektra (Jennifer Garner). ",Action
Spy Hard,"The evil Gen. Rancor (Andy Griffith) has his sights set on world domination, and only one man can stop him: Dick Steele (Leslie Nielsen), also known as Agent WD-40. Rancor needs to obtain a computer circuit for the missile that he is planning to fire, so Steele teams up with Veronique Ukrinsky (Nicollette Sheridan), a KGB agent whose father designed the chip. Together they try to locate the evil mastermind's headquarters, where Veronique's father and several other hostages are being held. ",Action
Tank Girl,"After a comet disrupts the rain cycle of Earth, the planet has become a desolate, barren desert by the year 2033. With resources scarce, Kesslee (Malcolm McDowell) -- head of the powerful and evil Water &amp; Power Corporation, the de facto government -- has taken control of the water supply. Unwilling to cower under Kesslee's tyrannical rule, a pair of outlaws known as Tank Girl (Lori Petty) and Jet Girl (Naomi Watts) rise up, joining the mysterious rebel Rippers to destroy the corrupt system. ",Action
The Karate Kid Part III,"Cobra Kai karate instructor John Kreese (Martin Kove) is still brooding over the defeat handed to him by Daniel LaRusso (Ralph Macchio) and Mr. Miyagi (Noriyuki ""Pat"" Morita). With his slimy partner, Terry Silver (Thomas Ian Griffith), Kreese plans an intricate payback that involves hiring a mean-spirited ringer (Sean Kanan) to rob Daniel of his championship title. When Mr. Miyagi refuses to train Daniel, even under threat, the boy makes the mistake of turning to Terry for guidance. ",Action
Masters of the Universe,"When the evil Skeletor (Frank Langella) finds a mysterious power called the Cosmic Key, he becomes nearly invincible. However, courageous warrior He-Man (Dolph Lundgren) locates inventor Gwildor (Billy Barty), who created the Key and has another version of it. During a battle, one of the Keys is transported to Earth, where it is found by teenagers Julie (Courteney Cox) and Kevin (Robert Duncan McNeill). Now both He-Man and Skeletor's forces arrive on Earth searching for the potent weapon. ",Action
Resident Evil: Welcome to Raccoon City,"Returning to the origins of the massively popular RESIDENT EVIL franchise, fan and filmmaker Johannes Roberts brings the games to life for a whole new generation of fans. In RESIDENT EVIL: WELCOME TO RACCOON CITY, once the booming home of pharmaceutical giant Umbrella Corporation, Raccoon City is now a dying Midwestern town. The company’s exodus left the city a wasteland... with great evil brewing below the surface. When that evil is unleashed, a group of survivors must work together to uncover the truth behind Umbrella and make it through the night. ",Action
Monster Hunter,"Behind our world, there is another -- a world of dangerous and powerful monsters that rule their domain with deadly ferocity. When Lt. Artemis and her loyal soldiers are transported from our world to the new one, the unflappable lieutenant receives the shock of her life. In a desperate battle for survival against enormous enemies with incredible powers and unstoppable, terrifying attacks, Artemis teams up with a mysterious hunter who has found a way to fight back. ",Action
The First Purge,"To push the crime rate below one percent for the rest of the year, the New Founding Fathers of America try a radical sociological experiment that allows citizens to vent their aggression for one night in an isolated community. The idea soon explodes across the nation when the violence of the oppressors meets the rage of the marginalized. ",Action
F9,"Vin Diesel's Dom Toretto is leading a quiet life off the grid with Letty and his son, little Brian, but they know that danger always lurks just over their peaceful horizon. This time, that threat will force Dom to confront the sins of his past if he's going to save those he loves most. His crew joins together to stop a world-shattering plot led by the most skilled assassin and high-performance driver they've ever encountered: a man who also happens to be Dom's forsaken brother, Jakob (John Cena, the upcoming The Suicide Squad). ",Action
Morbius,"One of the most compelling and conflicted characters in Sony Pictures Universe of Marvel Characters comes to the big screen as Oscar® winner Jared Leto transforms into the enigmatic antihero Michael Morbius. Dangerously ill with a rare blood disorder and determined to save others suffering his same fate, Dr. Morbius attempts a desperate gamble. While at first it seems to be a radical success, a darkness inside him is unleashed. Will good override evil -- or will Morbius succumb to his mysterious new urges? ",Action
The Bad Batch,"Arlen is abandoned in a Texas wasteland that is fenced off from civilization. While trying to navigate the unforgiving landscape, Arlen is captured by a savage band of cannibals led by the mysterious Miami Man. With her life on the line, she makes her way to The Dream. As she adjusts to life in the bad batch, Arlen discovers that being good or bad mostly depends on who's standing next to you. ",Action
Transformers: The Last Knight,"Humans are at war with the Transformers, and Optimus Prime is gone. The key to saving the future lies buried in the secrets of the past and the hidden history of Transformers on Earth. Now, it's up to the unlikely alliance of inventor Cade Yeager, Bumblebee, an English lord and an Oxford professor to save the world. ",Action
The Transporter Refueled,"Frank Martin is living a less perilous lifestyle, or so he thinks, transporting classified packages for questionable people. Things get complicated when femme fatale Anna and her three accomplices orchestrate a bank heist and the kidnapping of Frank's father. It's all part of a grand plan to take down the human trafficker who victimized her years earlier. Now a pawn in her vengeful scheme, the former special-operations mercenary must use his covert skills to play Anna's dangerous game. ",Action
Hellboy,"At the end of World War II, the Nazis attempt to open a portal to a paranormal dimension in order to defeat the Allies, but are only able to summon a baby demon who is rescued by Allied forces and dubbed ""Hellboy"" (Ron Perlman). Sixty years later, Hellboy serves as an agent in the Bureau of Paranormal Research and Defense, where he, aided by Abe Sapien (Doug Jones), a merman with psychic powers, and Liz Sherman (Selma Blair), a woman with pyrokinesis, protects America against dark forces. ",Action
Independence Day: Resurgence,"As the Fourth of July nears, satellite engineer David Levinson (Jeff Goldblum) investigates a 3,000-mile-wide mother ship that's approaching Earth. Fortunately, 20 years earlier, nations across the world started to use recovered extraterrestrial technology to develop an immense defense program. When the alien invaders attack with unprecedented force, the U.S. president, teams of scientists and brave fighter pilots spring into action to save the planet from a seemingly invincible enemy. ",Action
A Good Day to Die Hard,"New York City cop John McClane (Bruce Willis) arrives in Moscow to track down his estranged son, Jack (Jai Courtney). McClane thinks his son is a criminal, so it comes as a shock when he learns that Jack is actually working undercover to protect Komarov (Sebastian Koch), a Russian government whistleblower. With their own lives on the line, McClane and Jack must overcome their differences in order to get Komarov to safety and thwart a potentially disastrous crime in the Chernobyl region. ",Action
Rocketry: The Nambi Effect,"Tracing the life of Narayanan, renowned for developing the Vikas Engine -- one of the most efficient, liquid fuel engines in the world today that continues to be a workhorse at the Indian Space Research Organization (ISRO) in almost every launch, with the unique distinction of never having failed -- the former ISRO scientist and aerospace engineer was inevitably embroiled in a spy scandal. The biographical drama will unveil the truth behind the mystery as it unravels in an interview by celebrated superstar of Bollywood, Shah Rukh Khan (in English and Hindi) and Suriya Sivakumar (in Tamil) on a TV program. ",Biography
Goodfellas,"A young man grows up in the mob and works very hard to advance himself through the ranks. He enjoys his life of money and luxury, but is oblivious to the horror that he causes. A drug addiction and a few mistakes ultimately unravel his climb to the top. Based on the book ""Wiseguy"" by Nicholas Pileggi. ",Biography
The Intouchables,"An unlikely friendship develops between a wealthy quadriplegic (François Cluzet) and his caretaker (Omar Sy), just released from prison. ",Biography
The Pianist,"The lives of two Canadian sisters (Gail Travers, Macha Grenon) are changed by their mutual first love for a Japanese pianist (Eiji Okuda). ",Biography
Sardar Udham,The life of Sardar Udham Singh. ,Biography
Braveheart,"Chief Standing Rock's tribe has a treaty protecting its fishing grounds, but a canning corporation is violating the treaty through intimidation and force. Standing Rock's son, Braveheart, is sent to college to study law to protect their rights. ",Biography
Amadeus,"Wolfgang Amadeus Mozart (Tom Hulce) is a remarkably talented young Viennese composer who unwittingly finds a fierce rival in the disciplined and determined Antonio Salieri (F. Murray Abraham). Resenting Mozart for both his hedonistic lifestyle and his undeniable talent, the highly religious Salieri is gradually consumed by his jealousy and becomes obsessed with Mozart's downfall, leading to a devious scheme that has dire consequences for both men. ",Biography
Ayla: The Daughter of War,"During the Korean War, a young girl is saved by Süleyman, a sergeant in the Turkish Brigade who gives her the nickname Ayla. The two form a friendship despite the language barrier between them but are torn apart when Süleyman must return home. ",Biography
Lawrence of Arabia,"Due to his knowledge of the native Bedouin tribes, British Lieutenant T.E. Lawrence (Peter O'Toole) is sent to Arabia to find Prince Faisal (Alec Guinness) and serve as a liaison between the Arabs and the British in their fight against the Turks. With the aid of native Sherif Ali (Omar Sharif), Lawrence rebels against the orders of his superior officer and strikes out on a daring camel journey across the harsh desert to attack a well-guarded Turkish port. ",Adventure
Green Book,"Dr. Don Shirley is a world-class African-American pianist who's about to embark on a concert tour in the Deep South in 1962. In need of a driver and protection, Shirley recruits Tony Lip, a tough-talking bouncer from an Italian-American neighborhood in the Bronx. Despite their differences, the two men soon develop an unexpected bond while confronting racism and danger in an era of segregation. ",Biography
Bhaag Milkha Bhaag,"The story of runner Milkha Singh (Farhan Akhtar), called ""the Flying Sikh,"" shows his loss in the 400-meter finals at the 1960 Olympics. ",Biography
A Beautiful Mind,"A human drama inspired by events in the life of John Forbes Nash Jr., and in part based on the biography ""A Beautiful Mind"" by Sylvia Nasar. From the heights of notoriety to the depths of depravity, John Forbes Nash Jr. experienced it all. A mathematical genius, he made an astonishing discovery early in his career and stood on the brink of international acclaim. But the handsome and arrogant Nash soon found himself on a painful and harrowing journey of self-discovery. ",Biography
Raging Bull,The story of a middleweight boxer as he rises through ranks to earn his first shot at the middleweight crown. He falls in love with a gorgeous girl from the Bronx. The inability to express his feelings enters into the ring and eventually takes over his life. He eventually is sent into a downward spiral that costs him everything. ,Biography
Dersu Uzala,"""Dersu Uzala"" is epic in form yet intimate in scope. Set in the forests of Eastern Siberia at the turn of the century, it is a portrait of the friendship that grows between an aging hunter and a Russian surveyor. A romantic hymn to nature and the human spirit, it boasts a performance by Maxim Munzuk as the wise and wizened old man of the Taiga. ",Adventure
Hacksaw Ridge,"The true story of Pfc. Desmond T. Doss (Andrew Garfield), who won the Congressional Medal of Honor despite refusing to bear arms during WWII on religious grounds. Doss was drafted and ostracized by fellow soldiers for his pacifist stance but went on to earn respect and adoration for his bravery, selflessness and compassion after he risked his life -- without firing a shot -- to save 75 men in the Battle of Okinawa. ",Biography
12 Years a Slave,"In the years before the Civil War, Solomon Northup (Chiwetel Ejiofor), a free black man from upstate New York, is kidnapped and sold into slavery in the South. Subjected to the cruelty of one malevolent owner (Michael Fassbender), he also finds unexpected kindness from another, as he struggles continually to survive and maintain some of his dignity. Then in the 12th year of the disheartening ordeal, a chance meeting with an abolitionist from Canada changes Solomon's life forever. ",Biography
Rush,A beefy road warrior (Conrad Nichols) frees slave laborers from a tyrant's (Gordon Mitchell) oil refinery 10 years after nuclear war. ,Action
Spotlight,"Two musicians play Camille Saint-Saens' ""Danse Macabre"" amidst an unexpected light show. ",Biography
Into the Wild,"Christopher McCandless (Emile Hirsch), son of wealthy parents (Marcia Gay Harden, William Hurt), graduates from Emory University as a top student and athlete. However, instead of embarking on a prestigious and profitable career, he chooses to give his savings to charity, rid himself of his possessions, and set out on a journey to the Alaskan wilderness. ",Adventure
Hotel Rwanda,"Hutu Paul Rusesabagina manages the Hôtel des Mille Collines and lives a happy life with his Tutsi wife and their three children, but when Hutu military forces initiate a campaign of ethnic cleansing against the Tutsi minority, Paul is compelled to allow refugees to take shelter in his hotel. As the U.N. pulls out, Paul must struggle alone to protect the Tutsi refugees in the face of the escalating violence later known as the Rwandan genocide. ",Biography
Catch Me If You Can,"Frank Abagnale, Jr. (Leonardo DiCaprio) worked as a doctor, a lawyer, and as a co-pilot for a major airline -- all before his 18th birthday. A master of deception, he was also a brilliant forger, whose skill gave him his first real claim to fame: At the age of 17, Frank Abagnale, Jr. became the most successful bank robber in the history of the U.S. FBI Agent Carl Hanratty (Tom Hanks) makes it his prime mission to capture Frank and bring him to justice, but Frank is always one step ahead of him. ",Biography
In the Name of the Father,"Unemployed young Irishman Gerry Conlon (Daniel Day-Lewis) gets by as a petty thief in 1970s Belfast. When local IRA leaders get fed up with him, he flees to England and meets up with his friend Paul Hill (John Lynch). On the same night that the IRA bombs a nearby pub, the friends get kicked out of their communal digs and are forced to sleep in a park. He returns to Belfast, but is arrested as the prime suspect in the bombing and imprisoned, where he spends 15 years trying to clear his name. ",Biography
Gandhi,"This acclaimed biographical drama presents major events in the life of Mohandas Gandhi (Ben Kingsley), the beloved Indian leader who stood against British rule over his country. Dedicated to the concept of nonviolent resistance, Gandhi is initially dismissed by English officials, including the influential Lord Irwin (John Gielgud), but eventually he and his cause become internationally renowned, and his gatherings of passive protest move India towards independence. ",Biography
The Message,During World War II a Japanese officer interrogates five potential Chinese spies. ,Biography
Andrei Rublev,"An expansive Russian drama, this film focuses on the life of revered religious icon painter Andrei Rublev (Anatoliy Solonitsyn). Drifting from place to place in a tumultuous era, the peace-seeking monk eventually gains a reputation for his art. But after Rublev witnesses a brutal battle and unintentionally becomes involved, he takes a vow of silence and spends time away from his work. As he begins to ease his troubled soul, he takes steps towards becoming a painter once again. ",Biography
Inherit the Wind,"In the 1920s, Tennessee schoolteacher Bertram Cates (Dick York) is put on trial for violating the Butler Act, a state law that prohibits public school teachers from teaching evolution instead of creationism. Drawing intense national attention in the media with writer E. K. Hornbeck (Gene Kelly) reporting, two of the nation's leading lawyers go head to head: Matthew Harrison Brady (Fredric March) for the prosecution, and Henry Drummond (Spencer Tracy) for the defense. ",Biography
Lion,A man (Nandamuri Balakrishna) wakes up from a coma and becomes embroiled in a conspiracy meant to hide his true identity. ,Biography
The Imitation Game,"In 1939, newly created British intelligence agency MI6 recruits Cambridge mathematics alumnus Alan Turing (Benedict Cumberbatch) to crack Nazi codes, including Enigma -- which cryptanalysts had thought unbreakable. Turing's team, including Joan Clarke (Keira Knightley), analyze Enigma messages while he builds a machine to decipher them. Turing and team finally succeed and become heroes, but in 1952, the quiet genius encounters disgrace when authorities reveal he is gay and send him to prison. ",Biography
Persepolis,"Based on Satrapi's graphic novel about her life in pre and post-revolutionary Iran and then in Europe. The film traces Satrapi's growth from child to rebellious, punk-loving teenager in Iran. In the background are the growing tensions of the political climate in Iran in the 70s and 80s, with members of her liberal-leaning family detained and then executed, and the background of the disastrous Iran/Iraq war. ",Animation
Cinderella Man,"During the Great Depression, ex-boxer James J. Braddock (Russell Crowe) works as a day laborer until his former manager Joe Gould (Paul Giamatti) offers him a one-time slot against a rising young contender. After he wins a shocking upset, Braddock goes back into the ring full time, against the wishes of his frightened wife, Mae (Renée Zellweger). Dubbed ""The Cinderella Man"" for his rags-to-riches story, Braddock sets his sights on the defending champion, the fearsome Max Baer (Craig Bierko). ",Biography
Dog Day Afternoon,"When inexperienced criminal Sonny Wortzik (Al Pacino) leads a bank robbery in Brooklyn, things quickly go wrong, and a hostage situation develops. As Sonny and his accomplice, Sal Naturile (John Cazale), try desperately to remain in control, a media circus develops and the FBI arrives, creating even more tension. Gradually, Sonny's surprising motivations behind the robbery are revealed, and his standoff with law enforcement moves toward its inevitable end. ",Biography
Papillon,"Convicted murderer Henri Charriere (Steve McQueen), known as ""Papillon"" for his butterfly chest tattoo, is transported to French Guiana to serve his sentence in a work camp. Determined to escape, Papillon forms an unlikely relationship with the frail but notorious forger Louis Dega (Dustin Hoffman), who reluctantly joins in the attempt. Despite the harshness of solitary confinement, brutal conditions and constant threats of betrayal, Papillon leads a desperate escape off the island. ",Biography
Togo,A man who looks after cars parked on his turf must protect his livelihood when traffickers attempt to make him and his pals sell drugs on the streets. ,Adventure
Bohemian Rhapsody,"Freddie Mercury -- the lead singer of Queen -- defies stereotypes and convention to become one of history's most beloved entertainers. The band's revolutionary sound and popular songs lead to Queen's meteoric rise in the 1970s. After leaving the group to pursue a solo career, Mercury reunites with Queen for the benefit concert Live Aid -- resulting in one of the greatest performances in rock 'n' roll history. ",Biography
Dallas Buyers Club,"In mid-1980s Texas, electrician Ron Woodroof (Matthew McConaughey) is stunned to learn that he has AIDS. Though told that he has just 30 days left to live, Woodroof refuses to give in to despair. He seeks out alternative therapies and smuggles unapproved drugs into the U.S. from wherever he can find them. Woodroof joins forces with a fellow AIDS patient (Jared Leto) and begins selling the treatments to the growing number of people who can't wait for the medical establishment to save them. ",Biography
Patton,"Biography of controversial World War II hero General George S. Patton. The film covers his wartime activities and accomplishments, beginning with his entry into the North African campaign and ending with his removal from command after his outspoken criticism of US post-war military strategy. ",Biography
Hidden Figures,"Three brilliant African American women at NASA -- Katherine Johnson, Dorothy Vaughan and Mary Jackson -- serve as the brains behind one of the greatest operations in history: the launch of astronaut John Glenn into orbit, a stunning achievement that restored the nation's confidence, turned around the Space Race and galvanized the world. ",Biography
Loving Vincent,Mystery surrounds the death of famed painter Vincent van Gogh in 1890 France. ,Animation
Pride,"In 1970s Philadelphia, Jim Ellis (Terrence Howard), who is driven by a love of competitive swimming, fixes up an abandoned pool building with the help of a janitor named Elston (Bernie Mac). But when city officials mark the place for demolition, he fights back by founding an all-black swim team. Facing racism, violence and a hostile city official, Jim struggles to prepare his novice swimmers for the state championships. ",Biography
The Big Short,"In 2008, Wall Street guru Michael Burry realizes that a number of subprime home loans are in danger of defaulting. Burry bets against the housing market by throwing more than $1 billion of his investors' money into credit default swaps. His actions attract the attention of banker Jared Vennett (Ryan Gosling), hedge-fund specialist Mark Baum (Steve Carell) and other greedy opportunists. Together, these men make a fortune by taking full advantage of the impending economic collapse in America. ",Biography
Straight Outta Compton,"In 1988, a groundbreaking new group revolutionizes music and pop culture, changing and influencing hip-hop forever. N.W.A's first studio album, ""Straight Outta Compton,"" stirs controversy with its brutally honest depiction of life in Southern Los Angeles. With guidance from veteran manager Jerry Heller, band members Ice Cube (O'Shea Jackson Jr.), Dr. Dre (Corey Hawkins), Eazy-E, DJ Yella and MC Ren navigate their way through the industry, acquiring fame, fortune and a place in history. ",Biography
The Irishman,"In the 1950s, truck driver Frank Sheeran gets involved with Russell Bufalino and his Pennsylvania crime family. As Sheeran climbs the ranks to become a top hit man, he also goes to work for Jimmy Hoffa -- a powerful Teamster tied to organized crime. ",Biography
The Social Network,"In 2003, Harvard undergrad and computer genius Mark Zuckerberg (Jesse Eisenberg) begins work on a new concept that eventually turns into the global social network known as Facebook. Six years later, he is one of the youngest billionaires ever, but Zuckerberg finds that his unprecedented success leads to both personal and legal complications when he ends up on the receiving end of two lawsuits, one involving his former friend (Andrew Garfield). Based on the book ""The Accidental Billionaires."" ",Biography
Changeling,"Composer John Russell (George C. Scott) is vacationing with his family when a car accident kills his wife and daughter. Distraught with grief, Russell leaves his home in New York City for a giant, secluded house near Seattle. Soon Russell starts to feel the presence of a ghost, a boy who drowned in the bathtub there. Russell seeks the assistance of Claire Norman (Trish Van Devere), who led him to the house initially, in uncovering the secrets of the boy's death. ",Biography
American Gangster,"Frank Lucas (Denzel Washington) earns his living as a chauffeur to one of Harlem's leading mobsters. After his boss dies, Frank uses his own ingenuity and strict business code to become one of the inner city's most powerful crime bosses. Meanwhile, veteran cop Richie Roberts (Russell Crowe) senses a change in the mob's power structure and looks for ways to bring his opponent to justice. ",Biography
Walk the Line,"The rise of country music legend Johnny Cash (Joaquin Phoenix) begins with his days as a boy growing up on the family farm, where he struggles under the scorn of his father (Robert Patrick). As the years pass, Cash ends up in Memphis, Tenn., with his wife, Vivian (Ginnifer Goodwin), and breaks into the music scene after finding his trademark sound. While on tour, Cash meets the love of his life, singer June Carter (Reese Witherspoon), but Cash's volatile lifestyle threatens to keep them apart. ",Biography
Remember the Titans,"In Virginia, high school football is a way of life, an institution revered, each game celebrated more lavishly than Christmas, each playoff distinguished more grandly than any national holiday. And with such recognition, comes powerful emotions. In 1971 high school football was everything to the people of Alexandria. But when the local school board was forced to integrate an all black school with an all white school, the very foundation of football's great tradition was put to the test. ",Biography
The Insider,Police look for clues to capture the inside man behind a series of armed robberies. ,Biography
October Sky,"John Hickam (Chris Cooper) is a West Virginia coal miner who loves his job and expects his sons, Jim (Scott Miles) and Homer (Jake Gyllenhaal), to follow in his footsteps. But Jim gets a football scholarship, and Homer becomes interested in rocket science after seeing Sputnik 1 crossing the sky. John disapproves of his son's new mania, but Homer begins building rockets with the help of friends and a sympathetic teacher (Laura Dern). Rocketry, he hopes, will prove his ticket to a better life. ",Biography
Ed Wood,"Because of his eccentric habits and bafflingly strange films, director Ed Wood (Johnny Depp) is a Hollywood outcast. Nevertheless, with the help of the formerly famous Bela Lugosi and a devoted cast and crew of show-business misfits who believe in Ed's off-kilter vision, the filmmaker is able to bring his oversize dreams to cinematic life. Despite a lack of critical or commercial success, Ed and his friends manage to create an oddly endearing series of extremely low-budget films. ",Biography
Tombstone,"Wyatt Earp (Kurt Russell) and his brothers, Morgan (Bill Paxton) and Virgil (Sam Elliott), have left their gunslinger ways behind them to settle down and start a business in the town of Tombstone, Ariz. While they aren't looking to find trouble, trouble soon finds them when they become targets of the ruthless Cowboy gang. Now, together with Wyatt's best friend, Doc Holliday (Val Kilmer), the brothers pick up their guns once more to restore order to a lawless land. ",Biography
Glory,"In Kentucky, Agnes Tilbee (Charlotte Greenwood) struggles to keep her dwindling racehorse-breeding business afloat. When the latest foal turns out to be a filly, Agnes' granddaughter, Clarabel (Margaret O'Brien), latches onto the horse, naming her Glory and asking trainer Ned Otis (Walter Brennan) to help bring her along. When Glory is of age, Clarabel races her, but it is too soon, and the young filly loses -- while Clarabel remains unaware that the losses are forcing Agnes into bankruptcy. ",Biography
The Killing Fields,"New York Times reporter Sydney Schanberg (Sam Waterston) is on assignment covering the Cambodian Civil War, with the help of local interpreter Dith Pran (Haing S. Ngor) and American photojournalist Al Rockoff (John Malkovich). When the U.S. Army pulls out amid escalating violence, Schanberg makes exit arrangements for Pran and his family. Pran, however, tells Schanberg he intends to stay in Cambodia to help cover the unfolding story -- a decision he may regret as the Khmer Rouge rebels move in. ",Biography
The Right Stuff,"This adaptation of the non-fiction novel by Tom Wolfe chronicles the first 15 years of America's space program. By focusing on the lives of the Mercury astronauts, including John Glenn (Ed Harris) and Alan Shepard (Scott Glenn), the film recounts the dangers and frustrations experienced by those involved with NASA's earliest achievements. It also depicts their family lives and the personal crises they endured during an era of great political turmoil and technological innovation. ",Adventure
Kaze tachinu,"A lifelong love of flight inspires Japanese aviation engineer Jiro Horikoshi, whose storied career includes the creation of the A-6M World War II fighter plane. ",Animation
Ray,"Legendary soul musician Ray Charles is portrayed by Jamie Foxx in this Oscar-winning biopic. Young Ray watches his 7-year-old brother drown at age seven. When he loses his sight at the age of 9, his hardworking mother (Sharon Warren) urges him not to feel sorry for himself. He rises through the ranks of the Seattle jazz scene, struggling with drug addiction and infidelity while on the road. Supported by his wife (Kerry Washington), Ray Charles redefines soul music and inspires a generation. ",Biography
Finding Neverland,"This charming account of a period in the life of author J.M. Barrie (Johnny Depp) reveals the real relationships and events that served as the basis for the author's most iconic work, ""Peter Pan."" After Barrie develops a platonic relationship with the widowed Sylvia (Kate Winslet) and her four sons, he is inspired to write a play about a group of children who don't want to grow up. The work proves a hit and winds up bringing Barrie and the children together in a way he had never expected. ",Biography
Donnie Brasco,"Joseph Pistone (Johnny Depp) is an FBI agent who has infiltrated one of the major New York Mafia families and is living under the name Donnie Brasco. He develops a relationship with mob hit man Benjamin ""Lefty"" Ruggiero (Al Pacino) in order to get deeper under cover, but ends up developing a real friendship with the Mafioso. As their relationship develops, Pistone must decide whether or not to complete his job, knowing that it will lead to the murder of his new friend. ",Biography
Shine,"As a child piano prodigy, David Helfgott's (Geoffrey Rush) musical ambitions generate friction with his overbearing father, Peter (Armin Mueller-Stahl). When Helfgott travels to London on a musical scholarship, his career as a pianist blossoms. However, the pressures of his newfound fame, coupled with the echoes of his tumultuous childhood, conspire to bring Helfgott's latent schizophrenia boiling to the surface, and he spends years in and out of various mental institutions. ",Biography
Il postino,"Mario Ruoppolo, the mailman on an Italian island, pines from afar for a beautiful waitress. But when exiled Chilean poet Pablo Neruda comes to live on the island, Ruoppolo delivers Neruda's mail and picks up lessons on love, life and poetry. ",Biography
Serpico,"Frank Serpico (Al Pacino) is an idealistic New York City cop who refuses to take bribes, unlike the rest of the force. His actions get Frank shunned by the other officers, and often placed in dangerous situations by his partners. When his superiors ignore Frank's accusations of corruption, he decides to go public with the allegations. Although this causes the Knapp Commission to investigate his claims, Frank has also placed a target on himself. The film is based on a true story. ",Biography
A Man for All Seasons,"When the power-hungry Henry VIII (Martin Chamberlain) seeks to annul his marriage and take a new bride, principled Sir Thomas More (Charlton Heston), the Lord Chancellor of England, will not support the king on the matter. Though More's wife, Lady Alice (Vanessa Redgrave), understands his rift with Henry, his associate, Cardinal Wolsey (John Gielgud), is willing to go along with the king's wishes, creating a conflict between More and the two powerful leaders. ",Biography
Dark Waters,A girl travels to an island after the death of her father to find out why he funded a monastery. ,Biography
The Two Popes,"Behind the Vatican walls, Pope Benedict and the future Pope Francis must find common ground to forge a new path for the Catholic Church. ",Biography
The Boy Who Harnessed the Wind,A 13-year-old boy is thrown out of the school he loves when his family can no longer afford the fees. He sneaks into the library and learns how to build a windmill to save his village from a famine. ,Biography
Sanju,"Coming from a family of cinematic legends, East Indian actor Sanjay Dutt reaches dizzying heights of success -- but also battles numerous addictions and other personal demons. ",Biography
Just Mercy,"After graduating from Harvard, Bryan Stevenson heads to Alabama to defend those wrongly condemned or those not afforded proper representation. One of his first cases is that of Walter McMillian, who is sentenced to die in 1987 for the murder of an 18-year-old girl, despite evidence proving his innocence. In the years that follow, Stevenson encounters racism and legal and political maneuverings as he tirelessly fights for McMillian's life. ",Biography
Philomena,"In 1952, Irish teenager Philomena (Judi Dench) became pregnant out of wedlock and was sent to a convent. When her baby, Anthony, was a toddler, the nuns took Philomena's child away from her and put him up for adoption in the United States. For the next 50 years, she searched tirelessly for her son. When former BBC correspondent Martin Sixsmith (Steve Coogan) learns of the story, he becomes her ally. They travel together to America to find Anthony and become unexpectedly close in the process. ",Biography
127 Hours,"While exploring a remote canyon in Utah, mountaineer and adventurer Aron Ralston (James Franco) becomes trapped when a boulder falls on his arm. Over the next five days, Ralston examines his life and considers his options, leading him to an agonizing choice: to amputate his arm so that he can extricate himself and try to make his way back to civilization or remain pinned to the canyon wall and likely die. Based on Ralston's book, ""Between a Rock and a Hard Place."" ",Biography
Moneyball,"Billy Beane (Brad Pitt), general manager of the Oakland A's, one day has an epiphany: Baseball's conventional wisdom is all wrong. Faced with a tight budget, Beane must reinvent his team by outsmarting the richer ball clubs. Joining forces with Ivy League graduate Peter Brand (Jonah Hill), Beane prepares to challenge old-school traditions. He recruits bargain-bin players whom the scouts have labeled as flawed, but have game-winning potential. Based on the book by Michael Lewis. ",Biography
The Blind Side,"Michael Oher (Quinton Aaron), a homeless black teen, has drifted in and out of the school system for years. Then Leigh Anne Tuohy (Sandra Bullock) and her husband, Sean (Tim McGraw), take him in. The Tuohys eventually become Michael's legal guardians, transforming both his life and theirs. Michael's tremendous size and protective instincts make him a formidable force on the gridiron, and with help from his new family and devoted tutor, he realizes his potential as a student and football player. ",Biography
Freedom Writers,"A dedicated teacher (Hilary Swank) in a racially divided Los Angeles school has a class of at-risk teenagers deemed incapable of learning. Instead of giving up, she inspires her students to take an interest in their education and planning their future. She assigns reading material that relates to their lives and encourages them all to keep journals. ",Biography
The Last King of Scotland,"While in Uganda on a medical mission, Scottish doctor Nicholas Garrigan (James McAvoy) becomes the personal physician and close confidante of dictator Idi Amin (Forest Whitaker). Although at first Dr. Garrigan feels flattered by his new position of power, he soon comes to realize that Amin's rule is soaked in blood, and that he is complicit in the atrocities. Garrigan faces the fight of his life as he tries to escape Amin's grasp. ",Biography
La Vie en Rose,"Born into poverty and raised in a brothel, Édith Piaf (Marion Cotillard) manages to achieve worldwide fame. Though her extraordinary voice and charisma open many doors that lead to friendships and romances, she experiences great personal loss, drug addiction and an early death. ",Biography
Control,"In 1970s England, troubled musician Ian Curtis (Sam Riley) rises to fame as lead singer of the band Joy Division. A husband and father, Curtis begins to feel the strain of his band's growing fortune, his crumbling marriage to wife Deborah (Samantha Morton) and his worsening epilepsy. ",Biography
King Richard,"Armed with a clear vision and a brazen 78-page plan, Richard Williams is determined to write his daughters, Venus and Serena, into history. Training on Compton, California's neglected tennis courts--rain or shine--the girls are shaped by their father's unyielding commitment and their mother's balanced perspective and keen intuition, defying the seemingly insurmountable odds and prevailing expectations laid before them. Based on the true story that will inspire the world, ""King Richard"" follows the uplifting journey of a family whose unwavering resolve and unconditional belief ultimately delivers two of the world's greatest sports legends. ",Biography
83,"On 25th of June 1983, the Lord's Cricket Ground witnessed one of the biggest underdog stories in the history of sports. Fourteen inspired men fought against all odds and orchestrated India's greatest sporting triumph by beating the twice over World Champions West Indies! This victory put India on the map again and provided the platform to make India the greatest cricketing nation in the world today. Armed with self-belief and conviction, one man guided the team to a historic victory. ",Biography
BlacKkKlansman,"Ron Stallworth is the first African-American detective to serve in the Colorado Springs Police Department. Determined to make a name for himself, Stallworth bravely sets out on a dangerous mission: infiltrate and expose the Ku Klux Klan. The detective soon recruits a more seasoned colleague, Flip Zimmerman, into the undercover investigation of a lifetime. Together, they team up to take down the extremist hate group as the organization aims to sanitize its rhetoric to appeal to the mainstream. ",Biography
The Favourite,"In the early 18th century, England is at war with the French. Nevertheless, duck racing and pineapple eating are thriving. A frail Queen Anne occupies the throne, and her close friend Lady Sarah governs the country in her stead while tending to Anne's ill health and mercurial temper. When a new servant, Abigail, arrives, her charm endears her to Sarah. Sarah takes Abigail under her wing, and Abigail sees a chance to return to her aristocratic roots. ",Biography
Richard Jewell,"During the 1996 Summer Olympics in Atlanta, security guard Richard Jewell discovers a suspicious backpack under a bench in Centennial Park. With little time to spare, he helps to evacuate the area until the incendiary device inside the bag explodes. Hailed as a hero who saved lives, Jewell's own life starts to unravel when the FBI names him the prime suspect in the bombing. ",Biography
Fruitvale Station,"Though he once spent time in San Quentin, 22-year-old black man Oscar Grant (Michael B. Jordan) is now trying hard to live a clean life and support his girlfriend (Melonie Diaz) and young daughter (Ariana Neal). Flashbacks reveal the last day in Oscar's life, in which he accompanied his family and friends to San Francisco to watch fireworks on New Year's Eve, and, on the way back home, became swept up in an altercation with police that ended in tragedy. Based on a true story. ",Biography
The Greatest Showman,"Growing up in the early 1800s, P.T. Barnum displays a natural talent for publicity and promotion, selling lottery tickets by age 12. After trying his hands at various jobs, P.T. turns to show business to indulge his limitless imagination, rising from nothing to create the Barnum &amp; Bailey circus. Featuring catchy musical numbers, exotic performers and daring acrobatic feats, Barnum's mesmerizing spectacle soon takes the world by storm to become the greatest show on Earth. ",Biography
Selma,"Although the Civil Rights Act of 1964 legally desegregated the South, discrimination was still rampant in certain areas, making it very difficult for Blacks to register to vote. In 1965, an Alabama city became the battleground in the fight for suffrage. Despite violent opposition, Dr. Martin Luther King Jr. (David Oyelowo) and his followers pressed forward on an epic march from Selma to Montgomery, and their efforts culminated with President Lyndon Johnson signing the Voting Rights Act of 1965. ",Biography
Milk,"In 1972, Harvey Milk (Sean Penn) and his then-lover Scott Smith leave New York for San Francisco, with Milk determined to accomplish something meaningful in his life. Settling in the Castro District, he opens a camera shop and helps transform the area into a mecca for gays and lesbians. In 1977 he becomes the nation's first openly gay man elected to a notable public office when he wins a seat on the Board of Supervisors. The following year, Dan White (Josh Brolin) kills Milk in cold blood. ",Biography
Hunger,"A family struggles to find sustenance. The night is coming, and a desperate mother needs to feed her hungry daughters. ",Biography
42,"The story revolves around the 'Quit India Movement' of 1942, as seen from the eyes of the people of a small town in Bengal. It depicts how Indians forced the British Empire to leave India. ",Biography
Blow,"In the turbulence of the 1970s, the international drug trade underwent a fast, violent and lucrative revolution - and one ordinary American was at its center. But in just a few short years, George Jung (Johnny Depp), a high-school football star single handedly became the world's premiere importer of cocaine from Colombia's Medellin cartel, changing the course of an entire generation. ""Blow"" is a high-velocity look at George Jung's spectacular rise and fall. ",Biography
Quiz Show,"Queens-born Herbie Stempel (John Turturro) becomes an unlikely hero after winning on America's beloved game show, ""Twenty One."" When the network decides to bring in a more telegenic contestant, the WASP-ish Charles Van Doren (Ralph Fiennes), Stempel takes aim at the show, announcing that the game is rigged. Congressional investigator Dick Goodwin (Rob Morrow) is brought in to examine the claim that winners were given the answers. Goodwin wrote the book on which this true story is based. ",Biography
Rudy,"Rudy Ruettiger (Sean Astin) wants to play football at the University of Notre Dame, but has neither the money for tuition nor the grades to qualify for a scholarship. Rudy redoubles his efforts to get out of the steel mill where his father works when his best friend (Christopher Reed) dies in an accident there. Overcoming his dyslexia thanks to his friend and tutor, D-Bob (Jon Favreau), Rudy gains admission to Notre Dame and begins to fight his way onto the school's fabled football team. ",Biography
Chaplin,"Re-creation of the life of comic genius Charlie Chaplin, from his humble beginnings in south London through his early days in British vaudeville, his silent movie career in America and his late masterpieces. His turbulent personal life saw four marriages and an enforced exile from the US - though he returned to receive an honorary Oscar in 1972. ",Biography
Midnight Express,"Billy Hayes (Brad Davis) is a young American caught by Turkish police while attempting to smuggle hash out of Istanbul. He's tried and sent to prison for four years, where he endures all manner of privation and abuse. As he finishes up his time, he's shocked to learn that the Turkish High Court has added a further 30 years to his sentence. He is now thoroughly demoralized, and his life in prison grows increasingly unbearable until he concludes that escape is his only option. ",Biography
Judas and the Black Messiah,"FBI informant William O'Neal infiltrates the Illinois Black Panther Party and is tasked with keeping tabs on their charismatic leader, Chairman Fred Hampton. A career thief, O'Neal revels in the danger of manipulating both his comrades and his handler, Special Agent Roy Mitchell. Hampton's political prowess grows just as he's falling in love with fellow revolutionary Deborah Johnson. Meanwhile, a battle wages for O'Neal's soul. Will he align with the forces of good? Or subdue Hampton and The Panthers by any means, as FBI Director J. Edgar Hoover commands? ",Biography
The Mauritanian,"Directed by Kevin Macdonald and based on the NY Times best-selling memoir ""Guantánamo Diary"" by Mohamedou Ould Slahi, this is the inspiring true story of Slahi's fight for freedom after being detained and imprisoned without charge by the U.S. Government for years. Alone and afraid, Slahi (Tahar Rahim) finds allies in defense attorney Nancy Hollander (Jodie Foster) and her associate Teri Duncan (Shailene Woodley) who battle the U.S. government in a fight for justice that tests their commitment to the law and their client at every turn. Their controversial advocacy, along with evidence uncovered by a formidable military prosecutor, Lt. Colonel Stuart Couch (Benedict Cumberbatch), uncovers shocking truths and ultimately proves that the human spirit cannot be locked up. ",Biography
Elvis,"The film explores the life and music of Elvis Presley (Austin Butler), seen through the prism of his complicated relationship with his enigmatic manager, Colonel Tom Parker (Tom Hanks). The story delves into the complex dynamic between Presley and Parker spanning over 20 years, from Presley's rise to fame to his unprecedented stardom, against the backdrop of the evolving cultural landscape and loss of innocence in America. Central to that journey is one of the most significant and influential people in Elvis's life, Priscilla Presley (Olivia DeJonge). ",Biography
Sully,"On Jan. 15, 2009, Capt. Chesley ""Sully"" Sullenberger (Tom Hanks) tries to make an emergency landing in New York's Hudson River after US Airways Flight 1549 strikes a flock of geese. Miraculously, all of the 155 passengers and crew survive the harrowing ordeal, and Sullenberger becomes a national hero in the eyes of the public and the media. Despite the accolades, the famed pilot now faces an investigation that threatens to destroy his career and reputation. ",Biography
Trumbo,"In 1947, successful screenwriter Dalton Trumbo (Bryan Cranston) and other Hollywood figures get blacklisted for their political beliefs. ",Biography
The Good Lie,"After their village is destroyed and their parents killed by Northern militia, Sudanese orphans Theo, his siblings and other survivors make a difficult journey to a refugee camp in Kenya. Thirteen years later, the group gets the chance to settle in the U.S. They are met in Kansas by Carrie Davis (Reese Witherspoon), who has been charged with finding them jobs. However, seeing how adrift they are in 20th-century America, Carrie endeavors to help them in rebuilding their shattered lives. ",Biography
Miracle,"When college coach Herb Brooks (Kurt Russell) is hired to helm the 1980 U.S. men's Olympic hockey team, he brings a unique and brash style to the ice. After assembling a team of hot-headed college all-stars, who are humiliated in an early match, Brooks unites his squad against a common foe, the heavily-favored Soviet team. As the U.S. squad tries to overcome insurmountable odds and win the gold medal, the team becomes a microcosm for American patriotism during the Cold War. ",Biography
American Splendor,"Underground comic book writer Harvey Pekar, portrayed by Paul Giamatti but also appearing as himself, is the subject of this inventive biopic. Much of the film focuses on the eccentric Pekar's day-to-day life in Cleveland, particularly his relationship with his patient wife, Joyce Brabner (played by Hope Davis and also appearing as herself). As Pekar's musings are brought to the screen in this unique and engaging production, the movie playfully incorporates comic book-like panels. ",Biography
Erin Brockovich,"Erin Brockovich (Julia Roberts) is a woman in a tight spot. Following a car accident in which Erin is not at fault, Erin pleads with her attorney Ed Masry (Albert Finney) to hire her at his law firm. Erin stumbles upon some medical records placed in real estate files. She convinces Ed to allow her to investigate, where she discovers a cover-up involving contaminated water in a local community which is causing devastating illnesses among its residents. ",Biography
Gods and Monsters,"Once a powerful Hollywood director best known for ""Frankenstein"" and ""The Bride of Frankenstein,"" James Whale (Ian McKellen) is long since retired and in increasingly poor health. His stalwart housekeeper, Hanna (Lynn Redgrave), quietly disapproves of Whale's faceless, nameless parade of young gay lovers, but when the director takes an interest in new gardener Clayton Boone, a former Marine and Korean War veteran, it seems to be for something more than his usual casual conquest. ",Biography
Searching for Bobby Fischer,"After he beats his dad (Joe Mantegna) in a chess match, Josh Waitzkin (Max Pomeranc), a 7-year-old, gets noticed for his talent. He becomes interested in speed chess at the park and learns the game from a hustler named Vinnie (Laurence Fishburne). However, Josh's parents invest in the services of Bruce (Ben Kingsley), a famous coach who has very different practices. Between Bruce's methods and the stress of the competitions, Josh learns that even a chess prodigy cannot make all the right moves. ",Biography
The King and I,"Anna, an English schoolteacher, travels to the kingdom of Siam to teach children and finds her challenge with a stubborn king. But even as a wondrous friendship grows between Anna and the arrogant monarch, an evil sorcerer is conjuring up a plot to steal the throne. ",Biography
The King,"Filmmaker Eugene Jarecki takes a musical road trip across the U.S. in Elvis Presley's 1963 Rolls Royce during the 2016 presidential election, comparing Elvis's transition from country boy to ""The King"" to America's transformation into an empire. ",Biography
Official Secrets,"One day in 2003, in the lead up to the Iraq War, British intelligence specialist Katharine Gun receives a memo from the NSA with a shocking directive: the United States is enlisting Britain's help in collecting compromising information on U.N. Security Council members to blackmail them into voting in favor of an invasion of Iraq. Unable to stand by and watch the world be rushed into war, Gun makes the gut-wrenching decision to defy her government and leak the memo to the press. ",Biography
Snowden,"Disillusioned with the intelligence community, top contractor Edward Snowden (Joseph Gordon-Levitt) leaves his job at the National Security Agency. He now knows that a virtual mountain of data is being assembled to track all forms of digital communication -- not just from foreign governments and terrorist groups, but from ordinary Americans. When Snowden decides to leak this classified information, he becomes a traitor to some, a hero to others and a fugitive from the law. ",Biography
A Street Cat Named Bob,"A stray ginger cat changes the life of James Bowen (Luke Treadaway), a homeless London street musician and recovering drug addict. ",Biography
The Disaster Artist,"The incredible true story of aspiring filmmaker and Hollywood outsider Tommy Wiseau as he and his best friend defiantly pursue their dreams and embark on the hilarious odyssey of making the now-infamous, cult classic ""The Room."" ",Biography
The Walk,"A young boy strikes up a friendship with an older Jewish man, who imparts life lessons to him during their walks through the neighborhood. ",Adventure
Woman in Gold,"Sixty years after fleeing Vienna, Maria Altmann (Helen Mirren), an elderly Jewish woman, attempts to reclaim family possessions that were seized by the Nazis. Among them is a famous portrait of Maria's beloved Aunt Adele: Gustave Klimt's ""Portrait of Adele Bloch-Bauer I."" With the help of young lawyer Randy Schoeberg (Ryan Reynolds), Maria embarks upon a lengthy legal battle to recover this painting and several others, but it will not be easy, for Austria considers them national treasures. ",Biography
Rocketman,Michael Hughes and his team try to launch a homemade rocket on a mission to prove that the Earth is flat. ,Biography
Belfast,"BELFAST is a movie straight from Branagh's own experience. A nine-year-old boy must chart a path towards adulthood through a world that has suddenly turned upside down. His stable and loving community and everything he thought he understood about life is changed forever but joy, laughter, music and the formative magic of the movies remain. ",Biography
Beautiful Boy,"Stuck in an unhappy but comfortable marriage, businessman Bill (Michael Sheen) and his wife, Kate (Maria Bello), are shocked when they learn that their son, Sammy (Kyle Gallner), has gone on a deadly shooting spree on his college campus before committing suicide. Struggling to avoid the media, the couple flees to the house of Kate's brother, Eric (Alan Tudyk). While the two try to remember what they might have done to drive Sammy to his desperate act, their mutual resentment builds. ",Biography
First Man,"Hoping to reach the moon by the end of the decade, NASA plans a series of extremely dangerous, unprecedented missions in the early 1960s. Engineer Neil Armstrong joins the space program, spending years in training and risking his life during test flights. On July 16, 1969, the nation and world watch in wonder as Armstrong and fellow astronauts Buzz Aldrin and Michael Collins embark on the historic Apollo 11 spaceflight. ",Biography
Eddie the Eagle,"Cut from the Olympic ski team, British athlete Michael ""Eddie"" Edwards travels to Germany to test his skills at ski jumping. Fate leads him to Bronson Peary, a former ski jumper who now works as a snowplow driver. Impressed by Edwards' spirit and determination, Peary agrees to train the young underdog. Despite an entire nation counting him out, Eddie's never-say-die attitude takes him all the way to a historic and improbable showing at the 1988 Winter Olympics in Calgary, Alberta. ",Adventure
Rescue Dawn,"During the Vietnam War, Dieter Dengler (Christian Bale), a U.S. fighter pilot, is shot down over Laos and taken captive by enemy soldiers. Interned in a POW camp, Dengler and his fellow prisoners (Steve Zahn, Jeremy Davies) endure torture, hunger and illness while they await their chance to escape. ",Adventure
The Queen,"Following the death of Princess Diana in an auto accident, Great Britain's Queen Elizabeth II (Helen Mirren) and Prime Minister Tony Blair (Michael Sheen) struggle to reach a compromise in how the royal family should publicly respond to the tragedy. In the balance is the family's need for privacy and the public's demand for an outward show of mourning. ",Biography
Coach Carter,"In 1999, Ken Carter (Samuel L. Jackson) returns to his old high school in Richmond, California, to get the basketball team into shape. With tough rules and academic discipline, he succeeds in setting the players on a winning streak. But when their grades start to suffer, Carter locks them out of the gym and shuts down their championship season. When he is criticized by the players and their parents, he sticks to his guns, determined that they excel in class as well as on the court. ",Biography
Monster,"Shortly after moving to Florida, longtime prostitute Aileen Wuornos (Charlize Theron) meets young and reserved Selby Wall (Christina Ricci) and a romance blossoms. When a john (Lee Tergesen) attempts to brutalize Aileen, she kills him and resolves to give up prostitution. But supporting herself and her new girlfriend through legitimate means proves extremely difficult, and she soon falls back on old ways. More johns die, and Selby can't help but think her new friend is responsible. ",Biography
24 Hour Party People,"Manchester, 1976. Tony Wilson (Steve Coogan) is an ambitious but frustrated local TV news reporter looking for a way to make his mark. After witnessing a life-changing concert by a band known as the Sex Pistols, he persuades his station to televise one of their performances, and soon Manchester's punk groups are clamoring for him to manage them. Riding the wave of a musical revolution, Wilson and his friends create the legendary Factory Records label and The Hacienda club. ",Biography
Quills,"A fictional work that reconstructs the unknown fate of the Marquis de Sade, the writer and sexual deviant who was imprisoned in an insane asylum for the last 10 years of his life. The Marquis de Sade befriends the director of the asylum and shares affections with the asylum laundress. When a doctor is sent in to cure the Marquis of his supposed madness, the Marquis's rebellious character only grows stronger. ",Biography
Antwone Fisher,"The touching story of a sailor (Derek Luke) who, prone to violent outbursts, is sent to a naval psychiatrist (Denzel Washington) for help. Refusing at first to open up, the young man eventually breaks down and reveals a horrific childhood. Through the guidance of his new doctor, he confronts his painful past and begins a quest to find the family he never knew. ",Biography
Frida,"This is the true story of Frida Kahlo (Salma Hayek) and her husband Diego Rivera (Alfred Molina), the larger-than-life painters who became the most acclaimed artists in Mexican history, and whose tempestuous love affair, landmark journeys to America, and outrageous personalities made them legendary. ",Biography
Amistad,"In 1839, the slave ship Amistad set sail from Cuba to America. During the long trip, Cinque (Djimon Hounsou) leads the slaves in an unprecedented uprising. They are then held prisoner in Connecticut, and their release becomes the subject of heated debate. Freed slave Theodore Joadson (Morgan Freeman) wants Cinque and the others exonerated and recruits property lawyer Roger Baldwin (Matthew McConaughey) to help his case. Eventually, John Quincy Adams (Anthony Hopkins) also becomes an ally. ",Biography
Heavenly Creatures,"Wealthy and precocious teenager Juliet (Kate Winslet) transfers from England to Christchurch, New Zealand, with her family, and forms a bond with the quiet, brooding Pauline (Melanie Lynskey) through their shared love of handsome big screen tenor Mario Lanza and games of make believe. But when their parents begin to suspect that their increasingly intense friendship is becoming unhealthy, the girls decide to run away to America, hatching a dark plan for those who threaten to keep them apart. ",Biography
Dolemite Is My Name,"Performer Rudy Ray Moore develops an outrageous character named Dolemite, who becomes an underground sensation and star of a kung-fu, anti-establisment film that could make or break Moore. ",Biography
The Report,A tax collector is accused of taking bribes and has to deal with problems at home. ,Biography
The Post,"Katharine Graham is the first female publisher of a major American newspaper -- The Washington Post. With help from editor Ben Bradlee, Graham races to catch up with The New York Times to expose a massive cover-up of government secrets that spans three decades and four U.S. presidents. Together, they must overcome their differences as they risk their careers -- and very freedom -- to help bring long-buried truths to light. ",Biography
Vice,Courtroom antics ensue after police officers illegally raid a topless club. ,Biography
The Professor and the Madman,Professor James Murray begins work on compiling words for the first edition of the Oxford English Dictionary in the mid-19th century. ,Biography
Papillon,"Convicted murderer Henri Charriere (Steve McQueen), known as ""Papillon"" for his butterfly chest tattoo, is transported to French Guiana to serve his sentence in a work camp. Determined to escape, Papillon forms an unlikely relationship with the frail but notorious forger Louis Dega (Dustin Hoffman), who reluctantly joins in the attempt. Despite the harshness of solitary confinement, brutal conditions and constant threats of betrayal, Papillon leads a desperate escape off the island. ",Adventure
The Founder,"The true story of how Ray Kroc (Michael Keaton), a struggling salesman from Illinois, met Mac (John Carroll Lynch) and Dick McDonald (Nick Offerman), who were running a burger operation in 1950s Southern California. Kroc was impressed by the brothers' speedy system of making the food and saw franchise potential. Kroc soon maneuvers himself into a position to be able to pull the company from the brothers and create a multi-billion dollar empire. ",Biography
The End of the Tour,Writer and journalist David Lipsky (Jesse Eisenberg) interviews author David Foster Wallace (Jason Segel) for Rolling Stone magazine. ,Biography
A Beautiful Day in the Neighborhood,"Lloyd Vogel is an investigative journalist who receives an assignment to profile Fred Rogers, aka Mr. Rogers. He approaches the interview with skepticism, as he finds it hard to believe that anyone can have such a good nature. But Roger's empathy, kindness and decency soon chips away at Vogel's jaded outlook on life, forcing the reporter to reconcile with his own painful past. ",Biography
Steve Jobs,"The original, unedited interview with Steve Jobs, conducted in 1995 by tech journalist and former Apple Inc. employee Robert X. Cringely when Jobs was still CEO of NeXT Computer and Pixar. ",Biography
The Sessions,"Though a childhood bout with polio left him dependent on an iron lung, Mark O'Brien (John Hawkes) maintains a career as a journalist and poet. A writing assignment dealing with sex and the disabled piques Mark's curiosity, and he decides to investigate the possibility of experiencing sex himself. When his overtures toward a caregiver (Annika Marks) scare her away, he books an appointment with sex surrogate Cheryl Cohen Green (Helen Hunt) to lose his virginity. ",Biography
Testament of Youth,"During World War I, Oxford University student Vera Brittain (Alicia Vikander) postpones her studies to serve as a nurse while her suitor, her brother and a secret admirer face death in the trenches. ",Biography
The Butler,"After leaving the South as a young man and finding employment at an elite hotel in Washington, D.C., Cecil Gaines (Forest Whitaker) gets the opportunity of a lifetime when he is hired as a butler at the White House. Over the course of three decades, Cecil has a front-row seat to history and the inner workings of the Oval Office. However, his commitment to his ""First Family"" leads to tension at home, alienating his wife (Oprah Winfrey) and causing conflict with his anti-establishment son. ",Biography
Lawless,Cop-turned-investigator John Lawless finds himself on the wrong side of the law. ,Biography
Secretariat,"Despite her lack of experience, housewife and mother Penny Chenery (Diane Lane) agrees to take over management of the family Thoroughbred farm after her father (Scott Glenn) becomes ill. Successfully navigating her way through the male-dominated world of horse racing, Chenery, together with veteran trainer Lucien Laurin (John Malkovich), fosters a gifted colt that ultimately crosses the finish line into history as the Triple Crown winner in 1973. ",Biography
Che: Part One,"Ernesto ""Che"" Guevara (Benicio del Toro) transforms from intellectual, asthmatic doctor to one of Latin America's legendary revolutionaries. In the years before his famous 1964 visit to the United Nations, Che joins forces with Cuban exile Fidel Castro (Demián Bichir) and ignites a revolution that eventually brings an end to the Batista regime in Cuba. ",Biography
The Man Who Knew Infinity,"In 1913, brilliant East Indian mathematician Srinivasa Ramanujan (Dev Patel) travels to Trinity College in England to work with professor G.H. Hardy (Jeremy Irons). ",Biography
Before Night Falls,"A richly imagined journey into the life and writings of brilliant Cuban author and exile Reinaldo Arenas. It spans the whole of Arenas' life, from his rural childhood and his early embrace of the Revolution to the persecution he would later experience as a writer and homosexual in Castro's Cuba; from his departure from Cuba in the Mariel Harbor exodus of 1980 to his exile and death in the United States. ",Biography
Men of Honor,"Carl Brashear (Cuba Gooding Jr.) is an ambitious sharecropper who joins the U.S. Navy to become the world's first black master diver. But as he works through diving training, the bitter and racist Master Chief Billy Sunday (Robert De Niro) sets out to make Carl's journey as difficult as possible. Despite the entire Navy doubting his potential and sabotaging his training, the determined Carl proves that he can overcome the discrimination around him. ",Biography
Born on the Fourth of July,"In the mid 1960s, suburban New York teenager Ron Kovic (Tom Cruise) enlists in the Marines, fulfilling what he sees as his patriotic duty. During his second tour in Vietnam, he accidentally kills a fellow soldier during a retreat and later becomes permanently paralyzed in battle. Returning home to an uncaring Veterans Administration bureaucracy and to people on both sides of the political divide who don't understand what he went through, Kovic becomes an impassioned critic of the war. ",Biography
Mask,"Rocky Dennis (Eric Stoltz) is an intelligent, outgoing and humorous teenager who suffers from a facial deformity called ""lionitis"" and has now outlived his life expectancy. While his mother, Rusty (Cher), struggles to fight for his acceptance in the public school system, he proves himself to be a highly accomplished student. Though Rocky endures ridicule for his appearance, he finds love and respect from his mother's biker gang family, and even experiences his first love. ",Biography
Bad Education,"When an old friend brings filmmaker Enrique Goded (Fele Martínez) a semi-autobiographical script chronicling their adolescence, Enrique is forced to relive his youth spent at a Catholic boarding school. Weaving through past and present, the script follows a transvestite performer (Gael García Bernal) who reconnects with a grade school sweetheart. Spurred on by this chance encounter, the character reflects on her childhood sexual victimization and the trauma of closeting her sexual orientation. ",Biography
Fighting with My Family,"Born into a tight-knit wrestling family, Paige and her brother Zak are ecstatic when they get the once-in-a-lifetime opportunity to try out for the WWE. But when only Paige earns a spot in the competitive training program, she must leave her loved ones behind and face this new cutthroat world alone. Paige's journey pushes her to dig deep and ultimately prove to the world that what makes her different is the very thing that can make her a star. ",Biography
On the Basis of Sex,"Ruth Bader Ginsburg is a struggling attorney and new mother who faces adversity and numerous obstacles in her fight for equal rights. When Ruth takes on a groundbreaking tax case with her husband, attorney Martin Ginsburg, she knows it could change the direction of her career and the way the courts view gender discrimination. ",Biography
Can You Ever Forgive Me?,"Lee Israel is a frustrated, hard-drinking author who can barely afford to pay her rent or bills in 1990s New York. Desperate for money, Israel soon hatches a scheme to forge letters by famous writers and sell them to bookstores and collectors. When the dealers start to catch on, Lee recruits a dubious friend to help her continue her self-destructive cycle of trickery and deceit. ",Biography
Miracles from Heaven,"Anna Beam (Kylie Rogers) lives with a rare, incurable disorder that leaves her unable to digest food. Despite the dire diagnosis, devoted mom Christy (Jennifer Garner) relentlessly searches for a way to save her beloved daughter. Everything changes in an instant when Anna tells an amazing story of a visit to heaven after surviving a headlong tumble into a tree. Her family and doctors become even more baffled when the young girl begins to show signs of recovering from her fatal condition. ",Biography
The Dig,A convicted murderer is released from prison with no memory of his crime and is forced to help the victim's father dig for the body. ,Biography
Concussion,A fateful blow to the head makes a middle-aged lesbian housewife (Robin Weigert) seek satisfaction as a high-end escort. ,Biography
The Glass Castle,"Evelyne, a judge's wife, falls in love with Remy in Paris during the holidays. She decides to return home to tell her husband about the affair, but her plane crashes. ",Biography
Wild,"After an encounter with a wolf, a young woman (Lilith Stangenberg) casts off societal conventions to live a life free of hypocrisy. ",Adventure
Mandela: Long Walk to Freedom,"The remarkable life of South African revolutionary, president and world icon Nelson Mandela (Idris Elba) takes center stage. Though he had humble beginnings as a herd boy in a rural village, Mandela became involved in the anti-apartheid movement and co-founded the African National Congress Youth League. His activities eventually led to his imprisonment on Robben Island from 1964 to 1990. In 1994, Mandela became the first president of democratic South Africa. ",Biography
Tracks,"After committing a senseless act, a New Jersey teenager (Chris Gunn) faces incarceration at a maximum-security prison. ",Adventure
The Railway Man,"Eric Lomax (Colin Firth), a former British army officer and POW, discovers that the Japanese interpreter who tortured him is still alive. He and his new wife (Nicole Kidman) set out to confront the man who caused him so much pain. ",Biography
War Dogs,A yellow dim-witted dog bumbles his way through military training. ,Biography
Goodbye Christopher Robin,"After leaving London for the English countryside, writer A.A. Milne starts to spin fanciful yarns about his son's growing collection of stuffed animals. These stories form the basis for ""Winnie-the-Pooh"" and ""The House at Pooh Corner,"" published respectively in 1926 and 1928. Milne and his family soon become swept up in the instant success of the books, while the enchanting tales bring hope and comfort to the rest of postwar England. ",Biography
Chasing Mavericks,"When 15-year-old surfing phenomenon Jay Moriarty (Jonny Weston) discovers that the mythic Mavericks surf break, one of the biggest waves on Earth, actually exists near his California home, he becomes determined to conquer it. Jay enlists the aid of local surfing legend Frosty Hesson (Gerard Butler) to train him to ride the Mavericks and live to tell about it. As Jay and Frosty carry on their quest to achieve the impossible, they develop a unique friendship that transforms both their lives. ",Biography
Nowhere Boy,"A rebellious teenager, future Beatle John Lennon (Aaron Johnson) lives with his Aunt Mimi (Kristin Scott Thomas) in working-class Liverpool, England. Mimi's husband suddenly dies, and John spies his mother, Julia (Anne-Marie Duff), at the funeral. Despite Mimi's misgivings, John intends to have a real relationship with his mother. Julia introduces him to popular music and the banjo and, though a family conflict looms, young Lennon is inspired to form his own band. ",Biography
Agora,"In the 4th century A.D., astronomer and philosopher Hypatia (Rachel Weisz) teaches her scientific beliefs to a class of male students. Among them is lovestruck slave Davus (Max Minghella), the equally smitten Orestes (Oscar Isaac) and young Christian man Synesius (Rupert Evans). Hypatia dismisses all of their advances, but this romantic drama pales in comparison to a rising battle between Christians and pagans on the streets of soon-to-be war-torn Alexandria. ",Adventure
The Whistleblower,"The experiences of Kathryn Bolkovac, a cop from Nebraska, who worked as a peacekeeper in post-war Bosnia and exposed a U.N. sex scandal that was covered up. ",Biography
The Danish Girl,"With support from his loving wife Gerda (Alicia Vikander), artist Einar Wegener (Eddie Redmayne) prepares to undergo one of the first sex-change operations. ",Biography
Kinsey,"Biology professor Alfred Kinsey (Liam Neeson) has a perfectly respectable life teaching and doing research at Indiana University along with a happy home life with his wife (Laura Linney). When he realizes that his students, many of them married and with children, still come to him with personal questions about human sexuality, he fights to begin teaching sex education courses and conducts extensive interviews about the sexual history of volunteers despite high-profile opposition. ",Biography
Lords of Dogtown,"A drought in 1970s Southern California has an unexpected side effect: as people empty their swimming pools, a group of teen surfers from the Dogtown area of Venice Beach move in with skateboards, and a new sport is born. Based on a true story, this film follows ""Z-Boys"" skate team members Stacy Peralta (John Robinson), Tony Alva (Victor Rasuk) and Jay Adams (Emile Hirsch), plus manager Skip Engblom (Heath Ledger), as their fearless ""pool surfing"" leads to fame, fortune -- and misfortune. ",Biography
Chopper,"America had Al Capone; England, the Kray brothers and Australia - proving once and for all its antipodean sense of humor - has Mark ""Chopper"" Read. ""Chopper"" is inspired by the books of Mark Brandon ""Chopper"" Read, arguably Australia's most infamous former criminal. ""Chopper"" draws on police records, court transcripts, news coverage and interviews with people who knew Chopper Read. ",Biography
Michael Collins,"In the early 20th century, Michael Collins (Liam Neeson) leads the Irish Republican Army with the help of his friends Harry Boland (Aidan Quinn) and Eamon de Valera (Alan Rickman), in a violent battle for Ireland's independence from Britain. But, when he fears the defeat of his revolution, Collins negotiates a treaty with the British, deeming him a traitor to the IRA. When he receives orders to murder his friends, Collins must decide where his loyalties lie. ",Biography
Nixon,"This film is a biographical examination of former U.S. President Richard Nixon (Anthony Hopkins). The non-chronological narrative explores Nixon's personal and professional life, touching on his youth, college years, and political triumphs and failures. Nixon is seen as a child born to austere Quaker parents, as a young attorney wooing his future wife, Pat (Joan Allen), and as an astute but dour politician. After finally becoming president, Nixon is embroiled in the infamous Watergate scandal. ",Biography
Alive,"Victoria is disabled and longs for intimacy, so her assistant, Ida, helps her create a Tinder profile. When Victoria matches up with a lousy guy, Ida becomes worried about what will happen if they meet. ",Biography
Out of Africa,"Initially set on being a dairy farmer, the aristocratic Karen Blixen (Meryl Streep) travels to Africa to join her husband, Bror (Klaus Maria Brandauer), who instead spends their money on a coffee plantation. After discovering Bror is unfaithful, Karen develops feelings for hunter Denys (Robert Redford), but realizes he prefers a simplistic lifestyle compared to her upper class background. The two continue on until a series of events force Karen to choose between her love and personal growth. ",Biography
Chariots of Fire,"In the class-obsessed and religiously divided United Kingdom of the early 1920s, two determined young runners train for the 1924 Paris Olympics. Eric Liddell (Ian Charleson), a devout Christian born to Scottish missionaries in China, sees running as part of his worship of God's glory and refuses to train or compete on the Sabbath. Harold Abrahams (Ben Cross) overcomes anti-Semitism and class bias, but neglects his beloved sweetheart Sybil (Alice Krige) in his single-minded quest. ",Biography
American Animals,"Spencer Reinhard, Warren Lipka, Eric Borsuk and Chas Allen are four friends who live an ordinary existence in Kentucky. After a visit to Transylvania University, Lipka comes up with the idea to steal the rarest and most valuable books from the school's library. As one of the most audacious art heists in U.S. history starts to unfold, the men question whether their attempts to inject excitement and purpose into their lives are simply misguided attempts at achieving the American dream. ",Biography
Professor Marston and the Wonder Women,"If behind every great man is a great woman, then Harvard psychologist and inventor Dr. William Moulton Marston has the good fortune of having two -- his wife Elizabeth and their mutual lover Olive Byrne. In addition to helping him perfect the lie detector test, the two women also inspire him to create one of the greatest female superheroes of all time -- the beloved comic book character Wonder Woman. ",Biography
Loving,Romance and intrigue rule the lives of the residents of a university town. Pilot for the short-lived daytime serial. ,Biography
Colonia,A determined stewardess (Emma Watson) tries to rescue her boyfriend (Daniel Brühl) when he becomes a prisoner during a military coup in Chile in 1973. ,Biography
Danny Collins,An aging rocker (Al Pacino) decides to change the course of his life after receiving a long-undelivered letter from the late John Lennon. ,Biography
Million Dollar Arm,"In a last-ditch effort to save his career, sports agent J.B. Bernstein (Jon Hamm) plans to find baseball's next star pitcher. He heads to India to find a cricket player whom he can nurture into a major league star. With the help of a scout (Alan Arkin), J.B. finds teens Dinesh (Madhur Mittal) and Rinku (Suraj Sharma), who haven't a clue about baseball but throw powerful pitches. As the boys adjust to American life, J.B. learns valuable lessons about teamwork and family. ",Biography
Soul Surfer,"A natural talent in the sport of surfing, teenager Bethany Hamilton (AnnaSophia Robb) loses an arm in a shark attack. Bolstered by the love of her parents (Helen Hunt, Dennis Quaid) and refusing to give up, she plans to return to competition, although questions about her future continue to trouble her. Upon seeing the devastation in Thailand caused by the 2004 tsunami, Bethany discovers a greater purpose: to make a difference in the lives of others. ",Biography
Pawn Sacrifice,American chess legend Bobby Fischer (Tobey Maguire) and Soviet Grandmaster Boris Spassky (Liev Schreiber) enthrall the world with their intense battle of wills and strategy during the 1972 World Chess Championship. ,Biography
Kill the Irishman,Mobster Danny Greene (Ray Stevenson) ignites a turf war in 1970s Cleveland that leads to the collapse of the Mafia in several major U.S. cities. ,Biography
The Infiltrator,"In 1986, federal agent Robert Mazur (Bryan Cranston) goes under cover to infiltrate the trafficking network of Colombian drug kingpin Pablo Escobar. Working with fellow agents Kathy Ertz (Diane Kruger) and Emir Abreu (John Leguizamo), Mazur poses as a slick, money-laundering businessman named Bob Musella. Gaining the confidence of Roberto Alcaino (Benjamin Bratt), Escobar's top lieutenant, Mazur must navigate a vicious criminal underworld where one wrong move could cost him everything. ",Biography
Behind the Candelabra,"World-famous pianist Liberace (Michael Douglas) takes much-younger Scott Thorson (Matt Damon) as a lover, but the relationship deteriorates when Liberace takes other bedmates and Thorson becomes addicted to drugs. ",Biography
Big Eyes,"In the late 1950s and early '60s, artist Walter Keane (Christoph Waltz) achieves unbelievable fame and success with portraits of saucer-eyed waifs. However, no one realizes that his wife, Margaret (Amy Adams), is the real painter behind the brush. Although Margaret is horrified to learn that Walter is passing off her work as his own, she is too meek to protest too loudly. It isn't until the Keanes' marriage comes to an end and a lawsuit follows that the truth finally comes to light. ",Biography
Foxcatcher,"When wealthy John du Pont (Steve Carell) invites Olympic wrestler Mark Schultz (Channing Tatum) to move to his estate and help form a wrestling team for the 1988 Olympics, Mark sees a way to step out of the shadow of his charismatic brother, Dave (Mark Ruffalo). However, du Pont begins to lead Mark down a dark road, causing the athlete's self-esteem to slip. Meanwhile, du Pont becomes fixated on bringing Dave into the fold, eventually propelling all three toward an unforeseen tragedy. ",Biography
Gangubai Kathiawadi,A woman becomes a powerful underworld figure. ,Biography
Miss Potter,"Beatrix Potter (Renée Zellweger) overcomes many obstacles in her quest to become a writer, including a domineering mother and the chauvinism prevalent in Victorian England. She falls in love with her publisher, Norman Warne (Ewan McGregor), and his marriage proposal and a subsequent tragedy change her life forever. ",Biography
Invincible,"Lifelong football fan Vince Papale (Mark Wahlberg) sees his wildest dreams come true when he becomes a member of the Philadelphia Eagles. While teaching at his high-school alma mater in Pennsylvania, the 30-year-old gets a chance to try out for his favorite team and, except for kickers, becomes the oldest rookie in NFL history who never played football in college. ",Biography
Gridiron Gang,"A counselor (The Rock) at a juvenile detention facility decides to turn the young inmates in his charge into a football team to give them a sense of self-respect and social responsibility, but he faces opposition from high-school coaches who do not want their players facing criminals on the field. ",Biography
Find Me Guilty,"Imprisoned on a drug charge, mobster Jack DiNorscio (Vin Diesel) refuses to testify against his former associates in the Lucchesi crime family. When an ambitious prosecutor brings him back to court, he decides to defend himself. Initially regarded with disbelief, his forceful presence and knowledge of the law turn the tide of the trial. ",Biography
Becoming Jane,"Though Jane Austen's (Anne Hathaway) financially strapped parents (James Cromwell, Julie Walters) expect her to marry the nephew of wealthy Lady Gresham (Maggie Smith), the young woman knows that such a union will destroy her creativity and sense of self-worth. Instead, she becomes involved with Tom Lefroy (James McAvoy), a charming but penniless apprentice lawyer who gives her the knowledge of the heart she needs for her future career as a novelist. ",Biography
Breach,"Eric O'Neill (Ryan Phillippe), a low-level surveillance expert with the FBI, believes he is accomplishing his dream of becoming a full-fledged agent, with his unexpected promotion and assignment to work with renowned agent Robert Hanssen (Chris Cooper). However, he soon learns the reason for his promotion is to gain Hanssen's trust and find proof that he is a traitor to the country. ",Biography
Bobby,"An intimate look at the life and career of the man who led England to victory in the 1966 World Cup, featuring interviews with those closest to him. ",Biography
Confessions of a Dangerous Mind,"Game show television producer Chuck Barris (Sam Rockwell) is at the height of his career. His creation, ""The Dating Game,"" is one of the network's top shows and he has just been given the post of hosting his latest brainchild, ""The Gong Show."" But what the public and industry big-wigs are unaware of is that Chuck Barris, game show pioneer, is also a covert assassin. He works for the C.I.A. and claims to have killed 33 people. ",Biography
Pollock,"In August of 1949, Life Magazine ran a banner headline that begged the question: ""Jackson Pollock: Is he the greatest living painter in the United States?"" The film is a look back into the life of an extraordinary man, a man who has fittingly been called ""an artist dedicated to concealment, a celebrity who nobody knew."" As he struggled with self-doubt, engaging in a lonely tug-of-war between needing to express himself and wanting to shut the world out, Pollock began a downward spiral. ",Biography
Kundun,"In 1937, a two-and-a-half year old boy from a simple family in Tibet was recognized as the 14th reincarnation of the Buddha of Compassion, and destined to become the spiritual and political leader of his people. Director Martin Scorsese brings to the screen the true story of the Dalai Lama. Told through the eyes of His Holiness, ""Kundun"" brings to life the account of the Dalai Lama's early life, from childhood through the Chinese invasion of Tibet and his journey into exile. ",Biography
Henry: Portrait of a Serial Killer,"Henry (Michael Rooker) is released from prison following his mother's murder. He supplements his job as an exterminator with a series of indiscriminate and violent murders. Fellow jailbird and drug dealer Otis (Tom Towles) becomes a willing accomplice in Henry's bloody killings. But as the depravity escalates and Henry forms a bond with Otis' sister, Becky (Tracy Arnold), things start to get out of hand. The film is based on the true-life story of serial killer Henry Lee Lucas. ",Biography
Sid and Nancy,"Following their breakout success in England, flagship punk rock band the Sex Pistols venture out on their first U.S. tour. Temperamental bassist Sid Vicious (Gary Oldman) takes his troubled girlfriend, Nancy Spungen (Chloe Webb), along for the ride. Along the way, the couple's turbulent relationship strains the patience of bandmate Johnny Rotten (Andrew Schofield) and manager Malcolm McLaren (David Hayman), while plunging Sid and Nancy into the depths of drug addiction and co-dependency. ",Biography
Cleopatra,A retired schoolteacher and a frustrated actress embark on an impromptu road trip. ,Biography
Boy Erased,"Jared Eamons, the son of a small-town Baptist pastor, must overcome the fallout after being outed as gay to his parents. His father and mother struggle to reconcile their love for their son with their beliefs. Fearing a loss of family, friends and community, Jared is pressured into attending a conversion therapy program. While there, Jared comes into conflict with its leader and begins his journey to finding his own voice and accepting his true self. ",Biography
Borg McEnroe,"It's the summer of 1980, and Björn Borg is the top tennis player in the world, dominating the sport both on and off the court. A powerful and rigorously disciplined player, there is only one obstacle in his pursuit of a record-breaking fifth Wimbledon championship: the highly talented but ferociously abrasive young American John McEnroe. With three days until the tournament begins, Borg trains religiously in his lavish Monaco home, aided by his coach and mentor Lennart and girlfriend Mariana. ",Biography
Legend,"Darkness (Tim Curry) seeks to create eternal night by destroying the last of the unicorns. Jack (Tom Cruise) and his friends do everything possible to save the world and Princess Lili (Mia Sara) from the hands of Darkness. Enter a world of unicorns, magic swamps, dwarfs and rainbows. ",Biography
The Highwaymen,Former Texas Rangers Frank Hamer and Maney Gault join forces to try and capture notorious outlaws Bonnie Parker and Clyde Barrow. ,Biography
My Week with Marilyn,"In 1956 England, Colin Clark (Eddie Redmayne) lands a job as a production assistant on the set of ""The Prince and the Showgirl,"" starring Marilyn Monroe (Michelle Williams). Marilyn is also honeymooning with her new husband, playwright Arthur Miller, but the combined pressure of work and the demands of the Hollywood hangers-on is driving her to exhaustion. When Miller departs for Paris, Colin seizes the opportunity, to give Marilyn respite during a week in the idyllic British countryside. ",Biography
Black Mass,"During World War II, four American soldiers learn the Nazis have been accessing supernatural powers, and they have to fight evil in its extreme form. ",Biography
Kill the Messenger,"During the Civil War, a soldier (Bryce Cone) and a photographer (John Coffman) embark on a dangerous mission to deliver a secret message. ",Biography
Bright Star,"In 1818, high-spirited young Fanny Brawne (Abbie Cornish) finds herself increasingly intrigued by the handsome but aloof poet John Keats (Ben Whishaw), who lives next door to her family friends the Dilkes. After reading a book of his poetry, she finds herself even more drawn to the taciturn Keats. Although he agrees to teach her about poetry, Keats cannot act on his reciprocated feelings for Fanny, since as a struggling poet he has no money to support a wife. ",Biography
Alpha Dog,"Teenage dealer Johnny Truelove (Emile Hirsch) and his friends kidnap the impressionable younger brother (Anton Yelchin) of a junkie (Ben Foster) who refuses to pay his drug debt. Things change unexpectedly when Frankie (Justin Timberlake), one of Johnny's pals, befriends the youth. ",Biography
Girl with a Pearl Earring,"When her father goes blind, Griet (Scarlett Johansson) must go to work as a maid for painter Johannes Vermeer (Colin Firth). While cleaning the house, Griet strikes up an unlikely friendship with Vermeer, which both agree to keep secret for fear of provoking the painter's jealous wife, Catharina (Essie Davis). When wealthy patron Van Ruijven (Tom Wilkinson) begins to lust after Griet, and commissions a painting of her, Vermeer and Griet are obliged to spend long hours alone together. ",Biography
Radio,"In a racially divided town, coach Jones (Ed Harris) spots a mentally disabled African-American student named Radio (Cuba Gooding Jr.) near his practice field and is inspired to befriend him. Soon, Radio is Jones' loyal assistant, and principal Daniels (Alfre Woodard) happily notes that Radio's self-confidence is skyrocketing. But things start to sour when Jones begins taking guff from fans who feel that his devotion to Radio is getting in the way of the team's quest for a championship. ",Biography
Bully,"As Bobby Kent lay bleeding on July 14, 1993, he called out for help, and then mercy from his friends. Their response was quick and deliberate. Larry Clark's ""Bully"" chronicles the incident that would leave a community stunned, parents nonplussed and heartbroken and a group of defendants convicted of a brutal crime for which they never repented. ",Biography
Private Parts,Cheryl (Ayn Ruymen) meets a weirdo (John Ventantonio) with an inflatable doll at Aunt Martha's (Lucille Benson) Skid Row hotel. ,Biography
Rob Roy,Rob Roy's struggle for survival turns into something bigger and more meaningful and brings a group of delinquents together against the upper-class corrupt in 18th-century Scotland. ,Adventure
La Bamba,"Los Angeles teenager Ritchie Valens (Lou Diamond Phillips) becomes an overnight rock 'n' roll success in 1958, thanks to a love ballad called ""Donna"" that he wrote for his girlfriend (Danielle von Zerneck) whose parents didn't want her to date a Latino boy. But as his star rises, Valens has conflicts with his jealous brother, Bob (Esai Morales), and becomes haunted by a recurring nightmare of a plane crash just as he begins his first national tour alongside Buddy Holly (Marshall Crenshaw). ",Biography
Munich: The Edge of War,"Based on the international bestseller by Robert Harris. It is Autumn 1938 and Europe stands on the brink of war. Adolf Hitler is preparing to invade Czechoslovakia and Neville Chamberlain's government desperately seeks a peaceful solution. With the pressure building, Hugh Legat, British civil servant, and Paul von Hartmann, German diplomat, travel to Munich for the emergency Conference. As negotiations begin, the two old friends find themselves at the center of a web of political subterfuge and very real danger. With the whole world watching, can war be averted and, if so, at what cost? ",Biography
Bombshell,A lab employee (Henry Thomas) grows steadily sicker as he tries to stop the launch of a flawed cancer drug. ,Biography
Escape from Pretoria,"Sentenced to a South African prison for 12 years, anti-apartheid activist Tim Jenkin and his fellow inmates devise a daring plan to escape. ",Biography
All the Money in the World,"In 1973, kidnappers demand $17 million from billionaire J. Paul Getty in exchange for his grandson's release. Getty refuses to pay the perpetrators a single penny despite the desperate pleas from his former daughter-in-law Gail and adviser Fletcher Chase. With nowhere else to turn, Gail and Fletcher soon become unlikely allies in a race against time to save the teen's life. ",Biography
Tolkien,"As a young student, J.R.R. Tolkien finds love, friendship and artistic inspiration among a group of fellow outcasts. Their brotherhood soon strengthens as Tolkien weathers the storm of a tumultuous courtship with Edith Bratt and the outbreak of World War I. These early life experiences later inspire the budding author to write the classic fantasy novels ""The Hobbit"" and ""The Lord of the Rings."" ",Biography
The 33,"Disaster strikes on Aug. 5, 2010, as a copper and gold mine collapses in Chile, trapping 33 men underground. With more than 2,000 feet of rock in their way, members of a rescue team work tirelessly for 69 days to save the seemingly doomed crew. Beneath the rubble, the miners begin an epic quest to survive, contending with suffocating heat and the need for food and water. With family, friends and the rest of the world watching, it becomes a race against time and a true test of the human spirit. ",Biography
Jersey Boys,"In the 1960s, four scrappy young men from New Jersey -- Frankie Valli (John Lloyd Young), Bob Gaudio (Erich Bergen), Nick Massi (Michael Lomenda) and Tommy DeVito (Vincent Piazza) -- have the magic sound that propels them from singing under streetlights to singing in spotlights. With songs like ""Sherry,"" ""Big Girls Don't Cry"" and ""Walk Like a Man,"" the quartet finds itself at the top of the charts. However, personal and professional problems threaten to tear the group apart. ",Biography
Bernie,A mentally impaired man (Albert Dupontel) leaves an orphanage to find the parents who left him in a trash bin 30 years earlier. ,Biography
Bleed for This,"Vinny ""The Pazmanian Devil"" Pazienza (Miles Teller), a local Providence boxer, shoots to stardom after winning two world title fights. After a near-fatal car accident leaves him with a broken neck, he is told he may never walk again. Against all odds and doctor's orders, renowned trainer Kevin Rooney (Aaron Eckhart) agrees to help Vinny return to the ring just a year after the accident for what could be the last fight of his life. Based on a true story. ",Biography
The Iceman,"A look at the career of George Gervin, who led the league in scoring for four years. ",Biography
Mank,"1930s Hollywood is reevaluated through the eyes of scathing wit and alcoholic screenwriter Herman J. Mankiewicz as he races to finish ""Citizen Kane."" ",Biography
Fair Game,"When two co-workers (Michael Whaley, Gina Torres) become roommates, their mutual disdain turns into affection. ",Biography
Hitchcock,"Following his great success with ""North by Northwest,"" director Alfred Hitchcock (Anthony Hopkins) makes a daring choice for his next project: an adaptation of Robert Bloch's novel ""Psycho."" When the studio refuses to back the picture, Hitchcock decides to pay for it himself in exchange for a percentage of the profits. His wife, Alma Reville (Helen Mirren), has serious reservations about the film but supports him nonetheless. Still, the production strains the couple's marriage. ",Biography
The Stanford Prison Experiment,"In 1971, Stanford's Professor Philip Zimbardo (Billy Crudup) conducts a controversial psychology experiment in which college students pretend to be either prisoners or guards, but the proceedings soon get out of hand. ",Biography
Che: Part Two,"Seven years after his triumph in Cuba, Che (Benicio del Toro) winds up in Bolivia, where he tries to ignite the same revolutionary fires as before. But, with the Bolivian army bolstered by CIA support, Che faces one defeat after another, finally meeting his end in the village of La Higuera. ",Biography
Patch Adams,"After struggling with depression in a mental hospital, Hunter ""Patch"" Adams (Robin Williams) decides he wants to become a doctor. He enrolls at Virginia Medical University but is disillusioned by the school's clinical perspective on patient care. With the aid of a wealthy friend, Adams opens his own medical clinic for those without insurance. He forms a deep bond with fellow medical student Carin Fisher (Monica Potter) before a tragedy causes Adams to re-evaluate his approach. ",Biography
Selena,"In this biographical drama, Selena Quintanilla (Jennifer Lopez) is born into a musical Mexican-American family in Texas. Her father, Abraham (Edward James Olmos), realizes that his young daughter is talented and begins performing with her at small venues. She finds success and falls for her guitarist, Chris Perez (Jon Seda), who draws the ire of her father. Seeking mainstream stardom, Selena begins recording an English-language album which, tragically, she would never complete. ",Biography
Bugsy,"New York mobster Benjamin ""Bugsy"" Siegel (Warren Beatty) leaves New York City to dip into the glamour of Hollywood, Calif., and to build up syndicate gambling rackets. Bowled over by actress Virginia Hill (Annette Bening), the dapper Siegel courts her, despite having a wife and children. Obsessed with creating a gambling haven, Siegel takes racketeering to the Nevada desert and helps develop Las Vegas, only to find himself in deep water over his reckless construction of the Flamingo Hotel. ",Biography
Battle of the Sexes,"The 1973 tennis match between Billie Jean King and Bobby Riggs became the most watched televised sports event of all time. Trapped in the media glare, King and Riggs were on opposites sides of a binary argument, but off-court each was fighting more personal and complex battles. With her husband urging her to fight for equal pay, the private King was also struggling to come to terms with her own sexuality, while Riggs gambled his legacy and reputation in a bid to relive the glories of his past. ",Biography
The Lady in the Van,"In 1973 London, playwright Alan Bennett (Alex Jennings) develops an unlikely friendship with Miss Shepherd (Maggie Smith), a homeless woman who lives in a van in his driveway for the next 15 years. ",Biography
Jackie,A father decides to kidnap his daughter after his visits are restricted. ,Biography
Hysteria,A U.S. accident victim (Robert Webber) wakes in a London hospital to amnesia and disturbing visions of murder. ,Biography
Taking Woodstock,"In the summer of 1969, Elliot Tiber (Demetri Martin) divides his time between Greenwich Village and the upstate ramshackle motel, El Monaco, of his Old World parents. When the proposed venue for the upcoming Woodstock concert falls through, Elliot steps in and plays a pivotal role in the generation-defining event by helping organizers secure Max Yasgur's nearby farm for the festival and offering the El Monaco as the home base. ",Biography
The Soloist,"Dario, a young Sicilian with a degree and no prospect of work on the horizon, accepts the proposal of a local manager in exchange for the delivery of an envelope of documents. ",Biography
The New World,"Family and friends react negatively to a lesbian couple's (Natalia Dontcheva, Vanessa Larré) decision to have a baby. ",Biography
Ali,"With wit and athletic genius, with defiant rage and inner grace, Muhammad Ali forever changed the American landscape. Fighting all comers, Ali took on the law, conventions, the status quo and the war -- as well as the fists in front of him. Ali both ignited and mirrored the conflicts of his time and ours to become one of the most admired fighters in the world. Forget, now, what you thought you knew. ",Biography
The Eyes of Tammy Faye,"Twelve years after the scandalous collapse of the multimillion dollar Christian empire built by Jim and Tammy Faye Bakker, ""The Eyes Of Tammy Faye"" tells the fascinating inside story of the rise, fall and resurrection of ""the Queen of the Eyelashes."" One of the most adored and reviled women of her time, the film follows her amazing tale from her love at first sight encounter with Jim, through the glory days of PTL, to the scandal that brought both their empire and their family tumbling down. ",Biography
Operation Finale,"Fifteen years after the end of World War II, a team of top-secret Israeli agents travels to Argentina to track down Adolf Eichmann, the Nazi officer who masterminded the transportation logistics that brought millions of innocent Jews to their deaths in concentration camps. Hoping to sneak him out of the country to stand trial, agent Peter Malkin soon finds himself playing a deadly game of cat and mouse with the notorious war criminal. ",Biography
Whiskey Tango Foxtrot,"In 2002, cable news producer Kim Barker (Tina Fey) decides to shake up her routine by taking a daring new assignment in Kabul, Afghanistan. Dislodged from her comfortable American lifestyle, Barker finds herself in the middle of an out-of-control war zone. Luckily, she meets Tanya Vanderpoel (Margot Robbie), a fellow journalist who takes the shellshocked reporter under her wing. Amid the militants, warlords and nighttime partying, Barker discovers the key to becoming a successful correspondent. ",Biography
Spencer,A mail clerk at an advertising firm sets out to climb the corporate ladder and win the woman of his dreams. ,Biography
The Lost City of Z,"At the dawn of the 20th century, British explorer Percy Fawcett journeys into the Amazon, where he discovers evidence of a previously unknown, advanced civilization that may have once inhabited the region. Despite being ridiculed by the scientific establishment, which views indigenous populations as savages, the determined Fawcett, supported by his devoted wife, son, and aide-de-camp, returns to his beloved jungle in an attempt to prove his case. ",Adventure
House of Gucci,"House of Gucci is inspired by the shocking true story of the family behind the Italian fashion empire. When Patrizia Reggiani (Lady Gaga), an outsider from humble beginnings, marries into the Gucci family, her unbridled ambition begins to unravel the family legacy and triggers a reckless spiral of betrayal, decadence, revenge, and ultimately... murder. ",Biography
I Love You Phillip Morris,"Steven Russell (Jim Carrey) becomes a cop, gets married and starts a family, but after a terrible car accident, he vows to be true to himself. He comes out of the closet, moves to Florida, and finances a luxurious lifestyle with bad checks and credit cards. In prison, Steven meets Phillip (Ewan McGregor), a mild-mannered inmate who becomes the love of his life. Determined to build a beautiful life with his lover, Steven embarks on another crime spree. ",Biography
Notorious,A CIA agent (John Shea) falls for a traitor's daughter (Jenny Robertson) recruited to seduce a Soviet arms dealer her father knew. ,Biography
Being the Ricardos,"Lucille Ball (Nicole Kidman) and Desi Arnaz (Javier Bardem) are threatened by shocking personal accusations, a political smear and cultural taboos in Academy Award (R)-winning writer and director Aaron Sorkin's behind-the-scenes drama Being the Ricardos. A revealing glimpse of the couple's complex romantic and professional relationship, the film takes audiences into the writers' room, onto the soundstage and behind closed doors with Ball and Arnaz during one critical production week of their groundbreaking sitcom ""I Love Lucy."" ",Biography
Imperium,An idealistic FBI agent (Daniel Radcliffe) goes under cover to infiltrate a white supremacist group that's plotting an act of terror. ,Biography
The Runaways,"Joan Jett (Kristen Stewart) and Cherie Currie (Dakota Fanning), two rebellious teenagers from Southern California, become the frontwomen for the Runaways -- the now-legendary group that paved the way for future generations of female rockers. Under the Svengalilike influence of impresario Kim Fowley, the band becomes a huge success, with Joan as the band's hard-rocking heart, and Cherie as the sex kitten. However, the teens' stormy relationship threatens the band's future. ",Biography
Hollywoodland,"A detective (Adrien Brody) uncovers unexpected links to his own personal life as he probes the mysterious death of ""Superman"" actor George Reeves (Ben Affleck) in 1959. A possible affair between the actor and Toni Mannix (Diane Lane), the wife of a studio executive (Bob Hoskins), might reveal the truth. ",Biography
Riding in Cars with Boys,"The fresh, funny, touching and true story of writer Beverly Donofrio (played by Drew Barrymore, who ages from 15 to 35 in the role), reveals her coming of age in the late 1960s and her whole life colored by an event that happened when she was 15. The events span more than two decades, as the young heroine experiences often-humorous, sometimes-irreverent, but certainly a unique personal journey to make something meaningful of her life. ",Biography
Dangerous Minds,"Former Marine Louanne Johnson (Michelle Pfeiffer) lands a gig teaching in a pilot program for bright but underachieving teens at a notorious inner-city high school. After having a terrible first day, she decides she must throw decorum to the wind. When Johnson returns to the classroom, she does so armed with a no-nonsense attitude informed by her military training and a fearless determination to better the lives of her students -- no matter what the cost. ",Biography
Fire in the Sky,"In 1975, a group of five men are driving home after working in a forest when they see a mysterious light. Intrigued, Travis Walton (D.B. Sweeney) leaves the truck -- only to be sucked up by a flying saucer. The other four men report the strange event, but they are skeptically interrogated by Lt. Frank Watters (James Garner), who suspects that murder is behind Walton's disappearance. When Walton reappears five days later, his story of alien abduction is met with disbelief. ",Biography
A Dangerous Method,"In 1904 a Russian woman named Sabina Spielrein (Keira Knightley) arrives at Carl Jung's (Michael Fassbender) clinic, seeking treatment for hysteria. Jung is eager to test Sigmund Freud's (Viggo Mortensen) theories on Sabina and, in fact, successfully treats her. Two years later Jung and Sabina meet Freud in person, and Jung takes over the treatment of Otto Gross, whose influence leads Jung to begin an affair with Sabina, contributing to a rift with Freud. ",Biography
Kill Your Darlings,"A struggling screenwriter (Andreas Wilson), a free-spirited woman (Lolita Davidovich) and a group of suicidal people take a wild road trip. ",Biography
The Iron Lady,"In her twilight years, former British Prime Minister Margaret Thatcher (Meryl Streep) reflects on her life and career as she finally prepares to dispose of the belongings of her late husband, Denis (Jim Broadbent). Daughter of a Grantham grocer, she successfully broke through a double-paned glass ceiling of gender and class. Thatcher became the first female prime minister of the United Kingdom and remained as such for 11 consecutive years, until declining popularity forced her to resign. ",Biography
Joan of Arc,"In the 15th century, both France and England stake a blood claim for the French throne. Believing that God had chosen her, the young Joan leads the army of the King of France. When she is captured, the Church sends her for trial on charges of heresy. Refusing to accept the accusations, the graceful Joan of Arc will stay true to her mission. ",Adventure
1492: Conquest of Paradise,"Determined to find a new sailing route to India, Christopher Columbus (Gérard Depardieu) convinces Spanish Queen Isabella (Sigourney Weaver) to finance an expedition. Setting sail with three ships, Columbus quells potential mutinies until the men arrive in North America. After his triumphant return home, Columbus is appointed governor of the new territory, but his dream of a peaceful new world does not fit with nobleman Don Adrian de Moxica's (Michael Wincott) visions of conquest. ",Adventure
Mary Queen of Scots,"Queen of France at 16 and widowed at 18, Mary Stuart defies pressure to remarry. Instead, she returns to her native Scotland to reclaim her rightful throne. But Scotland and England fall under the rule of the compelling Elizabeth I. Each young Queen beholds her sister in fear and fascination. Rivals in power and in love, and female regents in a masculine world, the two must decide how to play the game of marriage versus independence. ",Biography
True Story,A woman's pregnancy turns into a nightmare. ,Biography
A Walk in the Woods,"Travel writer Bill Bryson (Robert Redford) takes a long-lost old friend (Nick Nolte) for a hike along the Appalachian Trail, which stretches more than 2,000 miles from Georgia to Maine. ",Adventure
Evita,"Eva Duarte Peron rises from poverty to become an Argentinian actress and the wife of powerful President Juan Peron. Through a series of flashbacks, Eva transforms from an impoverished teenager into a woman of influence and power. After the death of her father, Eva travels to Buenos Aires and begins a string of relationships with powerful men before she meets Juan. Eva's ultimate power and influence earn her both admiration and hatred. ",Biography
The Fifth Estate,"WikiLeaks founder Julian Assange (Benedict Cumberbatch) and a colleague, Daniel Domscheit-Berg (Daniel Brühl), join forces to become watchdogs over actions of the privileged and powerful. Despite scant resources, they are able to create a platform for whistle-blowers to leak covert data anonymously, thereby exposing government secrets and corporate crimes. However, a major battle erupts when Assange and Berg gain access to the biggest cache of confidential intelligence documents in U.S. history. ",Biography
Lovelace,"After the release of ""Deep Throat"" in 1972, porn star Linda Lovelace (Amanda Seyfried) becomes an international sensation and spokeswoman for sexual freedom and hedonism; six years later, she presents a darker side to her story. ",Biography
Jobs,"College dropout Steve Jobs (Ashton Kutcher), together with his friend, technical whiz-kid Steve Wozniak (Josh Gad), sparks a revolution in home computers with the invention of the Apple 1 in 1976. Built in the garage of Jobs' parents, the device -- and the subsequent formation of Apple Inc. -- have changed the world for all time. Though he is viewed as a visionary, Jobs' tenure as Apple's leader is a rocky one, leading to his eventual ouster from the company he co-founded. ",Biography
Thalaivi,The story of East Indian politician and actress J. Jayalalithaa. ,Biography
Masterminds,"Expelled for playing tech-savvy gags on his teachers, teenage computer wiz Ozzie Paxton (Vincent Kartheiser) attempts to unleash one last prank on the faculty of Shady Glen School. So he sneaks into the school to wreak havoc on its security system. While there, however, he discovers the school security chief, Rafe Bentley (Patrick Stewart), in the midst of hatching a sinister kidnapping plot. Now Ozzie must set aside his childish games so that he can rescue the children of Shady Glen. ",Biography
Heaven Is for Real,"Small-town businessman, pastor and volunteer firefighter Todd Burpo (Greg Kinnear) and his wife, Sonja (Kelly Reilly), are struggling to make ends meet during a tough year. After their young son, Colton (Connor Corum), undergoes emergency surgery, Todd and Sonja are overjoyed at the child's miraculous recovery. However, the Burpos are unprepared for what happens next -- Colton says that he went to heaven and back, and tells his parents things that he couldn't possibly know. ",Biography
Eat Pray Love,"Liz Gilbert (Julia Roberts) thought she had everything she wanted in life: a home, a husband and a successful career. Now newly divorced and facing a turning point, she finds that she is confused about what is important to her. Daring to step out of her comfort zone, Liz embarks on a quest of self-discovery that takes her to Italy, India and Bali. ",Biography
The Bling Ring,"California teens (Austin Butler, Yin Chang) attract the attention of the media when they burglarize the homes of celebrities. ",Biography
Blonde,"Based on the bestselling novel by Joyce Carol Oates, Blonde boldly reimagines the life of one of Hollywood's most enduring icons, Marilyn Monroe. From her volatile childhood as Norma Jeane, through her rise to stardom and romantic entanglements, Blonde blurs the lines of fact and fiction to explore the widening split between her public and private selves. ",Biography
Chhapaak,A young woman tries to rebuild her life after a man throws acid in her face on a public street in New Delhi in 2005. ,Biography
The 15:17 to Paris,"On Aug. 21, 2015, the world watches in stunned silence as the media reports a thwarted terrorist attack on a train that's bound for Paris -- an attempt prevented by three young Americans traveling together through Europe. The heroic and courageous actions of Anthony Sadler, Alek Skarlatos and Spencer Stone help to save the lives of more than 500 passengers on board. ",Biography
Reis,The life of Turkish leader Recep Tayyip Erdogan. ,Biography
Sen to Chihiro no kamikakushi,"10-year-old Chihiro (Daveigh Chase) moves with her parents to a new home in the Japanese countryside. After taking a wrong turn down a wooded path, Chihiro and her parents discover an amusement park with a stall containing an assortment of food. To her surprise, Chihiro's parents begin eating and then transform into pigs. In this supernatural realm, Chihiro encounters a host of characters and endures labor in a bathhouse for spirits, awaiting a reunion with her parents. ",Animation
The Lion King,"This Disney animated feature follows the adventures of the young lion Simba (Jonathan Taylor Thomas), the heir of his father, Mufasa (James Earl Jones). Simba's wicked uncle, Scar (Jeremy Irons), plots to usurp Mufasa's throne by luring father and son into a stampede of wildebeests. But Simba escapes, and only Mufasa is killed. Simba returns as an adult (Matthew Broderick) to take back his homeland from Scar with the help of his friends Timon (Nathan Lane) and Pumbaa (Ernie Sabella). ",Animation
Hotaru no haka,A teenager (J. Robert Spencer) is charged with the care of his younger sister (Rhoda Chrosite) after an Allied firebombing during World War II destroys their home and kills their mother. ,Animation
Coco,An immigrant plans a spectacular party for his son's bar mitzvah. ,Animation
Up,"Carl Fredricksen (Ed Asner), a 78-year-old balloon salesman, is about to fulfill a lifelong dream. Tying thousands of balloons to his house, he flies away to the South American wilderness. But curmudgeonly Carl's worst nightmare comes true when he discovers a little boy named Russell is a stowaway aboard the balloon-powered house. ",Animation
Toy Story 3,"With their beloved Andy preparing to leave for college, Woody (Tom Hanks), Buzz Lightyear (Tim Allen), Jessie (Joan Cusack), and the rest of the toys find themselves headed for the attic but mistakenly wind up on the curb with the trash. Woody's quick thinking saves the gang, but all but Woody end up being donated to a day-care center. Unfortunately, the uncontrollable kids do not play nice, so Woody and the gang make plans for a great escape. ",Animation
Toy Story,"Woody (Tom Hanks), a good-hearted cowboy doll who belongs to a young boy named Andy (John Morris), sees his position as Andy's favorite toy jeopardized when his parents buy him a Buzz Lightyear (Tim Allen) action figure. Even worse, the arrogant Buzz thinks he's a real spaceman on a mission to return to his home planet. When Andy's family moves to a new house, Woody and Buzz must escape the clutches of maladjusted neighbor Sid Phillips (Erik von Detten) and reunite with their boy. ",Animation
Inside Out,A man (Steven Weber) suspects that the odd behavior of his new neighbor (Eriq La Salle) covers up a dark secret. ,Animation
Finding Nemo,"Marlin (Albert Brooks), a clown fish, is overly cautious with his son, Nemo (Alexander Gould), who has a foreshortened fin. When Nemo swims too close to the surface to prove himself, he is caught by a diver, and horrified Marlin must set out to find him. A blue reef fish named Dory (Ellen DeGeneres) -- who has a really short memory -- joins Marlin and complicates the encounters with sharks, jellyfish, and a host of ocean dangers. Meanwhile, Nemo plots his escape from a dentist's fish tank. ",Animation
Klaus,A desperate postman accidentally brings about the genesis of Santa Claus. ,Animation
Ratatouille,"Remy (Patton Oswalt), a resident of Paris, appreciates good food and has quite a sophisticated palate. He would love to become a chef so he can create and enjoy culinary masterpieces to his heart's delight. The only problem is, Remy is a rat. When he winds up in the sewer beneath one of Paris' finest restaurants, the rodent gourmet finds himself ideally placed to realize his dream. ",Animation
WolfWalkers,"In a time of superstition and magic, a young apprentice hunter, Robyn Goodfellowe, journeys to Ireland with her father to wipe out the last wolf pack. While exploring the forbidden lands outside the city walls, Robyn befriends a free-spirited girl, Mebh, a member of a mysterious tribe rumored to have the ability to transform into wolves by night. As they search for Mebh's missing mother, Robyn uncovers a secret that draws her further into the enchanted world of the ""Wolfwalkers"" and risks turning into the very thing her father is tasked to destroy. ",Animation
Soul,"Joe is a middle-school band teacher whose life hasn't quite gone the way he expected. His true passion is jazz -- and he's good. But when he travels to another realm to help someone find their passion, he soon discovers what it means to have soul. ",Animation
Zootopia,"From the largest elephant to the smallest shrew, the city of Zootopia is a mammal metropolis where various animals live and thrive. When Judy Hopps (Ginnifer Goodwin) becomes the first rabbit to join the police force, she quickly learns how tough it is to enforce the law. Determined to prove herself, Judy jumps at the opportunity to solve a mysterious case. Unfortunately, that means working with Nick Wilde (Jason Bateman), a wily fox who makes her job even harder. ",Animation
Aladdin,"Aladdin is a lovable street urchin who meets Princess Jasmine, the beautiful daughter of the sultan of Agrabah. While visiting her exotic palace, Aladdin stumbles upon a magic oil lamp that unleashes a powerful, wisecracking, larger-than-life genie. As Aladdin and the genie start to become friends, they must soon embark on a dangerous mission to stop the evil sorcerer Jafar from overthrowing young Jasmine's kingdom. ",Animation
Beauty and the Beast,An adaptation of this timeless classic. ,Animation
Shrek,"Once upon a time, in a far away swamp, there lived an ogre named Shrek (Mike Myers) whose precious solitude is suddenly shattered by an invasion of annoying fairy tale characters. They were all banished from their kingdom by the evil Lord Farquaad (John Lithgow). Determined to save their home -- not to mention his -- Shrek cuts a deal with Farquaad and sets out to rescue Princess Fiona (Cameron Diaz) to be Farquaad's bride. Rescuing the Princess may be small compared to her deep, dark secret. ",Animation
Toy Story 2,"Woody (Tom Hanks) is stolen from his home by toy dealer Al McWhiggin (Wayne Knight), leaving Buzz Lightyear (Tim Allen) and the rest of the gang to try to rescue him. But when Woody discovers that he's actually a valuable collectible from a once-popular television show called ""Woody's Roundup"" and is reunited with his horse Bullseye, Jessie the yodeling cowgirl (Joan Cusack) and his faithful sidekick, Stinky Pete the Prospector (Kelsey Grammer), he doesn't want to leave. ",Animation
Isle of Dogs,"A mob boss in London finds out his trophy wife is having an affair, and a deadly game begins when he tracks her lover down. ",Animation
The Breadwinner,"Parvana is an 11-year-old girl who lives under Taliban rule in Afghanistan in 2001. After the wrongful arrest of her father, Parvana cuts off her hair and dresses like a boy to support her family. Working alongside a friend, she soon discovers a new world of freedom and danger. Drawing strength from the fantastical stories she invents, Parvana embarks on an epic quest to find her father and reunite her family. ",Animation
Ma vie de Courgette,A police officer (Michel Vuillermoz) and some new friends help an orphan (Gaspard Schlatter) adjust to life at a foster home. ,Animation
Toy Story 4,"Woody, Buzz Lightyear and the rest of the gang embark on a road trip with Bonnie and a new toy named Forky. The adventurous journey turns into an unexpected reunion as Woody's slight detour leads him to his long-lost friend Bo Peep. As Woody and Bo discuss the old days, they soon start to realize that they're worlds apart when it comes to what they want from life as a toy. ",Animation
Tangled,"When the kingdom's most-wanted bandit, Flynn Rider (Zachary Levi), hides in a convenient tower, he immediately becomes a captive of Rapunzel (Mandy Moore), the spire's longtime resident. Crowned with 70 feet of magical golden hair, she has been locked away for years and desperately wants freedom. The feisty teenager strikes a deal with Flynn, and together they begin a whirlwind adventure. ",Animation
Coraline,"While exploring her new home, a girl named Coraline (Dakota Fanning) discovers a secret door, behind which lies an alternate world that closely mirrors her own but, in many ways, is better. She rejoices in her discovery, until Other Mother (Teri Hatcher) and the rest of her parallel family try to keep her there forever. Coraline must use all her resources and bravery to make it back to her own family and life. ",Animation
Waking Life,"Transcending the boundaries of technology and imagination, ""Waking Life"" is a revolutionary breakthrough in film animation. In ""Waking Life,"" Wiley Wiggins (""Dazed and Confused"") travels through a series of encounters and observations in a world that may or may not be reality. It is this surreal existence, flourishing with endless ideas and possibilities, that ultimately leads to the question -- Are we sleep-walking through our waking state or wake-walking through our dreams? ",Animation
Who Framed Roger Rabbit,"Down-on-his-luck private eye Eddie Valiant (Bob Hoskins) gets hired by cartoon producer R.K. Maroon (Alan Tilvern) to investigate an adultery scandal involving Jessica Rabbit (Kathleen Turner), the sultry wife of Maroon's biggest star, Roger Rabbit (Charles Fleischer). But when Marvin Acme (Stubby Kaye), Jessica's alleged paramour and the owner of Toontown, is found murdered, the villainous Judge Doom (Christopher Lloyd) vows to catch and destroy Roger. ",Animation
Fantasia,"Released in 1940, represented Disney's boldest experiment to date. Bringing to life his vision of blending animated imagery with classical music. What had begun as a vehicle to enhance Mickey Mouse's career blossomed into a full-blown feature that remains unique in the history of animation. ",Animation
The Mitchells vs the Machines,"Young Katie Mitchell embarks on a road trip with her proud parents, younger brother and beloved dog to start her first year at film school. But their plans to bond as a family soon get interrupted when the world's electronic devices come to life to stage an uprising. With help from two friendly robots, the Mitchells must now come together to save one another -- and the planet -- from the new technological revolution. ",Animation
Moana,Filmmaker Robert J. Flaherty spends a year living in a village in Samoa documenting the life of the villagers. ,Animation
Despicable Me,"Supervillain Gru, a man who delights in all things wicked, hatches a plan to steal the moon. Surrounded by an army of little yellow minions and his impenetrable arsenal of weapons and war machines, Gru prepares to vanquish all who stand in his way. However, nothing in his calculations and groundwork has prepared him for his greatest challenge: three adorable orphan girls who want to make him their dad. ",Animation
The Secret of Kells,"In the remote Irish woods, Cellach (Brendan Gleeson) prepares a fortress for an impending attack by a Viking war party. Unbeknown to Cellach, his young nephew Brendan (Evan McGuire) -- who has no taste for battle -- works secretly as an apprentice in the scriptorium of the local monastery, learning the ancient art of calligraphy. As the Vikings approach, revered illuminator Aidan (Mick Lally) arrives at the monastery and recruits Brendan to complete a series of dangerous, magical tasks. ",Animation
Mulan,"Fearful that her ailing father will be drafted into the Chinese military, Mulan (Ming-Na Wen) takes his spot -- though, as a girl living under a patriarchal regime, she is technically unqualified to serve. She cleverly impersonates a man and goes off to train with fellow recruits. Accompanied by her dragon, Mushu (Eddie Murphy), she uses her smarts to help ward off a Hun invasion, falling in love with a dashing captain along the way. ",Animation
The Little Mermaid,"To marry her true love, a mermaid princess risks being turned into sea foam. ",Animation
Watership Down,"When a young rabbit named Fiver (Richard Briers) has a prophetic vision that the end of his warren is near, he persuades seven other rabbits to leave with him in search of a new home. Several obstacles impede their progress, including predators, a rat-filled cemetery and a speeding river. Upon arriving at their final destination, a hill dubbed Watership Down, the rabbits find that their journey is still far from over. Realistically drawn, this British animated film carries an emotional weight. ",Animation
The Jungle Book,"In this classic Walt Disney animation based on Rudyard Kipling's book, Mowgli, an abandoned child raised by wolves, has his peaceful existence threatened by the return of the man-eating tiger Shere Khan . Facing certain death, Mowgli must overcome his reluctance to leave his wolf family and return to the ""man village."" But he is not alone on his quest: Aided by Bagheera the panther, and later by the carefree bear Balloo , he braves the jungle's many perils. ",Animation
Snow White and the Seven Dwarfs,"The Grimm fairy tale gets a Technicolor treatment in Disney's first animated feature. Jealous of Snow White's beauty, the wicked queen orders the murder of her innocent stepdaughter, but later discovers that Snow White is still alive and hiding in a cottage with seven friendly little miners. Disguising herself as a hag, the queen brings a poisoned apple to Snow White, who falls into a death-like sleep that can be broken only by a kiss from the prince. ",Animation
Ice Age,"Twenty-thousand years ago, Earth is a wondrous, prehistoric world filled with great danger, not the least of which is the beginning of the Ice Age. To avoid a really bad frostbite, the planet's majestic creatures - and a few small, slothful ones - begin migrating south . The story revolves around sub-zero heroes: a woolly mammoth, a saber-toothed tiger, a sloth and a prehistoric combination of a squirrel and rat, known as Scrat. ",Animation
Robin Hood,A thief steals from the rich to help the poor people of England. ,Animation
Pinocchio,A woodcarver creates a puppet (Roberto Benigni) that longs to become a real boy. ,Animation
Onward,"Teenage elf brothers Ian and Barley embark on a magical quest to spend one more day with their late father. Like any good adventure, their journey is filled with cryptic maps, impossible obstacles and unimaginable discoveries. But when dear Mom finds out her sons are missing, she teams up with the legendary manticore to bring her beloved boys back home. ",Animation
Sing 2,"This holiday season, the new chapter in Illumination's smash animated franchise arrives with big dreams and spectacular hit songs as the ever-optimistic koala, Buster Moon, and his all-star cast of performers prepare to launch their most dazzling stage extravaganza yet... all in the glittering entertainment capital of the world. There's just one hitch: They first have to persuade the world's most reclusive rock star--played by global music icon Bono, in his animated film debut--to join them. ",Animation
Koto no ha no niwa,A master musician becomes interested in a young woman (Yoshiko Sakuma). ,Animation
Frozen,A performance artist turns his suicide into a work of art by melting ice with his body. ,Animation
Luca,A young woman and her family strive to recover from the Chilean military dictatorship. ,Animation
Alice in Wonderland,Animated adaptation of Lewis Carroll's story. ,Animation
Shaun the Sheep Movie,"All is well at Mossy Bottom Farm, except for the fact that the animals will do anything to get out of work. So, Shaun the sheep and his scheming friends devise a plan to put their master to sleep. However, the ruse backfires when the poor farmer finds himself transported to the big city, having lost his memory. Now, it's up to Sean, Timmy the lamb, Shirley the ewe and the rest of the gang to travel to the metropolis and get him back, while not landing in even more trouble themselves. ",Animation
Finding Dory,"Dory (Ellen DeGeneres) is a wide-eyed, blue tang fish who suffers from memory loss every 10 seconds or so. The one thing she can remember is that she somehow became separated from her parents as a child. With help from her friends Nemo and Marlin, Dory embarks on an epic adventure to find them. Her journey brings her to the Marine Life Institute, a conservatory that houses diverse ocean species. Dory now knows that her family reunion will only happen if she can save mom and dad from captivity. ",Animation
Despicable Me 2,"Now that Gru has forsaken a life of crime to raise Margo, Agnes and Edith, he's trying to figure out how to provide for his new family. As he struggles with his responsibilities as a father, the Anti-Villain League, an organization dedicated to fighting evil, comes calling. The AVL sends Gru on a mission to capture the perpetrator of a spectacular heist, for who would be better than the world's greatest ex-villain to capture the individual who seeks to usurp his power. ",Animation
Shrek 2,"After returning from their honeymoon and showing home movies to their friends, Shrek and Fiona learn that her parents have heard that she has married her true love and wish to invite him to their kingdom, called Far Far Away. The catch is: Fiona's parents are unaware of the curse that struck their daughter and have assumed she married Prince Charming, not a 700-pound ogre with horrible hygiene and a talking donkey pal. ",Animation
Corpse Bride,"Victor (Johnny Depp) and Victoria's (Emily Watson) families have arranged their marriage. Though they like each other, Victor is nervous about the ceremony. While he's in a forest practicing his lines for the wedding, a tree branch becomes a hand that drags him to the land of the dead. It belongs to Emily, who was murdered after eloping with her love and wants to marry Victor. Victor must get back aboveground before Victoria marries the villainous Barkis Bittern (Richard E. Grant). ",Animation
Tarzan,"In this Disney animated tale, the orphaned Tarzan (Tony Goldwyn) grows up in the remote African wilderness, raised by the gentle gorilla Kala (Glenn Close). When a British expedition enters the jungle, Tarzan encounters the beautiful Jane (Minnie Driver) and recognizes that, like her, he's human. Falling in love with Jane, Tarzan is torn between embracing civilization and staying with his gorilla family, which becomes threatened by the ruthless hunter Clayton (Brian Blessed). ",Animation
Hercules,"Disney tackles Greek mythology in this animated feature. Hercules (Tate Donovan), a son of gods, was snatched as a baby by Hades (James Woods) and forced to live among mortals as a half-man, half-god. Now a teenager, Hercules needs to perform a rite of passage on Earth to prove himself worthy of living with the gods on Mount Olympus. With his plucky satyr sidekick, Philoctetes (Danny DeVito), along for the ride, Hercules must learn how to use his strength to defeat a series of evil creatures. ",Animation
The Last Unicorn,"In this animated musical, the villainous King Haggard (Christopher Lee) plots to destroy all the world's unicorns. When a young unicorn (Mia Farrow) learns that she's in danger and that she may soon be the last of her kind, she leaves the safety of her protected forest and enlists the help of Schmendrick (Alan Arkin), a gentle, albeit clumsy, sorcerer. Together, they embark on a long and dangerous journey with one goal: to defeat Haggard and save the unicorns from extinction. ",Animation
One Hundred and One Dalmatians,"In a Disney animation classic, Dalmatian Pongo is tired of his bachelor-dog life. He spies lovely Perdita and maneuvers his master, Roger, into meeting Perdita's owner, Anita. The owners fall in love and marry, keeping Pongo and Perdita together too. After Perdita gives birth to a litter of 15 puppies, Anita's old school friend Cruella De Vil wants to buy them all. Roger declines her offer, so Cruella hires the criminal Badun brothers to steal them -- so she can have a fur coat. ",Animation
Lady and the Tramp,"This Disney animated classic follows a pampered cocker spaniel named Lady (Barbara Luddy) whose comfortable life slips away once her owners have a baby. When, after some tense circumstances, Lady finds herself on the loose and out on the street, she is befriended and protected by the tough stray mutt Tramp (Larry Roberts). A romance begins to blossom between the two dogs, but their many differences, along with more drama at Lady's household, threaten to keep them apart. ",Animation
Peter Pan,"Peter and Tinker Bell take three children to Neverland to see the Lost Boys, Indians, Captain Hook and his pirates. ",Animation
Cinderella,"With a wicked stepmother (Eleanor Audley) and two jealous stepsisters (Rhoda Williams, Lucille Bliss) who keep her enslaved and in rags, Cinderella (Ilene Woods) stands no chance of attending the royal ball. When her fairy godmother (Verna Felton) appears and magically transforms her reality into a dream come true, Cinderella enchants the handsome Prince Charming at the ball, but must face the wrath of her enraged stepmother and sisters when the spell wears off at midnight. ",Animation
Bambi,"In a classic Disney animation, a fawn named Bambi joins his new friends, a young rabbit named Thumper and a skunk kit named Flower in happily exploring the woods. Bambi is captivated with a young doe named Faline, and he learns from his doting mother and his father -- the Great Prince of the Forest -- that besides the delights of the forest, there is danger in open meadows where hunters can see them. Though fear and tragedy touch Bambi's life, another spring brings renewal. ",Animation
Wish Dragon,"In Sony Pictures Animation's Wish Dragon, Din, a working-class college student with big dreams but small means, and Long, a cynical but all-powerful dragon capable of granting wishes, set off on a hilarious adventure through modern day Shanghai in pursuit of Din's long-lost childhood friend, Lina. Their journey forces them to answer some of life's biggest questions -- because when you can wish for anything, you have to decide what really matters. ",Animation
Anomalisa,An inspirational speaker (David Thewlis) becomes reinvigorated after meeting a lively woman (Jennifer Jason Leigh) who shakes up his mundane existence. ,Animation
The Book of Life,"In the Mexican town of San Angel, Manolo (Diego Luna), Maria (Zoë Saldana) and Joaquin (Channing Tatum) have been friends ever since childhood. Although their lives have taken different paths -- Maria was sent to Europe, Joaquin joined the military, and Manolo studied to become a bullfighter -- one thing remains the same: Manolo and Joaquin both want to marry Maria. Little does the trio know that battling husband-and-wife deities have made a high-stakes wager on the love triangle's outcome. ",Animation
Monsters University,"Ever since he was a kid monster, Mike Wazowski (Billy Crystal) has dreamed of becoming a Scarer. To make his dream a reality, he enrolls at Monsters University. During his first semester, he meets Sulley (John Goodman), a natural-born Scarer. Sulley and Mike engage in a fierce rivalry that ultimately gets them both kicked out of MU's elite Scare Program. To make things right, Mike and Sulley -- along with a bunch of misfit monsters -- will have to learn to work together. ",Animation
The Croods,"Prehistoric family the Croods live in a particularly dangerous moment in time. Patriarch Grug (Nicolas Cage), his mate, Ugga (Catherine Keener), teenage daughter Eep (Emma Stone), son Thunk (Clark Duke) and feisty Gran (Cloris Leachman) gather food by day and huddle together in a cave at night. When a more evolved caveman named Guy (Ryan Reynolds) arrives on the scene, Grug is distrustful, but it soon becomes apparent that Guy is correct about the impending destruction of their world. ",Animation
Cars,"While traveling to California to race The King and Chick Hicks in the Piston Cup Championship, Lightning McQueen falls out of his trailer and winds up in a run-down town called Radiator Springs. He slowly befriends the town's odd residents, including Sally, Doc Hudson and Mater. When it comes time for him to leave, the championship is no longer his top priority. ",Animation
Treasure Planet,"The legendary ""loot of a thousand worlds"" inspires an intergalactic treasure hunt when 15-year-old Jim Hawkins stumbles upon a map to the greatest pirate trove in the universe in Walt Disney Pictures' thrilling animated space adventure, ""Treasure Planet."" Based on one of the greatest adventure stories ever told - Robert Louis Stevenson's ""Treasure Island"" - this film follows Jim's fantastic journey across a parallel universe as a cabin boy aboard a glittering space galleon. ",Animation
The Great Mouse Detective,Rodent supersleuth Basil and his bumbling partner must thwart evil Ratigan's plot to depose the Mouse Queen. ,Animation
Sleeping Beauty,"Marius Petipa's ""The Sleeping Beauty"" holds a special place in The Royal Ballet's repertory, with its vibrant sets and glittering costumes and featuring such iconic moments, all to Tchaikovsky's richly layered music. ",Animation
Dumbo,"A young circus elephant is born with comically large ears and given the cruel nickname Dumbo. One day at a show, he is taunted by a group of kids, inciting his mother into a rage that gets her locked up. After Dumbo's ears cause an accident that injures many of the other elephants, he is made to dress like a clown and perform dangerous stunts. Everything changes when Dumbo discovers that his enormous ears actually allow him to fly, and he astounds everyone at the circus with his new talent. ",Animation
The Sea Beast,"In an era when terrifying beasts roamed the seas, monster hunters were celebrated heroes -- and none were more beloved than the great Jacob Holland. But when young Maisie Brumble stows away on his fabled ship, he's saddled with an unexpected ally. Together they embark on an epic journey into uncharted waters and make history. From Academy Award winning filmmaker Chris Williams (Moana, Big Hero Six, Bolt), The Sea Beast takes us to where the map ends, and the true adventure begins. ",Animation
Sing,A Brooklyn high-school teacher (Lorraine Bracco) assigns a bad boy (Peter Dobson) and a good girl (Jessica Steen) to put on a talent show. ,Animation
Arthur Christmas,"Everyone knows that, each Christmas, Santa Claus delivers presents to every last child on Earth. What everyone doesn't know is that Santa accomplishes the feat with a very high-tech operation beneath the North Pole. But when the unthinkable happens, and Santa misses one child out of hundreds of millions, someone has to save the day. It's up to Arthur (James McAvoy), Santa's youngest son, to deliver a present to the forgotten tyke before Christmas morning dawns. ",Animation
Brave,"Merida (Kelly Macdonald), the impetuous but courageous daughter of Scottish King Fergus (Billy Connolly) and Queen Elinor (Emma Thompson), is a skilled archer who wants to carve out her own path in life. Her defiance of an age-old tradition angers the Highland lords and leads to chaos in the kingdom. Merida seeks help from an eccentric witch (Julie Walters), who grants her an ill-fated wish. Now, Merida must discover the true meaning of courage and undo a beastly curse before it's too late. ",Animation
The Princess and the Frog,"Hardworking and ambitious, Tiana dreams of one day opening the finest restaurant in New Orleans. Her dream takes a slight detour when she meets Prince Naveen , who has been turned into an amphibian by evil Dr. Facilier. Mistaking her for a princess and hoping to break the spell, Naveen plants a kiss on poor Tiana -- thereby turning her into a frog as well. The pair hop along on an adventure through the bayous to seek the help of a powerful voodoo priestess. ",Animation
Enchanted,"Banished by an evil queen, Princess Giselle (Amy Adams) from a fairy-tale world lands in modern Manhattan, where music, magic and ""happily ever after"" are sorely lacking. She is adrift in this strange new place until a divorce lawyer (Patrick Dempsey) comes to her aid. Giselle begins to fall for her flawed benefactor, but the storybook romance gets complicated when a prince from her world comes to rescue her. ",Animation
The SpongeBob SquarePants Movie,"In this lively animated adventure, undersea oddball SpongeBob SquarePants and his starfish friend, Patrick, embark on a quest to clear the name of Mr. Krabs, the owner of the Krusty Krab restaurant, who has been framed for stealing the crown of ocean deity King Neptune. Leaving the familiar confines of Bikini Bottom, SpongeBob and Patrick venture out towards Shell City, where they hope to find Neptune's crown, but numerous obstacles stand (or float) in their way. ",Animation
Spirit: Stallion of the Cimarron,"Follows the adventures of a wild and rambunctious mustang stallion as he journeys through the untamed American frontier. Encountering man for the first time, Spirit defies being broken, even as he develops a remarkable friendship with a young Lakota brave. The courageous young stallion also finds love with a beautiful paint mare named Rain on his way to becoming one of the greatest unsung heroes of the Old West. ",Animation
Fantasia 2000,"""Fantasia/2000"" continues and builds upon Walt Disney's original idea with the creation of a new musical program interpreted by a group of distinguished Disney artists and storytellers. Adding to the fun and entertainment, celebrity hosts from the various arts appear on screen to introduce each of the segments. Included in that prestigious group are Steve Martin, Itzhak Perlman, Bette Midler, Quincy Jones, James Earl Jones, Penn &amp; Teller and Angela Lansbury. ",Animation
The Prince of Egypt,"In this animated retelling of the Book of Exodus, Egyptian Prince Moses , upon discovering his roots as a Jewish slave, embarks on a quest to free his people from bondage. When his plea is denied by his brother Rameses , the new pharaoh, a series of horrific plagues strike Egypt. Moses finally leads the Israelites to freedom by parting the Red Sea and drowning the Egyptian army. God then gives Moses the Ten Commandments, a list of rules for his people to live by. ",Animation
Chicken Run,"This engaging stop-motion, claymation adventure tells the story of an American rooster who falls in love with a gorgeous hen on a British farm. The couple decides to run away from the farm, but they must first contend with the evil farmer who is intent on keeping them under her control. The chickens decide to attempt an escape so they don't get turned into chicken pot pies. ",Animation
Anastasia,"A Russian princess has her life of wealth and privilege toppled when a mighty Czar takes power, leading her to search for true love and a new life. ",Animation
Balto,"In this animated feature, a deadly diphtheria epidemic strikes the remote town of Nome, Alaska. With the life-saving medicine located hundreds of miles away, the residents decide to send out a sled-dog team. Balto (Kevin Bacon) -- a half-wolf dog ignored by all except a goose, Boris (Bob Hoskins), and two polar bears -- is chosen to run but is disqualified by lead dog Steele (Jim Cummings). When the other dogs get lost in the snow, Balto risks his life to rescue them and deliver the medicine. ",Animation
Turning Red,"In ""Turning Red"", Mei Lee is a confident, dorky thirteen-year-old torn between staying her mother's dutiful daughter and the chaos of adolescence. And as if changes to her interests, relationships, and body weren't enough, whenever she gets too excited (which for a teenager is practically ALWAYS), she ""poofs"" into a giant red panda! ",Animation
Abominable,"After discovering a Yeti on the roof of her apartment building, teenage Yi and her two friends embark on an epic quest to reunite the magical creature with his family. But to do so, they must stay one step ahead of a wealthy financier and a determined zoologist who want to capture the beast for their own gain. ",Animation
Ralph Breaks the Internet,"Video game bad guy Ralph and fellow misfit Vanellope von Schweetz must risk it all by traveling to the World Wide Web in search of a replacement part to save Vanellope's video game, ""Sugar Rush."" In way over their heads, Ralph and Vanellope rely on the citizens of the internet -- the netizens -- to help navigate their way, including an entrepreneur named Yesss, who is the head algorithm and the heart and soul of trend-making site BuzzzTube. ",Animation
The Peanuts Movie,"Life always seems complicated for good ol' Charlie Brown (Noah Schnapp), the boy who always tries his best against seemingly impossible odds. When the Little Red-Haired Girl moves into his neighborhood, Charlie Brown develops a crush on her. Meanwhile, his best friend Snoopy embarks on an epic adventure in a fantasy world. As a World War I flying ace, the lovable beagle pursues his nemesis, the Red Baron, while also trying to win the heart of a beautiful poodle named Fifi (Kristin Chenoweth). ",Animation
ParaNorman,"Young Norman Babcock (Kodi Smit-McPhee) has the ability to speak with the dead -- and he often prefers their company to that of the living. Norman receives word from his strange Uncle Prenderghast (John Goodman) that a centuries-old witch's curse on their town is real and about to come true -- and that only Norman can stop it. When zombies rise from their graves, Norman must summon all his courage and compassion and push his paranormal abilities to the limit to save his fellow townspeople. ",Animation
Hotel Transylvania,"When monsters want to get away from it all, they go to Count Dracula's (Adam Sandler) Hotel Transylvania, a lavish resort where they can be themselves without humans around to bother them. On one special weekend, Dracula invites creatures like the Invisible Man, the Mummy and others to celebrate the 118th birthday of his daughter, Mavis (Selena Gomez). However, an unforeseen complication unfolds when an ordinary human unwittingly crashes the party and falls in love with Mavis. ",Animation
A Scanner Darkly,"In the near future, as America virtually loses the war on drugs, Robert Arctor, a narcotics cop in Orange County, Calif., becomes an addict when he goes under cover. He is wooing Donna, a dealer, to ferret out her supplier. At the same time, he receives orders to spy on his housemates, one of whom is suspected of being Donna's biggest customer. ",Animation
Bedknobs and Broomsticks,"During the Battle of Britain, Miss Eglantine Price (Angela Lansbury), a cunning witch-in-training, decides to use her supernatural powers to defeat the Nazi menace. She sets out to accomplish this task with the aid of three inventive children who have been evacuated from the London Blitz. Joined by Emelius Brown (David Tomlinson), the head of Miss Price's witchcraft training correspondence school, the crew uses an enchanted bed to travel into a fantasy land and foil encroaching German troops. ",Animation
The Croods: A New Age,"Searching for a safer habitat, the prehistoric Crood family discovers an idyllic, walled-in paradise that meets all of its needs. Unfortunately, they must also learn to live with the Bettermans -- a family that's a couple of steps above the Croods on the evolutionary ladder. As tensions between the new neighbors start to rise, a new threat soon propels both clans on an epic adventure that forces them to embrace their differences, draw strength from one another, and survive together. ",Animation
Rio,"Captured by smugglers when he was just a hatchling, a macaw named Blu (Jesse Eisenberg) never learned to fly and lives a happily domesticated life in Minnesota with his human friend, Linda. Blu is thought to be the last of his kind, but when word comes that Jewel (Anne Hathaway), a lone female, lives in Rio de Janeiro, Blu and Linda go to meet her. Animal smugglers kidnap Blu and Jewel, but the pair soon escape and begin a perilous adventure back to freedom -- and Linda. ",Animation
Ice Age: Dawn of the Dinosaurs,"After Sid (John Leguizamo) pilfers some dinosaur eggs, Manny (Ray Romano), Diego (Denis Leary) and the rest of their prehistoric pals enter a mysterious, underground world to rescue the hapless sloth. During the course of their mission, the gang encounters many creatures great and small, including hungry carnivores and a relentless, dinosaur-hunting weasel named Buck. ",Animation
Cloudy with a Chance of Meatballs,"When hard times hit Swallow Falls, its townspeople can only afford to eat sardines. Flint Lockwood, a failed inventor, thinks he has the answer to the town's crisis. He builds a machine that converts water into food, and becomes a local hero when tasty treats fall from the sky like rain. But when the machine spins out of control and threatens to bury the whole world under giant mounds of food, Flint finds he may have bitten off more than he can chew. ",Animation
Madagascar,"Alex the lion is the king of the urban jungle, the main attraction at New York's Central Park Zoo. He and his best friends -- Marty the zebra, Melman the giraffe and Gloria the hippo -- have spent their whole lives in blissful captivity before an admiring public and with regular meals provided for them. Not content to leave well enough alone, Marty lets his curiosity get the better of him and makes his escape -- with the help of some prodigious penguins -- to explore the world. ",Animation
A Goofy Movie,"Though Goofy always means well, his amiable cluelessness and klutzy pratfalls regularly embarrass his awkward adolescent son, Max. When Max's lighthearted prank on his high-school principal finally gets his longtime crush, Roxanne, to notice him, he asks her on a date. Max's trouble at school convinces Goofy that he and the boy need to bond over a cross-country fishing trip like the one he took with his dad when he was Max's age, which throws a kink in his son's plans to impress Roxanne. ",Animation
An American Tail,"A young mouse named Fievel Mousekewitz (Phillip Glasser) and his family emigrate from Russia to the United States by boat after their home is destroyed by cats. During the trip, a fierce storm throws Fievel from the ship, and he loses contact with his family. Luckily, he manages to sail to New York in a bottle. There, Irish mouse Bridget (Cathianne Blore), an Italian mouse named Tony (Pat Musick) and a kindly cat named Tiger (Dom DeLuise) help Fievel search for his loved ones. ",Animation
The Rescuers,An anti-genocide activist and a Holocaust historian trace the lives of thirteen diplomats who saved tens of thousands of Jews during World War II. ,Animation
The Bad Guys,"During a return trip to his childhood home, a filmmaker is confronted by the now-grown ensemble of his old friends - none of whom are aware that he intends to make his fortune off the shared childhood trauma that splintered them apart. ",Animation
The Lion King,"This Disney animated feature follows the adventures of the young lion Simba (Jonathan Taylor Thomas), the heir of his father, Mufasa (James Earl Jones). Simba's wicked uncle, Scar (Jeremy Irons), plots to usurp Mufasa's throne by luring father and son into a stampede of wildebeests. But Simba escapes, and only Mufasa is killed. Simba returns as an adult (Matthew Broderick) to take back his homeland from Scar with the help of his friends Timon (Nathan Lane) and Pumbaa (Ernie Sabella). ",Animation
Storks,"Storks deliver babies -- or at least they used to. Now, they deliver packages for a global internet retail giant. Junior (Andy Samberg), the company's top delivery stork, lands in hot water when the Baby Factory produces an adorable but wholly unauthorized girl. Desperate to deliver this bundle of trouble, Junior and his friend Tulip (Katie Crown), the only human on Stork Mountain, race against time to make their first baby drop before the boss (Kelsey Grammer) finds out. ",Animation
Frozen II,"Elsa the Snow Queen has an extraordinary gift -- the power to create ice and snow. But no matter how happy she is to be surrounded by the people of Arendelle, Elsa finds herself strangely unsettled. After hearing a mysterious voice call out to her, Elsa travels to the enchanted forests and dark seas beyond her kingdom -- an adventure that soon turns into a journey of self-discovery. ",Animation
A Christmas Carol,Ebenezer Scrooge is visited by spirits. ,Animation
The Boxtrolls,"Eggs (Isaac Hempstead-Wright), an orphan, lives with the Boxtrolls -- a community of quirky, mischievous creatures who inhabit a cavern beneath the city of Cheesebridge. When villainous Archibald Snatcher (Ben Kingsley) hatches a plan to get rid of the pretty harmless beings, Eggs decides to go above ground, where he meets and befriends feisty Winnifred (Elle Fanning). Together, Eggs and Winnifred devise a daring plan to save the Boxtrolls from extermination. ",Animation
Bolt,"The days of canine superstar Bolt (John Travolta) are filled with danger and intrigue ... until the cameras stop rolling. But Bolt doesn't know that he's on a TV show; he thinks his amazing powers are real. When Bolt is accidentally shipped from his Hollywood soundstage to the mean streets of New York, he begins his most-amazing adventure: Armed only with his delusions and accompanied by a cat and a hamster, he sets out to to find his owner, Penny (Miley Cyrus). ",Animation
Meet the Robinsons,"Boy genius Lewis gives up hope of retrieving his latest invention, which was stolen by Bowler Hat Guy, then a young time-traveler named Wilbur Robinson arrives on the scene to whisk Lewis away in his time machine. The boys spend a day in the future with Wilbur's eccentric family and uncover an amazing secret at the same time. ",Animation
Brother Bear,"Kenai (Joaquin Phoenix) is a young Indian brave with a particular distaste for bears. When his brother Sitka (D.B. Sweeney) is killed by one, Kenai in turn kills the bear, only to be magically transformed into one himself. To make matters worse, his other brother Denahi (Jason Raize) vows to kill the bear Kenai has become. Kenai's only hope is a magical mountain where he believes he can be changed back to a human, and he enlists a real bear cub, Koda, to get him there. ",Animation
DuckTales the Movie: Treasure of the Lost Lamp,"Scrooge McDuck finds a magic lamp with Huey, Dewey and Louie and their girlfriend, Webby. ",Animation
Missing Link,"Upon returning to his camp from a nearby watering hole, a half-simian/half-human herbivore (Michael Gambon) -- the titular ""missing link"" between ape and man -- discovers his entire clan, friends and family have been killed by Stone Age humans. Thus begins a long search for others of his kind. As he traverses the African continent avoiding humans and looking for clues about his own species, he also befriends animals and learns about the world in which he is the last of his kind. ",Animation
Mary Poppins Returns,"Now an adult with three children, bank teller Michael Banks learns that his house will be repossessed in five days unless he can pay back a loan. His only hope is to find a missing certificate that shows proof of valuable shares that his father left him years earlier. Just as all seems lost, Michael and his sister receive the surprise of a lifetime when Mary Poppins -- the beloved nanny from their childhood -- arrives to save the day and take the Banks family on a magical, fun-filled adventure. ",Animation
Cars 3,"Blindsided by a new generation of blazing-fast cars, the legendary Lighting McQueen finds himself pushed out of the sport that he loves. Hoping to get back in the game, he turns to Cruz Ramirez, an eager young technician who has her own plans for winning. With inspiration from the Fabulous Hudson Hornet and a few unexpected turns, No. 95 prepares to compete on Piston Cup Racing's biggest stage. ",Animation
Ferdinand,"Ferdinand is a young bull who escapes from a training camp in rural Spain after his father never returns from a showdown with a matador. Adopted by a girl who lives on a farm, Ferdinand's peaceful existence comes crashing down when the authorities return him to his former captors. With help from a wisecracking goat and three hedgehogs, the giant but gentle bovine must find a way to break free before he squares off against El Primero, the famous bullfighter who never loses. ",Animation
The Good Dinosaur,"Luckily for young Arlo, his parents (Jeffrey Wright, Frances McDormand) and his two siblings, the mighty dinosaurs were not wiped out 65 million years ago. When a rainstorm washes poor Arlo (Raymond Ochoa) downriver, he ends up bruised, battered and miles away from home. Good fortune shines on the frightened dino when he meets Spot (Jack Bright), a Neanderthal boy who offers his help and friendship. Together, the unlikely duo embark on an epic adventure to reunite Arlo with his beloved family. ",Animation
Over the Hedge,"When Verne (Garry Shandling) and fellow woodland friends awake from winter's hibernation, they find they have some new neighbors: humans, and RJ (Bruce Willis), an opportunistic raccoon who shows the others how to exploit the suburban bounty laid out before them. ",Animation
Sinbad: Legend of the Seven Seas,The adventurous sailor (Brad Pitt) and a beautiful stowaway (Catherine Zeta-Jones) have 10 days to save a prince from execution. ,Animation
James and the Giant Peach,"Featuring stop-motion animation and live action, this inventive adaptation of Roald Dahl's beloved children's tale follows the adventures of James (Paul Terry), an orphaned young British boy. Forced to live with his cruel aunts (Joanna Lumley, Miriam Margolyes), James finds a way out of his bleak existence when he discovers an enormous enchanted peach. After rolling into the sea inside the buoyant fruit, James, accompanied by a crew of friendly talking insects, sets sail for New York City. ",Animation
Pocahontas,"This is the Disney animated tale of the romance between a young American Indian woman named Pocahontas (Seong Yujin) and Capt. John Smith (Lee Jeong-gu), who journeyed to the New World with other settlers to begin fresh lives. Her powerful father, Chief Powhatan, disapproves of their relationship and wants her to marry a native warrior. Meanwhile, Smith's fellow Englishmen hope to rob the Native Americans of their gold. Can Pocahontas' love for Smith save the day? ",Animation
All Dogs Go to Heaven,"In this animated feature, canine casino owner Charlie (Burt Reynolds) is killed by gambler Carface (Vic Tayback), but returns to Earth from heaven thanks to the powers of a magical, rewindable watch. Charlie sets out to take his revenge on Carface by means of an elaborate plan that involves an orphan girl, Anne-Marie. But as the plan progresses, Charlie discovers that Anne-Marie is being exploited by Carface. Charlie must decide whether to change his mission from one of revenge to one of rescue. ",Animation
Smallfoot,"Migo is a friendly Yeti whose world gets turned upside down when he discovers something that he didn't know existed -- a human. He soon faces banishment from his snowy home when the rest of the villagers refuse to believe his fantastic tale. Hoping to prove them wrong, Migo embarks on an epic journey to find the mysterious creature that can put him back in good graces with his simple community. ",Animation
Minions: The Rise of Gru,"In the heart of the 1970s, amid a flurry of feathered hair and flared jeans, Gru (Oscar® nominee Steve Carell) is growing up in the suburbs. A fanboy of a supervillain supergroup known as the Vicious 6, Gru hatches a plan to become evil enough to join them. Luckily, he gets some mayhem-making backup from his loyal followers, the Minions. Together, Kevin, Stuart, Bob, and Otto--a new Minion sporting braces and a desperate need to please--deploy their skills as they and Gru build their first lair, experiment with their first weapons and pull off their first missions. When the Vicious 6 oust their leader, legendary fighter Wild Knuckles (Oscar® winner Alan Arkin), Gru interviews to become their newest member. It doesn't go well (to say the least), and only gets worse after Gru outsmarts them and suddenly finds himself the mortal enemy of the apex of evil. On the run, Gru will turn to an unlikely source for guidance, Wild Knuckles himself, and discover that even bad guys need a little help from their friends. ",Animation
Hotel Transylvania 2,"Now that Dracula (Adam Sandler) has opened the Hotel Transylvania's doors to humans, things are changing for the better; however, Drac is secretly worried that his half-human grandson, Dennis, isn't showing his vampire side. So, while Mavis and Johnny are away, Drac enlists his friends to help him put the boy through a ""monster-in-training"" boot camp. But things really get batty when Drac's cantankerous, old-school dad (Mel Brooks) pays an unexpected visit. ",Animation
Home,"A homeless teenager meets another homeless boy on the streets, and they team up to survive. ",Animation
Penguins of Madagascar,"Plucky penguins Skipper (Tom McGrath), Kowalski (Chris Miller), Rico (Conrad Vernon) and Private (Christopher Knights) -- the most elite spies ever hatched -- join forces with a chic undercover organization known as the North Wind. Led by highly trained, handsome and arrogant Agent Classified (Benedict Cumberbatch), this special inter-species task force must stop a many-tentacled villain, Dr. Octavius Brine (John Malkovich), from destroying the world. ",Animation
Madagascar: Escape 2 Africa,"Alex (Ben Stiller), Morty (Chris Rock) and other zoo animals find a way to escape from Madagascar when the penguins reassemble a wrecked airplane. The precariously repaired craft stays airborne just long enough to make it to the African continent. There the New Yorkers encounter members of their own species for the first time. Africa proves to be a wild place, but Alex and company wonder if it is better than their Central Park home. ",Animation
Puss in Boots,"When a miller passes away, two of his sons take everything he owns and leave only the cat behind for their other brother. ",Animation
Monster House,"No adults believe three youths' (Mitchel Musso, Spencer Locke, Sam Lerner) assertion that a neighboring residence is a living creature that means them harm. With Halloween approaching, the trio must find a way to destroy the structure before innocent trick-or-treaters meet ghastly ends. ",Animation
Antz,"Z the worker ant (Woody Allen) strives to reconcile his own individuality with the communal work-ethic of the ant colony. He falls in love with ant-Princess Bala (Sharon Stone), Z strives to make social inroads, and then must save the ant colony from the treacherous scheming of the evil General Mandible (Gene Hackman) that threaten to wipe out the entire worker population. ",Animation
The Secret Life of Pets,"Max (Louis C.K.) is a spoiled terrier who enjoys a comfortable life in a New York building until his owner adopts Duke, a giant and unruly canine. During their walk outside, they encounter a group of ferocious alley cats and wind up in a truck that's bound for the pound. Luckily, a rebellious bunny named Snowball swoops in to save the doggy duo from captivity. In exchange, Snowball demands that Max and Duke join his gang of abandoned pets on a mission against the humans who've done them wrong. ",Animation
Ice Age: Continental Drift,"Scrat's continuous pursuit of an infernal acorn has world-changing consequences for Manny (Ray Romano), Sid (John Leguizamo) and Diego (Denis Leary) when the continents split apart. The continental crack-up separates Manny and his friends from the rest of the herd, including Manny's mate, Ellie (Jennifer Lopez) and rebellious daughter Peaches (Keke Palmer). The pals are desperate to return home, but a pirate (Peter Dinklage) and his ragtag crew stand in their way. ",Animation
Space Jam,"Swackhammer (Danny DeVito), an evil alien theme park owner, needs a new attraction at Moron Mountain. When his gang, the Nerdlucks, heads to Earth to kidnap Bugs Bunny (Billy West) and the Looney Tunes, Bugs challenges them to a basketball game to determine their fate. The aliens agree, but they steal the powers of NBA basketball players, including Larry Bird (Larry Bird) and Charles Barkley (Charles Barkley) -- so Bugs gets some help from superstar Michael Jordan (Michael Jordan). ",Animation
FernGully: The Last Rainforest,"Crysta (Samantha Mathis) is a fairy who lives in FernGully, a rainforest in Australia, and has never seen a human before. In fact, she is told they are extinct. But when a logging company comes near the rainforest, she sees that they do exist, and even accidentally shrinks one of them: a boy named Zak (Jonathan Ward). Now her size, Zak sees the damage that the company does and helps Crysta to stop not only them, but an evil entity named Hexxus (Tim Curry), who feeds off pollution. ",Animation
The Secret Life of Pets 2,"Explore the emotional lives of pets and the deep bond between them and the families that love them as Max, Gidget, Snowball and the rest of the gang take on new adventures and push themselves to find the courage to become their own heroes. ",Animation
Minions,"Evolving from single-celled yellow organisms at the dawn of time, Minions live to serve, but find themselves working for a continual series of unsuccessful masters, from T. Rex to Napoleon. Without a master to grovel for, the Minions fall into a deep depression. But one minion, Kevin, has a plan; accompanied by his pals Stuart and Bob, Kevin sets forth to find a new evil boss for his brethren to follow. Their search leads them to Scarlet Overkill, the world's first-ever super-villainess. ",Animation
Trolls,"After the Bergens invade Troll Village, Poppy (Anna Kendrick), the happiest Troll ever born, and the overly-cautious, curmudgeonly Branch (Justin Timberlake) set off on a journey to rescue her friends. Their mission is full of adventure and mishaps, as this mismatched duo try to tolerate each other long enough to get the job done. ",Animation
Happy Feet,"Mumble (Elijah Wood), a young emperor penguin, lives in Antarctica. Like others of his kind, he needs to be able to sing to attract a mate, but he has a terrible voice. Instead, Mumble must express himself, and lure a female through his amazing talent for tap-dancing. ",Animation
Robots,"In a world of sentient robots, striving young inventor Rodney Copperbottom (Ewan McGregor) wants to work for the avuncular Bigweld (Mel Brooks), whose Bigweld Industries makes spare robot parts. But Bigweld has just been deposed as company head by the villainous Phineas T. Ratchet (Greg Kinnear), who wants to make all robots submit to profitable forced upgrades. In this animated adventure, Rodney and his friend Fender (Robin Williams) go underground to fight Ratchet's evil plans. ",Animation
Dinosaur,"This is the story of Aladar (Alfre Woodard), an iguanodon dinosaur raised by a family of lemurs. Their world is turned upside-down however, when meteors strike, turning their green world into a desert wasteland. Teaming up with a herd of other herbivores, the trek is on to find the ""Nesting Ground"" where water and vegetation is bountiful... but with carnivores behind them and nothing but desert around for miles, it doesn't look promising! ",Animation
The Swan Princess,A vengeful wizard curses a princess to exist as a swan by day until her prince declares his undying love. ,Animation
An American Tail: Fievel Goes West,"Fievel and family continue their pursuit of the American dream by heading West. Fievel wants to be a lawman and his sister wants to make it as a dance hall singer. They are trying to get away from cats, but they find their move doesn't work out as easy as they would like. ",Animation
Hotel Transylvania 3: Summer Vacation,"Your favorite monster family boards a luxury cruise ship so Dracula can take a summer vacation from the hotel. It's smooth sailing for the pack as they indulge in all of the fun the cruise has to offer, including monster volleyball, exotic excursions and catching up on their moon tans. But the dream vacation soon turns into a nightmare when Mavis realizes Drac has fallen for the mysterious captain of the ship, Ericka, who hides a dangerous secret that could destroy them all. ",Animation
The Boss Baby,"A new baby's arrival impacts a family, told from the point of view of a delightfully unreliable narrator -- a wildly imaginative 7-year-old named Tim. The most unusual Boss Baby (Alec Baldwin) arrives at Tim's home in a taxi, wearing a suit and carrying a briefcase. The instant sibling rivalry must soon be put aside when Tim discovers that Boss Baby is actually a spy on a secret mission, and only he can help thwart a dastardly plot that involves an epic battle between puppies and babies. ",Animation
The Grinch,"The Grinch and his loyal dog, Max, live a solitary existence inside a cave on Mount Crumpet. His main source of aggravation comes during Christmastime when his neighbors in Whoville celebrate the holidays with a bang. When the Whos decide to make Christmas bigger and brighter, the disgruntled Grinch realizes there is one way to gain peace and quiet. With help from Max, the green grump hatches a scheme to pose as Santa Claus, steal Christmas and silence the Whos' holiday cheer once and for all. ",Animation
Rio 2,"Blue macaws Blu (Jesse Eisenberg), Jewel (Anne Hathaway) and their three children are comfortably settled in the city -- perhaps too comfortably. Jewel fears that the children are becoming more like humans than birds. After learning that she and Blu may not be the last blue macaws after all, Jewel decides that their little family should visit the Amazon jungle. It's there that Blu meets his formidable father-in-law (Andy Garcia) and goes beak-to-beak with archnemesis Nigel (Jemaine Clement). ",Animation
Cloudy with a Chance of Meatballs 2,"His genius finally recognized by his idol Chester V, inventor Flint Lockwood (Bill Hader) gets to join Chester's company, where he can work full-time on technologies to help mankind. However, Flint soon discovers that his most-famous machine, which turns water into food, is still operating but now creates animal/vegetable hybrids. With the fate of humanity in Flint's hands, he and his friends set out to save the world from tacodiles, shrimpanzees and other deliciously dangerous creatures. ",Animation
Shrek Forever After,"Long-settled into married life and fully domesticated, Shrek (Mike Myers) begins to long for the days when he felt like a real ogre. Duped into signing a contract with devious Rumpelstiltskin, he finds himself in an alternate version of Far Far Away, where ogres are hunted, Rumpelstiltskin rules, and he and Fiona (Cameron Diaz) have never met. Shrek must find a way out of the contract to restore his world and reclaim his true love. ",Animation
Despicable Me 3,"The mischievous Minions hope that Gru will return to a life of crime after the new boss of the Anti-Villain League fires him. Instead, Gru decides to remain retired and travel to Freedonia to meet his long-lost twin brother for the first time. The reunited siblings soon find themselves in an uneasy alliance to take down the elusive Balthazar Bratt, a former 1980s child star who seeks revenge against the world. ",Animation
Cars 2,"Racecar Lightning McQueen (Owen Wilson) and his tow-truck buddy, Mater (Larry the Cable Guy), have had their share of adventures together but nothing like what they experience when they head overseas for the first-ever World Grand Prix. While Lightning has his eye on the road to the championship, Mater takes a detour to international espionage when he meets British master spy Finn McMissile (Michael Caine) and stunning spy-in-training Holley Shiftwell (Emily Mortimer). ",Animation
The Lord of the Rings,"This animated film by Ralph Bakshi presents the first part of J.R.R. Tolkien's renowned fantasy tale. The wise old wizard, Gandalf (William Squire), entrusts the young hobbit, Frodo (Christopher Guard), with a magical ring. Soon dark forces are after Frodo, so he must leave his peaceful home and travel to the ominous Mount Doom, where the ring must be destroyed. Accompanied by a trio of hobbit friends, Frodo is also aided by the mysterious Aragorn (John Hurt) and other heroic allies. ",Animation
Sausage Party,"Life is good for all the food items that occupy the shelves at the local supermarket. Frank (Seth Rogen) the sausage, Brenda (Kristen Wiig) the hot dog bun, Teresa Taco and Sammy Bagel Jr. (Edward Norton) can't wait to go home with a happy customer. Soon, their world comes crashing down as poor Frank learns the horrifying truth that he will eventually become a meal. After warning his pals about their similar fate, the panicked perishables devise a plan to escape from their human enemies. ",Animation
The Tale of Despereaux,Small mouse. Big dreams. ,Animation
Shrek the Third,"When King Harold suddenly croaks, Shrek (Mike Myers) learns he will have to rule the land of Far, Far Away, unless he can find a suitable heir to the throne. The most-promising candidate is Princess Fiona's (Cameron Diaz) cousin Artie (Justin Timberlake), a teenage slacker in a medieval high-school. Shrek and his trusted companions, Donkey (Eddie Murphy) and Puss in Boots (Antonio Banderas), set out to bring Artie back but find their mission is a bigger challenge than they expected. ",Animation
Open Season,"Boog (Martin Lawrence), a 900-pound grizzly bear, is content entertaining tourists and living in park ranger Beth's (Debra Messing) barn. His life takes a drastic turn when he rescues a one-horned mule deer named Elliot (Ashton Kutcher) from a hunter (Gary Sinise), and is subsequently tranquilized and returned to the wild. Elliot and Boog recruit the other animals, notably a Scottish squirrel (Billy Connolly) and a beaver foreman, to help turn the tables on the hunters to make the woods safe. ",Animation
Bee Movie,"Fresh out of college, Barry the Bee finds the prospect of working with honey uninspiring. He flies outside the hive for the first time and talks to a human, breaking a cardinal rule of his species. Barry learns that humans have been stealing and eating honey for centuries, and he realizes that his true calling is to obtain justice for his kind by suing humanity for theft. ",Animation
Hotel Transylvania: Transformania,"Drac and the pack are back, like you've never seen them before in Hotel Transylvania: Transformania. Reunite with your favorite monsters for an all-new adventure that presents Drac with his most terrifying task yet. When Van Helsing's mysterious invention, the 'Monsterfication Ray,"" goes haywire, Drac and his monster pals are all transformed into humans, and Johnny becomes a monster! In their new mismatched bodies, Drac, stripped of his powers, and an exuberant Johnny, loving life as a monster, must team up and race across the globe to find a cure before it's too late, and before they drive each other crazy. With help from Mavis and the hilariously human Drac Pack, the heat is on to find a way to switch themselves back before their transformations become permanent. ",Animation
The SpongeBob Movie: Sponge Out of Water,"Life is dandy in Bikini Bottom for SpongeBob Squarepants (Tom Kenny) and his friends Patrick (Bill Fagerbakke), Squidward (Rodger Bumpass), Mr. Krabs (Clancy Brown) and Sandy (Carolyn Lawrence). However, when the top-secret recipe for Krabby Patties is stolen, SpongeBob finds that he must join forces with perpetual adversary Plankton (Mr. Lawrence) and come ashore to battle a fiendish pirate named Burger Beard (Antonio Banderas), who has his own plans for the delicious delicacies. ",Animation
Planet 51,"When astronaut Capt. Charles ""Chuck"" Baker lands on Planet 51, he thinks he is the first life form to set foot there. He gets the surprise of his life when he learns that it is inhabited by little green people who live in an idyllic version of 1950s America -- complete with a universal fear of alien invasion. ",Animation
Shark Tale,"Underachiever Oscar (Will Smith) is a pint-sized fish with grand aspirations. When mob-connected great white shark Frankie (Michael Imperioli) is accidentally killed, Oscar concocts a story with Frankie's peace-loving brother Lenny (Jack Black) that it was he who murdered the shark. Suddenly hailed ""Sharkslayer"" by his aquatic brethren, Oscar has bigger fish to fry when Frankie's father, mob boss Don Lino (Robert De Niro), dispatches his henchmen to track down his son's killer. ",Animation
The Addams Family,"Members of the mysterious and spooky Addams family -- Gomez, Morticia, Pugsley, Wednesday, Uncle Fester and Grandma -- are readily preparing for a visit from their even creepier relatives. But trouble soon arises when shady TV personality Margaux Needler realizes that the Addams' eerie hilltop mansion is standing in the way of her dream to sell all the houses in the neighborhood. ",Animation
Happy Feet Two,"Mumble (Elijah Wood) the penguin, now called the Master of Tap, has an unusual problem: Erik, his son, is reluctant to dance. Erik runs away from home and encounters the Mighty Sven (Hank Azaria) -- a penguin that can fly. Poor Mumble can't compete with Erik's unusual new role model. But, when the world is shaken by powerful forces, Erik gets a chance to see his father's true colors as Mumble gathers all creatures great and small to set things right again. ",Animation
Escape from Planet Earth,"On the planet Baab, dashing astronaut Scorch Supernova (Nam Do-hyung) is a national hero and master of daring rescues. However, Scorch does not work alone; his nerdy brother, Gary (Im Chaeheon), head of mission control at BASA, often lends quiet, behind-the-scenes support. When a distress signal arrives from a dangerous planet, Scorch ignores Gary's warnings and sets out on a rescue mission. Scorch soon finds himself caught in a trap set by an evil enemy, and it's up to Gary to save him. ",Animation
The Ant Bully,"Tired of weathering constant attacks on their colony, ants shrink a destructive boy, named Lucas (Zach Tyler Eisen), to their size and sentence him to live among them until he learns the errors of his ways. Guided by his insect guardians (Julia Roberts, Regina King, Bruce Campbell), Lucas discovers a world he never knew existed and soon joins forces with his new friends to combat an exterminator (Paul Giamatti) who threatens their colony. ",Animation
Looney Tunes: Back in Action,"Sick of ceding the spotlight to Bugs Bunny (Joe Alaskey), Daffy Duck is unceremoniously fired by studio boss Kate Houghton (Jenna Elfman) when he demands equal pay and billing. Daffy goes on a studio lot rampage, taking down security guard D.J. Drake (Brendan Fraser) in the process, who is also sacked. But when D.J.'s A-list actor dad (Timothy Dalton) is kidnapped by the evil Mr. Chairman (Steve Martin), D.J. and Daffy try to rescue him, while also being pursued by Kate and Bugs. ",Animation
The Nut Job,"After he accidentally destroys the winter food supply of his fellow Liberty Park residents, Surly (Will Arnett), a squirrel, is banished to the streets of Oakton. Luckily, Surly finds the town's nut shop and hatches a plan to plunder its bounty. However, unbeknown to Surly and his ragtag team of animal associates, the nut shop is really a front for mobsters who plan to rob the bank next door. While Surly and his team break in to the shop, the mobsters carry out their own scheme. ",Animation
Planes,"Dusty is a small-town plane who dreams of one day competing as a high-flying air racer. However, poor Dusty has two strikes against him: He's not built for racing, and he's terribly afraid of heights. To achieve his dream, Dusty turns to naval aviator Skipper. Skipper helps Dusty qualify to take on Ripslinger, the race circuit's defending champion. Dusty's courage faces the ultimate test, as he takes aim at heights he never dreamed were possible. ",Animation
Chicken Little,"Young Chicken Little (Zach Braff) throws his small town into panic by claiming the sky is falling. Unable to find the piece of ""sky"" that hit him, he earns the town's scorn. A year later, outcast Little tries to redeem himself by joining the baseball team, helping to win a crucial game. Later that night he is hit on the head again and discovers that the ""falling sky"" is actually from a UFO. Now, Little must convince the skeptical town that an alien invasion is about to happen. ",Animation
Ice Age: Collision Course,"Manny the mammoth starts to worry when his daughter Peaches announces her engagement. Still unlucky in love, Sid the sloth volunteers to plan the couple's wedding. To Manny's dismay, nothing can stop the upcoming nuptials, except maybe the end of the world. When Scrat accidentally launches himself into outer space, he sets off a chain reaction that sends an asteroid hurtling toward Earth. Now, the entire herd must leave home to explore new lands and save itself from Scrat's cosmic blunder. ",Animation
Barnyard,"Like the other animals in the barn, Otis the bull (Kevin James) likes to sing and play while the farmer is away. However, the carefree bovine must soon find the courage to be a leader when, unexpectedly, he finds himself in a position of great responsibility. ",Animation
Stuart Little 2,"Plucky, pint-sized hero Stuart Little (Michael J. Fox) returns in ""Stuart Little 2,"" delighting audiences with his big heart and even more action-packed adventure. This time, Stuart must journey through the city with a reluctant Snowbell (Nathan Lane) to rescue a new friend, Margalo (Melanie Griffith), from a villainous Falcon (James Woods). ",Animation
Hop,A former revolutionary (Jan Decleir) and his companion (Antje de Boeck) help an illegal immigrant boy (Kalomba Mbuyi) whose father is about to be deported to Africa. ,Animation
The Smurfs,"Evil wizard Gargamel (Hank Azaria) has plagued the happy, peaceful Smurfs for a very long time. Finally, he succeeds in chasing the little blue people from their village and through a magic portal -- which transports them to Manhattan and into the life of ad executive Patrick Winslow (Neil Patrick Harris). Only three apples high and lost in the Big Apple, the Smurfs (Jonathan Winters, Alan Cumming, Katy Perry) must find a way back to their world before Gargamel tracks them down. ",Animation
The Smurfs 2,"Hoping to harness the magical Smurf-essence, evil wizard Gargamel creates a pair of Smurflike creatures, called Naughties. However, only a real Smurf can give Gargamel what he wants, so he kidnaps Smurfette to force her to cast a spell that will transform the Naughties into Smurfs. Papa, Clumsy and the rest of the Smurfs reunite with their human friends Patrick (Neil Patrick Harris) and Grace (Jayma Mays) to rescue Smurfette from the wizard's clutches. ",Animation
The Wild,"An adolescent lion (Kiefer Sutherland) who was raised in captivity finds himself accidentally plucked from the New York Zoo and deposited in Africa. Meanwhile, the friends he left behind at the zoo must put aside their differences to help bring him home safely. ",Animation
Garfield,"Based on the popular comic strip, this live-action comedy follows the exploits of Garfield (Bill Murray), the large, lazy and wisecracking cat owned by hapless Jon Arbuckle (Breckin Meyer). Jon's other housemate, Odie, is a dim but sweet dog who frequently annoys Garfield. When the conniving orange feline gets fed up with Odie, he devises a way to get rid of the pooch. However, after Garfield has a change of heart about Odie, he must find a way to get his fellow pet back. ",Animation
Space Jam: A New Legacy,"When LeBron James and his young son Dom are trapped in a digital space by a rogue A.I., LeBron must get them home safe by leading Bugs, Lola Bunny and the whole gang of notoriously undisciplined Looney Tunes to victory over the A.I.'s digitized champions on the court: a powered-up roster of professional basketball stars as you've never seen them before. It's Tunes versus Goons in the highest-stakes challenge of his life, that will redefine LeBron's bond with his son and shine a light on the power of being yourself. ",Animation
Alvin and the Chipmunks: Chipwrecked,"Dave Seville (Jason Lee), the Chipmunks (Justin Long, Matthew Gray Gubler, Jesse McCartney) and the Chipettes are taking a luxury cruise to the International Music Awards. Of course, Alvin cannot resist the urge to create havoc, and the singing rodents soon find themselves marooned on a seemingly deserted island. While Dave and an unlikely ally launch a search, Alvin and company discover that they are not alone on the island, as they first thought. ",Animation
The Emoji Movie,"Hidden inside a smartphone, the bustling city of Textopolis is home to all emojis. Each emoji has only one facial expression, except for Gene, an exuberant emoji with multiple expressions. Determined to become ""normal"" like the other emojis, Gene enlists the help of his best friend Hi-5 and a notorious code breaker called Jailbreak. During their travels through the other apps, the three emojis discover a great danger that could threaten their phone's very existence. ",Animation
Once Upon a Time in the West,"There's a single piece of land around Flagstone with water on it, and rail baron Morton (Gabriele Ferzetti) aims to have it, knowing the new railroad will have to stop there. He sends his henchman Frank (Henry Fonda) to scare the land's owner, McBain (Frank Wolff), but Frank kills him instead and pins it on a known bandit, Cheyenne (Jason Robards). Meanwhile, a mysterious gunslinger with a score to settle (Charles Bronson) and McBain's new wife, Jill (Claudia Cardinale), arrive in town. ",Western
Django Unchained,"Two years before the Civil War, Django (Jamie Foxx), a slave, finds himself accompanying an unorthodox German bounty hunter named Dr. King Schultz (Christoph Waltz) on a mission to capture the vicious Brittle brothers. Their mission successful, Schultz frees Django, and together they hunt the South's most-wanted criminals. Their travels take them to the infamous plantation of shady Calvin Candie (Leonardo DiCaprio), where Django's long-lost wife (Kerry Washington) is still a slave. ",Drama
Unforgiven,Betrayal won't be forgotten as people seek vengeance on a group of backstabbers. ,Drama
The Gold Rush,"In this classic silent comedy, the Little Tramp (Charles Chaplin) heads north to join in the Klondike gold rush. Trapped in a small cabin by a blizzard, the Tramp is forced to share close quarters with a successful prospector (Mack Swain) and a fugitive (Tom Murray). Eventually able to leave the cabin, he falls for a lovely barmaid (Georgia Hale), trying valiantly to win her affections. When the prospector needs help locating his claim, it appears the Tramp's fortunes may change. ",Adventure
Dances with Wolves,"A Civil War soldier develops a relationship with a band of Lakota Indians. Attracted by the simplicity of their lifestyle, he chooses to leave his former life behind to be with them. Having observed him, they give the name Dances With Wolves. Soon he is a welcomed member of the tribe and falls in love with a white woman who has been raised in the tribe. Tragedy results when Union soldiers arrive with designs on the land. ",Adventure
Rio Bravo,"When gunslinger Joe Burdette (Claude Akins) kills a man in a saloon, Sheriff John T. Chance (John Wayne) arrests him with the aid of the town drunk, Dude (Dean Martin). Before long, Burdette's brother, Nathan (John Russell), comes around, indicating that he's prepared to bust his brother out of jail if necessary. Chance decides to make a stand until reinforcements arrive, enlisting Dude, an old cripple named Stumpy (Walter Brennan) and baby-faced cowboy Colorado Ryan (Ricky Nelson) to help. ",Western
High Noon,A psychopathic killer (Ivan Sergei) targets a hostage negotiator (Emilie de Ravin) who takes care of her daughter and mother (Cybill Shepherd). ,Drama
The Searchers,"In this revered Western, Ethan Edwards (John Wayne) returns home to Texas after the Civil War. When members of his brother's family are killed or abducted by Comanches, he vows to track down his surviving relatives and bring them home. Eventually, Edwards gets word that his niece Debbie (Natalie Wood) is alive, and, along with her adopted brother, Martin Pawley (Jeffrey Hunter), he embarks on a dangerous mission to find her, journeying deep into Comanche territory. ",Adventure
The Hateful Eight,"While racing toward the town of Red Rock in post-Civil War Wyoming, bounty hunter John ""The Hangman"" Ruth (Kurt Russell) and his fugitive prisoner (Jennifer Jason Leigh) encounter another bounty hunter (Samuel L. Jackson) and a man who claims to be a sheriff. Hoping to find shelter from a blizzard, the group travels to a stagecoach stopover located on a mountain pass. Greeted there by four strangers, the eight travelers soon learn that they may not make it to their destination after all. ",Crime
The Outlaw Josey Wales,"Josey Wales (Clint Eastwood) watches helplessly as his wife and child are murdered, by Union men led by Capt. Terrill (Bill McKinney). Seeking revenge, Wales joins the Confederate Army. He refuses to surrender when the war ends, but his fellow soldiers go to hand over their weapons -- and are massacred by Terrill. Wales guns down some of Terrill's men and flees to Texas, where he tries to make a new life for himself, but the bounty on his head endangers him and his new surrogate family. ",Western
Red River,"Headstrong Thomas Dunson (John Wayne) starts a thriving Texas cattle ranch with the help of his faithful trail hand, Groot (Walter Brennan), and his protégé, Matt Garth (Montgomery Clift), an orphan Dunson took under his wing when Matt was a boy. In need of money following the Civil War, Dunson and Matt lead a cattle drive to Missouri, where they will get a better price than locally, but the crotchety older man and his willful young partner begin to butt heads on the exhausting journey. ",Drama
Stagecoach,"An outlaw (Kris Kristofferson), a gambler (Waylon Jennings), Doc Holliday (Willie Nelson) and other passengers have Geronimo's war party for company. ",Adventure
Wind River,"After losing an infant son, the wife of a Shoshone chief dreams that a blond boy (Blake Heron) will save her other child. ",Crime
Blazing Saddles,"In this satirical take on Westerns, crafty railroad worker Bart (Cleavon Little) becomes the first black sheriff of Rock Ridge, a frontier town about to be destroyed in order to make way for a new railroad. Initially, the people of Rock Ridge harbor a racial bias toward their new leader. However, they warm to him after realizing that Bart and his perpetually drunk gunfighter friend (Gene Wilder) are the only defense against a wave of thugs sent to rid the town of its population. ",Comedy
Hell or High Water,"Toby is a divorced father who's trying to make a better life for his son. His brother Tanner is an ex-convict with a short temper and a loose trigger finger. Together, they plan a series of heists against the bank that's about to foreclose on their family ranch. Standing in their way is Marcus, a Texas Ranger who's only weeks away from retirement. As the siblings plot their final robbery, they must also prepare for a showdown with a crafty lawman who's not ready to ride off into the sunset. ",Crime
True Grit,"After hired hand Tom Chaney (Jeff Corey) murders the father of 14-year-old Mattie Ross (Kim Darby), she seeks vengeance and hires U.S. Marshal ""Rooster"" Cogburn (John Wayne), a man of ""true grit,"" to track Chaney into Indian territory. As the two begin their pursuit, a Texas Ranger, La Boeuf (Glen Campbell), joins the manhunt in hopes of capturing Chaney for the murder of a Texas senator and collecting a substantial reward. The three clash on their quest of bringing to justice the same man. ",Drama
Little Big Man,"When a curious oral historian (William Hickey) turns up to hear the life story of 121-year-old Jack Crabb (Dustin Hoffman), he can scarcely believe his ears. Crabb tells of having been rescued and raised by the Cheyenne, of working as a snake-oil salesman, as a gunslinger, and as a mule skinner under Gen. Custer (Richard Mulligan). As if those weren't astonishing enough, he also claims to be the only white survivor of the infamous Battle of the Little Bighorn. ",Adventure
Giant,"Wealthy Texas rancher Bick Benedict (Rock Hudson) shakes things up at home when he returns from a trip to the East Coast with a love interest, the refined Leslie Lynnton (Elizabeth Taylor). Bick and Leslie get married, but she clashes with his sister, Luz (Mercedes McCambridge), and wins the admiration of the ambitious young Jett Rink (James Dean). Bick and Jett form a tense rivalry that continues to surface as the years pass and fortunes change in this sweeping drama. ",Drama
Shane,"Enigmatic gunslinger Shane (Alan Ladd) rides into a small Wyoming town with hopes of quietly settling down as a farmhand. Taking a job on homesteader Joe Starrett's (Van Heflin) farm, Shane is drawn into a battle between the townsfolk and ruthless cattle baron Rufus Ryker (Emile Meyer). Shane's growing attraction to Starrett's wife, Marian (Jean Arthur), and his fondness for their son Joey (Brandon de Wilde), who idolizes Shane, force Shane to realize that he must thwart Ryker's plan. ",Drama
Dead Man,Circumstances transform a mild-mannered accountant (Johnny Depp) into a notorious Old West gunslinger. ,Adventure
Legends of the Fall,"In early 20th-century Montana, Col. William Ludlow (Anthony Hopkins) lives in the wilderness with his sons, Tristan (Brad Pitt), Alfred (Aidan Quinn) and Samuel (Henry Thomas). Eventually, the unconventional but close-knit family encounters tragedy when Samuel is killed in World War I. Tristan and Alfred survive their tours of duty, but, soon after they return home, both men fall for Samuel's gorgeous fiancée, Susannah (Julia Ormond), and their intense rivalry begins to destroy the family. ",Drama
Jeremiah Johnson,"A Mexican-American War veteran, Jeremiah Johnson (Robert Redford), heads to the mountains to live in isolation. Woefully unequipped for the task at hand, Johnson is fortunate to come across a seasoned mountain man (Will Geer) willing to teach him the necessary survival tactics. As life continues in the mountains, Johnson finds himself a native bride (Delle Bolton) and an adopted son (Josh Albee). However, their peaceful existence is threatened when Johnson incurs the ire of the Crow Indians. ",Adventure
El Dorado,"Heartless tycoon Bart Jason (Edward Asner) hires a group of thugs to force the MacDonald family out of El Dorado so he can claim their land. J.P. Harrah, the town's sheriff, is too deep in the throes of alcoholism to help the family. When Harrah's friend, noble elder gunfighter Cole Thorton (John Wayne), learns of the predicament, he travels to El Dorado with his upstart friend, Mississippi (James Caan), to help Harrah clean up in time for a shootout against Jason's men. ",Drama
Yahsi Bati,In 1881 a sultan asks Lemi and Aziz to escort a gift to the American president. ,Adventure
Lone Star,"Roy goes off on his dimwit younger brother, Ray, for having slept with the former's wife. From imparting his odd versions of Bible lessons to throwing punches, he does whatever he can to vent his anger. ",Drama
High Plains Drifter,"In this Western, a drifter with no name (Clint Eastwood) wanders into a small town, where his gun-slinging abilities are in high demand. When the drifter rides into Lago, he is met with incredulity and disapproval by the townspeople. But once he shows his skills with a pistol, the locals realize he may be able to help them fend off a band of criminals who have been terrorizing the town. He agrees to help the townspeople, but does so with his own secret agenda. ",Drama
True Grit,"After hired hand Tom Chaney (Jeff Corey) murders the father of 14-year-old Mattie Ross (Kim Darby), she seeks vengeance and hires U.S. Marshal ""Rooster"" Cogburn (John Wayne), a man of ""true grit,"" to track Chaney into Indian territory. As the two begin their pursuit, a Texas Ranger, La Boeuf (Glen Campbell), joins the manhunt in hopes of capturing Chaney for the murder of a Texas senator and collecting a substantial reward. The three clash on their quest of bringing to justice the same man. ",Adventure
The Ballad of Buster Scruggs,An anthology of six short films that take place in 19th-century post-Civil War era during the settling of the Old West. ,Comedy
Bacurau,"A few years from now... Bacurau, a small village in the Brazilian sertão, mourns the loss of its matriarch, Carmelita, who lived to be 94. Days later, its inhabitants (among them Sônia Braga) notice that their village has literally vanished from online maps and a UFO-shaped drone is seen flying overhead. There are forces that want to expel them from their homes, and soon, in a genre-bending twist, a band of armed mercenaries led by Udo Kier arrive in town picking off the inhabitants one by one. A fierce confrontation takes place when the townspeople turn the tables on the villainous outsiders, banding together by any means necessary to protect and maintain their remote community. The mercenaries just may have met their match in the fed-up, resourceful denizens of little Bacurau. ",Adventure
Pale Rider,"When property owner Coy LaHood (Richard Dysart) starts using a band of hooligans to terrorize a group of small-town gold miners into giving up their territory, an enigmatic man named ""Preacher"" (Clint Eastwood) arrives in town. Preacher fends off the attacks, and then goes directly to LaHood to negotiate. When the miners, led by Hull Barret (Michael Moriarty), refuse the terms, LaHood sends in Marshall Stockburn (John Russell) to take down Preacher and the others. ",Drama
Seven Brides for Seven Brothers,"During the 1850s, Milly (Jane Powell), a pretty young cook, marries Adam (Howard Keel), a grizzled woodsman, after a brief courtship. When the two return to Adam's farm, Milly is shocked to meet his six ill-mannered brothers, all of whom live in his cabin. She promptly begins teaching the brothers proper behavior, and most importantly, how to court a woman. But after the brothers kidnap six local girls during a town barn-raising, a group of indignant villagers tries to track them down. ",Comedy
Hostiles,"In 1892, legendary Army Capt. Joseph Blocker reluctantly agrees to escort a dying Cheyenne war chief and his family back to their tribal land. Embarking on a harrowing and perilous journey from Fort Berringer, N.M., to the grasslands of Montana, they soon encounter a young widow whose family was killed on the plains. The travelers must now band together to survive a punishing landscape that's crawling with hostile Comanches and vicious outliers. ",Drama
El Topo,A black-clad gunfighter (Alejandro Jodorowsky) embarks on a symbolic quest in an Old West version of Sodom and Gomorrah. ,Drama
Bone Tomahawk,"In the Old West, a sheriff (Kurt Russell), his deputy (Richard Jenkins), a gunslinger (Matthew Fox),and a cowboy (Patrick Wilson) embark on a mission to rescue three people from a savage group of cave dwellers. ",Drama
The Dressmaker,"Accused of murder when she was a child, a dressmaker (Kate Winslet) returns to her small Australian town to seek revenge on the locals who did her wrong. ",Comedy
The Longest Ride,"Former bull-riding champion Luke (Scott Eastwood) and college student Sophia (Britt Robertson) are in love, but conflicting paths and ideals threaten to tear them apart: Luke hopes to make a comeback on the rodeo circuit, and Sophia is about to embark on her dream job in New York's art world. As the couple ponder their romantic future, they find inspiration in Ira (Alan Alda), an elderly man whose decades-long romance with his beloved wife withstood the test of time. ",Comedy
Brimstone,"Pop ""Brimstone"" Courteen (Walter Brennan) and his sons, Nick, Luke and Bud, run a ranch outside the town of Gunsight, and are none too happy about the recent arrival of homesteaders in the area. Determined to cut off the interlopers' supplies, the Courteens rob incoming stagecoaches and even the local bank. But things change when a U.S. marshal (Rod Cameron) arrives in town to investigate, and Bud falls in love with one of the hated homesteaders. ",Drama
Two Mules for Sister Sara,"When gunslinger Hogan (Clint Eastwood) discovers a group of men attempting to rape a young nun, Sara (Shirley MacLaine), he shoots them dead and rescues the woman. The two escape to a nearby camp of Mexican revolutionaries, who have hired Hogan to help fight the invading French army. En route, Sara turns out to be surprisingly crude for a nun, drinking, smoking and using curse words. When she also proves to be handy with a gun, Hogan begins wondering if she is telling him the whole truth. ",Adventure
Ravenous,"Upon receiving reports of missing persons at Fort Spencer, a remote Army outpost on the Western frontier, Capt. John Boyd (Guy Pearce) investigates. After arriving at his new post, Boyd and his regiment aid a wounded frontiersman, F.W. Colghoun (Robert Carlyle), who recounts a horrifying tale of a wagon train murdered by its supposed guide -- a vicious U.S. Army colonel gone rogue. Fearing the worst, the regiment heads out into the wilderness to verify Colghoun's gruesome claims. ",Adventure
The Power of the Dog,"Severe, pale-eyed, handsome, Phil Burbank is brutally beguiling. All of Phil's romance, power and fragility is trapped in the past and in the land: He can castrate a bull calf with two swift slashes of his knife; he swims naked in the river, smearing his body with mud. He is a cowboy as raw as his hides. The year is 1925. The Burbank brothers are wealthy ranchers in Montana. At the Red Mill restaurant on their way to market, the brothers meet Rose, the widowed proprietress, and her impressionable son Peter. Phil behaves so cruelly he drives them both to tears, reveling in their hurt and rousing his fellow cowhands to laughter -- all except his brother George, who comforts Rose then returns to marry her. As Phil swings between fury and cunning, his taunting of Rose takes an eerie form -- he hovers at the edges of her vision, whistling a tune she can no longer play. His mockery of her son is more overt, amplified by the cheering of Phil's cowhand disciples. Then Phil appears to take the boy under his wing. Is this latest gesture a softening that leaves Phil exposed, or a plot twisting further into menace? ",Drama
City Slickers,"Every year, three friends take a vacation away from their wives. This year, henpecked Phil (Daniel Stern), newly married Ed (Bruno Kirby), and Mitch (Billy Crystal) -- terrified of his midlife crisis -- decide to reignite their masculinity by taking a supervised cattle drive across the Southwest. Under the supervision of gruff cowboy Curly (Jack Palance), the men set out on a journey that turns unexpectedly dangerous. The three men bond along the way to conquering their fear of aging. ",Comedy
The Homesman,A frontier farm woman (Hilary Swank) saves the life of a claim-jumper (Tommy Lee Jones) and persuades him to help her escort three insane women to a safe haven in Iowa. ,Drama
Australia,"With the globe on the brink of World War II, Lady Sarah Ashley (Nicole Kidman) travels from Britain to Australia to inspect a cattle ranch she inherited. Reluctantly joining forces with a rugged local known as the Drover (Hugh Jackman), she sets out on a cattle drive across hundreds of miles of harsh terrain to save her ranch. But when they finally reach the town of Darwin, they must contend with the same Japanese bombers that just rained death upon Pearl Harbor. ",Adventure
Far and Away,"Joseph (Tom Cruise) and his landlord's daughter, Shannon (Nicole Kidman), travel from Ireland to America in hopes of claiming free land in Oklahoma. The pair get sidetracked in Boston, where Joseph takes up boxing to support himself. When he loses a pivotal fight, the two are left penniless. Now faced with poverty, the two must find new ways to scrape by. As their affection for each other grows, Joseph questions whether he is truly what Shannon needs in her life. ",Adventure
The Missing,"In parallel stories, a woman searches for her grandson and a teen searches for his grandfather. ",Adventure
A Million Ways to Die in the West,"Mild-mannered sheep farmer Albert Stark (Seth MacFarlane) feels certain that the Western frontier is trying to kill him, then he loses his girlfriend, Louise (Amanda Seyfried), to the town's most successful businessman. However, a beautiful, pistol-packing woman named Anna (Charlize Theron) rides into town and helps Albert find his inner courage. Then Stark must put his newfound bravery to the test when Anna's outlaw husband arrives with plans to plant him in an unmarked grave. ",Comedy
Cry Macho,"From Warner Bros. Pictures comes director/producer Clint Eastwood's uplifting and poignant drama ""Cry Macho."" The film stars Eastwood as Mike Milo, a one-time rodeo star and washed-up horse breeder who, in 1979, takes a job from an ex-boss to bring the man's young son home from Mexico. Forced to take the backroads on their way to Texas, the unlikely pair faces an unexpectedly challenging journey, during which the world-weary horseman finds unexpected connections and his own sense of redemption. ",Drama
Wild Wild West,"When President Ulysses S. Grant (Kevin Kline) learns that diabolical inventor Dr. Arliss Loveless (Kenneth Branagh) is planning to assassinate him, he orders Civil War hero James West (Will Smith) and U.S. Marshal Artemus Gordon (also Kline) to arrest him. West's trigger-happy personality doesn't always mesh well with that of the thoughtful Gordon, but they manage to work together. And with the help of a mysterious stranger (Salma Hayek), West and Gordon close in on Loveless. ",Action
The Ridiculous 6,"White Knife, an orphan raised by Native Americans, discovers that five outlaws are actually his half-brothers. Together, they set out to save their wayward father. ",Action
Jonah Hex,"Having cheated death, gunslinger and bounty hunter Jonah Hex (Josh Brolin) has one foot in the natural world and one in the supernatural. His unusual nature gives him the ability to track down anyone or anything, so the Army makes him an irresistible offer: It will erase the warrants on his head if he will find Quentin Turnbull (John Malkovich). Turnbull, his oldest enemy, is preparing to unleash hell on Earth and will stop at nothing to kill him. ",Action
The Godfather,"Widely regarded as one of the greatest films of all time, this mob drama, based on Mario Puzo's novel of the same name, focuses on the powerful Italian-American crime family of Don Vito Corleone (Marlon Brando). When the don's youngest son, Michael (Al Pacino), reluctantly joins the Mafia, he becomes involved in the inevitable cycle of violence and betrayal. Although Michael tries to maintain a normal relationship with his wife, Kay (Diane Keaton), he is drawn deeper into the family business. ",Crime
Jai Bhim,"A pregnant woman from a primitive tribal community, searches desperately for her husband, who is missing from police custody. A High Court advocate rises in support to find her husband and seek justice for them. ",Crime
Pulp Fiction,"Vincent Vega (John Travolta) and Jules Winnfield (Samuel L. Jackson) are hitmen with a penchant for philosophical discussions. In this ultra-hip, multi-strand crime movie, their storyline is interwoven with those of their boss, gangster Marsellus Wallace (Ving Rhames) ; his actress wife, Mia (Uma Thurman) ; struggling boxer Butch Coolidge (Bruce Willis) ; master fixer Winston Wolfe (Harvey Keitel) and a nervous pair of armed robbers, ""Pumpkin"" (Tim Roth) and ""Honey Bunny"" (Amanda Plummer). ",Crime
The Green Mile,"Paul Edgecomb (Tom Hanks) walked the mile with a variety of cons. He had never encountered someone like John Coffey (Michael Clarke Duncan), a massive black man convicted of brutally killing a pair of young sisters. Coffey had the size and strength to kill anyone, but not the demeanor. Beyond his simple, naive nature and a deathly fear of the dark, Coffey seemed to possess a prodigious, supernatural gift. Paul began to question whether Coffey was truly guilty of murdering the two girls. ",Crime
The Silence of the Lambs,"Jodie Foster stars as Clarice Starling, a top student at the FBI's training academy. Jack Crawford (Scott Glenn) wants Clarice to interview Dr. Hannibal Lecter (Anthony Hopkins), a brilliant psychiatrist who is also a violent psychopath, serving life behind bars for various acts of murder and cannibalism. Crawford believes that Lecter may have insight into a case and that Starling, as an attractive young woman, may be just the bait to draw him out. ",Crime
The Departed,"South Boston cop Billy Costigan (Leonardo DiCaprio) goes under cover to infiltrate the organization of gangland chief Frank Costello (Jack Nicholson). As Billy gains the mobster's trust, a career criminal named Colin Sullivan (Matt Damon) infiltrates the police department and reports on its activities to his syndicate bosses. When both organizations learn they have a mole in their midst, Billy and Colin must figure out each other's identities to save their own lives. ",Crime
American History X,"Living a life marked by violence and racism, neo-Nazi Derek Vinyard (Edward Norton) finally goes to prison after killing two black youths who tried to steal his car. Upon his release, Derek vows to change his ways; he hopes to prevent his younger brother, Danny (Edward Furlong), who idolizes Derek, from following in his footsteps. As he struggles with his own deeply ingrained prejudices and watches their mother grow sicker, Derek wonders if his family can overcome a lifetime of hate. ",Crime
Joker,A drama directed by Yuri Kuzmenko featuring Valeriy Storozhik and Vyacheslav Molokov. ,Crime
Drishyam 2,A gripping tale of an investigation and a family that is threatened by it. ,Crime
Witness for the Prosecution,"The affable Leonard Vole (Tyrone Power) is being tried for the murder of a wealthy woman, and legendary lawyer Sir Wilfrid Robarts (Charles Laughton) has chosen to represent him. Unfortunately, Leonard's alibi depends on the testimony of his callous wife, Christine (Marlene Dietrich) -- who, after the discovery of a legal loophole, makes the shocking decision to appear in court against him. To Sir Wilfrid's surprise, this is only the first in a series of puzzling revelations and reversals. ",Crime
Ratsasan,A rookie cop attempts to track down a serial killer who is murdering young school girls. ,Crime
Drishyam,A man tries to save his family from the dark side of the law after they commit an unexpected crime. ,Crime
Reservoir Dogs,"A group of thieves assemble to pull of the perfect diamond heist. It turns into a bloody ambush when one of the men turns out to be a police informer. As the group begins to question each other's guilt, the heightening tensions threaten to explode the situation before the police step in. ",Crime
Once Upon a Time in America,"In 1968, the elderly David ""Noodles"" Aaronson (Robert De Niro) returns to New York, where he had a career in the criminal underground in the '20s and '30s. Most of his old friends, like longtime partner Max (James Woods), are long gone, yet he feels his past is unresolved. Told in flashbacks, the film follows Noodles from a tough kid in a Jewish slum in New York's Lower East Side, through his rise to bootlegger and then Mafia boss -- a journey marked by violence, betrayal and remorse. ",Crime
Scarface,"After getting a green card in exchange for assassinating a Cuban government official, Tony Montana (Al Pacino) stakes a claim on the drug trade in Miami. Viciously murdering anyone who stands in his way, Tony eventually becomes the biggest drug lord in the state, controlling nearly all the cocaine that comes through Miami. But increased pressure from the police, wars with Colombian drug cartels and his own drug-fueled paranoia serve to fuel the flames of his eventual downfall. ",Crime
To Kill a Mockingbird,"Scout Finch (Mary Badham), 6,and her older brother, Jem (Phillip Alford), live in sleepy Maycomb, Ala., spending much of their time with their friend Dill (John Megna) and spying on their reclusive and mysterious neighbor, Boo Radley (Robert Duvall). When Atticus (Gregory Peck), their widowed father and a respected lawyer, defends a black man named Tom Robinson (Brock Peters) against fabricated rape charges, the trial and tangent events expose the children to evils of racism and stereotyping. ",Crime
Double Indemnity,"In this classic film noir, insurance salesman Walter Neff (Fred MacMurray) gets roped into a murderous scheme when he falls for the sensual Phyllis Dietrichson (Barbara Stanwyck), who is intent on killing her husband (Tom Powers) and living off the fraudulent accidental death claim. Prompted by the late Mr. Dietrichson's daughter, Lola (Jean Heather), insurance investigator Barton Keyes (Edward G. Robinson) looks into the case, and gradually begins to uncover the sinister truth. ",Crime
Andhadhun,A series of mysterious events changes the life of a blind pianist who must report a crime that he should technically know nothing about. ,Comedy
Drishyam,A man tries to save his family from the dark side of the law after they commit an unexpected crime. ,Crime
No Country for Old Men,"While out hunting, Llewelyn Moss (Josh Brolin) finds the grisly aftermath of a drug deal. Though he knows better, he cannot resist the cash left behind and takes it with him. The hunter becomes the hunted when a merciless killer named Chigurh (Javier Bardem) picks up his trail. Also looking for Moss is Sheriff Bell (Tommy Lee Jones), an aging lawman who reflects on a changing world and a dark secret of his own, as he tries to find and protect Moss. ",Crime
Snatch,"Illegal boxing promoter Turkish (Jason Statham) convinces gangster Brick Top (Alan Ford) to offer bets on bare-knuckle boxer Mickey (Brad Pitt) at his bookie business. When Mickey does not throw his first fight as agreed, an infuriated Brick Top demands another match. Meanwhile, gangster Frankie Four Fingers (Benicio del Toro) comes to place a bet for a friend with Brick Top's bookies, as multiple criminals converge on a stolen diamond that Frankie has come to London to sell. ",Comedy
Casino,A suave and sophisticated gambler's floating hotel and gambling ship is plagued by sabotage on its maiden voyage. ,Crime
Taxi Driver,"Suffering from insomnia, disturbed loner Travis Bickle (Robert De Niro) takes a job as a New York City cabbie, haunting the streets nightly, growing increasingly detached from reality as he dreams of cleaning up the filthy city. When Travis meets pretty campaign worker Betsy (Cybill Shepherd), he becomes obsessed with the idea of saving the world, first plotting to assassinate a presidential candidate, then directing his attentions toward rescuing 12-year-old prostitute Iris (Jodie Foster). ",Crime
Z,"Repression is the rule of the day in this film that skewers Greek governance of the 1960s. Z (Yves Montand), a leftist rabble rouser, is killed in what appears to be a traffic accident. But given the political climate, the death of such a prominent activist raises troubling questions. Though it's too late to save Z's life, a postmortem examination suggests that the ruling party was behind his death. As the facts leak out, those who tell the truth pay the price for their honesty. ",Crime
Dial M for Murder,"Ex-tennis pro Tony Wendice (Ray Milland) wants to have his wealthy wife, Margot (Grace Kelly), murdered so he can get his hands on her inheritance. When he discovers her affair with Mark Halliday (Robert Cummings), he comes up with the perfect plan to kill her. He blackmails an old acquaintance into carrying out the murder, but the carefully-orchestrated set-up goes awry, and Margot stays alive. Now Wendice must frantically scheme to outwit the police and avoid having his plot detected. ",Crime
Pink,A tormented artist has just three days left under house arrest when a friend stashes a backpack full of stolen drugs in his home. ,Crime
Talvar,Police investigate the mysterious murder of a teenage girl. ,Crime
The Grand Budapest Hotel,"In the 1930s, the Grand Budapest Hotel is a popular European ski resort, presided over by concierge Gustave H. (Ralph Fiennes). Zero, a junior lobby boy, becomes Gustave's friend and protege. Gustave prides himself on providing first-class service to the hotel's guests, including satisfying the sexual needs of the many elderly women who stay there. When one of Gustave's lovers dies mysteriously, Gustave finds himself the recipient of a priceless painting and the chief suspect in her murder. ",Adventure
Prisoners,"Krueger, a former infantry lieutenant who is imprisoned at Quai Dong on the South China Sea for refusing to fight, is told to use his Vietnamese language skills to question a Viet Cong suspect. ",Crime
Rang De Basanti,"After a group of friends graduate from Delhi University, they listlessly haunt their old campus, until a British filmmaker (Alice Patten) casts them in a film she's making about freedom fighters under British rule. Although the group is largely apolitical, the tragic death of a friend owing to local government corruption awakens their patriotism. Inspired by the freedom fighters they represent in the film, the friends collectively decide to avenge the killing. ",Comedy
The Big Lebowski,"Jeff Bridges plays Jeff Lebowski who insists on being called ""the Dude,"" a laid-back, easygoing burnout who happens to have the same name as a millionaire whose wife owes a lot of dangerous people a whole bunch of money -- resulting in the Dude having his rug soiled, sending him spiraling into the Los Angeles underworld. ",Comedy
Fargo,"""Fargo"" is a reality-based crime drama set in Minnesota in 1987. Jerry Lundegaard (William H. Macy) is a car salesman in Minneapolis who has gotten himself into debt and is so desperate for money that he hires two thugs (Steve Buscemi), (Peter Stormare) to kidnap his own wife. Jerry will collect the ransom from her wealthy father (Harve Presnell), paying the thugs a small portion and keeping the rest to satisfy his debts. The scheme collapses when the thugs shoot a state trooper. ",Crime
La haine,"When a young Arab is arrested and beaten unconscious by police, a riot erupts in the notoriously violent suburbs outside of Paris. Three of the victim's peers, Vinz (Vincent Cassel), Said (Said Taghmaoui) and Hubert (Hubert Koundé), wander aimlessly about their home turf in the aftermath of the violence as they try to come to grips with their outrage over the brutal incident. After one of the men finds a police officer's discarded weapon, their night seems poised to take a bleak turn. ",Crime
Paper Moon,"Real-life father and daughter Ryan and Tatum O'Neal team up as slick con-artists Moses Pray and Addie Loggins in 1930s Kansas. When ""Moze"" is unexpectedly saddled with getting the 9-year-old Addie to relatives in Missouri after the death of her mother, his attempt to dupe her out of her money backfires, and he's forced to take her on as a partner. Swindling their way through farm country, the pair is nearly done in by a burlesque dancer (Madeline Kahn) and an angry bootlegger. ",Comedy
Cool Hand Luke,"When petty criminal Luke Jackson (Paul Newman) is sentenced to two years in a Florida prison farm, he doesn't play by the rules of either the sadistic warden (Strother Martin) or the yard's resident heavy, Dragline (George Kennedy), who ends up admiring the new guy's unbreakable will. Luke's bravado, even in the face of repeated stints in the prison's dreaded solitary confinement cell, ""the box,"" make him a rebel hero to his fellow convicts and a thorn in the side of the prison officers. ",Crime
Du rififi chez les hommes,"Out of prison after a five-year stretch, jewel thief Tony (Jean Servais) turns down a quick job his friend Jo (Carl Mohner) offers him, until he discovers that his old girlfriend Mado (Marie Sabouret) has become the lover of local gangster Pierre Grutter (Marcel Lupovici) during Tony's absence. Expanding a minor smash-and-grab into a full-scale jewel heist, Tony and his crew appear to get away clean, but their actions after the job is completed threaten the lives of everyone involved. ",Crime
On the Waterfront,"Dockworker Terry Malloy (Marlon Brando) had been an up-and-coming boxer until powerful local mob boss Johnny Friendly (Lee J. Cobb) persuaded him to throw a fight. When a longshoreman is murdered before he can testify about Friendly's control of the Hoboken waterfront, Terry teams up with the dead man's sister Edie (Eva Marie Saint) and the streetwise priest Father Barry (Karl Malden) to testify himself, against the advice of Friendly's lawyer, Terry's older brother Charley (Rod Steiger). ",Crime
Contratiempo,"Carlos is father to little Erick, whose health is at risk. Saving him will require urgent and costly surgery. Diego is a successful stockbroker about to lose all of his investors' money. Their worlds collide. ",Crime
Slumdog Millionaire,"As 18-year-old Jamal Malik (Dev Patel) answers questions on the Indian version of ""Who Wants to Be a Millionaire,"" flashbacks show how he got there. Part of a stable of young thieves after their mother dies, Jamal and his brother, Salim, survive on the streets of Mumbai. Salim finds the life of crime agreeable, but Jamal scrapes by with small jobs until landing a spot on the game show. ",Crime
Sin City,"In this quartet of neo-noir tales, a mysterious salesman (Josh Hartnett) narrates a tragic story of co-dependency, while a musclebound vigilante (Mickey Rourke) tears his way through the criminal underworld in search of his lost love (Jaime King). In another part of the city, a grizzled cop (Bruce Willis) foils the ambitions of a child-killer (Nick Stahl), and an ex-prostitute (Brittany Murphy) evades her ex-pimp (Benicio del Toro) with the help of her new boyfriend, Dwight (Clive Owen). ",Crime
Dogville,"A barren soundstage is stylishly utilized to create a minimalist small-town setting in which a mysterious woman named Grace (Nicole Kidman) hides from the criminals who pursue her. The town is two-faced and offers to harbor Grace as long as she can make it worth their effort, so Grace works hard under the employ of various townspeople to win their favor. Tensions flare, however, and Grace's status as a helpless outsider provokes vicious contempt and abuse from the citizens of Dogville. ",Crime
Touch of Evil,"When a car bomb explodes on the American side of the U.S./Mexico border, Mexican drug enforcement agent Miguel Vargas (Charlton Heston) begins his investigation, along with American police captain Hank Quinlan (Orson Welles). When Vargas begins to suspect that Quinlan and his shady partner, Menzies (Joseph Calleia), are planting evidence to frame an innocent man, his investigations into their possible corruption quickly put himself and his new bride, Susie (Janet Leigh), in jeopardy. ",Crime
The Killing,A twisted and ultimately tragic love triangle plays out between two men and a woman. ,Crime
Kind Hearts and Coronets,"When his mother eloped with an Italian opera singer, Louis Mazzini (Dennis Price) was cut off from her aristocratic family. After the family refuses to let her be buried in the family mausoleum, Louis avenges his mother's death by attempting to murder every family member (all played by Alec Guinness) who stands between himself and the family fortune. But when he finds himself torn between his longtime love (Joan Greenwood) and the widow of one of his victims (Valerie Hobson), his plans go awry. ",Comedy
Out of the Past,"The quiet life of small-town gas station owner Jeff Bailey (Robert Mitchum) is interrupted when a figure from his shady past, small-time crook Joe Stephanos (Paul Valentine), recognizes him. Stephanos' boss, crooked gambler Whit Sterling (Kirk Douglas), had hired Jeff to track down Kathie Moffat (Jane Greer), a girlfriend who shot Whit and made off with $40,000 of his. Jeff and Kathie fell in love, but she left him to go back to Sterling, who now wants Jeff to settle a few old scores. ",Crime
The Maltese Falcon,"In this noir classic, detective Sam Spade (Humphrey Bogart) gets more than he bargained for when he takes a case brought to him by a beautiful but secretive woman (Mary Astor). As soon as Miss Wonderly shows up, trouble follows as Sam's partner is murdered and Sam is accosted by a man (Peter Lorre) demanding he locate a valuable statuette. Sam, entangled in a dangerous web of crime and intrigue, soon realizes he must find the one thing they all seem to want: the bejeweled Maltese falcon. ",Crime
Knives Out,"The circumstances surrounding the death of crime novelist Harlan Thrombey are mysterious, but there's one thing that renowned Detective Benoit Blanc knows for sure -- everyone in the wildly dysfunctional Thrombey family is a suspect. Now, Blanc must sift through a web of lies and red herrings to uncover the truth. ",Comedy
In Bruges,"After a particularly difficult job, hit men Ray (Colin Farrell) and Ken (Brendan Gleeson) head to Belgium to hide out until things cool down. Ray hates the medieval city they land in, but Ken finds its beauty and peacefulness enchanting. Their experiences become increasingly surreal and possibly life-changing as they encounter tourists, locals, an American dwarf and a potential romance for Ray. ",Comedy
Mystic River,"When the daughter (Emmy Rossum) of ex-con Jimmy Marcus (Sean Penn) is murdered, two of his childhood friends from the neighborhood are involved. Dave (Tim Robbins), a blue-collar worker, was the last person to see her alive, while Sean (Kevin Bacon), a homicide detective, is heading up the case. As Sean proceeds with his investigation, Jimmy conducts one of his own through neighborhood contacts. Eventually, Jimmy suspects Dave is the culprit and considers taking the law into his own hands. ",Crime
Nueve reinas,"""Nine Queens"" is the story of two small-time swindlers, Juan (Gastón Pauls) and Marcos (Ricardo Darín), who team up after meeting in a convenience store and become involved in a half million-dollar deal. As the deceptions and duplicity mount, it becomes more and more difficult to figure out who is conning whom, and we begin to ask ourselves, ""Who isn't a thief?"" ",Crime
Dancer in the Dark,"Selma is a Czech immigrant, a single mother working in a factory in rural America. Her salvation is passion for music, specifically, the all-singing, all-dancing numbers found in classic Hollywood musicals. Selma harbors a sad secret: she is losing her eyesight and her son Gene stands to suffer the same fate if she can't put away enough money to secure him an operation. When a desperate neighbor falsely accuses Selma of stealing his savings, the drama of her life escalates to a tragic finale. ",Crime
Once Were Warriors,"An unemployed Maori living in the Auckland slums, Jake Heke (Temuera Morrison) has a terrible temper that he takes out on family and strangers alike. His wife, Beth (Rena Owen), takes regular beatings after he's been at the pub, and his kids do what they can to sidestep trouble. Nig (Julian Arahanga), the eldest, is joining a street gang; Boogie (Taungaroa Emile) has been placed in a foster home; and Grace increasingly retreats to the pages of her journal. ",Crime
True Romance,"A comic-book nerd and Elvis fanatic Clarence (Christian Slater) and a prostitute named Alabama (Patricia Arquette) fall in love. Clarence breaks the news to her pimp and ends up killing him. He grabs a suitcase of cocaine on his way out thinking it is Alabama's clothing. The two hit the road for California hoping to sell the cocaine, but the mob is soon after them. ",Crime
Bound by Honor,"Prison, drugs and gang war touch three young men (Damian Chapa, Jesse Borrego, Benjamin Bratt) in East Los Angeles from the 1970s to the 1990s. ",Crime
Le cercle rouge,"When French criminal Corey (Alain Delon) gets released from prison, he resolves to never return. He is quickly pulled back into the underworld, however, after a chance encounter with escaped murderer Vogel (Gian Maria Volonte). Along with former policeman and current alcoholic Jansen (Yves Montand), they plot an intricate jewel heist. All the while, quirky Police Commissioner Mattei (Bourvil), who was the one to lose custody of Vogel, is determined to find him. ",Crime
Strangers on a Train,"In Alfred Hitchcock's adaptation of Patricia Highsmith's thriller, tennis star Guy Haines (Farley Granger) is enraged by his trampy wife's refusal to finalize their divorce so he can wed senator's daughter Anne (Ruth Roman). He strikes up a conversation with a stranger, Bruno Anthony (Robert Walker), and unwittingly sets in motion a deadly chain of events. Psychopathic Bruno kills Guy's wife, then urges Guy to reciprocate by killing Bruno's father. Meanwhile, Guy is murder suspect number one. ",Crime
Rope,"Just before hosting a dinner party, Philip Morgan (Farley Granger) and Brandon Shaw (John Dall) strangle a mutual friend to death with a piece of rope, purely as a Nietzsche-inspired philosophical exercise. Hiding the body in a chest upon which they then arrange a buffet dinner, the pair welcome their guests, including the victim's oblivious fiancée (Joan Chandler) and the college professor (James Stewart) whose lectures inadvertently inspired the killing. ",Crime
Mildred Pierce,"When Mildred Pierce's (Joan Crawford) wealthy husband leaves her for another woman, Mildred decides to raise her two daughters on her own. Despite Mildred's financial successes in the restaurant business, her oldest daughter, Veda (Ann Blyth), resents her mother for degrading their social status. In the midst of a police investigation after the death of her second husband (Zachary Scott), Mildred must evaluate her own freedom and her complicated relationship with her daughter. ",Crime
Arsenic and Old Lace,"Writer and notorious marriage detractor Mortimer Brewster (Cary Grant) falls for girl-next-door Elaine Harper (Priscilla Lane), and they tie the knot on Halloween. When the newlyweds return to their respective family homes to deliver the news, Brewster finds a corpse hidden in a window seat. With his eccentric aunts (Josephine Hull, Jean Adair), disturbed uncle (John Alexander), and homicidal brother (Raymond Massey), he starts to realize that his family is even crazier than he thought. ",Comedy
Badla,"A young married entrepreneur finds herself in a locked hotel room next to the body of her dead lover. Hoping to find answers, she hires a prestigious lawyer to help her solve the mystery of what really happened. ",Crime
Nightcrawler,"Los Angeles denizen Louis Bloom (Jake Gyllenhaal) survives by scavenging and petty theft. He stumbles into a new career as a cameraman and -- armed with a camcorder and police scanner -- begins nocturnal forays across the city in search of shocking and grisly crimes. When he catches the eye of a shopworn news director (Rene Russo) who welcomes the chance to raise her station's ratings, Louis goes to increasingly greater lengths to catch the ""money shot."" ",Crime
La migliore offerta,"Virgil Oldman (Geoffrey Rush), the director of an esteemed auction house, falls in love with a reclusive young heiress. After he shows her his priceless collection of portraits, she soon disappears with all of his paintings. ",Crime
The Girl with the Dragon Tattoo,"Disgraced financial reporter Mikael Blomkvist (Daniel Craig) finds a chance to redeem his honor after being hired by wealthy Swedish industrialist Henrik Vanger (Christopher Plummer) to solve the 40-year-old murder of Vanger's niece, Harriet. Vanger believes that Harriet was killed by a member of his own family. Eventually joining Blomkvist on his dangerous quest for the truth is Lisbeth Salander (Rooney Mara), an unusual but ingenious investigator whose fragile trust is not easily won. ",Crime
Madeo,"A widow (Kim Hye-ja) resides with her mentally challenged son (Won-bin) in a small South Korean town, where she scrapes out a living selling medicinal herbs. Mother and son are plunged into a nightmare when the body of a murdered young girl is discovered. Circumstantial evidence indicates the son's involvement, and he becomes the prime suspect during the sloppy police investigation. Betrayed by the legal system, the mother takes the law into her own hands to clear her son's name. ",Crime
Crash,The exhausted mother of a newborn and a man seen leaving the scene of an accident hurdle headlong into a confrontation. ,Crime
Boyz n the Hood,"Tre (Cuba Gooding Jr.) is sent to live with his father, Furious Styles (Larry Fishburne), in tough South Central Los Angeles. Although his hard-nosed father instills proper values and respect in him, and his devout girlfriend Brandi (Nia Long) teaches him about faith, Tre's friends Doughboy (Ice Cube) and Ricky (Morris Chestnut) don't have the same kind of support and are drawn into the neighborhood's booming drug and gang culture, with increasingly tragic results. ",Crime
Mississippi Burning,"When a group of civil rights workers goes missing in a small Mississippi town, FBI agents Alan Ward (Willem Dafoe) and Rupert Anderson (Gene Hackman) are sent in to investigate. Local authorities refuse to cooperate with them, and the African American community is afraid to, precipitating a clash between the two agents over strategy. As the situation becomes more volatile, the direct approach is abandoned in favor of more aggressive, hard-line tactics. ",Crime
The Asphalt Jungle,"Recently released from prison, Dix Handley (Sterling Hayden) concocts a plan to steal $1 million in jewels. Dix gathers a team of small-time crooks, including a safecracker (Anthony Caruso) and a lawyer (Louis Calhern), and the heist is a success until a stray bullet kills one of the men. As they scramble to pick up the pieces after the theft, the men let their greed get the best of them while entangling themselves in webs of deceit, treachery and murder. ",Crime
Gaslight,"After the death of her famous opera-singing aunt, Paula (Ingrid Bergman) is sent to study in Italy to become a great opera singer as well. While there, she falls in love with the charming Gregory Anton (Charles Boyer). The two return to London, and Paula begins to notice strange goings-on: missing pictures, strange footsteps in the night and gaslights that dim without being touched. As she fights to retain her sanity, her new husband's intentions come into question. ",Crime
This Is England,"Shaun (Thomas Turgoose), who lost his father in the Falklands War, earns the respect of skinheads when he stand up to their teasing. He becomes part of the gang and enjoys hanging out with his new friends. Trouble starts with the return of Combo (Stephen Graham), a racist ex-convict. With the gang divided into two factions, Shaun sides with Combo and, unfortunately, finds in him a father figure. ",Crime
Zodiac,"In the late 1960s and 1970s, fear grips the city of San Francisco as a serial killer called Zodiac stalks its residents. Investigators (Mark Ruffalo, Anthony Edwards) and reporters (Jake Gyllenhaal, Robert Downey Jr.) become obsessed with learning the killer's identity and bringing him to justice. Meanwhile, Zodiac claims victim after victim and taunts the authorities with cryptic messages, cyphers and menacing phone calls. ",Crime
Lucky Number Slevin,"A case of mistaken identity puts a man named Slevin (Josh Hartnett) in the middle of a war between two rival New York crime lords: The Rabbi (Ben Kingsley) and the Boss (Morgan Freeman). While under the watchful eyes of Detective Brikowski (Stanley Tucci) and well-known assassin Goodkat (Bruce Willis), Slevin must quickly devise a plan to save his skin before his luck runs out. ",Crime
Road to Perdition,"Mike Sullivan (Tom Hanks) is an enforcer for powerful Depression-era Midwestern mobster John Rooney (Paul Newman). Rooney's son, Connor (Daniel Craig), is jealous of the close bond they share, and when Mike's eldest son, Michael (Tyler Hoechlin), witnesses a hit, Connor uses the incident as an excuse to murder Sullivan's wife (Jennifer Jason Leigh) and youngest son. Forced to flee, Sullivan and Michael set out on a journey of revenge and self-discovery. ",Crime
Glengarry Glen Ross,"When an office full of New York City real estate salesmen is given the news that all but the top two will be fired at the end of the week, the atmosphere begins to heat up. Shelley Levene (Jack Lemmon), who has a sick daughter, does everything in his power to get better leads from his boss, John Williamson (Kevin Spacey), but to no avail. When his coworker Dave Moss (Ed Harris) comes up with a plan to steal the leads, things get complicated for the tough-talking salesmen. ",Crime
Down by Law,"A disc jockey (Tom Waits), a pimp (John Lurie) and an Italian tourist (Roberto Benigni) escape from jail in New Orleans. ",Comedy
Blue Velvet,"College student Jeffrey Beaumont (Kyle MacLachlan) returns home after his father has a stroke. When he discovers a severed ear in an abandoned field, Beaumont teams up with detective's daughter Sandy Williams (Laura Dern) to solve the mystery. They believe beautiful lounge singer Dorothy Vallens (Isabella Rossellini) may be connected with the case, and Beaumont finds himself becoming drawn into her dark, twisted world, where he encounters sexually depraved psychopath Frank Booth (Dennis Hopper). ",Crime
Victoria,A man leaves his tumultuous life in L.A. behind to begin life anew in a half-completed and partially abandoned settlement in the Mojave Desert. ,Crime
Highway,Two friends hit the road for Seattle to attend a vigil for singer Kurt Cobain and escape the wrath of an angry mobster. ,Crime
Leviafan,A Russian fisherman (Alexey Serebryakov) fights back when a corrupt mayor tries to seize possession of his ancestral home. ,Crime
Eastern Promises,"Nikolai (Viggo Mortensen), who is both ruthless and mysterious, has ties to one of the most dangerous crime families in London. He crosses paths with Anna (Naomi Watts), a midwife who has come across potentially damaging evidence against the family, which forces him to set in motion a plan of deceit, death and retribution. ",Crime
Inside Man,"A tough detective (Denzel Washington) matches wits with a cunning bank robber (Clive Owen), as a tense hostage crisis is unfolding. Into the volatile situation comes a woman named Madaline (Jodie Foster), a mysterious power broker who has a hidden agenda and threatens to push a tense situation past the breaking point. ",Crime
Gone Baby Gone,"Along with his girlfriend (Michelle Monaghan), a private detective (Casey Affleck) takes on the difficult task of searching for a kidnapped girl in Boston. During his investigation, he must deal with the girl's aunt, a disapproving lawman (Morgan Freeman) and a drug dealer. ",Crime
Lord of War,"The 20-year arms dealing career of Queens, N.Y., outcast Yuri Orlov (Nicolas Cage) serves as a window onto the end of the Cold War and the emergence of worldwide terrorism. He finds himself reassuring his more ethically challenged younger brother, Vitaly (Jared Leto), while adeptly sidestepping the pursuit of federal agent Jack Lawrence (Ethan Hawke). The globetrotting arms dealer also pursues the woman of his dreams, supermodel Ava Fontaine (Bridget Moynahan). ",Crime
Vera Drake,"In 1950s England, housekeeper Vera Drake (Imelda Staunton) is a kindly wife and mother who offers selfless devotion and unwavering care to her family, which includes her husband (Philip Davis) and two grown children (Alex Kelly, Daniel Mays). However, unknown to her friends and family, Drake provides abortions to local women with unwanted pregnancies. When the authorities learn of her illegal activities, Drake loses the admiration of many around her -- and possibly her freedom. ",Crime
Kontroll,"Bulcsú (Sándor Csányi) is a subway enforcement officer working in the oppressively gray underground transit system in Hungary, whose job consists of ensuring commuters have paid to ride the train. A quirky young woman (Eszter Balla) catches his eye, and their relationship suggests that Bulcsú might escape from the drudgery of his subterranean life and finally see sunlight again. But first he needs to find out why passengers are jumping -- or being pushed -- to their deaths onto the tracks. ",Comedy
21 Grams,"In a film that plays with the idea of straightforward storytelling, a group of troubled people find that they are linked in unpredictable ways. Paul Rivers (Sean Penn) is an academic dealing with a terminal heart condition, but his life is changed by a car crash that seems unrelated to his ailment. The traffic accident, involving ex-con Jack Jordan (Benicio del Toro) and the husband of Cristina Peck (Naomi Watts), is one that ruins lives but ultimately also resurrects them. ",Crime
American Psycho,"In New York City in 1987, a handsome, young urban professional, Patrick Bateman (Christian Bale), lives a second life as a gruesome serial killer by night. The cast is filled by the detective (Willem Dafoe), the fiance (Reese Witherspoon), the mistress (Samantha Mathis), the coworker (Jared Leto), and the secretary (Chloë Sevigny). This is a biting, wry comedy examining the elements that make a man a monster. ",Crime
Baazigar,"A man keen on getting his daughters married to two brothers, who happen to be sworn to bachelorhood, comes up with a unique plan. Confusion arises when four brides turn up dressed alike at the venue. ",Crime
My Cousin Vinny,"New York lawyer Vinny has never won a case. When his teenage cousin Bill and his friend Stan are accused of murder in a backwater Alabama town, it's up to the nervous Vinny to save him from jail, even though he's only ever tried personal injury cases before, and none of them successfully. ",Comedy
Delicatessen,"Clapet (Jean-Claude Dreyfus) is a butcher who owns a run-down apartment building in post-apocalyptic France. The building is in constant need of a handyman, because Clapet routinely butchers them and sells them as food. The latest in the long ling of disposable workers is Louison (Dominique Pinon), a former circus clown desperate for work and lodging. But this time Clapet's plan hits a snag when his young daughter (Marie-Laure Dougnac) falls head over heels for the lovable Louison. ",Comedy
After Hours,New York City nightlife in 2017 brings a tempestuous mix of love and lust as multiple characters navigate their way through the city with their own flair. ,Comedy
Blood Simple,"""Blood Simple"" was the first feature film from Joel and Ethan Coen. This is the newly restored and re-edited director's cut of the film, introduced by Mortimer Young. The stylish crime thriller premiered at film festivals in 1984. ""Blood Simple"" begins deep in the heart of Texas, where a jealous saloon owner hires a cheap divorce detective to kill the saloon owner's younger wife and her bartender lover. But the detective gets a better idea: he follows the two lovers, and... ",Crime
The Long Goodbye,"An immigrant family in Britain is preparing its home for a wedding celebration, until a right-wing march spirals out of control and chaos erupts. ",Comedy
West Side Story,"A musical in which a modern day Romeo and Juliet are involved in New York street gangs. On the harsh streets of the upper west side, two gangs battle for control of the turf. The situation becomes complicated when a gang members falls in love with a rival's sister. ",Crime
Promising Young Woman,"Nothing in Cassie's life is what it appears to be -- she's wickedly smart, tantalizingly cunning, and she's living a secret double life by night. Now, an unexpected encounter is about to give Cassie a chance to right the wrongs from the past. ",Crime
Sin nombre,"Claudia (Emma Vilarasau) and Marc (Brendan Price) are horrified and heartbroken when their young daughter's body is found mutilated. Several years later, Claudia gets a call from a young woman who could be her child. Claudia then launches an investigation involving a detective, Massera (Karra Elejalde), and a reporter, Quiroga (Tristán Ulloa). Their target -- a satanic cult, which may be holding and torturing the girl, and whose members could subject all involved in the case to dire fates. ",Adventure
The Town,"Doug MacRay (Ben Affleck) leads a band of ruthless bank robbers and has no real attachments except for James (Jeremy Renner), who -- despite his dangerous temper -- is like a brother. Everything changes for Doug when James briefly takes a hostage, bank employee Claire Keesey. Learning that she lives in the gang's neighborhood, Doug seeks her out to discover what she knows, and he falls in love. As the romance deepens, he wants out of his criminal life, but that could threaten Claire. ",Crime
Perfume: The Story of a Murderer,"With his incredible talent for discerning scents, Jean-Baptiste Grenouille (Ben Whishaw) is one of 18th-century France's finest perfumers. He becomes obsessed with capturing an elusive aroma: the scent of young womanhood. His search takes a deadly turn, and when the bodies of 12 young females are found, panic breaks out, with families rushing to lock up their daughters. ",Crime
Kiss Kiss Bang Bang,"Two-bit crook Harry Lockhart (Robert Downey Jr.) stumbles into an audition for a mystery film while on the run from the cops. Winning the part, he lands in Hollywood, where he's flung into a tangled, murderous conspiracy with his childhood sweetheart, Harmony Lane (Michelle Monaghan), and hard-boiled private eye Perry van Shrike (Val Kilmer). This deadpan, affectionate parody of film noir tropes is named for film critic Pauline Kael's influential 1968 collection of film reviews and essays. ",Comedy
House of Sand and Fog,"Reformed drug addict Kathy Nicolo (Jennifer Connelly) has her California coast house, which she inherited from her father, taken away by the county due to a misunderstanding about back taxes. The place is bought by Iranian immigrant Massoud Amir Behrani (Ben Kingsley), who intends to fix it up and sell it in order to provide a better life for his wife (Shohreh Aghdashloo) and son (Jonathan Ahdout). However, Kathy, desperate to get the house back, begins harassing Behrani so he will return it. ",Crime
The Life of David Gale,"David Gale (Kevin Spacey) is a man who has tried hard to live by his principles but in a bizarre twist of fate, this devoted father, popular professor and respected death penalty opponent finds himself on Death Row for the rape and murder of fellow activist Constance Hallaway (Laura Linney). With only three days before his scheduled execution, Gale agrees to give reporter Bitsey Bloom (Kate Winslet) the exclusive interview she's been chasing. ",Crime
Gangs of New York,"Amsterdam Vallon (Leonardo DiCaprio) is a young Irish immigrant released from prison. He returns to the Five Points seeking revenge against his father's killer, William Cutting (Daniel Day-Lewis), a powerful anti-immigrant gang leader. He knows that revenge can only be attained by infiltrating Cutting's inner circle. Amsterdam's journey becomes a fight for personal survival and to find a place for the Irish people in 1860's New York. ",Crime
Ghost Dog: The Way of the Samurai,"Ghost Dog (Forest Whitaker) is a contract killer, a master of his trade who can whirl a gun at warp speed and moves through this world like a phantom -- stealthy and evanescent. In the spirit of the samurai, he has pledged his loyalty to a small time mobster named Louie (John Tormey) who saved his life many years before. ",Crime
Following,"Lacking prospects, a writer (Jeremy Theobald) begins tailing strangers, until he encounters a voyeuristic thief (Alex Haw). ",Crime
Jackie Brown,"When flight attendant Jackie Brown (Pam Grier) is busted smuggling money for her arms dealer boss, Ordell Robbie (Samuel L. Jackson), agent Ray Nicolette (Michael Keaton) and detective Mark Dargus (Michael Bowen) want her help to bring down Robbie. Facing jail time for her silence or death for her cooperation, Brown decides instead to double-cross both parties and make off with the smuggled money. Meanwhile, she enlists the help of bondsman Max Cherry (Robert Forster), a man who loves her. ",Crime
Dead Man Walking,A contaminated man (Wings Hauser) is hired to rescue a big shot's kidnapped daughter (Pamela Ludwig) in the post-plague future. ,Crime
A Perfect World,"Butch (Kevin Costner), a escaped state prisoner from a Texas jail, kidnaps Philip (T.J. Lowther), a young, impressionable boy. As they embark on a trip across the American Southwest together, a surprising bond grows between the convict and his captive, even as law enforcement forces slowly catch up with them. An honorable Texas Ranger, Red Garnett (Clint Eastwood), understands Butch has a heart of gold, but must pursue him anyway out of duty to the law and a desire to protect the child. ",Crime
Menace II Society,"After growing up in the gang lifestyle of the Los Angeles projects, 18-year-old Caine Lawson (Tyrin Turner) wants a way out. Everyone around him, including his unpredictable friend O-Dog (Larenz Tate), is trapped in their lives of crime and violence. With the help of his caring teacher (Charles Dutton) and supportive girlfriend (Jada Pinkett), Caine plans to leave the city for good. But in a series of tragic events, Caine realizes that escape will not be easy. ",Crime
The Player,Filmmaker John Appel explores the causes of his father's destructive gambling mania. ,Comedy
Mystery Train,Passengers become trapped on a runaway Pullman car. ,Comedy
A Fish Called Wanda,"British gangster George Thomason (Tom Georgeson) and his hapless aide, Ken Pile (Michael Palin), draft a pair of arrogant Americans, grifter Wanda Gerschwitz (Jamie Lee Curtis) and weapons expert Otto West (Kevin Kline), for a massive diamond heist. When the job goes badly, Wanda attempts to seduce George's stuffy lawyer, Archie Leach (John Cleese), to find out where George hid the diamonds. Meanwhile, Ken repeatedly attempts to kill an elderly woman (Patricia Hayes) who witnessed the robbery. ",Comedy
How to Steal a Million,"Charles Bonnet (Hugh Griffith) expresses his passion for art by forging masterpieces -- and selling them at a hefty profit. The trouble starts when his reproduction of a prized sculpture winds up in a famous Paris museum. If experts determine that it is inauthentic, Bonnet's reputation will be tarnished. That's why his fetching daughter, Nicole (Audrey Hepburn), hires cat burglar Simon Dermott (Peter O'Toole) to steal the sculpture back before it's too late. ",Comedy
Pierrot le fou,"Uninterested in his wife (Raymond Devos), Ferdinand Griffon (Jean-Paul Belmondo) wearies of his stagnant life. But when the couple hires an enigmatic baby-sitter, Marianne Renoir (Anna Karina), Ferdinand falls head over heels in love with her and abandons his family. He soon discovers, however, that his mistress is not who she seems. Pursued by foreign thugs, Ferdinand and Marianne steal a car and embark on a crime spree through the French countryside all the way to the Mediterranean. ",Crime
The Lady from Shanghai,"A seaman becomes involved in a complex murder plot when he is hired to work on a yacht. He soon finds himself implicated in the murder, despite his innocence. The film is best remembered for it's climax ""hall of mirrors"" scene with a shoot out amidst shards of shattering glass. ",Crime
Blindspotting,"Collin must make it through his final three days of probation for a chance at a new beginning in his Oakland, Calif., neighborhood. His bond with his volatile best friend soon gets tested when Collin sees a police officer shoot a suspect in the back during a chase through the streets. Things soon come to a head when the buddies attend a party at the upscale home of a young and wealthy tech entrepreneur. ",Comedy
Uncut Gems,"A charismatic jeweler makes a high-stakes bet that could lead to the windfall of a lifetime. In a precarious high-wire act, he must balance business, family and adversaries on all sides in pursuit of the ultimate win. ",Crime
The Hate U Give,"Starr Carter is constantly switching between two worlds -- the poor, mostly black neighborhood where she lives and the wealthy, mostly white prep school that she attends. The uneasy balance between these worlds is soon shattered when she witnesses the fatal shooting of her childhood best friend at the hands of a police officer. Facing pressure from all sides of the community, Starr must find her voice and decide to stand up for what's right. ",Crime
The Judge,Holocaust survivor and former Israeli Supreme Court Justice Aaron Barak dealt with many issues affecting Israeli life. ,Crime
Av Mevsimi,Three policeman's lives are turned upside down during a murder investigation. ,Crime
Notes on a Scandal,"Barbara Covett (Judi Dench), a veteran teacher at St. George's, senses a kindred spirit in Sheba Hart (Cate Blanchett), the school's new art teacher. The younger woman's charisma intensely draws in the older, and the two become friends. Then Barbara learns of Sheba's affair with a teenage student and becomes the keeper of the explosive secret. ",Crime
Maria Full of Grace,"Seventeen-year-old Colombian Maria (Catalina Sandino Moreno) is desperate: pregnant and with a large family to care for, she's forced to leave a demanding job after an altercation with her boss. Needing work as soon as possible, she encounters charming Franklin (John Álex Toro), who offers her a dangerous job as a drug mule. With cocaine pellets in her stomach, Maria flies to New York for the drug drop-off, but finds her new line of work may be far riskier than it initially seemed. ",Crime
Hooligans,A gangster (Andy Curtis) lands in trouble when he tries to take over a pub and double-crosses a crime boss (Brendan Dempsey). ,Crime
In the Bedroom,"Summertime on the coast of Maine, ""In the Bedroom"" centers on the inner dynamics of a family in transition. Matt Fowler (Tom Wilkinson) is a doctor practicing in his native Maine and is married to New York born Ruth Fowler (Sissy Spacek), a music teacher. He is involved in a love affair with a local single mother (Marisa Tomei). As the beauty of Maine's brief and fleeting summer comes to an end, these characters find themselves in the midst of unimaginable tragedy. ",Crime
Frequency,"What if you had the chance to travel back in time and change just one event in your life? What would it be? For John Sullivan (Jim Caviezel), there is no question. He would undo the events of October 12, 1969, when the out-of-control Bruxton fire took the life of his father (Dennis Quaid), a heroic firefighter. Now John may get exactly what he wished for -- and much more than he bargained for. ",Crime
A Time to Kill,A policeman and journalist investigate the poisoning of a couple in which only the husband survives. ,Crime
Tesis,A Spanish film student (Ana Torrent) finds a videotape showing the torture and murder of a missing coed. ,Crime
Dolores Claiborne,"In a small New England town, Dolores Claiborne (Kathy Bates) works as a housekeeper for the rich but heartless Vera Donovan (Judy Parfitt). When Vera turns up dead, Dolores is accused of killing her elderly employer -- so her estranged daughter, Selena (Jennifer Jason Leigh), a well-respected New York City journalist, decides to visit her mother and investigate the matter for herself. As Selena digs deeper into the case, she uncovers shocking truths about the murder and her own childhood. ",Crime
Bullets Over Broadway,"Struggling 1920s playwright David Shayne (John Cusack), having failed to secure financing for his latest work, reluctantly makes a deal with mob boss Nick Valenti (Joe Viterelli) : a Broadway debut with the chance to direct, as long as Nick's flibbertigibbet girlfriend, Olive (Jennifer Tilly), plays one of the lead roles. As Olive and star Helen Sinclair (Dianne Wiest) attempt to upstage each other, Olive's gangland bodyguard Cheech (Chazz Palminteri) starts suggesting changes to David's script. ",Comedy
Dirty Rotten Scoundrels,"Con artist Lawrence Jamieson (Michael Caine) is a longtime resident of a luxurious coastal resort, where he enjoys the fruits of his deceptions -- that is, until a competitor, Freddy Benson (Steve Martin), shows up. When the new guy's lowbrow tactics impinge on his own work, Jamieson resolves to get rid of him. Confident of his own duplicitous talents, Jamieson challenges Benson to a winner-takes-all competition: whoever swindles their latest mark first can stay, while the other must leave town. ",Comedy
Blow Out,"While recording sound effects for a slasher flick, Jack Terri (John Travolta) stumbles upon a real-life horror: a car careening off a bridge and into a river. Jack jumps into the water and fishes out Sally (Nancy Allen) from the car, but the other passenger is already dead -- a governor intending to run for president. As Jack does some investigating of his tapes, and starts a perilous romance with Sally, he enters a tangled web of conspiracy that might leave him dead. ",Crime
Marathon Man,"Thomas ""Babe"" Levy (Dustin Hoffman) is a Columbia graduate student and long-distance runner who is oblivious to the fact that his older brother, Doc (Roy Scheider), is a government agent chasing down a Nazi war criminal (Laurence Olivier) -- that is, until Doc is murdered and Babe finds himself knee-deep in a tangle of stolen gems and sadistic madmen. Even his girlfriend, Elsa (Marthe Keller), becomes a suspect as everything Babe believed to be true is suddenly turned upside down. ",Crime
Three Days of the Condor,"On a seemingly ordinary day, Joe Turner (Robert Redford), a quiet CIA codebreaker, walks into his workplace and finds that all of his coworkers have been murdered. Horrified, Joe flees the scene and tries to tell his supervisors about the tragedy. Unfortunately, he soon learns that CIA higher-ups were involved in the murders. With no one to trust, and a merciless hit man (Max von Sydow) close on his tail, Joe must somehow survive long enough to figure out why his own agency wants him dead. ",Crime
Straw Dogs,"David Sumner (Dustin Hoffman), a mild-mannered academic from the United States, marries Amy (Susan George), an Englishwoman. In order to escape a hectic stateside lifestyle, David and his wife relocate to the small town in rural Cornwall where Amy was raised. There, David is ostracized by the brutish men of the village, including Amy's old flame, Charlie (Del Henney). Eventually the taunts escalate, and two of the locals rape Amy. This sexual assault awakes a shockingly violent side of David. ",Crime
Good Time,"A bank robber stops at nothing to free his brother from prison, launching himself into a nightlong odyssey through New York's dark and dangerous criminal underworld. ",Crime
Shot Caller,"Recently released from prison, a gang member finds himself forced by his leaders to orchestrate a major crime with a rival gang. ",Crime
Cruella,"Academy Award (R) winner Emma Stone (""La La Land"") stars in Disney's ""Cruella,"" an all-new live-action feature film about the rebellious early days of one of cinemas most notorious - and notoriously fashionable - villains, the legendary Cruella de Vil. ""Cruella,"" which is set in 1970s London amidst the punk rock revolution, follows a young grifter named Estella, a clever and creative girl determined to make a name for herself with her designs. She befriends a pair of young thieves who appreciate her appetite for mischief, and together they are able to build a life for themselves on the London streets. One day, Estella's flair for fashion catches the eye of the Baroness von Hellman, a fashion legend who is devastatingly chic and terrifyingly haute, played by two-time Oscar (R) winner Emma Thompson (""Howards End,"" ""Sense &amp; Sensibility""). But their relationship sets in motion a course of events and revelations that will cause Estella to embrace her wicked side and become the raucous, fashionable and revenge-bent Cruella. ",Adventure
Starred Up,An explosive teenager runs into his equally violent father after being switched to an adult prison from a facility for juveniles. ,Crime
The Place Beyond the Pines,"In upstate New York, two men (Ryan Gosling, Bradley Cooper), and later, their sons (Dane DeHaan, Emory Cohen) must deal with the unforeseen consequences of their actions. ",Crime
The Guard,"Appukuttan Nair, a poor man, gets a job as a forest guard. While living in the dense, isolated forest, he learns about some poachers who are trying to enter his territory and decides to fight them. ",Comedy
Four Lions,"A group of young Muslim men living in Sheffield decide to wage jihad, and they hatch an inept plan to become suicide bombers. Omar (Riz Ahmed) and Waj (Kayvan Novak) have a brief, disastrous run at a Pakistan training camp, while Faisal (Adeel Akhtar) works on an unlikely scheme to train birds to carry bombs. Their ill-conceived plan culminates at the London Marathon with their bumbling attempts to disrupt the event while dressed in outlandish costumes. ",Comedy
Animal Kingdom,"In this gritty Australian crime drama, young Joshua ""J"" Cody (James Frecheville) is taken in by his extended family after his mother dies of an overdose. This branch of the Cody clan, overseen by J's scheming grandmother, Janine (Jacki Weaver), is heavily involved in various criminal activities, and they quickly indoctrinate the boy into their way of life. However, J is given an opportunity to take a different route when a cop named Leckie (Guy Pearce) seeks to help him leave the family fold. ",Crime
The Lincoln Lawyer,"Mick Haller (Matthew McConaughey) is a charismatic defense attorney who does business out of his Lincoln Continental sedan. Mick spends most of his time defending petty crooks and other bottom-feeders, so it comes as quite a surprise when he lands the case of a lifetime: defending a Beverly Hills playboy (Ryan Phillippe) who is accused of attempted murder. However, what Mick initially thinks is an open-and-shut case with a big monetary reward develops into something more sinister. ",Crime
Matchstick Men,"Roy (Nicolas Cage), a depressed con artist with obsessive-compulsive disorder, and Frank (Sam Rockwell), his partner, find their line of work complicated by the arrival of Roy's teenage daughter, Angela (Alison Lohman). Angela brings some spirit back into Roy's life, and some of his disorder symptoms seem to disappear. But when Angela wants to learn the family business, and Roy allows her to assist on a big scam concerning a businessmen (Bruce McGill), he reconsiders his parenting techniques. ",Comedy
Dirty Pretty Things,"In London, Okwe (Chiwetel Ejiofor) is an undocumented alien from Nigeria who works as a cabbie and moonlights as a hotel attendant. He shares living quarters with Turkish émigré Senay (Audrey Tautou). Working late one evening, Okwe is called up to one of the hotel suites. Inside, he finds a prostitute standing by a toilet that's clogged with a human heart. This leads him to the hotel manager (Sergi López), and he soon uncovers a darker side to his employer and his adopted city. ",Crime
Sexy Beast,"Ex-villain Gal Dove (Ray Winstone) has served his time behind bars and is blissfully retired to a Spanish villa paradise with a wife he adores. The idyll is shattered by the arrival of his nemesis Don Logan (Ben Kingsley), intent on persuading Gal to return to London for one last big job. Desperate not to sacrifice his enchanted existence, Dove is drawn into a shocking battle of wills with Logan, and takes part in a sensational underwater heist, risking everything to protect the woman he loves. ",Crime
Pusher,"As a heroin dealer in Copenhagen, Frank (Kim Bodnia) is far from the top but earns good money pushing with a friend (Mads Mikkelsen). When he decides to up the ante, Frank goes to Milo (Zlatko Buric), a drug lord -- except he doesn't have enough money for the heroin. Instead, Milo fronts him the goods upon the condition of immediate repayment. But when Frank goes to make the deal, and the police arrive, he has to ditch the drugs. Now Frank has to find a way to repay Milo if he wants to live. ",Crime
Bound,"Sparks fly when Violet (Jennifer Tilly) sets eyes on Corky (Gina Gershon) in an elevator. Violet is the girlfriend of a violent gangster, Caesar (Joe Pantoliano), while Corky is fresh out of prison and doing renovations on the apartment next door. As the two women launch into a passionate love affair, they assemble an intricate plan for Violet to escape from Caesar, with two million dollars of the mob's money -- but the important part is to make it out alive. ",Crime
Drugstore Cowboy,"Bob Hughes (Matt Dillon) is the leader of a ""family"" of drug addicts consisting of his wife, Dianne (Kelly Lynch), and another couple who feed their habit by robbing drug stores as they travel across the country. After a tragedy befalls a member of his group, Bob decides he must leave his dysfunctional clan and go straight. Parting ways with his junkie past proves more difficult than expected when Bob is stalked by an old acquaintance looking to score drugs at any price. ",Crime
Wall Street,"On the Wall Street of the 1980s, Bud Fox (Charlie Sheen) is a stockbroker full of ambition, doing whatever he can to make his way to the top. Admiring the power of the unsparing corporate raider Gordon Gekko (Michael Douglas), Fox entices Gekko into mentoring him by providing insider trading. As Fox becomes embroiled in greed and underhanded schemes, his decisions eventually threaten the livelihood of his scrupulous father (Martin Sheen). Faced with this dilemma, Fox questions his loyalties. ",Crime
Raising Arizona,"An ex-con and an ex-cop meet, marry and long for a child of their own. When it is discovered that Hi is unable to have children they decide to snatch a baby. They try to keep their crime a secret, while friends, co-workers and a bounty hunter look to use the child for their own purposes. ",Comedy
Murder by Death,"Five diverse, infamous private eyes, including Sam Diamond (Peter Falk), Sidney Wang (Peter Sellers) and Jessica Marbles (Elsa Lanchester), are invited to the mysterious Lionel Twain's castle for a dinner party. There, they are told that Twain plans an unsolvable murder in the house at midnight -- and he will pay $1 million to the one who determines the killer. But when Twain's blind butler, Bensonmum (Alec Guinness), dies long before the deadline, the stakes go up for the trapped sleuths. ",Comedy
Murder on the Orient Express,"Having concluded a case, detective Hercule Poirot (Albert Finney) settles into what he expects will be a relaxing journey home aboard the Orient Express. But when an unpopular billionaire is murdered en route, Poirot takes up the case, and everyone on board the famous train is a suspect. Using an avalanche blocking the tracks to his advantage, Poirot gradually realizes that many of the passengers have revenge as a motive, and he begins to home in on the culprit. ",Crime
The Stranger,A young man who lives on a ranch back in 1968 travels forward in time into the new world of 2018. ,Crime
Dogman,A farmer and his American Indian neighbor join forces to stop an unknown creature that is hunting both animals and humans. ,Crime
Dope,The London drug culture of the late '60s. ,Adventure
West Side Story,"A musical in which a modern day Romeo and Juliet are involved in New York street gangs. On the harsh streets of the upper west side, two gangs battle for control of the turf. The situation becomes complicated when a gang members falls in love with a rival's sister. ",Crime
Kvinden i buret,Police inspector Carl Morck and his assistant investigate a cold case involving a missing woman. ,Crime
American Hustle,"Irving Rosenfeld (Christian Bale) dabbles in forgery and loan-sharking, but when he falls for fellow grifter Sydney Prosser (Amy Adams), things change in a big way. Caught red-handed by FBI agent Richie DiMaso (Bradley Cooper), Irv and Sydney are forced to work under cover as part of DiMaso's sting operation to nail a New Jersey mayor (Jeremy Renner). Meanwhile, Irv's jealous wife (Jennifer Lawrence) may be the one to bring everyone's world crashing down. Based on the 1970s Abscam case. ",Crime
Talaash,"Inspector Surjan Singh Shekhawat (Aamir Khan) investigates a popular film star's death. Before he can solve the complicated case, he has to face his suppressed grief and deal with Rosie -- a sex worker and murderer. ",Crime
Now You See Me,"Charismatic magician Atlas (Jesse Eisenberg) leads a team of talented illusionists called the Four Horsemen. Atlas and his comrades mesmerize audiences with a pair of amazing magic shows that drain the bank accounts of the corrupt and funnel the money to audience members. A federal agent (Mark Ruffalo) and an Interpol detective (Mélanie Laurent) intend to rein in the Horsemen before their next caper, and they turn to Thaddeus (Morgan Freeman), a famous debunker, for help. ",Crime
Mientras duermes,"César is the superintendent of an apartment building and keeps very close tabs on the tenants. He secretly enjoys inflicting pain on others, and the occupant of apartment 5B will be his new target. ",Crime
The Ghost Writer,"Gilliger Graham, a struggling writer, is told by his agent that he must produce a hit novel if he is to save his career. He decamps to his old family home, where his father, who was once a very successful writer, had died under mysterious circumstances many years before. Disturbed by the reminders of his old family life, Gilliger struggles to find his muse, and driven to drink, he stumbles across an old hidden manuscript -- his father's unfinished, last novel. He soon realizes the novel is better than anything he can write himself and decides to plagiarize the book, and begins transposing it to his laptop. Then, his real troubles begin. Haunted by the characters from the book, he begins to understand that the novel is a part confessional, which implicates his deceased father at the center of a murder.... The Ghost Writer is a supernatural thriller about a man battling the demons of his father's past to overcome his own, and find redemption. ",Crime
Nothing But the Truth,"Gwen Saunders (Paulette Goddard) teams up with her uncle's employee, Steve Bennett (Bob Hope), in an attempt to double her $10,000 investment in the family firm. If she can reach the $20,000 mark, her uncle T.T. Ralston (Edward Arnold) will match the figure. Steve bets that if he can spend an entire day without telling a lie, Ralston and his business partners must double Gwen's money. Bennett then earns the enmity of everyone involved in his attempt to win the bet. ",Crime
Fracture,"Willy Beachum (Ryan Gosling), a hotshot prosecutor, is about to leave his post for a lucrative job at a private law firm when his boss (David Strathairn) hands him a seemingly open-and-shut case. Ted Crawford (Anthony Hopkins) tried to kill his wife with a shot to the head and is defending himself in court. All hope for a quick and easy trial fly out the door when Ted proves to be a more cunning and devious adversary than Willy anticipates. ",Crime
In the Valley of Elah,"A police detective (Charlize Theron) helps a retired Army sergeant (Tommy Lee Jones) search for his son, a soldier who went missing soon after returning from Iraq. Hank Deerfield, a Vietnam War veteran, learns that his son may have met with foul play after a night on the town with members of his platoon. ",Crime
Tsotsi,"A South African hoodlum named Tsotsi (Presley Chweneyagae) lives by a code of violence, and he and his gang of thugs prowl the streets of Johannesburg day and night, attacking those who fail to give them what they want. After casually shooting a woman and stealing her car, he discovers her baby in the back seat. Instead of harming the mewling infant, he takes it home and cares for it. The child acts as a catalyst for the hardened thug to regain his humanity. ",Crime
Michael Clayton,"Former prosecutor Michael Clayton (George Clooney) works as a ""fixer"" at the corporate law firm of Kenner, Bach and Ledeen, and takes care of his employer's dirty work. Burned out and deep in debt, he is bound tightly to the firm. Clayton faces the biggest challenge of his career when a guilt-ridden attorney (Tom Wilkinson) has a breakdown during a huge class-action lawsuit. ",Crime
Brick,"After receiving a frantic phone call from his ex-girlfriend, teenage loner Brendan Frye (Joseph Gordon-Levitt) learns that her dead body has been found. Vowing to solve her murder himself, he must infiltrate high-school cliques that he previously avoided. His search for the truth places him before some of the school's roughest characters, leading to a confrontation with a drug dealer known as ""the Pin (Lukas Haas)."" ",Crime
Mean Creek,"Quiet adolescent Sam (Rory Culkin) has been bullied by George (Josh Peck), a fellow student who has trouble fitting in with other teens. When Rocky (Trevor Morgan), Sam's elder brother, finds out Sam is being picked on, he enlists his buddies to help get back at George. They ask George to accompany them on a boating expedition deep in the woods, but when their plan to humiliate George horrifically backfires, the friends make a series of poor decisions that will change their lives. ",Crime
Chicago,"Nightclub sensation Velma (Catherine Zeta-Jones) murders her philandering husband, and Chicago's slickest lawyer, Billy Flynn (Richard Gere), is set to defend her. But when Roxie (Renée Zellweger) also winds up in prison, Billy takes on her case as well -- turning her into a media circus of headlines. Neither woman will be outdone in their fight against each other and the public for fame and celebrity. ",Comedy
Red Dragon,"Ex-FBI agent Will Graham (Edward Norton) is an expert investigator who quit the Bureau after almost losing his life in the process of capturing the elusive Dr. Lecter (Anthony Hopkins). After a series of particularly grisly murders, Graham soon realizes that the best way to catch this killer, known as the Tooth Fairy, is to find a way to get inside the killer's mind. For Graham, that means confronting his past and facing his former nemesis, the now-incarcerated Lecter. ",Crime
Frailty,"Set in present day Texas, ""Frailty"" centers on the FBI's search for a serial killer who calls himself ""God's Hands."" McConaughey plays Fenton Meeks, a young man who approaches the lead investigator, one night, claiming he knows the identity of the killer. The FBI agent is curious, but unimpressed until Fenton reveals that the killer is his younger brother Adam. This is a film about faith, family and the end of innocence. ",Crime
The Bank Job,A recently released convict and his criminally inclined best friend execute a daring daytime bank robbery. ,Crime
The Rainmaker,A man has the power to control the weather around a racetrack. ,Crime
Wild at Heart,"After serving prison time for a self-defense killing, Sailor Ripley (Nicolas Cage) reunites with girlfriend Lula Fortune (Laura Dern). Lula's mother, Marietta (Diane Ladd), desperate to keep them apart, hires a hit man to kill Sailor. But he finds a whole new set of troubles when he and Bobby Peru (Willem Dafoe), an old buddy who's also out to get Sailor, try to rob a store. When Sailor lands in jail yet again, the young lovers appear further than ever from the shared life they covet. ",Comedy
Heathers,"Veronica (Winona Ryder) is part of the most popular clique at her high school, but she disapproves of the other girls' cruel behavior. When Veronica and her new boyfriend, J.D. (Christian Slater), confront clique leader Heather Chandler (Kim Walker) and accidentally poison her, they make it appear a suicide. Soon Veronica realizes that J.D. is intentionally killing students he does not like. She races to stop J.D. while also clashing with the clique's new leader, Heather Duke (Shannen Doherty). ",Comedy
Manhunter,A World War I Marine veteran sets his sights on Depression-era gangsters in this pilot for the TV series. ,Crime
Clue,"Based on the popular board game, this comedy begins at a dinner party hosted by Mr. Boddy, where he admits to blackmailing his visitors. These guests, who have been given aliases, are Mrs. Peacock, Miss Scarlet, Mr. Green, Professor Plum, Mrs. White and Col. Mustard. When Boddy turns up murdered, all are suspects, and together they try to figure out who is the killer. ",Comedy
Death on the Nile,"On a luxurious cruise on the Nile River, a wealthy heiress, Linnet Ridgeway (Lois Chiles), is murdered. Fortunately, among the passengers are famed Belgian detective Hercule Poirot (Peter Ustinov) and his trusted companion, Colonel Race (David Niven), who immediately begin their investigation. But just as Poirot identifies a motley collection of would-be murderers, several of the suspects also meet their demise, which only deepens the mystery of the killer's identity. ",Crime
Mean Streets,"A slice of street life in Little Italy among lower echelon Mafiosos, unbalanced punks, and petty criminals. A small-time hood gets in over his head with a vicious loan shark. In an attempt to free himself from the dangers of his debt, he gets help from a friend who is also involved in criminal activities. ",Crime
Take the Money and Run,"Virgil Starkwell (Woody Allen) is intent on becoming a notorious bank robber. Unfortunately for Virgil and his not-so-budding career, he is completely incompetent. Presented in mockumentary format, the film features interviews with those who know Virgil best, including his wife, Louise (Janet Margolin). Following him from his crime-obsessed youth to his law-breaking antics, the movie eventually depicts both Virgil's jail time and his prison break, with plenty of slapstick silliness throughout. ",Comedy
The Devil All the Time,A young man is devoted to protecting his loved ones in a town full of corruption and sinister characters. ,Crime
Bad Times at the El Royale,"The El Royale is run-down hotel that sits on the border between California and Nevada. It soon becomes a seedy battleground when seven strangers -- a cleric, a soul singer, a traveling salesman, two sisters, the manager and the mysterious Billy Lee -- converge on a fateful night for one last shot at redemption before everything goes wrong. ",Crime
The White Tiger,Red Army Sgt. Ivan Naydenov (Aleksey Vertkov) becomes obsessed with destroying a Tiger tank after a battle. ,Crime
Elle,"After witnessing a car crash, Maria and Jonathan pursue a relationship, but Jonathan has to come to terms with a strange companion in Maria's life. ",Crime
99 Homes,A desperate construction worker (Andrew Garfield) reluctantly accepts a job with the ruthless real-estate broker (Michael Shannon) who evicted him and his family from their home. ,Crime
Blue Ruin,An ominous piece of news sends a drifter (Macon Blair) back to his hometown to exact brutal -- and inept -- revenge for the deaths of his parents. ,Crime
Side Effects,"America! Built on a better pill. Karly Hert has spent the last ten years selling drugs. Legally, that is. Karly is a pharmaceutical sales representative. She sells pills to doctors. She makes lots of money. She has a company car. She has a nice fat expense account. But there's a growing pit in Karly's stomach. Something isn't right behind the scenes at big pharma. Based on the director's decade working directly for the industry. ",Crime
Seven Psychopaths,"Boozy writer Marty (Colin Farrell) is a man in search of a screenplay. He has a catchy title but no story to go along with it. Marty has a couple of oddball buddies, Hans (Christopher Walken) and Billy (Sam Rockwell), who make a living by kidnapping rich people's dogs, then returning them and collecting the reward. However this time, the fur flies when Hans and Billy kidnap the beloved pooch of a gangster (Woody Harrelson), and Marty uses the ensuing events as fodder for his screenplay. ",Comedy
The Outfit,"When petty crook Earl Macklin (Robert Duvall) is released from prison to find that his brother was murdered over a botched bank heist, he has one thing on his mind -- revenge. After tracing his brother's death back to a merciless, well-armed ring of mobsters, Macklin teams up with his old partner Cody (Joe Don Baker) in an effort to track down the thugs. However, the tables turn when Macklin realizes that the deadly criminals he is after have already put out a hit on him. ",Crime
Dhamaka,"When a cynical ex-TV news anchor gets an alarming call on his radio show, he sees a chance for a career comeback -- but it may cost him his conscience. ",Crime
The Unforgivable,"Released from prison after serving a sentence for a violent crime, Ruth Slater (Sandra Bullock) re-enters a society that refuses to forgive her past. Facing severe judgment from the place she once called home, her only hope for redemption is finding the estranged younger sister she was forced to leave behind. ",Crime
Frozen River,"After her husband deserts her, working-class mother Ray Eddy (Melissa Leo) is in great need of money to find a home. Lured by the possibility of easy cash, Ray joins Lila (Misty Upham) a widowed Mohawk who earns a living by smuggling immigrants from Canada to the U.S. across the St. Lawrence. ",Crime
Elephant,"A variety of adolescents at a suburban high school drift through a seemingly uneventful day, until two students arrive with violent intentions. Alex (Alex Frost) and Eric (Eric Deulen) have developed elaborate plans to enter their school and gun down as many of their peers as possible. Although Alex and Eric are seen as the victims of bullying, and the pair have carefully plotted their attack, most of the violence is committed with a detached sense of randomness. ",Crime
11:14,"A series of storylines, ranging from bizarre to deadly, runs on parallel tracks before coming to a head at 11:14 p.m. In a fairly typical American suburb, Buzzy (Hilary Swank) and Duffy (Shawn Hatosy) are arrested and find themselves in the police car that responds to a car accident involving Jack (Henry Thomas). Meanwhile, some local youths are rabble-rousing, and a teenage girl is planning a romantic rendezvous. Each is about to find their lives touched by misfortune. ",Comedy
Runaway Jury,"After a workplace shooting in New Orleans, a trial against the gun manufacturer pits lawyer Wendell Rohr (Dustin Hoffman) against shady jury consultant Rankin Fitch (Gene Hackman), who uses illegal means to stack the jury with people sympathetic to the defense. But when juror Nicholas Easter (John Cusack) and his girlfriend, Marlee (Rachel Weisz), reveal their ability to sway the jury into delivering any verdict they want, a high-stakes cat-and-mouse game begins. ",Crime
Bad Santa,"In this dark comedy, the crotchety Willie T. Stokes (Billy Bob Thornton) and his partner (Tony Cox) reunite once a year for a holiday con. Posing as a mall Santa and his elf, they rip off shopping outlets on Christmas Eve. This year, however, Willie is falling apart. He's depressed and alcoholic, and his erratic behavior draws the suspicion of mall security (Bernie Mac). But when befriending a small boy brings out his kinder side, Willie begins to wonder if there is still some hope for him. ",Comedy
Narc,"Tells the dark story of suspended undercover narcotics officer, Nick Tellis (Jason Patric), who is reluctantly drawn back onto the force to find the truth behind the murder of a young police officer killed in the line of duty. He is teamed with Henry Oak (Ray Liotta), the slain officer's partner, a rogue cop who will stop at nothing to avenge his friend's death. As Tellis and Oak unravel the case, the dark underbelly of the narcotics world reveals itself in surprising ways. ",Crime
Phone Booth,"A phone call can change your life, but for one man it can also end it. Set entirely within and around the confines of a New York City phone booth. ""Phone Booth"" follows a slick media consultant (Colin Farrell) who is trapped after being told by a caller -- a serial killer with a sniper rifle -- that he'll be shot dead if he hangs up. ",Crime
Strange Days,"Former policeman Lenny Nero (Ralph Fiennes) has moved into a more lucrative trade: the illegal sale of virtual reality-like recordings that allow users to experience the emotions and past experiences of others. While the bootlegs typically contain tawdry incidents, Nero is shocked when he receives one showing a murder. He enlists a friend, bodyguard Mace (Angela Bassett), to help find the killer -- and the two soon stumble upon a vast conspiracy involving the police force Nero once worked for. ",Crime
The Accused,"A young student is the main suspect of her best friend's brutal murder; while in the center of media attention, she will have to face her own doubts about what really happened. ",Crime
Rumble Fish,"Disaffected and restless, Rusty James (Matt Dillon) is spoiling for a fight. Abandoned by his mother and living with his alcoholic father (Dennis Hopper), he hangs out with his girlfriend, Patty (Diane Lane), and his similarly aimless friends Midget (Larry Fishburne), Smokey (Nicolas Cage) and B.J. Jackson (Christopher Penn). When his brother, the Motorcycle Boy (Mickey Rourke), returns to town, Rusty hopes to gain guidance and wisdom from someone most people think is crazy. ",Crime
The Outsiders,An outlaw helps the Ainu people on an island. ,Crime
Dressed to Kill,"When Liz Blake (Nancy Allen), a prostitute, sees a mysterious woman brutally slay homemaker Kate Miller (Angie Dickinson), she finds herself trapped in a dangerous situation. While the police think Liz is the murderer, the real killer wants to silence the crime's only witness. Only Kate's inventor son, Peter (Keith Gordon), believes Liz. Peter and Liz team up to find the real culprit, who has an unexpected means of hiding her identity and an even more surprising motivation to kill. ",Crime
Klute,"This acclaimed thriller stars Jane Fonda as Bree Daniel, a New York City call girl who becomes enmeshed in an investigation into the disappearance of a business executive. Detective John Klute (Donald Sutherland) is hired to follow Daniel, and eventually begins a romance with her, but it appears that he hasn't been the only person on her trail. When it becomes clear that Daniel is being targeted, it's up to her and Klute to figure out who is after her before it's too late. ",Crime
Marnie,"Mark Rutland (Sean Connery) is a customer of one Mr. Strutt, whose business was robbed by his secretary, the mysterious Marnie Edgar (Tippi Hedren). When Marnie applies for a job with Mark, with the intention of stealing from him, Mark -- who is obsessively in love with her -- blackmails her into marrying him. However, he soon discovers that she has severe psychological issues regarding men, thunderstorms and the color red, and resolves to help her come to terms with her past trauma. ",Crime
The Mule,"During the Spanish Civil War, a soldier rescues a mule from a battlefield and decides to keep it. ",Crime
Nightmare Alley,"Roustabout Stanton Carlisle (Tyrone Power) joins a traveling carny and unsuccessfully schemes to figure out the mind-reading act of Mademoiselle Zeena (Joan Blondell) and her alcoholic husband, Pete (Ian Keith). But when Pete dies, Zeena is forced to take on Stanton as a partner, and he quickly proves more gifted than his predecessor. Ambitious to a fault, Carlisle abandons Zeena and the carny to reinvent himself as ""The Great Stanton,"" wowing high-class audiences in a Chicago hotel. ",Crime
Rustom,A naval officer (Akshay Kumar) goes on trial for the murder of his wife's lover. ,Crime
Green Room,"Julien Davenne (François Truffaut) is a French writer who becomes consumed with the concept of death. After losing many friends during the fighting in World War I, Julien constructs a shrine to those close to him who died in battle. At the heart of Julien's obsession is his late wife, whom he honors throughout his home, which is essentially one large memorial dedicated to her memory. Though Julien makes fleeting attempts to connect with the living, he seems more comfortable with the dead. ",Crime
The Drop,"Bob Saginowski (Tom Hardy) tends bar in his cousin's pub and looks the other way when local mobsters use the joint as a temporary bank. His simple life takes a complicated turn when he finds a battered puppy. He asks his neighbor, Nadia (Noomi Rapace), for help nursing it back to health, and a mutual attraction sparks between them. However, a robbery at the bar and the return of Nadia's abusive ex force Bob to face the truth about those he thinks he knows best -- including himself. ",Crime
Filth,"The story of Abigail Bunu, a young woman working in Nigeria as a clinical psychologist with more than her clients' personal problems on her mind. ",Action
Unthinkable,"FBI Agent Helen Brody (Carrie-Anne Moss) races to discover the location of three nuclear bombs, each programmed to detonate in a different city. When authorities arrest terrorist suspect Younger (Michael Sheen), who announced the murderous plot in a video, special operative Harold Humphries (Samuel L. Jackson) joins Brody in the interrogation. He takes escalating measures to extract answers from Younger, but Younger clams up. Brody begins to question their brutal methods as time ticks away. ",Crime
Burn After Reading,"When a disc containing memoirs of a former CIA analyst (John Malkovich) falls into the hands of Linda Litzke (Frances McDormand) and Chad Feldheimer (Brad Pitt), the two gym employees see a chance to make enough money for her to have life-changing cosmetic surgery. Predictably, events whirl out of control for the duo doofuses and those in their orbit. ",Comedy
The Lookout,"Cameras record the life, work and environment of a fire lookout stationed in a remote outpost in Montana's Flathead National Forest. ",Crime
John Q,"Story centers on a man whose nine-year-old son is in desperate need of a life-saving transplant. When he discovers that his medical insurance won't cover the costs of the surgery and alternative government aid is unavailable, John Q. Archibald (Denzel Washington) takes a hospital emergency room hostage in a last-ditch attempt to save his child. ",Crime
Super Troopers,"Always looking for action, five over-enthusiastic but under-stimulated Vermont State Troopers raise hell on the highway, keeping motorists anxiously looking in their rear-view mirrors. Between an ongoing feud with the local cops over whose you-know-what is bigger, and the state government wanting to shut them down, the ""Super Troopers"" find themselves precariously and hilariously heading toward calamity as they try to avoid extinction. ",Comedy
Heaven,"Cate Blanchett stars as Philippa, a British teacher living in Turin, Italy, who has seen many friends, including her husband, fall victim to drug overdoses. Philippa has repeatedly contacted the police with information about Turin's biggest drug dealer but, complicit in his dealings, they have completely ignored her. So Philippa decides to dole out her own form of justice with a home-made bomb -- setting her off on a journey from young widow to fugitive on the run. ",Crime
Cop Land,"When hotheaded Superboy (Michael Rapaport) accidentally gets involved in an ugly racially-motivated incident, his uncle Ray Donlan (Harvey Keitel), a corrupt New York City cop, attempts to sweep it under the rug by helping fake his nephew's death. The bungled cover-up leads to investigations by idealistic Internal Affairs officer Moe Tilden (Robert De Niro) and Freddy Heflin (Sylvester Stallone), sheriff of the suburban New Jersey town where Donlan and his fellow crooked policemen live. ",Crime
Breakdown,A boxer (William Bishop) jailed for murder proves his girlfriend's (Ann Richards) wealthy father and a ward boss framed him. ,Crime
Bad Lieutenant,"The Lieutenant (Harvey Keitel) is a corrupt cop steeped in gambling debt who exploits his authority to sexually harass teenage girls, embezzle money and abuse drugs. His troubles come to a head when a mob lackey delivers an ultimatum: pay off his debt, or else. His fate appears sealed. But when The Lieutenant learns that a $50,000 reward is being offered to whoever catches a pair of thugs who raped a nun (Frankie Thorn), he jumps at the opportunity, hoping that he can still redeem himself. ",Crime
Soylent Green,"In a densely overpopulated, starving New York City of the future, NYPD detective Robert Thorn (Charlton Heston) investigates the murder of an executive at rations manufacturer Soylent Corporation. With the help of elderly academic Solomon ""Sol"" Roth (Edward G. Robinson), Thorn begins to make real progress -- until the governor mysteriously pulls the plug. Obsessed with the mystery, Thorn steps out from behind the badge and launches his own investigation into the murder. ",Crime
The Pink Panther,"In this first film of the beloved comic series, dashing European thief Sir Charles Lytton (David Niven) plans to steal a diamond, but he's not the only one with his eyes on the famous jewel known as the ""Pink Panther."" His nephew George (Robert Wagner) also aims to make off with the gem, and to frame Charles for the crime. Blundering French police inspector Jacques Clouseau (Peter Sellers) intercedes, but finds his career -- and his freedom -- jeopardized. ",Comedy
Trance,"A woman finds herself living in constant fear after the war in Sri Lanka. Then, when she's in a state of trance, she finds the courage she needs to express her suppressed feelings. ",Crime
Horrible Bosses,"Nick (Jason Bateman), Dale (Charlie Day) and Kurt (Jason Sudeikis) are workers who would like nothing better than to grind their oppressive employers into the dirt. Quitting their jobs is not an option, so -- fueled by alcohol and dubious advice from a criminal (Jamie Foxx) -- the men devise a complex and seemingly foolproof plan to permanently rid themselves of their terrible bosses. The problem is, any plan is only as clever as the brains behind it. ",Comedy
Haseen Dillruba,"Under investigation as a suspect in her husband's murder, a woman reveals details of their thorny marriage that seem to only further blur the truth. ",Crime
The Conspirator,"Following the assassination of President Lincoln, seven men and one woman are arrested and charged with conspiring to kill Lincoln, the vice president and the secretary of state. Lawyer Frederick Aiken (James McAvoy) reluctantly agrees to defend the lone woman, Mary Surratt (Robin Wright), who owns a boarding house where John Wilkes Booth and others met to plan their crimes. Aiken realizes that Mary may be innocent and being used as bait to capture her son, a suspect who is still at large. ",Crime
A Guide to Recognizing Your Saints,"Dito Montiel (Robert Downey Jr.), a successful author, receives a call from his long-suffering mother (Dianne Wiest), asking him to return home and visit his ailing father. Dito recalls his childhood growing up in a violent neighborhood in Queens, N.Y., with friends Antonio (Channing Tatum), Giuseppe, Nerf and Mike. ",Crime
Taxi,"After a slew of traffic accidents, police detective Andy Washburn is demoted and has his driver's license revoked by his lieutenant. While on duty one day, Andy learns of a bank robbery and hails a taxi driven by new cabbie Belle. They lose the robbers in a chase through New York City, and Belle's taxi is impounded. Andy promises to get the car back for Belle if she helps him catch the thieves. ",Action
Suicide Kings,"Avery (Henry Thomas), Max (Sean Patrick Flanery) and two friends (Jay Mohr, Jeremy Sisto), all wealthy men in their 20s, kidnap former Mafia boss Charlie (Christopher Walken) in an attempt to pay the $2 million ransom on the unrelated kidnapping of Avery's sister. Their plan runs into trouble at every turn, and, with the help of Charlie's psychological manipulation, the men begin to suspect that one or more among them was involved in the first kidnapping. ",Comedy
Bottle Rocket,"In Wes Anderson's first feature film, Anthony (Luke Wilson) has just been released from a mental hospital, only to find his wacky friend Dignan (Owen C. Wilson) determined to begin an outrageous crime spree. After recruiting their neighbor, Bob (Robert Musgrave), the team embarks on a road trip in search of Dignan's previous boss, Mr. Henry (James Caan). But the more they learn, the more they realize that they do not know the first thing about crime. ",Comedy
Get Shorty,"Chili Palmer (John Travolta) is a Miami mobster who gets sent by his boss, the psychopathic ""Bones"" Barboni (Dennis Farina), to collect a bad debt from Harry Zimm (Gene Hackman), a Hollywood producer who specializes in cheesy horror films. When Chili meets Harry's leading lady (Rene Russo), the romantic sparks fly. After pitching his own life story as a movie idea, Chili learns that being a mobster and being a Hollywood producer really aren't all that different. ",Comedy
King of New York,A crime lord plots to take control of New York's underground drug economy and distribute the profits to the poor. ,Crime
The Grifters,"Hard-as-nails Lily Dillon (Anjelica Huston) works as a swindler for dangerous bookie Bobo (Pat Hingle), probably the only man she fears. Arriving in Los Angeles on ""business,"" Lily looks up her son, Roy (John Cusack), a small-time con artist content with paltry sleight-of-hand cheats. Roy's girlfriend, Myra (Annette Bening), looks like an All-American type but is a grifter looking to pull off another big-time con. The convergence of the three hustlers inevitably means trouble for all of them. ",Crime
Frantic,"Restless femme fatale Florence Carala (Jeanne Moreau) recruits her lover, Julien Tavernier (Maurice Ronet), to murder her wealthy husband, Simon (Jean Wall), in his office and make it appear like a suicide. Tavernier does the dirty deed eagerly, but becomes trapped in an elevator when he returns to remove a key piece of evidence he had accidentally left behind. Tavernier's unfortunate oversight sets into motion a dark ripple of events that bloodies the cold Paris night. ",Crime
Adventures in Babysitting,"When plans with her boyfriend fall through, high school senior Chris Parker (Elisabeth Shue) ends up babysitting the Anderson kids, Brad (Keith Coogan) and Sara (Maia Brewton). What should be a quiet night in, however, turns into a series of ridiculous exploits, starting when they leave the house to pick up Chris' friend Brenda (Penelope Ann Miller). Soon, Brad's buddy Daryl (Anthony Rapp) is involved, and the group must contend with car thieves, blues musicians and much more. ",Adventure
Ruthless People,"Sam Stone (Danny DeVito) hates his wife, Barbara (Bette Midler), so much that he wants her dead. He's ecstatic when she's taken by a duo of kidnappers who want $500,000 ransom in exchange for her life. Fully intending to ignore every one of the kidnappers' demands in the hopes that they do him a favor and murder her for him, the two confused kidnappers (Judge Reinhold, Helen Slater) have to figure out how they're going get their money, and what they're going to do with the overbearing Barbara. ",Comedy
Fletch,"A veritable chameleon, investigative reporter Irwin ""Fletch"" Fletcher (Chevy Chase) might drive his editor (Richard Libertini) up the wall, but he always produces great pieces for the newspaper. When his next story is about the drug trade taking place on the beach, Fletch goes undercover as a homeless man. Unaware of Fletch's true identity, businessman Alan Stanwyk (Tim Matheson) offers Fletch $50,000 to kill him. Intrigued, Fletch decides to unearth the full story behind the offer. ",Comedy
22 July,"Norway's deadliest terrorist attack, in which a right-wing extremist murders 77 teens at a youth camp in 2011, is dramatized. ",Crime
A Simple Favor,"Stephanie is a widowed, single mother who works as a vlogger in Connecticut. Her best friend, Emily, seems to have it all -- a successful career, a loving family and a glamorous lifestyle. When Emily mysteriously disappears one day, Stephanie launches her own investigation by digging into her friend's past -- and finding a few surprises along the way. ",Comedy
I See You,"Corrupt colleagues are about to remove Dr. Dutt from life support, until her spirit contacts Raj, who is able to abduct her comatose body. ",Crime
You Were Never Really Here,A contract killer uncovers a conspiracy while trying to save a kidnapped teen from a life of prostitution. ,Crime
The Dry,"Based on the global bestseller, a federal agent's homecoming leads to a deeply personal murder investigation that reopens old wounds and threatens to unravel the tight-knit small town. ",Crime
Widows,"The widows (Mercedes Ruehl, Brooke Shields, Rosie Perez) of three thieves join forces to finish a caper and find their husbands' killers. ",Crime
Joe,"When executive Bill Compton's (Dennis Patrick) daughter, Melissa (Susan Sarandon), overdoses at the house of her drug-dealer boyfriend, Compton flies into a rage and kills the dealer. He tries to make it look like a robbery gone wrong but, in a bar afterward, confesses his crime to a stranger named Joe (Peter Boyle). Joe is a hippie-hater and approves of Compton's actions. Moreover, when Melissa goes missing, he helps Compton track her down in the hope of killing a few hippies himself. ",Crime
A Most Wanted Man,An escaped militant's (Grigoriy Dobrygin) attempt to claim an inheritance gives a German agent (Philip Seymour Hoffman) the chance to lay a trap for a well-regarded Muslim scholar who is suspected of financing terrorists. ,Crime
The East,"Sarah (Brit Marling), an undercover agent at a private intelligence firm, is hired to infiltrate the East, an ecoterrorism cell targeting companies that pollute the environment. Though one (Elliot Page) of the group's hardcore members is suspicious of her, Sarah manages to win over Benji (Alexander Skarsgård), the East's leader. However -- even as Sarah tries to maintain her cover -- she gains more sympathy for the group's cause while, increasingly, becoming drawn to Benji. ",Crime
Defendor,An everyday guy (Woody Harrelson) believes he is a superhero and befriends a teenager while seeing a psychiatrist. ,Comedy
Exam,Eight candidates cooperate in order to secure a job with a prestigious company. ,Crime
Middle Men,"Jack Harris (Luke Wilson) is a legitimate Texas businessman who wanders off the straight-and-narrow path when he meets Wayne Beering (Giovanni Ribisi) and Buck Dolby (Gabriel Macht), a slimy pair of Internet porn profiteers. Jack's association with the men leads to his involvement with a host of other lowlifes, and though he tries to convince himself that he is staying clean in a dirty business, his disintegrating family situation proves otherwise. ",Comedy
Disturbia,"Ever since his father died, young Kale (Shia LaBeouf) has become increasingly sullen and withdrawn, until he finds himself under house arrest. With cabin fever setting in, he turns his attention to spying on his neighbors, becoming increasingly suspicious that one of them is a serial killer. However, he wonders if he is right, or if his overactive imagination is getting the better of him. ",Crime
21,"Following the death of a friend, a college senior (Matt Wheeler) gathers his other pals together for a final fling in Las Vegas. ",Crime
Keeping Mum,"Walter Goodfellow (Rowan Atkinson), vicar of the British village Little Wallop, is busy composing the perfect sermon. So busy, in fact, that he fails to notice his bored wife's (Kristin Scott Thomas) flirtation with her American golf instructor (Patrick Swayze), his daughter's revolving set of boyfriends, or his son's status as the favorite target of bullies. Enter Grace Hawkins (Maggie Smith), the new housekeeper, who has a drastic solution to the family's problems. ",Comedy
Motherless Brooklyn,"Lionel Essrog is a lonely private detective who doesn't let Tourette's syndrome stand in the way of his job. Gifted with a few clues and an obsessive mind, Lionel sets out to solve the murder of Frank Minna -- his mentor and only friend. Scouring the jazz clubs and slums of Brooklyn and Harlem, Essrog soon uncovers a web of secrets while contending with thugs, corruption and the most dangerous man in the city. ",Crime
Oliver Twist,Extreme circumstances and shady agents force Dickens' young orphan to join pickpockets in Victorian era London. ,Crime
Millions,"When 9-year-old Damian (Alex Etel) finds a bag of money in his back yard, he and his brother Anthony (Lewis Owen McGibbon) decide to try to spend it without telling their father (James Nesbitt). Seeking advice from the imaginary saints with whom he converses, Damian struggles with his own morality, and attempts to spend his money in a more altruistic way. News of the mysterious loot inevitably attracts attention, however, and Damian is faced with an increasingly hairy situation. ",Comedy
Panic Room,"Trapped in their New York brownstone's panic room, a hidden chamber built as a sanctuary in the event of break-ins, newly divorced Meg Altman (Jodie Foster) and her young daughter Sarah (Kristen Stewart) play a deadly game of cat-and-mouse with three intruders - Burnham (Forest Whitaker), Raoul (Dwight Yoakam) and Junior (Jared Leto) - during a brutal home invasion. But the room itself is the focal point because what the intruders really want is inside it. ",Crime
The Pledge,"On the day of his retirement, detective Jerry Black (Jack Nicholson) accepts a gift -- an airline ticket to Mexico. But when the body of a murdered eight-year-old girl is discovered in the mountains, Jerry offers his expertise at the crime scene. When an ambitious younger cop wrenches a dubious confession from a simple-minded suspect, the case is closed... but not for Jerry. ",Crime
Hannibal,"Carthaginian general Hannibal marches on Rome through the icy mountains of the Alps with 90,000 soldiers and 37 elephants. ",Crime
Freeway,"Yeo-jin decides to move to China to live with her daughter. At the start of the next chapter of her life, Yeo-jin drives to the airport with her friend Joo-hee, but they soon encounter an unexpected event that interrupts their plan. ",Crime
To Die For,Two soldiers risk everything to defend their homeland. ,Comedy
Serial Mom,A seemingly perfect wife and mother (Kathleen Turner) from Baltimore gains celebrity status as a serial killer. ,Comedy
Romper Stomper,"Hando (Russell Crowe) and Davey (Daniel Pollock) are the leaders of a racist youth gang who spend their nights attacking Asian immigrants in a rough section of Melbourne. On the run after losing badly in a fight against the new Vietnamese owners of their local pub, the pair hook up with teenage junkie Gabe (Jacqueline McKenzie), who suggests robbing the mansion of her rich and sexually abusive father (Leigh Russell). But the girl's presence begins to drive a wedge between the longtime friends. ",Crime
Home Alone 2: Lost in New York,"After snarky youth Kevin McCallister (Macaulay Culkin) loses track of his father at the airport, he mistakenly gets on a plane headed for New York City -- while the rest of the McCallisters fly to Florida. Now alone in the Big Apple, Kevin cons his way into a room at the Plaza Hotel and begins his usual antics. But when Kevin discovers that the Sticky Bandits (Joe Pesci, Daniel Stern) are on the loose, he struggles to stop them from robbing an elderly man's toy store just before Christmas. ",Adventure
Dead Again,"When a mute woman suffering from amnesia (Emma Thompson) arrives at the gates of an old orphanage, private investigator Mike Church (Kenneth Branagh) is asked to find out who she is. With the help of a hypnotist (Derek Jacobi), the woman regains her voice and recalls vivid past memories of a couple from the 1940s torn apart by murder. Church begins to develop feelings for the woman, who he calls Grace, and then discovers he has a connection to the tragic couple from the 40s. ",Crime
Sea of Love,"Troubled New York City detective Frank Keller (Al Pacino) investigates a serial killer who finds victims using personal ads in a magazine and leaves the song ""Sea of Love"" playing at his crime scenes. With the help of his partner, Sherman Touhey (John Goodman), Frank concocts a plan to find the killer using his own personal ads. But when Frank falls for one of his chief suspects, Helen Cruger (Ellen Barkin), he struggles to reconcile his personal life and his professional duty. ",Crime
Body Double,"After losing an acting role and his girlfriend, Jake Scully (Craig Wasson) finally catches a break: he gets offered a gig house-sitting in the Hollywood Hills. While peering through the beautiful home's telescope one night, he spies a gorgeous blonde (Deborah Shelton) dancing in her window. But when he witnesses the girl's murder, it leads Scully through the netherworld of the adult entertainment industry on a search for answers -- with porn actress Holly Body (Melanie Griffith) as his guide. ",Crime
Risky Business,"A flamboyant radio gossip (George Murphy) fights gangsters, revealing gang secrets on the air. ",Comedy
House on Haunted Hill,"Rich oddball Frederick Loren has a proposal for five guests at a possibly haunted mansion: show up, survive a night filled with scares and receive $10,000 each. The guest of honor is Loren's estranged wife, Annabelle, who, with her secret lover, Dr. Trent, has concocted her own scheme to scare Loren's associate, Nora Manning, into shooting the potentially crazy millionaire. However, more spooks and shocks throw a wrench into the plan. ",Crime
Let Him Go,"Following the loss of their son, a retired sheriff and his wife leave their Montana ranch to rescue their young grandson from the clutches of a dangerous family living off the grid in the Dakotas. ",Crime
The Good Liar,"Career con artist Roy Courtnay can hardly believe his luck when he meets well-to-do widow Betty McLeish online. As Betty opens her life and home to him, Roy is surprised to find himself caring about her, turning what should be a cut-and-dry swindle into the most treacherous tightrope walk of his life. ",Crime
Veronica Mars,"With her graduation from law school imminent, Veronica Mars (Kristen Bell) is interviewing with prestigious New York law firms when she gets a call from ex-boyfriend Logan (Jason Dohring), who has been accused of murder. Veronica returns to Neptune to help Logan find a good defense attorney, but when she becomes suspicious of the way Logan's case is being handled, she finds herself being pulled back into a life she thought she had left behind: that of an amateur sleuth. ",Crime
The Disappearance of Alice Creed,"Alice Creed (Gemma Arterton), the daughter of a wealthy family, is kidnapped for ransom by two masked men, one of whom is her boyfriend, Danny (Martin Compston). The other man is Vic (Eddie Marsan), who Danny intends to double-cross once they get the ransom. Although Alice eventually discovers that Danny is one of her abductors, they are forced to continue acting like strangers, since Vic does not know about Alice and Danny's relationship -- and would kill them both if he were to find out. ",Crime
The Perfect Host,A crook on the run cons his way into a dinner party whose host is anything but ordinary. ,Comedy
Big Nothing,An unemployed teacher with a chip on his shoulder teams with a scammer and his girlfriend in a blackmailing scheme. ,Comedy
The Matador,A globetrotting hit man and a salesman form an unlikely relationship after meeting at a hotel bar in Mexico City. ,Comedy
Swimming Pool,"When uptight British writer Sarah Morton (Charlotte Rampling) has difficulty with her new detective novel, her publisher, John Bosload (Charles Dance), sends her to his French country home to unwind. Once Sarah warms up to her new surroundings, her peace and quiet is interrupted by the arrival of Bosload's daughter, Julie (Ludivine Sagnier), a beautiful, uninhibited young woman. Though the two clash, they eventually form an unlikely bond -- one that is strained when things take a dramatic turn. ",Crime
Spun,"A drug addict (Jason Schwartzman) meets an assortment of wild characters (John Leguizamo, Mena Suvari) while on a three-day speed binge in Los Angeles. ",Comedy
The Whole Nine Yards,"Jimmy ""The Tulip"" Tudeski (Bruce Willis), a mob hitman-turned-informant, ratted on the mob and put his life in jeopardy. Now he has moved to suburban Montreal, ostensibly to make a new start. His next-door neighbor is mild-mannered, unhappily married dentist Nick ""Oz"" Oseransk (Matthew Perry). Nick recognizes Jimmy from the newspaper stories about his mob testimony, and that's when Nick's simple, boring world turns upside down. ",Comedy
Summer of Sam,"During the summer of 1977, a killer known as the Son of Sam keeps all of New York City on edge with a series of brutal murders. The philandering Vinny (John Leguizamo) unwittingly almost becomes a victim of the psychopath, and soon he and numerous people in his orbit -- including his wife, Dionna (Mira Sorvino), his punk-rocker friend, Ritchie (Adrien Brody), and aspiring porn star Ruby (Jennifer Esposito) -- are trying to figure out the identity of the killer, before it's too late. ",Crime
Life,"During Prohibition, loudmouth Harlem grifter Ray (Eddie Murphy) and the no-nonsense Claude (Martin Lawrence) team up on a bootlegging mission to Mississippi that could bring them big bucks. But they run into trouble when a crooked lawman hits them with a phony murder charge. Ray and Claude are given life sentences and shipped off to jail, where they must think of a way to prove their innocence and avoid the brutal guards while battling their biggest enemies -- their opposing personalities. ",Comedy
Analyze This,"When doctors tell a mob boss (Robert De Niro) that he is suffering from anxiety attacks, he seeks the help of Ben, a therapist (Billy Crystal), who is manipulated into treating him, with hysterical results. Just as Ben and his fiancée (Lisa Kudrow) are about to wed, they are faced with a mobster who won't take no for an answer. ",Comedy
U Turn,A young reporter's investigation into a string of grisly suicides takes a dangerous detour when she follows the clues to a cursed stretch of road. ,Crime
Apt Pupil,A high-school student (Brad Renfro) forms an unhealthy relationship with a former Nazi death-camp officer (Ian McKellen). ,Crime
The Client,"Fast-paced thriller, based on the John Grisham bestseller, about a boy whose life is endangered after he stumbles across vital information about a politician's murder. His lawyer is the only person offering protection from the unwanted attentions of the Mob and the FBI - but is she capable of saving his life? ",Crime
Kalifornia,"Brian Kessler (David Duchovny) is a writer, and his girlfriend, Carrie Laughlin (Michelle Forbes), is a photographer. They're working on a book about serial killers, and planning a trip across the country to document the sites of famous serial murders. To cut costs, they set up a ride-share with strangers, Early Grayce (Brad Pitt) and his girlfriend, Adele Corners (Juliette Lewis). But what they don't know is that Early is a violent sociopath in the middle of his own serial killing spree. ",Crime
Phenomena,An American (Jennifer Connelly) at a Swiss finishing school calls on insects to help a paralyzed scientist (Donald Pleasence) fight a monster. ,Crime
Stir Crazy,"With a jailbreak offering them their only way out, a despondent duo rack their brains to figure out a foolproof plan. Fortuitously, one of them discovers an unexpected talent as a rodeo rider, and an escape plan begins to take shape at the annual prisoners' rodeo. ",Comedy
Cherry,A young woman (Shalom Harlow) left at the altar swears off men until she decides she wants to have a baby. ,Crime
Thoroughbreds,"When a cavalry officer retrains his horse to win a steeplechase, he finds love in unlikely places. ",Comedy
Peter Rabbit,"Peter Rabbit and his three sisters -- Flopsy, Mopsy and Cotton-Tail -- enjoy spending their days in Mr. McGregor's vegetable garden. When one of McGregor's relatives suddenly moves in, he's less than thrilled to discover a family of rabbits in his new home. A battle of wills soon breaks out as the new owner hatches scheme after scheme to get rid of Peter -- a resourceful rabbit who proves to be a worthy and wily opponent. ",Adventure
The Book of Henry,"Single mother Susan Carpenter works as a waitress alongside her feisty family friend Sheila. Taking care of everyone and everything in his own way is Susan's older son Henry. Protective of his brother and a tireless supporter of his often self-doubting mother, Henry blazes through the days like a comet. When Susan discovers that the family next door harbors a dark secret, she's surprised to learn that Henry has devised a plan to help the young daughter. ",Crime
Irrational Man,A tormented philosophy professor (Joaquin Phoenix) considers murdering a corrupt judge to find meaning in his life. ,Comedy
Going in Style,"Senior citizens Willie (Lee Strasberg), Al (Art Carney) and Joe (George Burns) lead lives of uninterrupted boredom until they alight upon the idea of robbing a bank together. Though none of them has a criminal record, they nevertheless find the planning of the caper an energizing and satisfying experience all around. Even more surprisingly, they pull it off -- but no sooner do they make off with the loot than their age begins to catch up with them. ",Comedy
The Heat,"FBI Special Agent Sarah Ashburn (Sandra Bullock) is a methodical investigator with a long-standing reputation for excellence -- and arrogance. In contrast, foul-mouthed, hot-tempered detective Shannon Mullins (Melissa McCarthy) goes with her gut instincts and street smarts to remove criminals from the streets of Boston. Sparks fly when these polar opposites have to work together to capture a drug lord, but in the process, they become the last thing anyone expected -- buddies. ",Action
Focus,"Lawrence Newman (William H. Macy) is an ordinary man who doesn't want to stand out in a dangerous world. Then, unassuming Newman and his sexy, outspoken newlywed wife (Laura Dern) become caught up in a case of mistaken identity. Suddenly the unwitting focus of his neighbors' prejudice, Newman is faced with a choice - to go down as a coward or take a long shot at becoming the unlikeliest of heroes - and tell the truth. ",Comedy
Inherent Vice,"In a California beach community, private detective Larry ""Doc"" Sportello (Joaquin Phoenix) tends to work his cases through a smoky haze of marijuana. One day, Shasta, a former lover, arrives out of the blue to plead for Doc's help; it seems that Shasta's current beau, rich real-estate tycoon Mickey Wolfmann, has a wife who may be plotting to commit him to a mental hospital. When Mickey and Shasta both disappear, Doc navigates a psychedelic world of surfers, stoners and cops to solve the case. ",Comedy
The Loved Ones,"After a classmate (Xavier Samuel) declines her invitation to the school dance, a teenager (Robin McLeavy) kidnaps him and makes him the guest of honor at her own twisted prom. ",Crime
Stillwater,"After discovering that he was adopted, a recent college graduate travels to a Southern town to try to discover his roots. ",Crime
Paranoid Park,"As teenage skateboarder Alex (Gabe Nevins) hops freight trains with a stranger named Scratch (Daniel Liu), a security guard spots them and tries to forcibly remove them. In the scuffle, Alex strikes the guard with his skateboard, knocking him in the direction of another train, which kills him. Alex tosses his board into the river, but soon he and other skaters are called in for questioning by Detective Lu about a recovered skateboard that has been linked to the scene of the crime. ",Crime
Transsiberian,"On their way home from China, married Christian missionaries Roy (Woody Harrelson) and Jessie (Emily Mortimer) take a train from Beijing to Moscow. On board, they befriend Carlos (Eduardo Noriega) and Abby (Kate Mara). When Roy does not return in time at one stop, Jessie waits for him to catch up at the next station. Carlos and Abby stay with her, insisting the town is unsafe, however Carlos' attempts to ""befriend"" Jessie radically change the dynamic of the trip. ",Crime
Pride and Glory,"Ray Tierney (Edward Norton) comes from a family full of New York cops, including his father (Jon Voight), brother Francis (Noah Emmerich) and bad-boy brother-in-law Jimmy (Colin Farrell). When a failed drug bust results in the deaths of four of Francis' men, the Tierney patriarch pulls Ray into leading the investigation. But Jimmy launches his own investigation, compromising Ray's team. Jimmy's actions soon catch Ray between duty as a police officer and loyalty to his family. ",Crime
Scoop,"Even in death, British reporter Joe Strombel (Ian McShane) is dedicated to completing his final piece on London's notorious Tarot Card Killer, and American journalism student Sondra Pransky (Scarlett Johansson) discovers during a magician's (Woody Allen) performance that she can communicate with Joe. He hands her the story of a lifetime, and the chase leads directly to British aristocrat Peter Lyman (Hugh Jackman), with whom she has fallen dangerously in love. ",Comedy
Derailed,"Temptation and a difficult home life leave Charles (Clive Owen) open to an affair with Lucinda (Jennifer Aniston), whom he meets during his commute. Both are married with children, and it isn't long before they are together in a sleazy motel. However, a thug named LaRoche (Vincent Cassel) bursts into the room and attacks them, and they can't report it without their families discovering the affair. As if the violation wasn't enough, LaRoche then calls Charles to blackmail him. ",Crime
Confidence,"In this glossy neo-noir caper, expert grifter Jake Vig (Edward Burns) inadvertently crosses volatile crime boss the King (Dustin Hoffman) and, to make it right, he must agree to con banker Morgan Price (Robert Forster). He assembles his team, including Lily (Rachel Weisz) and Gordo (Paul Giamatti), but things get complicated fast with the arrival of Special Agent Gunther Butan (Andy Garcia), who has been tracking Jake for years. As the con goes down, Jake can't say who's double crossing whom. ",Crime
Small Time Crooks,"Woody Allen wrote, directed and stars in this romantic comedy that follows the misadventures of an ex-con dishwasher and his manicurist wife. Their get-rich-quick scheme to rob a bank leaves them rolling in dough... but not the kind they had in mind. Allen and award-winning comedic actress Tracey Ullman are paired as the husband and wife team who take a bite out of crime. ",Comedy
True Crime,"Mary (Alicia Silverstone), a precocious high school senior, longs to be a cop. She idolizes her late father, a policeman, and intently studies her favorite magazine, ""True Crime."" When a classmate dies and the case remains unsolved, Mary becomes obsessed, pestering a local cop (Bill Nunn). When she meets police cadet Tony (Kevin Dillon), the two decide to take up the investigation themselves, and romantic sparks soon fly. But Mary has no idea of the danger that awaits her. ",Crime
Wild Things,"When teen debutante Kelly (Denise Richards) fails to attract the attention of her hunky guidance counselor, Sam (Matt Dillon), she cries rape, igniting a scandal that results in his arrest. Sam appeals to Ken (Bill Murray), a hack personal-injury lawyer who has never handled a case that couldn't be helped by a prop neck brace. Soon, a second victim, Suzie (Neve Campbell), comes forward, and Detective Duquette (Kevin Bacon) discovers that the unfolding case is far from what it seems. ",Crime
A Perfect Murder,"Wall Street baron Steven Taylor (Michael Douglas) discovers that his pretty young wife, Emily (Gwyneth Paltrow), is cheating on him. But what concerns him more than her infidelity is the hope of profiting from her untimely death. Emily has millions, and Steve's own financial empire is collapsing before his eyes. He hires her lover, David (Viggo Mortensen), to murder her. The plan -- to stage a break-in that will look like a random murder -- turns out to be far from perfect. ",Crime
Half Baked,"When a member of their crew gets arrested for killing a New York City police horse by feeding it junk food, three slackin' stoners are forced to get off their butts and raise bail by selling pot stolen from a pharmaceutical lab. It's a risky plan but, hey, these are stand-up guys who would do anything to help out a friend in need. ",Comedy
The Man Who Knew Too Little,"In London to celebrate his birthday with James (Peter Gallagher), his rich younger brother, hapless American Wallace Ritchie (Bill Murray) gets signed up to participate in an elaborate role-playing theater performance. However, when Wallace accidentally receives a call intended for an actual hit man, he gets caught in a web of intrigue, completely unaware that the action unfolding around him is real. Luckily, the lovely Lori (Joanne Whalley) is around to help the clueless guy out of tight spots. ",Comedy
Midnight in the Garden of Good and Evil,"In this adaptation of John Berendt's book, a young journalist, John Kelso (John Cusack), travels to Savannah, Ga., to cover the city's Christmas celebration amid a backdrop of eccentric characters. He becomes intrigued by a sultry singer, Mandy (Alison Eastwood), and engrossed by a murder trial. Wealthy society figure Jim Williams (Kevin Spacey) is accused of shooting his male lover, and the question is whether it was in self-defense as he claims. ",Crime
Kiss the Girls,"Successful forensic psychologist Alex Cross (Morgan Freeman) discovers that his niece has gone missing. Once he consults with police Detective Nick Ruskin (Cary Elwes), Cross believes that the disappearance is the work of an insane killer known as ""Casanova."" Meanwhile, Dr. Kate McTiernan (Ashley Judd) is kidnapped by this criminal and witnesses many other imprisoned women in his lair. After narrowly escaping, McTiernan teams up with Cross to try to apprehend the deranged Casanova. ",Crime
The Pelican Brief,"Taut thriller about a young law student whose legal brief about the assassination of two Supreme Court justices causes her to be targeted by killers. She realizes just how accurate her accusations have been when her lover and mentor is murdered. Forced to go on the run in New Orleans, she is aided by a journalist who helps her unravel a conspiracy involving senior government figures. ",Crime
The Clovehitch Killer,"After Tyler finds a cache of disturbing images in his father's possession, he begins to suspect that the man he trusts most in the world may be responsible for a series of unsolved murders. ",Crime
Under the Silver Lake,"Sam is a disenchanted 33-year-old who discovers a mysterious woman, Sarah, frolicking in his apartment's swimming pool. When she vanishes, Sam embarks on a surreal quest across Los Angeles to decode the secret behind her disappearance, leading him into the murkiest depths of mystery, scandal, and conspiracy in the City of Angels. ",Crime
White Boy Rick,"Rick Wershe is a single father who's struggling to raise two teenagers during the height of the crack epidemic in 1980s Detroit. Wershe sells guns illegally to make ends meet but soon attracts attention from the FBI. Federal agents convince his son, Rick Jr., to become an undercover drug informant in exchange for keeping his father out of prison. When young Rick gets in too deep, he finds himself seduced by the lure of easy money and becomes a drug dealer himself. ",Crime
The Girl on the Train,A young woman (Émilie Dequenne) causes an uproar when she falsely claims to be the victim of an anti-Semitic attack. ,Crime
Murder on the Orient Express,"Having concluded a case, detective Hercule Poirot (Albert Finney) settles into what he expects will be a relaxing journey home aboard the Orient Express. But when an unpopular billionaire is murdered en route, Poirot takes up the case, and everyone on board the famous train is a suspect. Using an avalanche blocking the tracks to his advantage, Poirot gradually realizes that many of the passengers have revenge as a motive, and he begins to home in on the culprit. ",Crime
Stretch,A disgraced French jockey (Nicolas Cazalé) travels to Macau to find work. ,Comedy
Homefront,"Hoping to escape from his troubled past, former DEA agent Phil Broker (Jason Statham) moves to a seemingly quiet backwater town in the bayou with his daughter. However, he finds anything but quiet there, for the town is riddled with drugs and violence. When Gator Bodine (James Franco), a sociopathic druglord, puts the newcomer and his young daughter in harm's way, Broker is forced back into action to save her and their home. Based on a novel by Chuck Logan. ",Action
Money Monster,"Lee Gates is a Wall Street guru who picks hot stocks as host of the television show ""Money Monster."" Suddenly, during a live broadcast, disgruntled investor Kyle Budwell storms onto the set and takes Gates hostage. He tells Lee that he lost everything on one of his tips. As Gates tries to plead with Kyle, he's also using an earpiece to communicate with his longtime producer in the control room. Together, they must figure out a way to defuse the situation and disarm the angry young man. ",Crime
The Final Girls,"Max, recently orphaned, goes to see a screening of a B-horror movie that her mother made 20 years earlier. When Max and her friends find themselves in the world of the film itself, they must apply their knowledge of horror tropes to survive. ",Comedy
Sightseers,"A couple's (Alice Lowe, Steve Oram) cross-country road trip takes a deadly turn when they decide to start killing everyone who annoys them. ",Adventure
The Girl Next Door,Theresa turns her horrifying past as a sex slave into her calling by traveling the country and helping people who are being trafficked. ,Crime
Fanboys,"To honor the wishes of their dying friend, some diehard ""Star Wars"" fans set out on a cross-country road trip to George Lucas' famous Skywalker Ranch. There, they intend to treat their pal to a screening of the movie series' latest installment before its official release. ",Adventure
Step Up,"Tyler Gage (Channing Tatum) has been in and out of trouble for most of his life and after finding himself before the judge again, he is sentenced to 200 hours of community service mopping floors at the Maryland School of the Arts. He quickly catches the eye of Nora (Jenna Dewan), a gifted ballet student, who is trying to use hip-hop moves with her classical routines. After some initial hesitation, Nora convinces Tyler to help her with her dance routines and the sparks fly. ",Crime
Out of Time,"Matt Lee Whitlock (Denzel Washington) is the police chief of a small Florida town, going through a divorce with his detective wife, Alex (Eva Mendes). He begins a passionate affair with Ann (Sanaa Lathan), only to find out that she's stricken with terminal cancer. Matt steals a large sum of money confiscated from a drug bust in order to pay for Ann's treatment -- but when she apparently dies in a suspicious fire, the money disappears, and all the clues point to Matt as the culprit. ",Crime
Bandits,"Joe (Bruce Willis) and Terry (Billy Bob Thornton) have escaped from prison. Cutting a swath from Oregon through California, these fugitives rob banks in order to finance their scheme for a new -- and somewhat legitimate -- life south of the border. Unfortunately, things get more complicated when they meet Kate Wheeler (Cate Blanchett), who runs into Terry with her car. Kate joins the bandits on their cross-country spree, and eventually she steals something, too: their hearts. ",Comedy
Awake,"While undergoing surgery, a young man (Hayden Christensen) experiences intraoperative awareness. He becomes fully alert -- but paralyzed -- and therefore cannot tell his doctors that he is not sedated and is enduring the whole process. Meanwhile, his wife (Jessica Alba) wrestles with demons of her own while her husband suffers through his ordeal. ",Crime
Under Suspicion,A commercial trade agent becomes involved with three female spies and subsequently with the British Secret Service. ,Crime
Double Jeopardy,"When his lover (Rachel Ward) is accused of murder, a Salt Lake City family man (Bruce Boxleitner) is her eyewitness and his wife (Sela Ward) is her attorney. ",Crime
8MM,"Private detective Tom Welles (Nicolas Cage) lives a normal life with his wife (Catherine Keener) and young daughter, until he receives a startling new case. A widow named Mrs. Christian (Myra Carter) has found what appears to be a snuff film among her late husband's belongings, and she wants Welles to determine if the movie is real or fake. Welles heads to California, where a video store employee (Joaquin Phoenix) helps him infiltrate the dangerous and depraved world of illegal porn movies. ",Crime
Oscar,"Oscar is a young Jewish musician during WWII who, thanks to his talent, gains the sympathy of the Italian community in which he lives in mandatory residence. He joins the village band that is conducted by the priest. ",Comedy
Creep 2,A video artist quickly realizes she has made a mistake when she meets a serial killer in a cabin. ,Crime
Blood Father,An ex-convict (Mel Gibson) and his estranged daughter (Erin Moriarty) go on the run from her drug-dealing boyfriend (Diego Luna) and his vicious cartel. ,Crime
Muppets Most Wanted,"Dominic Badguy (Ricky Gervais), the Muppets' new manager, convinces the gang to embark on a world tour. Kermit the Frog doubts that it's a good idea -- a feeling that's proven right when look-alike Constantine escapes from prison, takes Kermit's place, and lands Miss Piggy's sweetie in a Siberian prison. While the frog tries to convince his captors of his true identity, Constantine and Dominic are free to carry out their plan to steal London's crown jewels. ",Adventure
The Frozen Ground,"A teenage escapee (Vanessa Hudgens) provides a critical break in the case, as an Alaskan detective (Nicolas Cage) hunts a serial killer who has been preying on women for 13 years. ",Crime
Compliance,"A fast-food worker (Dreama Walker) who's accused of theft is put through the wringer as her boss (Ann Dowd), at the direction of a phone caller who says he's a cop, subjects her to increasingly harsh forms of interrogation. ",Crime
Horns,"Blamed for the murder of his girlfriend, a man (Daniel Radcliffe) awakes one morning to find he has grown a pair of horns. Armed, now, with supernatural powers, he sets out to find the killer. ",Comedy
The Raven,A killer targets guests at a masquerade ball where murders occurred 50 years earlier. ,Crime
Stand Up Guys,"After serving 28 years in prison for accidentally killing the son of a crime boss, newly paroled gangster Val (Al Pacino) reunites with his former partners in crime, Doc (Christopher Walken) and Hirsch (Alan Arkin), for a night on the town. As the three men revisit old haunts, reflect on their glory days and try to make up for lost time, one wrestles with a terrible quandary: Doc has orders to kill Val, and time is running out for him to figure out a way out of his dilemma. ",Comedy
Solace,A psychic and a federal agent hunt a serial killer. ,Crime
No Sudden Move,"Set in 1954 Detroit, NO SUDDEN MOVE centers on a group of small-time criminals who are hired to steal what they think is a simple document. When their plan goes horribly wrong, their search for who hired them -- and for what ultimate purpose -- weaves them through all echelons of the race-torn, rapidly changing city. ",Crime
Child 44,"In 1950s Soviet Russia, secret police agent Leo Demidov (Tom Hardy) loses everything when he refuses to denounce his wife, Raisa (Noomi Rapace) as a traitor. Finding themselves exiled to a grim provincial outpost, Leo and Raisa join forces with Gen. Mikhail Nesterov (Gary Oldman) to capture a serial killer who preys on young boys. They soon find that their investigation threatens a system-wide cover-up enforced by Vasili (Joel Kinnaman), Leo's psychopathic rival. ",Crime
Sleuth,"Andrew Wyke (Michael Caine) is a highly successful mystery writer living in a beautiful and technologically advanced mansion in England. Milo Tindle (Jude Law) is an unsuccessful actor with decidedly less to show for his professional exploits. The lives of these two men cross paths when Andrew's wife leaves him for the younger Milo. Hoping to carry out a cleverly constructed revenge plot, Andrew invites Milo to his estate, where elaborate mind games ensue. ",Crime
The Number 23,"A man's (Jim Carrey) discovery of an obscure book about the number 23 leads him on a descent into darkness. As he becomes more obsessed with its contents, he becomes more convinced that it is, in fact, based on his life. To his horror, he discovers grave consequences in store for the book's main character. ",Crime
Unknown,"When five men awake in a locked warehouse, none of them can remember his identity or how he ended up locked inside with the others. They must determine who is good and who is bad, in order to stay alive. The film's events take place in reverse order, in a style reminiscent of ""Memento."" ",Crime
The Longest Yard,"Disgraced pro football quarterback Paul Crewe (Adam Sandler) lands in jail, where manipulative Warden Hazen (James Cromwell) recruits him to advise the institution's team. This turns into a lead role quarterbacking a crew of inmates in a game against a team of prison guards. Aided by incarcerated ex-NFL coach Nate Scarborough (Burt Reynolds), Crewe and his team must overcome not only the bloodthirstiness of the opposition, but also the corrupt officials trying to fix the game against them. ",Comedy
The Interpreter,"Eighty-year-old Jiri seeks revenge on the former SS officer who executed his parents. When he meets the man's son, the pair journey to meet surviving witnesses of war. ",Crime
Mean Machine,"In a rough-and-tumble British prison, where murderers, thieves and assorted madmen are locked away, inmate Danny Meehan (Vinnie Jones) is about to lead them all in the ultimate battle of their degenerate lives -- but no one could have guessed it would be a soccer match! Now, in an all-out playoff against the despised guards, the prisoners' goal isn't just to make goals; it's to prove the indomitable nature of the spirit, no matter how much it gets kicked, bloodied or knocked around. ",Comedy
The Cell,A special operations officer deals with multiple terrorist operations and hunts down terrorist cells. ,Crime
Ace Ventura: When Nature Calls,"Legendary pet detective Ace Ventura (Jim Carrey) returns for another adventure when he's coerced out of retirement while on a soul-searching retreat in the Himalayas. He must now retrieve an endangered white bat from a village located in Africa. The sacred animal was offered up as a wedding dowry from the Wachootoo prince to the Wachati princess, and, if Ace can't track down the culprit behind the kidnapping in time, civil war will break out between the two rival tribes. ",Adventure
The River Wild,"Fast-paced thriller in which a young family on a white-water rafting adventure in Montana are taken hostage by a pair of dangerous fugitives. The rafting holiday - a birthday gift for the New England couple's ten-year-old son - turns into a nightmare when the two armed killers take control and try to force the mother, a proficient rafter, to use her skills to help them escape down the treacherous rapids. ",Adventure
Malice,"Suburban Boston professional couple Andy (Bill Pullman) and Tracy (Nicole Kidman) become entangled with cocky trauma surgeon Dr. Jed Hill (Alec Baldwin), an old classmate of Andy's whom they invite to become their tenant in the large Victorian home they're renovating. Things become even more tangled when college dean Andy becomes implicated in a campus serial rape investigation and Jed performs an emergency surgery on Tracy with unforeseen complications that disrupt all their lives. ",Crime
I Care a Lot,"Poised with sharklike self-assurance, Marla Grayson (Academy Award nominee Rosamund Pike) is a professional, court-appointed guardian for dozens of elderly wards whose assets she seizes and cunningly bilks through dubious but legal means. It's a well-oiled racket that Marla and her business-partner and lover Fran (Eiza González) use with brutal efficiency on their latest ""cherry,"" Jennifer Peterson (two-time Academy Award winner Dianne Wiest) -- a wealthy retiree with no living heirs or family. But when their mark turns out to have an equally shady secret of her own and connections to a volatile gangster (Golden Globe winner Peter Dinklage), Marla is forced to level up in a game only predators can play -- one that's neither fair, nor square. ",Comedy
The Many Saints of Newark,"Young Anthony Soprano is growing up in one of the most tumultuous eras in Newark's history, becoming a man just as rival gangsters begin to rise up and challenge the all-powerful DiMeo crime family's hold over the increasingly race-torn city. Caught up in the changing times is the uncle he idolizes, Dickie Moltisanti, who struggles to manage both his professional and personal responsibilities--and whose influence over his impressionable nephew will help make the teenager into the all-powerful mob boss we'll later come to know: Tony Soprano. ",Crime
Death on the Nile,"On a luxurious cruise on the Nile River, a wealthy heiress, Linnet Ridgeway (Lois Chiles), is murdered. Fortunately, among the passengers are famed Belgian detective Hercule Poirot (Peter Ustinov) and his trusted companion, Colonel Race (David Niven), who immediately begin their investigation. But just as Poirot identifies a motley collection of would-be murderers, several of the suspects also meet their demise, which only deepens the mystery of the killer's identity. ",Crime
The Laundromat,"When her idyllic vacation takes an unthinkable turn, Ellen Martin begins investigating a fake insurance policy. ",Comedy
Cop Car,"Two mischievous boys (James Freedson-Jackson, Hays Wellford) stumble upon a seemingly abandoned police cruiser and steal it, unaware that its murderous owner (Kevin Bacon) has stashed a hostage in the trunk. ",Crime
The Family,Kinky carnage abounds around a sleazy family's efforts to shoot a pornographic snuff film of epic proportions. ,Comedy
Horrible Bosses 2,"Tired of always answering to others, Nick (Jason Bateman), Dale (Charlie Day) and Kurt (Jason Sudeikis) go into business for themselves. After demonstrating the prototype for an invention called the Shower Buddy, the guys attract the attention of Rex Hanson and his father, Bert. Bert invests in the trio's product, then cancels the order and steals their idea. Now heavily in debt and with no legal recourse, Nick, Dale and Kurt decide to kidnap Rex and use the ransom money to pay off their loans. ",Comedy
Secret in Their Eyes,"Hoping to put to rest years of unease concerning a past case, retired criminal investigator Benjamín Espósito (Ricardo Darín) begins writing a novel based on the decades-old unsolved mystery of a newlywed's rape and murder. With the help of a former colleague, Judge Irene Menéndez Hastings (Soledad Villamil), Benjamín attempts to make sense of the past. The journey through his memories sets Benjamín on a thrilling emotional path that leads to a shocking realization. ",Crime
The Voices,"A mentally unhinged factory worker (Ryan Reynolds) must decide whether to listen to his talking cat and become a killer, or follow his dog's advice to keep striving for normalcy. ",Comedy
Flypaper,A wealthy man's (Robert Loggia) plan to keep his daughter (Sadie Frost) away from an unsavory boyfriend sets off a chain of complicated events. ,Comedy
Kimi,"An agoraphobic tech worker discovers recorded evidence of a violent crime but is met with resistance when she tries to report it. Seeking justice, she must now do the thing she fears the most: she must leave her apartment. ",Crime
Date Night,"Dragged down by the daily grind, suburbanites Phil (Steve Carell) and Claire (Tina Fey) try to invigorate their marriage by visiting a trendy Manhattan bistro. They get more than romance when mistaken identity hurtles them into an incredible adventure involving corrupt cops, a mob boss and a crazy cab driver. ",Comedy
All Good Things,"Heir to a real-estate dynasty, David Marks (Ryan Gosling) lives in the shadow of his father, Sanford (Frank Langella). He takes a chance at true love when he meets Katie (Kirsten Dunst), a woman of modest origins who sees David's real worth as a person, not just his family's wealth. David and Katie marry and plan to build a life together, but their once-loving relationship deteriorates after David gives in to his father's demand that he work in the family business. ",Crime
The Little Things,Late 20-somethings search for love in New York City. ,Crime
Mindhunters,"FBI agent Jake Harris (Val Kilmer) escorts a group of cadets to a remote island for simulation training. The cadets, under the leadership of J.D. (Christian Slater), will try to catch an imaginary serial killer within the island's elaborate facility. The FBI, however, is suspicious of Harris' methods and dispatch Gabe Jensen (LL Cool J) to act as an outside observer. What he finds is a simulation exercise that becomes dangerously real and training that becomes a fight for survival. ",Crime
Death to Smoochy,"Tells the story of Rainbow Randolph (Robin Williams), the corrupt, costumed star of a popular children's TV show, who is fired over a bribery scandal and replaced by squeaky-clean Smoochy (Edward Norton), a puffy fuscia rhinoceros. As Smoochy catapults to fame - scoring hit ratings and the affections of a network executive (Catherine Keener) - Randolph makes the unsuspecting rhino the target of his numerous outrageous attempts to exact revenge and reclaim his status as America's sweetheart. ",Comedy
High Crimes,"A happily married, successful lawyer (Ashley Judd) is shocked to learn that her husband (Jim Caviezel) has a hidden past as a classified military operative, and is accused of committing a heinous war crime. As she prepares to defend her husband in a top-secret military court, where none of the rules she knows so well apply, she gets help from a wild card (Morgan Freeman) -- a former military attorney who doesn't play by anyone's rules. ",Crime
Nurse Betty,"What happens when a person decides that life is merely a state of mind? If you're Betty, a small-town waitress and soap opera fan from Fair Oaks, Kansas, you refuse to believe that you can't be with the love of your life just because he doesn't really exist. After all, life is no excuse for not living. Traumatized by a savage event, Betty enters into a fugue state that allows -- even encourages -- her to keep functioning... in a kind of alternate reality. ",Comedy
Intolerable Cruelty,"Miles Massey (George Clooney) is an exceptional divorce lawyer who specializes in saving cheating husbands from having to pay expensive settlements. Unchallenged, he wearies of his life -- until he meets the cunning Marylin Rexroth (Catherine Zeta-Jones). When Massey's representation of her husband in court denies her any divorce compensation, Marylin vows to get revenge, enlisting the help of an oil baron (Billy Bob Thornton), and the two vie for the advantage in a flirtatious duel of wits. ",Comedy
Very Bad Things,"Kyle Fisher (Jon Favreau) heads to Las Vegas for a bachelor party with four friends. When one of them accidentally kills a hired stripper and a security guard finds the body, unstable Boyd (Christian Slater) kills the guard to keep him from calling the cops, then organizes the group to dispose of the corpses. Back home, Kyle is troubled and has difficulty hiding his worries from his fiancée (Cameron Diaz). Meanwhile, to ensure his own safety, Boyd begins killing the others. ",Comedy
Throw Momma from the Train,"Larry (Billy Crystal), an author with a cruel ex-wife, Margaret (Kate Mulgrew), teaches a writing workshop where Owen (Danny DeVito), one of his students, is fed up with his domineering mother (Anne Ramsey). When Owen watches a Hitchcock classic that seems to mirror his own life, he decides to put the movie's plot into action and offers to kill Margaret, if Larry promises to murder his mom. Before Larry gets a chance to react to the plan, it seems that Owen has already sealed Margaret's fate. ",Comedy
American Gigolo,"Julian (Richard Gere), a gigolo, commands high prices for his services, living a lavish and emotionally unattached lifestyle under the management of Anne (Nina van Pallandt). While secretly working for pimp Leon (Bill Duke), Julian is assigned to service Mr. Rheiman (Tom Stewart) and his wife, Judy (Patti Carr), but leaves when their violent requests make him nervous. When Mrs. Rheiman is found dead and no one is willing to testify on his behalf, Julian finds himself the primary suspect. ",Crime
Synchronic,"When New Orleans paramedics and longtime best friends Steve and Dennis are called to a series of bizarre and gruesome accidents, they chalk it up to a mysterious new drug found at the scene. But after Dennis' oldest daughter disappears, Steve stumbles upon a terrifying truth about the supposed psychedelic that will challenge everything he knows about reality -- and the flow of time itself. ",Crime
Malignant,A man grieving his wife becomes a victim in a horrific experiment to cure his addiction. ,Crime
The Whole Truth,"An architect (Dyan Kane) and a magic-store owner (Dan Cohen) go from courtship to court, where both sides of their story come out. ",Crime
Dark Places,"The true value of an estate brings out the worst in the deceased's doctor (Christopher Lee), lawyer, sister (Joan Collins) and rightful heir (Robert Hardy). ",Crime
Hummingbird,Two non-profit groups give aid to Brazilian women and children in need. ,Action
Killing Them Softly,"When rival crook Johnny Amato (Vincent Curatola) hatches a plan to rob a card game run by mob lackey Markie (Ray Liotta), he picks a low-rent thug named Frankie (Scoot McNairy) to do the job. Frankie picks a less-than-ideal partner (Ben Mendelsohn) to help him, but despite their combined incompetence, they manage to make off with the mob's money. In retaliation, Markie's bosses hire Jackie Cogan (Brad Pitt), a mob enforcer, to eradicate those responsible. ",Crime
Deadfall,"Henry (Michael Caine) is an alcoholic cat burglar finishing up a drying-out stint at a sanatorium. He's approached by an Italian belle, Fé (Giovanna Ralli), who has a proposition: She and her husband, Richard (Eric Portman), are planning to rob the millionaire Salinas (David Buck) when he's at a concert, and they need a thief to do it. After the heist, Henry, Fé and Richard retreat to the couple's Spanish villa, where hidden truths and scandalous secrets slowly come out. ",Crime
London Boulevard,A parolee battles a gangster for the affections of a reclusive movie star. ,Crime
The Card Counter,"Redemption is the long game in Paul Schrader's THE CARD COUNTER. Told with Schrader's trademark cinematic intensity, the revenge thriller tells the story of an ex-military interrogator turned gambler haunted by the ghosts of his past decisions, and features riveting performances from stars Oscar Isaac, Tiffany Haddish, Tye Sheridan and Willem Dafoe. ",Crime
Lions for Lambs,"Inspired by their idealistic professor, Dr. Mallery (Robert Redford), to do something meaningful with their lives, Arian (Derek Luke) and Ernest (Michael Peña) join the military and ship out to Afghanistan. Their experiences tie together two separate but related stories. In California, Mallery tries to break through to a disaffected student, while in Washington, D.C., a presidential hopeful (Tom Cruise) prepares to give a journalist (Meryl Streep) the scoop of a lifetime. ",Crime
Two for the Money,A former college athlete (Matthew McConaughey) joins forces with a sports consultant (Al Pacino) to handicap football games for high-rolling gamblers. ,Crime
Taking Lives,"An insidious serial killer is impersonating his victims' identities as he travels across Canada. A recent spate of murders in Montreal has brought FBI Agent Illeana Scott (Angelina Jolie) north to investigate. Scott's unusual methods quickly earn the suspicion of the local police but bring her close to art dealer James Costa (Ethan Hawke), who says he was an eyewitness to the latest murder. Sparks develop between the two as Costa's role becomes crucial in their effort to apprehend the killer. ",Crime
Femme Fatale,"A California forest ranger (Colin Firth) seeks his bride (Lisa Zane) and discovers, with his artist friend (Billy Zane), her dark sides. ",Crime
Heartbreakers,"Blue (Peter Coyote) and Eli (Nick Mancuso) are buddies living in a bohemian subculture of Los Angeles. Blue is an artist waiting for recognition, while Eli is a businessman waiting for his father to bequeath him the family lingerie factory. They are both looking for love, sex or some combination thereof, and engage meanwhile in friendly competition with one another. When Liliane (Carole Laure) arrives on the scene, their friendship is severely tested and they must decide what is truly important. ",Comedy
Hackers,"A teenage hacker finds himself framed for the theft of millions of dollars from a major corporation. Master hacker Dade Murphy, aka Zero Cool, aka Crash Override, has been banned from touching a keyboard for seven years after crashing over 1,500 Wall Street computers at the age of 11. Now keen to get back in front of a monitor, he finds himself in more trouble than ever. ",Crime
Needful Things,"When a creepy older man named Leland Gaunt (Max von Sydow) moves to a small town in Maine and sets up an antique shop, bad things soon follow. Gaunt has the remarkable ability of selling people exactly what they want most, but his ideal purchases come at a price that involves more than just money. Through Gaunt's manipulation, the citizens of the town gradually turn on one another, resulting in violence that Sheriff Alan Pangborn (Ed Harris) struggles to contain. ",Crime
Anon,"In the near future, private memories are recorded and crime has almost ceased to exist. But in trying to solve a series of murders, troubled detective Sal Frieland stumbles upon a young woman known only as ""The Girl."" She has no identity, no history and is invisible to the cops. Sal realizes this may not be the end of crime, and it could be the beginning of it. ",Crime
Dom Hemingway,"After serving 12 years in prison, a skilled safecracker (Jude Law) seeks payback and a chance to reconcile with his daughter (Emilia Clarke). ",Comedy
Duplicity,A woman (Polly Frame) is unsure who to trust after discovering that her murdered husband's $18 million fortune is missing. ,Comedy
The Killer Inside Me,An encounter with an aggressive prostitute (Jessica Alba) brings a Texas lawman's (Casey Affleck) homicidal tendencies screaming to the surface. ,Crime
The Oxford Murders,"American math student Martin transfers to Oxford in the hope of persuading renowned philosopher Arthur Seldom to oversee his thesis, but the murder of Martin's landlady plunges the pair into a mathematical mystery. Could an ""unsolvable"" math problem provide the answers to their murderous conundrum? ",Adventure
Fun with Dick and Jane,"After Dick Harper (Jim Carrey) loses his job at Globodyne in an Enron-esque collapse, he and his wife, Jane (Téa Leoni), turn to crime in order to handle the massive debt they now face. Two intelligent people, Dick and Jane actually get pretty good at robbing people and even enjoy it -- but they have second thoughts when they're reminded that crime can hurt innocent people. When the couple hears that Globodyne boss Jack McCallister (Alec Baldwin) actually swindled the company, they plot revenge. ",Comedy
Hannibal Rising,"After witnessing the violent deaths of his parents at the end of World War II, young Hannibal Lecter (Gaspard Ulliel) flees to his uncle's home in Paris. He learns his uncle is dead, but the man's mysterious Japanese widow, Lady Murasaki (Gong Li) welcomes him nonetheless. An aptitude for science helps Hannibal gain acceptance to medical school, where he hones the skills he needs to exact revenge for the atrocities he witnessed. ",Adventure
City by the Sea,"When a respected New York homicide detective (Robert De Niro) discovers the prime suspect in a murder case is his estranged son (James Franco), he is forced to return home to the decaying boardwalks of Long Beach, Long Island to confront the darkness of his past. During the course of the investigation, he realizes that his failures as a father - and his unresolved anguish about the painful estrangement - have deeply influenced his son's life. ",Crime
Murder by Numbers,"Hired by the deceased's ex-wife, a private eye (Sam Behrens) checks out the death of a gay man who had AIDS. ",Crime
Snake Eyes,"Detective Rick Santoro (Nicolas Cage) has never played by the rules. When he attends a high-profile boxing match with his friend Navy Cmdr. Kevin Dunne (Gary Sinise), as well as Defense Secretary Kirkland (Joel Fabiani), he witnesses a terrorist assassinate Kirkland. Despite a lockdown on the arena, key witness Julia Costello (Carla Gugino) escapes -- and Santoro begins to suspect Kirkland's death is part of a much larger conspiracy that involves boxing rivals and a beautiful stranger. ",Crime
Airheads,"Three aspiring rock musicians -- Chazz (Brendan Fraser), Pip (Adam Sandler) and Rex (Steve Buscemi) -- are determined to have their band's demo tape played on the air. Out of desperation, they sneak into a Los Angeles radio station, but when the manager, Milo (Michael McKean), meets them with hostility, they resort to threatening him with realistic-looking water pistols. Soon the situation escalates, and the none-too-bright rockers get in over their heads. ",Comedy
Point of No Return,A policeman seeks to avenge his partner's death and tracks down a key eyewitness. ,Action
Twins,A sex tape threatens to tear apart famous identical twins. ,Comedy
Get Hard,"When obscenely rich hedge-fund manager James (Will Ferrell) is convicted of fraud and sentenced to a stretch in San Quentin, the judge gives him one month to get his affairs in order. Knowing that he won't survive more than a few minutes in prison on his own, James desperately turns to Darnell (Kevin Hart) -- a black businessman who's never even had a parking ticket -- for help. As Darnell puts James through the wringer, both learn that they were wrong about many things, including each other. ",Comedy
The Gambler,A French tutor is determined to save a general's family from financial ruin. ,Crime
Righteous Kill,"Detectives Thomas Cowan (Robert De Niro) and David Fisk (Al Pacino), 30-year veterans of the NYPD, investigate the murder of a pimp. The crime resembles a case they solved many years earlier. As the body count rises, they realize they're dealing with a vigilante taking over when the police fail. The similarities between past and present crimes leads the detectives to wonder if they put the wrong man behind bars. ",Crime
Super Troopers 2,"Fired for their previous shenanigans, former Vermont Highway Patrol officers Thorny, Farva, Rabbit, Foster and Mac get a shot at redemption from Capt. O'Hagan and Gov. Jessan. The wacky quintet must provide law enforcement for a French Canadian town that's transitioning to U.S. sovereignty. Their unconventional methods soon get put to the test when they encounter a smarmy mayor, mischievous Mounties, a smuggling ring and a 1,300-pound bear. ",Comedy
Deception,"London - 1987. Philip is a famous American writer living in exile in London. His mistress comes regularly to see him in his office, a refuge for the two lovers. They make love here, they argue, they reconcile and talk for hours - about the women who mark out his life, about sex, antisemitism, literature, and remaining true to oneself... ",Crime
13,"When Jesus looks into the eyes of Magdalena, she believes she's destined to become a nun. Then, she's told by an angel that she must give birth to 13 children on the 13th of each month. ",Crime
Birthday Girl,"John (Ben Chaplin) is a mild-mannered banker who has never been lucky in love. Fed up with waiting for the right girl to come along, John takes a chance on a Russian mail-order bride arranged via the Internet. His Internet love connection is the enigmatic Nadia (Nicole Kidman). When Nadia's Russian cousins, Yuri and Alexei, turn up unexpectedly to celebrate her birthday, John's life is turned upside down as he learns the truth behind their relationship and is taken on an adventure. ",Comedy
Tequila Sunrise,"In a seaside California town, best friends Mac (Mel Gibson) and Nick (Kurt Russell) are on opposite sides of the law. Mac is a former drug dealer trying to clean up his act, while Nick is a high-profile detective trying to take down a Mexican drug lord named Carlos (Raul Julia). Soon Nick's loyalties are put to the test when he begins an affair with restaurateur Jo Ann (Michelle Pfeiffer) -- a love interest of Mac's -- unwittingly leading his friend into a police-orchestrated trap. ",Crime
Dragnet,"Sgt. Joe Friday (Jack Webb) and Officer Frank Smith (Ben Alexander) are Los Angeles Police Department detectives, and they need every bit of skill they have to solve their latest case: the shooting death of low-end bookie Miller Starkie. While initial evidence points to gangster Max Troy (Stacy Harris) and his trigger-man, Chester Davitt, Friday and Smith have trouble getting an indictment. Only through their own tenaciousness can they make sure justice is served. ",Comedy
Pink Flamingos,"A bizarre fat woman (Divine) and her misfit family compete with a Baltimore couple (David Lochary, Mink Stole) to be named the filthiest people alive. ",Comedy
Orphan: First Kill,"Esther's terrifying saga continues in this thrilling prequel to the original and shocking horror hit ""Orphan."" After orchestrating a brilliant escape from an Estonian psychiatric facility, Esther travels to America by impersonating the missing daughter of a wealthy family. Yet, an unexpected twist arises that pits her against a mother who will protect her family from the murderous ""child"" at any cost. ",Crime
P2,"Angela (Rachel Nichols) is working late on Christmas Eve. When she finally decides to leave, she goes down to the parking garage to get her car, but it won't start. Thomas (Wes Bentley), the garage's security guard, offers to help. He also invites Angela to dinner, but she refuses. Thomas, crazed, knocks her out. She wakes up in Thomas' office, chained to a chair and in different clothes. Now Angela must fight for her life in order the escape from the garage. ",Crime
88 Minutes,"Famed forensic psychiatrist Dr. Jack Gramm (Al Pacino) enjoys a reputation as one of the most sought-after profilers around. His expert testimony has resulted in the conviction of many criminals, including serial killer Jon Forster. On the eve of Forster's execution, one of Gramm's students is murdered in a vicious copycat crime, and Gramm himself receives an ominous message informing him that he has less than 90 minutes to live. ",Crime
Analyze That,"Mob boss Paul Vitti (Robert De Niro) is nearing the end of his term in Sing Sing, and the FBI agents monitoring him are baffled. Day after day they watch as New York's most notorious gangland figure walks around his cell in a semi-catatonic stupor. Is Vitti having a nervous breakdown because of recent threats on his life or is his odd behavior merely a foxy ploy to get him sprung from jail early? ",Comedy
Mickey Blue Eyes,"English art dealer Michael Felgate (Hugh Grant) is dumbfounded to learn that his girlfriend, Gina Vitale (Jeanne Tripplehorn), cannot accept his marriage proposal because her entire family is involved with the Mafia. Undeterred and in love, Michael meets Gina's father, mob boss Frank (James Caan), who immediately takes a shine to the young suitor. But before he can give his blessing, Frank has plans for Michael that may or may not end in wedding bells. ",Comedy
The Last House on the Left,"Mari and her friend look forward to a holiday at the remote Collingwood lakehouse, but instead an escaped convict (Garret Dillahunt) and his crew kidnap them and later leave them for dead. Mari makes her way back home, where her parents, John (Tony Goldwyn) and Emma (Monica Potter), have unwittingly offered shelter to the thugs. When John and Emma find out what happened to their daughter, they decide to make the strangers rue the day they harmed Mari. ",Crime
The Hangover Part III,"It's been two years since the gang known as the Wolfpack narrowly escaped disaster in Bangkok. Now, Phil (Bradley Cooper), Stu (Ed Helms) and Doug (Justin Bartha) have happy lives at home -- but Alan (Zach Galifianakis) doesn't. Still lacking contentment and a sense of purpose, Alan has gone off his meds and surrendered to his natural impulses. It's up to the other members of the Wolfpack to get him through his personal crisis by embarking on a road trip to the place it all began: Las Vegas. ",Comedy
Saving Silverman,"The film traces the misadventures of buddies J.D. (Jack Black) and Wayne (Steve Zahn), who begin to suspect that their best friend, Darren Silverman (Jason Biggs), is going to allow himself to be badgered into marrying Judith (Amanda Peet), a woman he doesn't love. They decide to reunite him with his long lost love from their school days (Amanda Detmer) -- even if they have to kidnap Judith to do it. ",Comedy
The Glass House,"At a unique rehab-and-education center in Iran, teenage girls receive help in overcoming their addictions and education in life skills they can use to make better lives for themselves. ",Crime
Jigsaw,"Ten actors (Danny Vasquez, Nicole Warner) have to survive three killers and each other to win a million dollars. ",Crime
Identity Thief,"Florida resident Diana (Melissa McCarthy) has a luxurious lifestyle as the queen of retail, buying whatever strikes her fancy -- and it's all free, thanks to Sandy Patterson (Jason Bateman), a guy from Denver whose identity she stole. With just one week to track down Diana before his world implodes, the real Sandy heads south to confront the unapologetic con artist and bring her back to Denver so that he can clear his name and restore his shattered credit rating. ",Comedy
Observe and Report,"As head of security at the Forest Ridge Mall, Ronnie Barnhardt (Seth Rogen) takes his job very seriously, enforcing mall rules with an iron fist. When a flasher strikes Forest Ridge, Ronnie sees a chance to display his unappreciated cop skills and bring the felon to justice, and, at the same time, impress his dream girl (Anna Faris) and win a coveted spot at the police academy. ",Comedy
Suburbicon,"Suburbicon is a peaceful, idyllic, suburban community with affordable homes and manicured lawns -- the perfect place to raise a family, and in the summer of 1959, the Lodge family is doing just that. But the tranquil surface masks a disturbing reality, as husband and father Gardner Lodge must navigate the town's dark underbelly of betrayal, deceit and violence. ",Comedy
Perfect Stranger,A man has a one-night stand with his friend's girlfriend. ,Crime
White Chicks,"Two FBI agent brothers, Marcus (Marlon Wayans) and Kevin Copeland (Shawn Wayans), accidentally foil a drug bust. As punishment, they are forced to escort a pair of socialites (Anne Dudek, Rochelle Aytes) to the Hamptons, where they're going to be used as bait for a kidnapper. But when the girls realize the FBI's plan, they refuse to go. Left without options, Marcus and Kevin decide to pose as the sisters, transforming themselves from African-American men into a pair of blonde, white women. ",Comedy
Enough,Three women console one another because their husbands want them to remain housewives. ,Crime
101 Dalmatians,"In a Disney animation classic, Dalmatian Pongo is tired of his bachelor-dog life. He spies lovely Perdita and maneuvers his master, Roger, into meeting Perdita's owner, Anita. The owners fall in love and marry, keeping Pongo and Perdita together too. After Perdita gives birth to a litter of 15 puppies, Anita's old school friend Cruella De Vil wants to buy them all. Roger declines her offer, so Cruella hires the criminal Badun brothers to steal them -- so she can have a fur coat. ",Adventure
The House,Ga-young moves into an old neighborhood and befriends the spirits of each abandoned house. ,Comedy
Regression,A detective (Ethan Hawke) and a psychoanalyst (David Thewlis) uncover evidence of a satanic cult while investigating the rape of a traumatized teen (Emma Watson). ,Adventure
Runner Runner,"Believing that he has been swindled, Princeton grad student Richie (Justin Timberlake) goes to Costa Rica to confront online-gambling tycoon Ivan Block (Ben Affleck). Block's promises of immense wealth and power have a seductive effect on Richie, until he learns the shocking truth about his new mentor. When Richie is coerced by the FBI to help bring Block to justice, he faces the biggest gamble of his life: outmaneuvering the two forces closing in on him. ",Crime
Bad Santa 2,"Fueled by cheap whiskey, greed and hatred, Willie Soke (Billy Bob Thornton) teams up with his angry little sidekick, Marcus, to knock off a Chicago charity on Christmas Eve. Along for the ride is chubby and cheery Thurman Merman, a 250-pound ray of sunshine who brings out Willie's sliver of humanity. Mommy issues arise when the pair are joined by Willie's horror story of a mother, Sunny Soke, who raises the bar for the gang's ambitions, while somehow lowering the standards of criminal behavior. ",Comedy
The Hitcher,"While transporting a car from Chicago to San Diego, Jim Halsey (C. Thomas Howell) picks up a hitchhiker named John Ryder (Rutger Hauer), who claims to be a serial killer. After a daring escape, Jim hopes to never see Ryder again. But when he witnesses the hitchhiker murdering an entire family, Jim pursues Ryder with the help of truck-stop waitress Nash (Jennifer Jason Leigh), pitting the rivals against each other in a deadly series of car chases and brutal murders. ",Crime
The Pink Panther,"In this first film of the beloved comic series, dashing European thief Sir Charles Lytton (David Niven) plans to steal a diamond, but he's not the only one with his eyes on the famous jewel known as the ""Pink Panther."" His nephew George (Robert Wagner) also aims to make off with the gem, and to frame Charles for the crime. Blundering French police inspector Jacques Clouseau (Peter Sellers) intercedes, but finds his career -- and his freedom -- jeopardized. ",Adventure
Be Cool,"Having made the transition from gangster to movie producer, Chili Palmer (John Travolta) is ready for the next big move. Setting his sights on the music industry, Palmer enters a precarious business that has more than just temperamental musicians: Russian mobsters, rival producers and hit men are out to bring him down. From witnessing the murder of his friend (James Woods) to romancing a music executive's widow (Uma Thurman), it seems as though it might all fall apart, but Palmer has his ways. ",Comedy
Domestic Disturbance,"Frank Morrison (John Travolta) no longer lives with his ex-wife, Susan (Teri Polo), and 12-year-old son, Danny (Matt O'Leary). Susan and Danny now live with Rick Barnes (Vince Vaughn), Susan's new husband. Danny, who has a reputation for telling lies, has accused his stepfather of committing a murder. But Frank is the only one who believes him. Now the father Danny trusts must protect him from the stepfather he fears. ",Crime
House on Haunted Hill,"Rich oddball Frederick Loren has a proposal for five guests at a possibly haunted mansion: show up, survive a night filled with scares and receive $10,000 each. The guest of honor is Loren's estranged wife, Annabelle, who, with her secret lover, Dr. Trent, has concocted her own scheme to scare Loren's associate, Nora Manning, into shooting the potentially crazy millionaire. However, more spooks and shocks throw a wrench into the plan. ",Crime
Jawbreaker,"When an exclusive clique of teenage socialites accidentally murders their best friend, Liz (Charlotte Ayanna), on the morning of her birthday, the three girls responsible -- Courtney (Rose McGowan), Julie (Rebecca Gayheart) and Marcie (Julie Benz) -- conspire to hide the truth. As the trio make over nerdy reject Fern Mayo (Judy Greer) and groom her to take Liz's place, crack police Detective Vera Cruz (Pam Grier) launches an investigation that will turn Reagan High School upside down. ",Comedy
The Counselor,"A Bentley-driving Texas lawyer (Michael Fassbender) appears to have it all, including a beautiful fiancee named Laura (Penélope Cruz) -- but his financial needs force him to become involved in an ill-advised drug deal. His partners in the venture include middleman Westray (Brad Pitt), shady nightclub owner Reiner (Javier Bardem) and Malkina (Cameron Diaz), Reiner's sociopathic lover. Unsurprisingly, the counselor's deal spirals out of control, placing both him and Laura in mortal danger. ",Crime
The Hustle,"Two friends (Charlie Murphy, Al Shearer) must pay a gangster $10,000 within seven days. ",Comedy
Spring Breakers,"College students Candy (Vanessa Hudgens), Faith (Selena Gomez), Brit (Ashley Benson) and Cotty (Rachel Korine) are short of the cash they need for a spring-break trip, so they rob a diner and head down to Florida. However, the police soon break up the party and arrest them. The curvaceous quartet are unexpectedly bailed out by a drug dealer and aspiring rap artist named Alien (James Franco). Soon after, three of the four gal pals decide to join Alien in a life of crime. ",Crime
Trespass,"Firefighters Vince (Bill Paxton) and Don (William Sadler) venture into gang-infested territory to find gold that's been hidden inside an abandoned building. But when they witness a murder, they become the targets of crime lord King James (Ice-T) and his underling Savon (Ice Cube). Fortunately, the treasure hunters have kidnapped a bargaining chip: King James' half-brother, Lucky (Devoreaux White). But this might not be enough to get them -- and their gold -- out of the building intact. ",Crime
The Resident,A landlord becomes obsessed with a doctor (Hilary Swank) who moves into his building. ,Crime
Balls of Fury,"A hard fall from grace strips Randy Daytona (Dan Fogler) of being considered a pingpong phenomenon. Now he must bounce back to take on an undercover assignment for the government. The FBI wants him to enter a tournament sponsored by Feng (Christopher Walken), a ping-pong enthusiast and notorious criminal. Randy must get the goods on Feng and bring him to justice. ",Comedy
The Watcher,A young couple are tormented by unseen forces trying to force them out of their home. ,Crime
A Nightmare on Elm Street,"In Wes Craven's classic slasher film, several Midwestern teenagers fall prey to Freddy Krueger (Robert Englund), a disfigured midnight mangler who preys on the teenagers in their dreams -- which, in turn, kills them in reality. After investigating the phenomenon, Nancy (Heather Langenkamp) begins to suspect that a dark secret kept by her and her friends' parents may be the key to unraveling the mystery, but can Nancy and her boyfriend Glen (Johnny Depp) solve the puzzle before it's too late? ",Crime
Paul Blart: Mall Cop,"A single suburban father (Kevin James) works at a mall as a security guard to make ends meet, and he takes his job very seriously, even though most of his colleagues and customers don't. As the holidays approach, Paul gets his moment to shine when Santa's little helpers shut down the mall down and take hostages, including his daughter and girlfriend. He realizes no one knows the place better than he does, and he mounts his trusty steed, a Segway, and goes to the rescue. ",Action
Bachchhan Paandey,"Myra Devekar, a budding director, is given a task by a producer to come up with a gripping and violent gangster story to produce as a film. To satisfy the producer's commercial outlook and her hunger for making a realistic flick, she decides to study the life of a real-life gangster for the script. Her extensive research leads to menacing, one-eyed 'Bachchan Pandey' of Baagwa, a ruthless gangster surrounded by quirky, yet scary henchmen. Myra's discreet and secret attempts to research the life of Bachchan Pandey fail miserably, and she gets caught by the merciless gangster for snooping. What happens next in this twist of tales forms the narrative of this film, taking us on a fun-filled roller-coaster ride. ",Action
Spiral: From the Book of Saw,"A criminal mastermind unleashes a twisted form of justice in Spiral, the terrifying new chapter from the book of Saw. Working in the shadow of his father, an esteemed police veteran (Samuel L. Jackson), brash Detective Ezekiel ""Zeke"" Banks (Chris Rock) and his rookie partner (Max Minghella) take charge of a grisly investigation into murders that are eerily reminiscent of the city's gruesome past. Unwittingly entrapped in a deepening mystery, Zeke finds himself at the center of the killer's morbid game. ",Crime
Hot Pursuit,A couple elude police and a one-eyed assassin as they travel across the country to find an auto magnate's killer. ,Action
The Snowman,An adventurer who has repeatedly outwitted his enemies meets his first real test in a mysterious woman. ,Crime
Alex Cross,"Alex Cross (Tyler Perry) works as a detective/psychologist for the Detroit Police Department along with his lifelong friend, Tommy Kane (Edward Burns), and detective Monica Ashe (Rachel Nichols). Cross' latest case puts him on a collision course with Picasso (Matthew Fox), a cunning serial killer whose ultimate target is multinational industrialist Giles Mercier (Jean Reno). Cross must find a way inside Picasso's head not only to catch the killer but also to stem the violent urges Cross feels. ",Action
Cosmopolis,A 28-year-old billionaire (Robert Pattinson) senses his empire collapsing around him as he takes a limo ride across Manhattan to get a haircut from his father's old barber. ,Crime
Agent Cody Banks,"High school student Cody Banks wants nothing more than what every other teen wants: to survive the banality of adolescence and become an adult. However, Banks is no ordinary teen; he's a CIA agent. When he's not doing his homework, Banks is on the case, spying on fellow student Natalie Connors to get close to her father, a scientist who has invented killer nanobots designed to bring down the country. ",Action
Get Carter,"Jack Carter (Michael Caine) is a cold-blooded London gangster, and not the sort of man you want to cross. When Carter's brother winds up dead, he travels to Newcastle to arrange the funeral. Convinced that his brother was murdered, Carter questions local thug Eric (Ian Hendry), who eventually leads him to kingpin Kinnear. From there, Carter carves a bloody trail of revenge through the seedy underbelly of Newcastle in search of his brother's killer. ",Action
Happy New Year,"A jewel thief (Peter Falk) flirts with a Palm Beach, Fla., antiques dealer (Wendy Hughes) while planning a heist with his buddy (Charles Durning). ",Action
Blues Brothers 2000,"The now-brotherless Ellwood Blues (Dan Aykroyd) is finally out of prison, attempting to reunite the old band and find a few new partners in crime (John Goodman), (J. Evan Bonifant). In this sequel to the original ""Blues Brothers"" comedy/musical, Ellwood battles the Chicago police, sings and dances his way out of numerous sticky situations, and manages to get the old band on the road for a hair-raising adventure. ",Action
Police Academy 4: Citizens on Patrol,"Feeling that his squad is not up to snuff, a police commander comes up with an unorthodox plan to hire everyday citizens to work alongside police officers. Unruly Sgt. Carey Mahoney (Steve Guttenberg) is given the job of training the citizens. At first Mahoney does not take the job seriously, but, when he learns that his nemesis, Capt. Harris (G.W. Bailey), is gunning for his commander's job, Mahoney focuses on making the plan work -- and bringing down Harris at the same time. ",Comedy
Texas Chainsaw Massacre,"In this remake of the horror classic, a group of young travelers -- including Erin (Jessica Biel), Andy (Mike Vogel) and Morgan (Jonathan Tucker) -- comes across an isolated rural home while driving through Texas. Unfortunately for them, the decrepit house is the residence of a family of deranged backwoods killers, most notably a hulking masked brute known as Leatherface (Andrew Bryniarski), who begins to hunt the stranded youths down. Will any of the friends survive the nightmarish ordeal? ",Crime
Tekken,Jin (Jon Foo) trains to fight Anvil after he witnesses him murdering his mother. ,Action
Crocodile Dundee in Los Angeles,"Mick Dundee (Paul Hogan) is an adventurer in the truest sense. He is an ace crocodile hunter who lives in the wilds of the Australian Outback. He has even survived the dangers of New York City. However, his latest adventure may be the biggest test for him yet. Mick Dundee is traveling to that bizarre netherworld - Los Angeles, California. ",Action
The Spirit,"Apparently murdered cop Denny Colt (Gabriel Macht) returns as the Spirit, dedicated to protecting Central City from crime. His archenemy, the Octopus (Samuel L. Jackson), is a ruthless killer who will destroy the Spirit's well-loved city to find the secret of immortality. As the Spirit pursues his quarry, he meets many beautiful women who would be happy to either kiss or kill him. ",Action
Elektra,"Assassin-for-hire Elektra (Jennifer Garner) works for a mysterious international organization known as the Hand, for which she kills her targets without question, and in a conspicuous red bustier, no less. When the Hand asks her to kill Mark Miller (Goran Visnjic) and his daughter, Abby (Kirsten Prout), while they're on holiday, Elektra's conscience kicks in and she decides to protect her targets rather than eliminate them. Of course, the Hand isn't so willing to let them off the hook. ",Action
Taxi,"After a slew of traffic accidents, police detective Andy Washburn is demoted and has his driver's license revoked by his lieutenant. While on duty one day, Andy learns of a bank robbery and hails a taxi driven by new cabbie Belle. They lose the robbers in a chase through New York City, and Belle's taxi is impounded. Andy promises to get the car back for Belle if she helps him catch the thieves. ",Action
Home Alone 3,"When an inept group of criminals tries to get a stolen top-secret computer chip through airport security, it ends up in a toy car in the luggage of the elderly Mrs. Hess (Marian Seldes). Unable to promptly retrieve the chip, the felons follow Hess and the car to her neighborhood. After she gives the toy to young Alex Pruitt (Alex D. Linz), who is home sick from school, he becomes the target of the criminals. However, the precocious kid is on to their schemes and ready to fight the thieves off. ",Action
Striptease,"When her ex-husband gets custody of their daughter, former FBI office assistant Erin Grant (Demi Moore) needs money to fight the legal case to get her child back. As a result, she takes a job dancing at the Eager Beaver strip club in Miami, where she befriends an imposing bouncer named Shad (Ving Rhames). Unfortunately, she also becomes an object of obsession for politician David Dilbeck (Burt Reynolds), who gets what he wants through charm and violence -- and what he wants is Erin. ",Comedy
Police Academy 5: Assignment: Miami Beach,"The vacationing rookies rescue their leader (George Gaynes) from jewel thieves, with a local duo (Matt McCoy, Janet Jones) as backup. ",Comedy
Paul Blart: Mall Cop 2,"Six years after he saved the day at his beloved New Jersey shopping mall, security guard Paul Blart (Kevin James) is taking a well-deserved vacation. In recognition for his hard work, he's won an all-expenses-paid trip to a security convention in Las Vegas, and decides to take his teenage daughter, Maya (Raini Rodriguez), with him. True to form, however, Paul just can't relax and take it easy, so when he uncovers a criminal threat to the hotel, he springs into action. ",Action
Little Man,"Posing as an abandoned toddler, a very small fugitive (Marlon Wayans) from the law tricks a couple (Shawn Wayans, Kerry Washington) into taking him in. Once there, the baby-faced thief endures the other man's attempts at fatherhood while waiting for a chance to take back the stolen gem he hid in the wife's purse. ",Comedy
xXx: State of the Union,"When the government finds out that a group of terrorists has infiltrated its ranks, and the group is being trained by high-ranking official George Deckert (Willem Dafoe), NSA Agent Augustus Gibbons (Samuel L. Jackson) hires an ex-con to bring down the nefarious plot. Thinking he can trust no one in the government, Augustus springs Darius Stone (Ice Cube), who once trained under him, from prison. Although Darius is a loose cannon, Augustus is convinced he is the only man for the job. ",Action
Kangaroo Jack,"Two friends from Brooklyn (Jerry O'Connell), (Anthony Anderson) are forced to deliver mob money to Australia. Their misadventures begin when one of them places his red jacket on a kangaroo while attempting to snap a picture. When the kangaroo bounces off, they realize the mob money is in the jacket and are forced to give chase through the Outback. ",Action
Police Academy 6: City Under Siege,"Clownish police officers (Bubba Smith, David Graf, Michael Winslow) are on the lookout for a three-ring circus of thieves. ",Comedy
Inspector Gadget,"John Brown (Matthew Broderick) is a bumbling but well-intentioned security guard who is badly injured in an explosion planned by an evil mastermind. He is taken to a laboratory, where Brenda (Joely Fisher), a leading robotics surgeon, replaces his damaged limbs with state-of-the-art gadgets and tools. Named ""Inspector Gadget"" by the press, John -- along with his niece, Penny (Michelle Trachtenberg), and her trusty dog, Brain -- uses his new powers to discover who was behind the explosion. ",Action
RoboCop 3,"Greedy corporation Omni Consumer Products is determined to begin development on its dream project, Delta City, which will replace the derelict Detroit. To achieve this end, O.C.P. is employing armed forces to bully residents out of the city, under the guise that they are just doing their part to reduce crime and root out thugs. After RoboCop (Robert John Burke) joins the civilian resistance, he sustains severe injuries but recovers to battle advanced ninja robots developed by O.C.P. ",Action
Speed 2: Cruise Control,"Annie (Sandra Bullock) is looking forward to a Caribbean cruise with her cop boyfriend, Alex (Jason Patric), who purchased the tickets to make up for lying about working on the SWAT team. Their trip turns dangerous, however, when an explosion disables the ship's communication system and it becomes clear that the vessel is under someone else's control. Alex and Annie must fight for survival as they discover that John Geiger (Willem Dafoe), a crazed passenger, is behind the chaos. ",Action
Escape Plan 2: Hades,"Ray Breslin manages an elite team of security specialists trained in the art of breaking people out of the world's most impenetrable prisons. When his trusted operative, Shu Ren, is kidnapped and disappears inside the most elaborate prison ever built, Ray assembles an elite team to assist in the rescue. ",Action
Catwoman,"""Catwoman"" is the story of shy, sensitive artist Patience Philips (Halle Berry), a woman who can't seem to stop apologizing for her own existence. She works as a graphic designer for Hedare Beauty, a mammoth cosmetics company on the verge of releasing a revolutionary anti-aging product. When Patience inadvertently happens upon a dark secret her employer is hiding, she finds herself in the middle of a corporate conspiracy. What happens next changes Patience forever. ",Action
Heropanti 2,"Babloo (Tiger Shroff) is a computer genius and Inaaya (Tara Sutaria) is a self-made billionaire. The two fall in love but due to unforeseen circumstances they suddenly part ways. When they are reunited, action, drama, and edge-of-the-seat thrills follow as the world wants Babloo dead. Laila (Nawazuddin Siddiqui) is the man behind all the cybercrimes in the world and how Babloo confronts Laila with flying cars, and high-octane action forms the story of this action-packed, sizzling romantic movie. ",Action
Gigli,"Gigli (Ben Affleck) is ordered to kidnap the psychologically challenged younger brother of a powerful federal prosecutor. When plans go awry, Gigli's boss sends in Ricki (Jennifer Lopez), a gorgeous free-spirited female gangster who has her own set of orders to assist with the kidnapping. But Gigli begins falling for the decidedly unavailable Ricki, which could be a hazard to his occupation. ",Comedy
Baby Geniuses,"Evil partners (Kathleen Turner, Christopher Lloyd) experiment on an infant and send his twin to a reputable research nursery. ",Comedy
Race 3,Members of a ruthless family become embroiled in a high-stakes heist. ,Action
Radhe,"RADHE: The Most Wanted Bhai is an adrenaline-pumping action entertainer. The story revolves around the rampant usage of drugs in our society and how the youth is getting destroyed in the bargain. The protagonist of the film ""RADHE"" is a smart and tough cop with a kind heart and witty personality. He usually likes to do things his way to get justice restored in society. How far RADHE goes to bring justice, clean the streets from drugs to save the youth and to restore peace in society forms the crux of the story. ",Action
The Great Escape,"Imprisoned during World War II in a German POW camp, a group of Allied soldiers are intent on breaking out, not only to escape, but also to draw Nazi forces away from battle to search for fugitives. Among the prisoners determined to escape are American Captain Virgil Hilts (Steve McQueen) and British Squadron Leader Roger Bartlett (Richard Attenborough). Outwitting their captors by digging a tunnel out of the prison grounds, the soldiers find the stakes much higher when escape becomes a reality. ",Adventure
Bronenosets Potemkin,"When they are fed rancid meat, the sailors on the Potemkin revolt against their harsh conditions. Led by Vakulinchuk (Aleksandr Antonov), the sailors kill the officers of the ship to gain their freedom. Vakulinchuk is also killed, and the people of Odessa honor him as a symbol of revolution. Tsarist soldiers arrive and massacre the civilians to quell the uprising. A squadron of ships is sent to overthrow the Potemkin, but the ships side with the revolt and refuse to attack. ",Drama
Kagemusha,"Akira Kurosawa's lauded feudal epic presents the tale of a petty thief (Tatsuya Nakadai) who is recruited to impersonate Shingen (also Nakadai), an aging warlord, in order to avoid attacks by competing clans. When Shingen dies, his generals reluctantly agree to have the impostor take over as the powerful ruler. He soon begins to appreciate life as Shingen, but his commitment to the role is tested when he must lead his troops into battle against the forces of a rival warlord. ",Drama
The Ten Commandments,Charting Moses' dramatic journey. ,Adventure
Under sandet,A group of German POWs are forced to dig up millions of land mines with their bare hands. ,Drama
The Trial of the Chicago 7,"In 1969, seven people were charged by the federal government with conspiracy and more, arising from the protests at the 1968 Democratic National Convention in Chicago. ",Drama
Apollo 13,"This Hollywood drama is based on the events of the Apollo 13 lunar mission, astronauts Jim Lovell (Tom Hanks), Fred Haise (Bill Paxton) and Jack Swigert (Kevin Bacon) find everything going according to plan after leaving Earth's orbit. However, when an oxygen tank explodes, the scheduled moon landing is called off. Subsequent tensions within the crew and numerous technical problems threaten both the astronauts' survival and their safe return to Earth. ",Adventure
Empire of the Sun,"Jamie Graham (Christian Bale), a privileged English boy, is living in Shanghai when the Japanese invade and force all foreigners into prison camps. Jamie is captured with an American sailor named Basie (John Malkovich), who looks out for him while they are in the camp together. Even though he is separated from his parents and in a hostile environment, Jamie maintains his dignity and youthful spirits, providing a beacon of hope for the others held captive with him. ",Drama
Zulu,"In 1879, the Zulu nation hands colonial British forces a resounding defeat in battle. A nearby regiment of the British Army takes over a station run by a missionary (Jack Hawkins) and his daughter (Ulla Jacobsson) as a supply depot and hospital under the command of Lieutenant John Chard (Stanley Baker) and his subordinate Gonville Bromhead (Michael Caine). Unable to abandon their wounded soldiers even in dire circumstances, the regiment defend their station against the Zulu warriors. ",Drama
Bridge of Spies,"During the Cold War, the Soviet Union captures U.S. pilot Francis Gary Powers after shooting down his U-2 spy plane. Sentenced to 10 years in prison, Powers' only hope is New York lawyer James Donovan (Tom Hanks), recruited by a CIA operative to negotiate his release. Donovan boards a plane to Berlin, hoping to win the young man's freedom through a prisoner exchange. If all goes well, the Russians would get Rudolf Abel (Mark Rylance), the convicted spy who Donovan defended in court. ",Drama
No,"In Argentina, there is one woman murdered every 18 hours. ",Drama
Zero Dark Thirty,"Following the terrorist attacks of Sept. 11, 2001, Osama bin Laden becomes one of the most-wanted men on the planet. The worldwide manhunt for the terrorist leader occupies the resources and attention of two U.S. presidential administrations. Ultimately, it is the work of a dedicated female operative (Jessica Chastain) that proves instrumental in finally locating bin Laden. In May 2011, Navy SEALs launch a nighttime strike, killing bin Laden in his compound in Abbottabad, Pakistan. ",Drama
The Mission,"A young Iranian agent (Houshang Touzie) travels to New York City following the Islamic revolution that seized his country, on a mission to kill a colonel who was in league with the shah. The agent accidentally meets the colonel (Parviz Sayyad), and the two become friends. The agent then has second thoughts about his mission and questions the motives of the new Islamic state back home. His superiors wonder whether he will go through with the mission and pay him a visit. ",Adventure
The Way Back,"Denounced by his wife as a possible spy in 1939, Janusz (Jim Sturgess) finds himself in a remote Siberian labor camp. Faced with brutal conditions inside and out, Janusz is determined to escape. A blizzard provides him with the perfect opportunity, and he and a small group of fellow prisoners make a break for it. Escape, however, is the easy part, for Janusz and his companions face a 4,000 mile trek on foot through the frozen Himalayas before they can truly be free. ",Adventure
Across the Universe,"The songs of the Beatles provide the sonic framework for this musical tale of romance, war and peace. When young British worker Jude (Jim Sturgess) sets sail for the United States in search of his father, he ends up meeting carefree college student Max (Joe Anderson) and his lovely sister, Lucy (Evan Rachel Wood), along with a cast of eccentric characters. As Jude and Lucy fall for each other, their relationship is threatened by the social upheaval that accompanies the Vietnam War. ",Drama
Troy,"Based on Homer's ""Iliad,"" this epic portrays the battle between the ancient kingdoms of Troy and Sparta. While visiting Spartan King Menelaus (Brendan Gleeson), Trojan prince Paris (Orlando Bloom) falls for Menelaus' wife, Helen (Diane Kruger), and takes her back to Troy. Menelaus' brother, King Agamemnon (Brian Cox), having already defeated every army in Greece, uses his brother's fury as a pretext to declare war against Troy, the last kingdom preventing his control over the Aegean Sea. ",Drama
Seabiscuit,"In the midst of the Great Depression, a businessman (Jeff Bridges) coping with the tragic death of his son, a jockey with a history of brutal injuries (Tobey Maguire) and a down-and-out horse trainer (Chris Cooper) team up to help Seabiscuit, a temperamental, undersized racehorse. At first the horse struggles to win, but eventually Seabiscuit becomes one of the most successful thoroughbreds of all time, and inspires a nation at a time when it needs it most. ",Drama
Thirteen Days,"For thirteen extraordinary days in October of 1962, the world stood on the brink of an unthinkable catastrophe. Across the globe, people anxiously awaited the outcome of a harrowing political, diplomatic and military confrontation that threatened to end in an apocalyptic nuclear exchange between the United States and the Soviet Union. Thirteen days captures the urgency, suspense and paralyzing chaos of the Cuban Missile Crisis. ",Drama
The Death of Stalin,"When tyrannical dictator Joseph Stalin dies in 1953, his parasitic cronies square off in a frantic power struggle to become the next Soviet leader. Among the contenders are the dweebish Georgy Malenkov, the wily Nikita Khrushchev and Lavrenti Beria -- the sadistic secret police chief. As they bumble, brawl and back-stab their way to the top, the question remains -- just who is running the government? ",Comedy
Shattered Glass,"Young hotshot journalist Stephen Glass (Hayden Christensen) puts on a good show for his adoring editor, Michael Kelly (Hank Azaria), but admits deep insecurities to his fellow writer, Caitlin Avey (Chloë Sevigny). When Glass begins turning in outrageous stories, his popularity skyrockets, but rival journalist Charles Lane (Peter Sarsgaard) becomes suspicious as to their factual accuracy, and eventually discovers that Glass has been fabricating many of his sources. ",Drama
Cold Mountain,"In this classic story of love and devotion set against the backdrop of the American Civil War, a wounded Confederate soldier named W.P. Inman (Jude Law) deserts his unit and travels across the South, aiming to return to his young wife, Ada (Nicole Kidman), who he left behind to tend their farm. As Inman makes his perilous journey home, Ada struggles to keep their home intact with the assistance of Ruby (Renée Zellweger), a mysterious drifter sent to help her by a kindly neighbor. ",Adventure
The Courier,"THE COURIER is a true-life spy thriller, the story of an unassuming British businessman Greville Wynne (Benedict Cumberbatch) recruited into one of the greatest international conflicts in history. At the behest of the UK's MI-6 and a CIA operative (Rachel Brosnahan), he forms a covert, dangerous partnership with Soviet officer Oleg Penkovsky (Merab Ninidze) in an effort to provide crucial intelligence needed to prevent a nuclear confrontation and defuse the Cuban Missile Crisis. ",Drama
Valkyrie,"Col. Claus von Stauffenberg (Tom Cruise) serves Germany with loyalty and pride but fears that Hitler will destroy his country if allowed to run unchecked. With time running out for Germany and the rest of Europe, von Stauffenberg joins a group of like-minded, high-ranking men who want to overthrow the Nazi regime from within. With everything he holds dear in the balance, von Stauffenberg becomes the trigger man in a plot to assassinate the evil dictator. ",Drama
Silence,An autistic boy (Ian Geer Flanders) wanders away from his parents and befriends an old hermit (Will Geer) in the woods. ,Drama
Shakespeare in Love,"""Shakespeare in Love"" is a romantic comedy for the 1990s set in the 1590s. It imaginatively unfolds the witty, sexy and timeless tale behind the creation of the greatest love story ever told. A young Shakespeare (Joseph Fiennes) is out of cash and ideas, he meets his ideal woman and she inspires him to write one of his most famous plays. ",Comedy
Padmaavat,"In medieval India, a tyrannical sultan and his army attack a prosperous kingdom to try and capture the beautiful Queen Padmavati. Her husband Maharawal Ratan Singh assembles his valiant forces to defend his land and the honor of his beloved wife. ",Drama
The Water Diviner,"Four years after the Battle of Gallipoli, Australian farmer Joshua Connor (Russell Crowe) travels to Turkey to find his three sons, who never returned home from the war. When he arrives in Istanbul, he meets others who have also suffered losses: hotelier Ayshe (Olga Kurylenko) and her son, Orhan, who befriends Connor; and Major Hasan (Yilmaz Erdogan), a Turkish officer who fought against Connor's sons and now may be their father's only hope in finding closure. ",Drama
Cool Runnings,"Even after the death of Bob Marley, the spirit of reggae music lives on in this documentary of the annual Reggae Sunsplash Festival, which is captured live at the Bob Marley Center in Montego Bay, Jamaica, during the summer of 1983. In addition to backstage interviews, the film features live performances by the Melody Makers, Gregory Isaacs, Musical Youth, Third World and early Jamaican music pioneer Alton Ellis, as well as cameo appearances by Marley's widow, Rita, and 14-year-old son, Ziggy. ",Adventure
Suffragette,"In early 20th-century Britain, the growing suffragette movement forever changes the life of working wife and mother Maud Watts (Carey Mulligan). Galvanized by political activist Emmeline Pankhurst (Meryl Streep), Watts joins a diverse group of women who fight for equality and the right to vote. Faced with increasing police action, Maud and her dedicated suffragettes must play a dangerous game of cat-and-mouse, risking their jobs, homes, family and lives for a just cause. ",Drama
The Crucible,"In the Puritan New England town of Salem, Massachusetts, some girls go dancing in the forest with a slave named Tituba. While dancing, they are caught by the local minister, the Rev. Parris. One of the girls falls into a coma-like state. ",Drama
History of the World: Part I,"Human history is traced through a series of vignettes, beginning with cavemen awestruck by their own magnificence. Then Moses (Mel Brooks) receives the tablets containing the ""15"" commandments, and Emperor Nero (Dom DeLuise) presides over a madcap Rome with his wife, Nympho (Madeline Kahn). Jumping ahead, the Spanish Inquisition softens repression with song and dance, and a few centuries later Madame Defarge (Cloris Leachman) is fomenting revolution in France. ",Comedy
The Good Shepherd,"Father Daniel Clemens (Christian Slater), a priest experiencing a crisis of faith, learns that good-hearted Father Andrews (Von Flores) has been accused of murder. Hoping to prove his friend innocent, Daniel turns to Madeline Finney (Molly Parker), a journalist whom he dated before he took his vows. McCaran (Stephen Rea), a church lawyer, also tries to defend the accused man. The three must overcome numerous obstacles -- including the Roman Catholic Church itself -- to find the truth. ",Drama
Anna and the King,"When a widowed, English schoolteacher and her 12-year-old son travel to Siam in the 1860s, they begin the adventure of a lifetime. ",Drama
The Red Sea Diving Resort,International agents and brave Ethiopians use a deserted retreat in Sudan as a front to smuggle thousands of refugees to Israel in the early 1980s. ,Drama
Macbeth,Witches predict Macbeth will be king of Scotland. ,Drama
The Monuments Men,"During World War II, the Nazis steal countless pieces of art and hide them away. Some over-the-hill art scholars, historians, architects and other experts form a unit to retrieve as many of the stolen masterpieces as possible. The mission becomes even more urgent when the team learns about Hitler's ""Nero Decree,"" which orders destruction of the artworks if the Third Reich falls. Caught in a race against time, the men risk their lives to protect some of mankind's greatest achievements. ",Comedy
World Trade Center,"Two Port Authority officers, Sgt. John McLoughlin (Nicolas Cage) and Officer Will Jimeno (Michael Peña), become trapped in the rubble of the World Trade Center after going in to help people escape from the buildings during the terrorist attacks of Sept. 11, 2001. ",Drama
Serena,"Jules, Felix and Matthieu are affluent teenagers who only care about one thing: having fun. They decide to take the butt of their jokes, the younger Joé, on a night out, but this time he fights back. ",Drama
Apocalypse Now,"In Vietnam in 1970, Captain Willard (Martin Sheen) takes a perilous and increasingly hallucinatory journey upriver to find and terminate Colonel Kurtz (Marlon Brando), a once-promising officer who has reportedly gone completely mad. In the company of a Navy patrol boat filled with street-smart kids, a surfing-obsessed Air Cavalry officer (Robert Duvall), and a crazed freelance photographer (Dennis Hopper), Willard travels further and further into the heart of darkness. ",Drama
Psycho,"Phoenix secretary Marion Crane (Janet Leigh), on the lam after stealing $40,000 from her employer in order to run away with her boyfriend, Sam Loomis (John Gavin), is overcome by exhaustion during a heavy rainstorm. Traveling on the back roads to avoid the police, she stops for the night at the ramshackle Bates Motel and meets the polite but highly strung proprietor Norman Bates (Anthony Perkins), a young man with an interest in taxidermy and a difficult relationship with his mother. ",Horror
Rear Window,"A newspaper photographer with a broken leg passes time recuperating by observing his neighbors through his window. He sees what he believes to be a murder, and decides to solve the crime himself. With the help of his nurse and wife, he tries to catch the murderer without being killed himself. ",Mystery
The Lives of Others,"In 1983 East Berlin, dedicated Stasi officer Gerd Wiesler (Ulrich Mühe), doubting that a famous playwright (Sebastian Koch) is loyal to the Communist Party, receives approval to spy on the man and his actress-lover Christa-Maria (Martina Gedeck). Wiesler becomes unexpectedly sympathetic to the couple, then faces conflicting loyalties when his superior takes a liking to Christa-Maria and orders Wiesler to get the playwright out of the way. ",Drama
Memento,"Leonard (Guy Pearce) is tracking down the man who raped and murdered his wife. The difficulty, however, of locating his wife's killer is compounded by the fact that he suffers from a rare, untreatable form of memory loss. Although he can recall details of life before his accident, Leonard cannot remember what happened fifteen minutes ago, where he's going, or why. ",Mystery
Incendies,"Nawal (Lubna Azabal), a dying Middle Eastern woman living in Montreal, leaves separate letters to her twin children to be read once she passes away. Jeanne (Mélissa Désormeaux-Poulin) is to deliver hers to the father the twins never knew, and Simon (Maxim Gaudette) is to give his to the brother they never knew they had. The siblings travel to the Middle East separately, where they each experience acts of brutality, uncover a startling family history, and have revelations about themselves. ",Drama
Vertigo,"Hitchcock's romantic story of obsession, manipulation and fear. A detective is forced to retire after his fear of heights causes the death of a fellow officer and the girl he was hired to follow. He sees a double of the girl, causing him to transform her image onto the dead girl's body. This leads into a cycle of madness and lies. ",Mystery
Citizen Kane,"When a reporter is assigned to decipher newspaper magnate Charles Foster Kane's (Orson Welles) dying words, his investigation gradually reveals the fascinating portrait of a complex man who rose from obscurity to staggering heights. Though Kane's friend and colleague Jedediah Leland (Joseph Cotten), and his mistress, Susan Alexander (Dorothy Comingore), shed fragments of light on Kane's life, the reporter fears he may never penetrate the mystery of the elusive man's final word, ""Rosebud."" ",Drama
The Father,A man attempts to thwart his greedy children's efforts to place him in a retirement home. ,Drama
Chinatown,"When Los Angeles private eye J.J. ""Jake"" Gittes (Jack Nicholson) is hired by Evelyn Mulwray to investigate her husband's activities, he believes it's a routine infidelity case. Jake's investigation soon becomes anything but routine when he meets the real Mrs. Mulwray (Faye Dunaway) and realizes he was hired by an imposter. Mr. Mulwray's sudden death sets Gittes on a tangled trail of corruption, deceit and sinister family secrets as Evelyn's father (John Huston) becomes a suspect in the case. ",Drama
The Tashkent Files,A journalist investigates the mysterious death of India's second prime minister. ,Drama
Gone Girl,"In Carthage, Mo., former New York-based writer Nick Dunne (Ben Affleck) and his glamorous wife Amy (Rosamund Pike) present a portrait of a blissful marriage to the public. However, when Amy goes missing on the couple's fifth wedding anniversary, Nick becomes the prime suspect in her disappearance. The resulting police pressure and media frenzy cause the Dunnes' image of a happy union to crumble, leading to tantalizing questions about who Nick and Amy truly are. ",Drama
Kahaani,A pregnant woman's (Vidya Balan) efforts to find her missing husband make her the target of an assassin dispatched by her husband's secretive employers. ,Mystery
Harry Potter and the Deathly Hallows: Part 2,"A clash between good and evil awaits as young Harry (Daniel Radcliffe), Ron (Rupert Grint) and Hermione (Emma Watson) prepare for a final battle against Lord Voldemort (Ralph Fiennes). Harry has grown into a steely lad on a mission to rid the world of evil. The friends must search for the Horcruxes that keep the dastardly wizard immortal. Harry and Voldemort meet at Hogwarts Castle for an epic showdown where the forces of darkness may finally meet their match. ",Adventure
The Third Man,"Set in postwar Vienna, Austria, ""The Third Man"" stars Joseph Cotten as Holly Martins, a writer of pulp Westerns, who arrives penniless as a guest of his childhood chum Harry Lime (Orson Welles), only to find him dead. Martins develops a conspiracy theory after learning of a ""third man"" present at the time of Harry's death, running into interference from British officer Maj. Calloway (Trevor Howard) and falling head-over-heels for Harry's grief-stricken lover, Anna (Alida Valli). ",Film-Noir
Rebecca,"A young newlywed arrives at her husband's imposing family estate on a windswept English coast and finds herself battling the shadow of his first wife, Rebecca, whose legacy lives on in the house long after her death. ",Drama
The Blue Elephant,"While trying to help an inmate at the mental hospital, a psychotherapist unravels mysteries he never thought existed. ",Drama
Donnie Darko,"In a funny, moving and distinctly mind-bending journey through suburban America, one extraordinary but disenchanted teenager is about to take Time's Arrow for a ride. After surviving a freak accident, Donnie (Jake Gyllenhaal) begins to explore what it means to be alive, and in short order to be in love, he uncovers secrets of the universe that give him a tempting power to alter time and destiny. ",Drama
Solaris,"Based on the classic science fiction novel by Stanislaw Lem, ""Solaris"" centers on a psychologist (George Clooney) sent to investigate unexplained behavior of key scientists on a space station orbiting the planet Solaris. Once aboard he, too, falls victim to this unique world's mysteries -- as well as to an erotic obsession with someone he thought he had left behind. ",Drama
Sleuth,"Andrew Wyke (Michael Caine) is a highly successful mystery writer living in a beautiful and technologically advanced mansion in England. Milo Tindle (Jude Law) is an unsuccessful actor with decidedly less to show for his professional exploits. The lives of these two men cross paths when Andrew's wife leaves him for the younger Milo. Hoping to carry out a cleverly constructed revenge plot, Andrew invites Milo to his estate, where elaborate mind games ensue. ",Mystery
Anatomy of a Murder,"Semi-retired Michigan lawyer Paul Biegler (James Stewart) takes the case of Army Lt. Manion (Ben Gazzara), who murdered a local innkeeper after his wife (Lee Remick) claimed that he raped her. Over the course of an extensive trial, Biegler parries with District Attorney Lodwick (Brooks West) and out-of-town prosecutor Claude Dancer (George C. Scott) to set his client free, but his case rests on the victim's mysterious business partner (Kathryn Grant), who's hiding a dark secret. ",Drama
Arrival,An FBI agent's (John Saxon) hunt for a serial killer leads to an old man made young and hungry by an alien force. ,Drama
Darbareye Elly,A young teacher disappears before being introduced to a potential suitor in northern Iran. ,Drama
The Man from Earth,College professors discuss many topics with a colleague who claims to be thousands of years old. ,Drama
Harry Potter and the Prisoner of Azkaban,"Harry Potter's (Daniel Radcliffe) third year at Hogwarts starts off badly when he learns deranged killer Sirius Black (Gary Oldman) has escaped from Azkaban prison and is bent on murdering the teenage wizard. While Hermione's (Emma Watson) cat torments Ron's (Rupert Grint) sickly rat, causing a rift among the trio, a swarm of nasty Dementors is sent to protect the school from Black. A mysterious new teacher helps Harry learn to defend himself, but what is his secret tie to Sirius Black? ",Adventure
Trois couleurs: Bleu,"Julie (Juliette Binoche) is haunted by her grief after living through a tragic auto wreck that claimed the life of her composer husband and young daughter. Her initial reaction is to withdraw from her relationships, lock herself in her apartment and suppress her pain. But avoiding human interactions on the bustling streets of Paris proves impossible, and she eventually meets up with Olivier (Benoît Régent), an old friend who harbors a secret love for her, and who could draw her back to reality. ",Drama
In the Heat of the Night,"African-American Philadelphia police detective Virgil Tibbs (Sidney Poitier) is arrested on suspicion of murder by Bill Gillespie (Rod Steiger), the racist police chief of tiny Sparta, Mississippi. After Tibbs proves not only his own innocence but that of another man, he joins forces with Gillespie to track down the real killer. Their investigation takes them through every social level of the town, with Tibbs making enemies as well as unlikely friends as he hunts for the truth. ",Drama
Charade,"Three tales of love and violence: ""Portrait of a Murderer,"" ""Duel at Dawn,"" ""The Midas Touch."" ",Comedy
In a Lonely Place,"Hollywood screenwriter Dixon Steele (Humphrey Bogart) and his neighbor Laurel (Gloria Grahame) are just getting to know each other romantically when the police begin questioning Dixon about his involvement in the murder of a girl he met once. Certain her new love interest is innocent, Laurel stands by Dixon, but as the police continue pressing him, Dixon begins to act increasingly erratically. The blossoming love affair suffers as Laurel begins to wonder if Dixon really might be a killer. ",Drama
Laura,"A woman is found murdered in her apartment by a gunshot to her face. The detective assigned to solve the case spends a lot of time in her apartment, which contains a large portrait of her and finds himself falling in love with her. ",Drama
The Thin Man,A struggling YouTube blogger and his friends decide to perform a ritual to summon an urban legend. ,Comedy
Moon,"Astronaut Sam Bell's (Sam Rockwell) three-year shift at a lunar mine is finally coming to an end, and he's looking forward to his reunion with his wife (Dominique McElligott) and young daughter. Suddenly, Sam's health takes a drastic turn for the worse. He suffers painful headaches and hallucinations, and almost has a fatal accident. He meets what appears to be a younger version of himself, possibly a clone. With time running out, Sam must solve the mystery before the company crew arrives. ",Drama
Atonement,"This sweeping English drama, based on the book by Ian McEwan, follows the lives of young lovers Cecilia Tallis (Keira Knightley) and Robbie Turner (James McAvoy). When the couple are torn apart by a lie constructed by Cecilia's jealous younger sister, Briony (Saoirse Ronan), all three of them must deal with the consequences. Robbie is the hardest hit, since Briony's deception results in his imprisonment, but hope for Cecilia and her beau increases when their paths cross during World War II. ",Drama
The Conversation,"Surveillance expert Harry Caul (Gene Hackman) is hired by a mysterious client's brusque aide (Harrison Ford) to tail a young couple, Mark (Frederic Forrest) and Ann (Cindy Williams). Tracking the pair through San Francisco's Union Square, Caul and his associate Stan (John Cazale) manage to record a cryptic conversation between them. Tormented by memories of a previous case that ended badly, Caul becomes obsessed with the resulting tape, trying to determine if the couple are in danger. ",Drama
Get Out,"Now that Chris and his girlfriend, Rose, have reached the meet-the-parents milestone of dating, she invites him for a weekend getaway with Missy and Dean. At first, Chris reads the family's overly accommodating behavior as nervous attempts to deal with their daughter's interracial relationship, but as the weekend progresses, a series of increasingly disturbing discoveries leads him to a truth that he never could have imagined. ",Horror
Harry Potter and the Deathly Hallows: Part 1,"Without the guidance and protection of their professors, Harry (Daniel Radcliffe), Ron (Rupert Grint) and Hermione (Emma Watson) begin a mission to destroy the Horcruxes, the sources of Voldemort's immortality. Though they must rely on one another more than ever, dark forces threaten to tear them apart. Voldemort's Death Eaters have seized control of the Ministry of Magic and Hogwarts, and they are searching for Harry -- even as he and his friends prepare for the ultimate showdown. ",Adventure
Harry Potter and the Goblet of Fire,"The fourth movie in the Harry Potter franchise sees Harry (Daniel Radcliffe) returning for his fourth year at Hogwarts School of Witchcraft and Wizardry, along with his friends, Ron (Rupert Grint) and Hermione (Emma Watson). There is an upcoming tournament between the three major schools of magic, with one participant selected from each school by the Goblet of Fire. When Harry's name is drawn, even though he is not eligible and is a fourth player, he must compete in the dangerous contest. ",Adventure
Abre los ojos,"Handsome 25-year-old Cesar (Eduardo Noriega) had it all -- a successful career, expensive cars, a swank bachelor's pad, and an endless string of beautiful and willing women. He is then thrown into a strange psychological mystery after a car accident scars his face and lands him in prison. ",Drama
The Game,"Nicholas Van Orton (Michael Douglas) is a successful banker who keeps mostly to himself. When his estranged brother Conrad (Sean Penn) returns on his birthday with an odd gift -- participation in a personalized, real-life game -- Nicholas reluctantly accepts. Initially harmless, the game grows increasingly personal, and Orton begins to fear for his life as he eludes agents from the mysterious game's organizers. With no one left to trust and his money gone, Orton must find answers for himself. ",Drama
La piel que habito,"Ever since his beloved wife was horribly burned in an auto accident, Dr. Robert Ledgard (Antonio Banderas), a skilled plastic surgeon, has tried to develop a new skin that could save the lives of burn victims. Finally, after 12 years, Ledgard has created a skin that guards the body, but is still sensitive to touch. With the aid of his faithful housekeeper (Marisa Paredes), Ledgard tests his creation on Vera (Elena Anaya), who is held prisoner against her will in the doctor's mansion. ",Drama
The Illusionist,"Magic tricks can't compete with rock 'n' roll in the 1950s, so a French illusionist (Jean-Claude Donda) finds himself touring Scotland's shabby pubs and run-down restaurants. But things brighten for him when he meets Alice (Eilidh Rankin), a girl who believes his powers are real. Together they travel to Edinburgh for a performance, but he doesn't have the heart to reveal that his feats are merely tricks, and risks financial ruin by giving her gifts supplied by his ""magic."" ",Drama
Saw,"Photographer Adam Stanheight (Leigh Whannell) and oncologist Lawrence Gordon (Cary Elwes) regain consciousness while chained to pipes at either end of a filthy bathroom. As the two men realize they've been trapped by a sadistic serial killer nicknamed ""Jigsaw"" and must complete his perverse puzzle to live, flashbacks relate the fates of his previous victims. Meanwhile, Dr. Gordon's wife (Monica Potter) and young daughter (Makenzie Vega) are forced to watch his torture via closed-circuit video. ",Horror
The Others,A librarian embarks on a quest to find the cause of his son's suicide. ,Horror
Dark City,"John Murdoch (Rufus Sewell) awakens alone in a strange hotel to find that he is wanted for a series of brutal murders. The problem is that he can't remember whether he committed the murders or not. For one brief moment, he is convinced that he has gone completely mad. Murdoch seeks to unravel the twisted riddle of his identity. As he edges closer to solving the mystery, he stumbles upon a fiendish underworld controlled by a group of ominous beings collectively known as the Strangers. ",Fantasy
Lost Highway,"From this inventory of imagery, Lynch fashions two separate but intersecting stories, one about a jazz musician (Bill Pullman), tortured by the notion that his wife is having an affair, who suddenly finds himself accused of her murder. The other is a young mechanic (Balthazar Getty) drawn into a web of deceit by a temptress who is cheating on her gangster boyfriend. These two tales are linked by the fact that the women in both are played by the same actress (Patricia Arquette). ",Mystery
The Conjuring,"In 1970, paranormal investigators and demonologists Lorraine (Vera Farmiga) and Ed (Patrick Wilson) Warren are summoned to the home of Carolyn (Lili Taylor) and Roger (Ron Livingston) Perron. The Perrons and their five daughters have recently moved into a secluded farmhouse, where a supernatural presence has made itself known. Though the manifestations are relatively benign at first, events soon escalate in horrifying fashion, especially after the Warrens discover the house's macabre history. ",Horror
We Need to Talk About Kevin,"Eva Khatchadourian (Tilda Swinton) is a travel writer/publisher who gives up her beloved freedom and bohemian lifestyle to have a child with her husband, Franklin (John C. Reilly). Pregnancy does not seem to agree with Eva, but what's worse, when she does give birth to a baby boy named Kevin, she can't seem to bond with him. When Kevin grows from a fussy, demanding toddler (Rocky Duer) into a sociopathic teen (Ezra Miller), Eva is forced to deal with the aftermath of her son's horrific act. ",Drama
Hugo,"Orphaned and alone except for an uncle, Hugo Cabret (Asa Butterfield) lives in the walls of a train station in 1930s Paris. Hugo's job is to oil and maintain the station's clocks, but to him, his more important task is to protect a broken automaton and notebook left to him by his late father (Jude Law). Accompanied by the goddaughter (Chloë Grace Moretz) of an embittered toy merchant (Ben Kingsley), Hugo embarks on a quest to solve the mystery of the automaton and find a place he can call home. ",Adventure
Doubt,"In 1964 the winds of change are sweeping through Sister Aloysius' (Meryl Streep) St. Nicholas school. Father Flynn (Philip Seymour Hoffman), a charismatic priest, is advocating reform of the school's strict customs, and the first black student has just been accepted. When a fellow nun (Amy Adams) tells Sister Aloysius that Father Flynn may be paying too much personal attention to the student, Sister Aloysius begins a personal crusade against the priest -- despite her lack of evidence. ",Drama
Eyes Wide Shut,"After Dr. Bill Hartford's (Tom Cruise) wife, Alice (Nicole Kidman), admits to having sexual fantasies about a man she met, Bill becomes obsessed with having a sexual encounter. He discovers an underground sexual group and attends one of their meetings -- and quickly discovers that he is in over his head. ",Drama
Contact,Small actions lead to major consequences. ,Drama
The Wicker Man,"A reclusive lawman (Nicolas Cage) travels to a secluded island to search for a girl who has gone missing. Once there, he discovers sinister forces at work among the island's secretive residents, including strange sexual rituals, a harvest festival and possible human sacrifice. ",Horror
Spellbound,A college student (Derek Farr) tries to contact the spirit of the woman that he loves. ,Film-Noir
Remember,A divorcee (Victoria Principal) in her 40s moves to the Pacific Northwest and begins a complicated relationship with a man (Adrian Pasdar) in his 20s. ,Drama
Dans la maison,A teenager insinuates himself into another student's house and writes about it for a class. His teacher rediscovers his enthusiasm for his work but the teen's intrusion unleashes a series of uncontrollable events. ,Drama
Cloud Atlas,"Actors (Tom Hanks, Halle Berry, Jim Broadbent) take on multiple roles in an epic that spans five centuries. An attorney harbors a fleeing slave on a voyage from the Pacific Islands in 1849; a poor composer in pre-World War II Britain struggles to finish his magnum opus before a past act catches up with him; a genetically engineered worker in 2144 feels the forbidden stirring of human consciousness -- and so on. As souls are born and reborn, they renew their bonds to one another throughout time. ",Drama
Bhool Bhulaiyaa,"An NRI and his wife decide to stay in his ancestral home, paying no heed to the warnings about ghosts. Soon, inexplicable occurrences cause him to call a psychiatrist to help solve the mystery. ",Comedy
El orfanato,"An orphan is adopted, and then returned to the orphanage because is he deemed ""different."" ",Drama
Harry Potter and the Chamber of Secrets,"The follow-up to ""Harry Potter and the Sorcerer's Stone"" finds young wizard Harry Potter (Daniel Radcliffe) and his friends, Ron (Rupert Grint) and Hermione (Emma Watson), facing new challenges during their second year at Hogwarts School of Witchcraft and Wizardry as they try to discover a dark force that is terrorizing the school. ",Adventure
Scream,"Twenty-five years after a streak of brutal murders shocked the quiet town of Woodsboro, a new killer has donned the Ghostface mask and begins targeting a group of teenagers to resurrect secrets from the town's deadly past. ",Horror
Carrie,"High school can be tough for many teenagers, but for Carrie White (Chloë Grace Moretz), it's especially hellish. A shy and awkward teen being raised by a religious zealot (Julianne Moore), Carrie is frequently the target of bullies. But Carrie has a secret talent: She can make things move with her mind. One fateful night, an especially cruel prank at her senior prom pushes her over the edge, and Carrie unleashes her telekinetic powers on all who get in her way. ",Horror
Picnic at Hanging Rock,"In the early 1900s, Miranda (Anne Lambert) attends a girls boarding school in Australia. One Valentine's Day, the school's typically strict headmistress (Rachel Roberts) treats the girls to a picnic field trip to an unusual but scenic volcanic formation called Hanging Rock. Despite rules against it, Miranda and several other girls venture off. It's not until the end of the day that the faculty realizes the girls and one of the teachers (Vivean Gray) have disappeared mysteriously. ",Drama
A Shot in the Dark,A blind high school wrestler tries to win a state championship before he graduates. ,Comedy
To Catch a Thief,"Notorious cat burglar John Robie (Cary Grant) has long since retired to tend vineyards on the French Riviera. When a series of robberies is committed in his style, John must clear his name. Armed with a list of people who own the most expensive jewels currently in the area, John begins following the first owner, young Francie (Grace Kelly). When her jewels are stolen, Francie suspects John, destroying their tentative romance. John goes on the lam to catch the thief and clear his own name. ",Mystery
Hereditary,"When the matriarch of the Graham family passes away, her daughter and grandchildren begin to unravel cryptic and increasingly terrifying secrets about their ancestry, trying to outrun the sinister fate they have inherited. ",Drama
The Conjuring 2,"In 1977, paranormal investigators Ed (Patrick Wilson) and Lorraine Warren come out of a self-imposed sabbatical to travel to Enfield, a borough in north London. There, they meet Peggy Hodgson, an overwhelmed single mother of four who tells the couple that something evil is in her home. Ed and Lorraine believe her story when the youngest daughter starts to show signs of demonic possession. As the Warrens try to help the besieged girl, they become the next targets of the malicious spirit. ",Horror
I Origins,A molecular biologist's study of the human eye has far-reaching implications about humanity's scientific and spiritual beliefs. ,Drama
La cara oculta,A woman (Clara Lago) accidentally becomes trapped in her new home's panic room while trying to spy on her boyfriend (Quim Gutiérrez). ,Drama
Identity,"When a vicious storm breaks out in the Nevada desert, 10 people seek refuge in an isolated motel. At the same time, a serial killer (Pruitt Taylor Vince) under the care of psychiatrist Doctor Mallick (Alfred Molina) -- who has just found the killer's revealing journal -- awaits execution for murdering a group of motel guests. When the storm-stranded travelers realize they are being killed off one by one, limo driver Ed Dakota (John Cusack) bids to stay alive and reveal the murderer's identity. ",Mystery
Unbreakable,David Dunn (Bruce Willis) is the sole survivor of a devastating train wreck. Elijah Price (Samuel L. Jackson) is a mysterious stranger who offers a bizarre explanation as to why David escaped without a single scratch -- an explanation which threatens to change David's family and his life forever. ,Drama
Sleepy Hollow,"Set in 1799, ""Sleepy Hollow"" is based on Washington Irving's classic tale ""The Legend of Sleepy Hollow."" Faithful to the dreamy custom-bound world that Irving paints in his story, the film mixes horror, fantasy and romance and features an extraordinary cast of characters that dabble in the supernatural. ",Fantasy
Pi,"A paranoid mathematician searches for a key number that will unlock the universal patterns found in nature. Pushed to his limits, he spirals between brilliance and obsession. ",Drama
Death and the Maiden,"Paulina Escobar (Sigourney Weaver) is convinced that the guest (Ben Kingsley) her lawyer husband (Stuart Wilson) brings home is the same man who who kidnapped, tortured and raped her years ago. Holding him captive at gunpoint, she repeatedly attacks him and demands that he confess his crime. Her husband tries to stand by his wife and her claims, but he begins to doubt her story and the claims. She forces her husband to represent the guest in a mock trial that she devises. ",Drama
Manhattan Murder Mystery,"Larry Lipton (Woody Allen) and his wife, Carol (Diane Keaton), are adjusting to life with their son away at college when they meet their older neighbor, Lillian House (Lynn Cohen), and her husband, Paul (Jerry Adler). Upon hearing of Lillian's sudden death, Carol grows suspicious of the circumstances surrounding her demise and comes to believe Paul may have killed her. Unwilling to let her curiosity subside, she convinces Larry to join her in getting to the bottom of the mystery. ",Comedy
Suspicion,A happily married woman (Amanda Redman) learns about her husband's alleged affair and his implication in a murder. ,Film-Noir
10 Cloverfield Lane,"After surviving a car accident, Michelle (Mary Elizabeth Winstead) wakes up to find herself in an underground bunker with two men. Howard (John Goodman) tells her that a massive chemical attack has rendered the air unbreathable, and their only hope of survival is to remain inside. Despite the comforts of home, Howard's controlling and menacing nature makes Michelle want to escape. After taking matters into her own hands, the young woman finally discovers the truth about the outside world. ",Drama
The Fountain,"A man (Hugh Jackman) travels through time on a quest for immortality and to save the woman (Rachel Weisz) he loves. As a 16th-century conquistador, Tomas searches for the legendary Fountain of Youth. As a present-day scientist, he desperately struggles to cure the cancer that is killing his wife. Finally, as a 26th-century astronaut in deep space, Tom begins to grasp the mysteries of life, love and death. ",Drama
Broken Flowers,"When his latest girlfriend (Julie Delpy) leaves him, retired computer magnate Don Johnston (Bill Murray) has no greater ambition than to sit around the house. When he receives an anonymous letter from a former girlfriend claiming he has a 19-year-old son he's never met, Don doesn't even think to follow up. It's not until his neighbor, a mystery fan, encourages him that Don resolves to visit the exes who seem the most likely candidates and find out the truth. ",Comedy
Gosford Park,"Robert Altman, one of America's most distinctive filmmakers, journeys to England for the first time to create a unique film mosaic with an outstanding ensemble cast. Set in the 1930's, ""Gosford Park"" brings a group of pretentious rich and famous together for a weekend of relaxation at a hunting resort. But when a murder occurs, each one of these interesting characters becomes a suspect. ",Comedy
Insomnia,A young man's insomnia leads to a mind-bending experience. ,Drama
Ringu,"When her niece is found dead along with three friends after viewing a supposedly cursed videotape, reporter Reiko Asakawa (Nanako Matsushima) sets out to investigate. Along with her ex-husband, Ryuji (Hiroyuki Sanada), Reiko finds the tape, watches it -- and promptly receives a phone call informing her that she'll die in a week. Determined to get to the bottom of the curse, Reiko and Ryuji discover the video's origin and attempt to solve an old murder that could break the spell. ",Horror
Cube,"Without remembering how they got there, several strangers awaken in a prison of cubic cells, some of them booby-trapped. There's onetime cop Quentin (Maurice Dean Wint), scientist Holloway (Nicky Guadagni), young math genius Leaven (Nicole de Boer), master of escapes Rennes (Wayne Robson), autistic savant Kazan (Andrew Miller) and architect Worth (David Hewlett), who might have more information on the maze than he lets on. The prisoners must use their combined skills if they are to escape. ",Drama
Twin Peaks: Fire Walk with Me,"In the folksy town of Deerfield, Wash., FBI Agent Desmond (Chris Isaak) inexplicably disappears while hunting for the man who murdered a teen girl. The killer is never apprehended, and, after experiencing dark visions and supernatural encounters, Agent Dale Cooper (Kyle MacLachlan) chillingly predicts that the culprit will claim another life. Meanwhile, in the similarly cozy town of Twin Peaks, hedonistic beauty Lara Palmer (Sheryl Lee) hangs with lowlifes and seems destined for a grisly fate. ",Drama
Last Night in Soho,"In acclaimed director Edgar Wright's psychological thriller, Eloise, an aspiring fashion designer, is mysteriously able to enter the 1960s where she encounters a dazzling wannabe singer, Sandie. But the glamour is not all it appears to be and the dreams of the past start to crack and splinter into something far darker. ",Drama
Black Mirror: Bandersnatch,A young programmer starts to question reality when he adapts a mad writer's fantasy novel into a video game. ,Drama
Where the Crawdads Sing,"From the best-selling novel comes a captivating mystery. Where the Crawdads Sing tells the story of Kya, an abandoned girl who raised herself to adulthood in the dangerous marshlands of North Carolina. For years, rumors of the ""Marsh Girl"" haunted Barkley Cove, isolating the sharp and resilient Kya from her community. Drawn to two young men from town, Kya opens herself to a new and startling world; but when one of them is found dead, she is immediately cast by the community as the main suspect. As the case unfolds, the verdict as to what actually happened becomes increasingly unclear, threatening to reveal the many secrets that lay within the marsh. ",Drama
Midsommar,"A young American couple, their relationship foundering, travel to a fabled Swedish midsummer festival where a seemingly pastoral paradise transforms into a sinister, dread-soaked nightmare as the locals reveal their terrifying agenda. ",Drama
First Reformed,The pastor of a small church in upstate New York spirals out of control after a soul-shaking encounter with an unstable environmental activist and his pregnant wife. ,Drama
Let Me In,"Bullied at school, neglected at home and incredibly lonely, 12-year-old Owen (Kodi Smit-McPhee) spends his days plotting revenge on his tormentors and spends his nights spying on other residents of the apartment complex. His sole friend is Abby (Chloë Grace Moretz), a strange girl who comes out only at nighttime. Both outcasts, the two form a strong bond. When Abby's caretaker disappears amid a series of gruesome murders, Owen begins to suspect that she is hiding a terrible secret. ",Drama
The Invisible Man,"After discovering the secret of invisibility, a scientist flees to keep the knowledge out of military hands. ",Drama
The Tragedy of Macbeth,"Proud Macbeth (Jon Finch) and his power-mad wife (Francesca Annis) plot to murder King Duncan (Nicholas Selby) and usurp the throne of Scotland, despite the increasing suspicions of Macbeth's rival, Macduff (Terence Baylor), and his once-loyal friend Banquo (Martin Shaw). Roman Polanski directed this violent and sexualized revision of William Shakespeare's tragedy of madness and political intrigue, financed by executive producer Hugh Hefner, publisher of Playboy magazine. ",Drama
The Jacket,"Amnesiac Gulf War veteran Jack Starks (Adrien Brody) can't explain why he's been found at the scene of a murder. Ordered to a mental hospital, Jack is subjected to Dr. Thomas Becker's (Kris Kristofferson) unusual treatment plan, which involves mysterious injections, sensory deprivation and confinement in a straitjacket. Locked away on his own, Jack discovers he can travel to the future, where he's compelled to help a onetime acquaintance (Keira Knightley) and investigate his own odd fate. ",Drama
The Ring,"It sounds like just another urban legend -- a videotape filled with nightmarish images leads to a phone call foretelling the viewer's death in exactly seven days. Newspaper reporter Rachel Keller (Naomi Watts) is skeptical of the story until four teenagers all die mysteriously exactly one week after watching just such a tape. Allowing her investigative curiosity to get the better of her, Rachel tracks down the video and watches it. Now she has just seven days to unravel the mystery. ",Horror
In the Mouth of Madness,"When horror novelist Sutter Cane (Jürgen Prochnow) goes missing, insurance investigator John Trent (Sam Neill) scrutinizes the claim made by his publisher, Jackson Harglow (Charlton Heston), and endeavors to retrieve a yet-to-be-released manuscript and ascertain the writer's whereabouts. Accompanied by the novelist's editor, Linda Styles (Julie Carmen), and disturbed by nightmares from reading Cane's other novels, Trent makes an eerie nighttime trek to a supernatural town in New Hampshire. ",Drama
Black Christmas,"The holiday season turns deadly for a group of sorority sisters (Katie Cassidy, Mary Elizabeth Winstead, Lacey Chabert, Michelle Trachtenberg) who are stranded at their campus house during a snowstorm. These coeds better watch out, for a vicious killer is on the loose, and he will not care if they are naughty or nice. ",Horror
Carnival of Souls,"Mary Henry (Candace Hilligoss) ends up the sole survivor of a fatal car accident through mysterious circumstances. Trying to put the incident behind her, she moves to Utah and takes a job as a church organist. But her fresh start is interrupted by visions of a fiendish man (Herk Harvey). As the visions begin to occur more frequently, Mary finds herself drawn to the deserted carnival on the outskirts of town. The strangely alluring carnival may hold the secret to her tragic past. ",Horror
Thelma,"A cabdriver (Laurent Schilling) in Zurich, Switzerland, gets mixed up in a transsexual's (Pascale Ourbih) revenge against an ex-lover. ",Drama
The Killing of a Sacred Deer,"Dr. Steven Murphy is a renowned cardiovascular surgeon who presides over a spotless household with his wife and two children. Lurking at the margins of his idyllic suburban existence is Martin, a fatherless teen who insinuates himself into the doctor's life in gradually unsettling ways. Soon, the full scope of Martin's intent becomes menacingly clear when he confronts Steven with a long-forgotten transgression that will shatter his domestic bliss forever. ",Drama
The Gift,A young man with Asperger's syndrome falls in love with a sheltered woman. ,Drama
The Words,"When shallow wannabe-writer Rory (Bradley Cooper) finds an old manuscript tucked away in a bag, he decides to pass the work off as his own. The book, called ""The Window Tears,"" brings Rory great acclaim, until the real author (Jeremy Irons) shows up and threatens to destroy Rory's reputation. Cut to Clayton Hammond (Dennis Quaid), a writer whose popular novel ""The Words"" seems to mirror Rory's story, leading to speculation that the tome is Hammond's thinly veiled autobiography. ",Drama
Buried,"A civilian truck driver in Iraq, Paul Conroy (Ryan Reynolds) falls victim to a band of insurgents. An unknown length of time later, Paul awakes in a coffin, with little more than a lighter, a cell phone, and his ever-growing anxiety. Faced with a dwindling oxygen supply and a dying battery, Paul must fight panic, despair and delirium as he awaits a rescue that might not arrive in time. ",Drama
Tinker Tailor Soldier Spy,"In 1970s England the head of MI6, Control (John Hurt), dispatches an agent (Mark Strong) to meet with a Hungarian general who knows the identity of a Soviet spy in the organization's ranks. However, the mission goes wrong, and the general dies before he can reveal the information. Undersecretary Oliver Lacon (Simon McBurney) calls veteran agent George Smiley (Gary Oldman) back from forced retirement to ferret out the mole and stop the flow of vital British secrets to the Russians. ",Drama
The Cabin in the Woods,"When five college friends (Kristen Connolly, Chris Hemsworth, Anna Hutchison, Fran Kranz, Jesse Williams) arrive at a remote forest cabin for a little vacation, little do they expect the horrors that await them. One by one, the youths fall victim to backwoods zombies, but there is another factor at play. Two scientists (Richard Jenkins, Bradley Whitford) are manipulating the ghoulish goings-on, but even as the body count rises, there is yet more at work than meets the eye. ",Horror
Shutter,"After hitting a young woman with her car, Jane (Natthaweeranuch Thongmee) and her photographer boyfriend, Tun (Ananda Everingham), begin seeing a shadowy figure haunting the background of Tun's photographs. Concerned that the figure is the vengeful spirit of the young woman from the accident, Jane does some research and soon discovers that the girl was named Natre (Achita Sikamana) and had been a classmate of Tun's. As the haunting continues, Jane uncovers a shocking secret. ",Horror
Holes,"An award-winning bestseller comes to life when young Stanley Yelnats, dogged by bad luck stemming from an ancient family curse, is sent to Camp Green Lake, a very weird place that's not green and doesn't have a lake. Once there, he's thrown headlong into the adventure of his life when he and his colorful campmates—Squid, Armpit, Zigzag, Magnet, X-Ray and Zero—must dig a hole a day to keep the warden at bay. But why? Through it all, Stanley and company must forge fast friendships as they try to unearth the mystery of what's really going on in the middle of nowhere. ",Adventure
Basic Instinct,"The mysterious Catherine Tramell (Sharon Stone), a beautiful crime novelist, becomes a suspect when she is linked to the brutal death of a rock star. Investigated by homicide detective Nick Curran (Michael Douglas), Catherine seduces him into an intense relationship. Meanwhile, the murder case becomes increasingly complicated when more seemingly connected deaths occur and Nick's psychologist and lover, Beth Garner (Jeanne Tripplehorn), appears to be another suspect. ",Drama
The Trouble with Harry,"When a local man's corpse appears on a nearby hillside, no one is quite sure what happened to him. Many of the town's residents secretly wonder if they are responsible, including the man's ex-wife, Jennifer (Shirley MacLaine), and Capt. Albert Wiles (Edmund Gwenn), a retired seaman who was hunting in the woods where the body was found. As the no-nonsense sheriff (Royal Dano) gets involved and local artist Sam Marlowe (John Forsythe) offers his help, the community slowly unravels the mystery. ",Comedy
Tully,A womanizer (Anson Mount) falls for the best friend (Julianne Nicholson) of his shy brother (Glenn Fitzgerald) after she returns home to intern at a veterinary practice. ,Comedy
Enemy,Former childhood friends enter into an intense rivalry fueled by their escalating competitive nature. ,Drama
Triangle,The president (Ahn Jae-wook) of an art exhibition company becomes the prime suspect in a bank robbery. ,Fantasy
Pig,"Pig plays out scenario after scenario of increasingly violent acts, ranging from merciless physical beatings, disembowelment, cannibalism (both willing and forced), and severe degradation, as blood and other body fluids flow with trashy, humorless, sadistic glee ... There is nowhere to turn in this film, no relief, no mercy, no hope. Know this, Pig is not a film for the casual horror fan by any stretch. This is stuff by the initiated for the initiated. ",Drama
Nope,"A man and his sister discover something sinister in the skies above their California horse ranch, while the owner of a nearby theme park tries to profit from the mysterious, otherworldly phenomenon. ",Horror
Wicker Park,"Matthew (Josh Hartnett) and Lisa (Diane Kruger) are madly in love. But one day Lisa vanishes. Simon enters an emotional tailspin and begins an obsessive quest to find her. Years later, Simon's life has stabilized, and he's in a new relationship. Then he thinks he sees Lisa in a restaurant and fixates on her all over again. He snoops around and eventually tracks down the mysterious woman from the restaurant. Her name is Alex (Rose Byrne), but she acts just like Lisa. ",Drama
Vanilla Sky,"Tom Cruise and Cameron Crowe reunite after ""Jerry Maguire"" for ""Vanilla Sky,"" the story of a young New York City publishing magnate who finds himself on an unexpected roller-coaster ride of romance, comedy, suspicion, love, sex and dreams in a mind-bending search for his soul. ",Fantasy
Hearts in Atlantis,"""Hearts In Atlantis"" is a drama based on Stephen King's best seller of the same name. It is the story of a mysterious man (Anthony Hopkins) who enlists the aid of a brilliant young boy (Anton Yelchin) to save his life. This friendship with a mysterious stranger forever changes the way he sees the world. ",Drama
Stir of Echoes,"Blue-collar family man Tom Witzky (Kevin Bacon) scoffs at supernatural phenomena -- until he lets his wife's sister, Lisa (Illeana Douglas), put him into a hypnotic trance. Upon waking, Tom realizes he has a psychic connection with his son, Jake (Zachary David Cope). He also has alarming hallucinations of a missing teenage neighbor named Samantha (Jennifer Morrison). Tom, convinced his visions will lead him to the girl, begins a desperate search that puts him into a life-threatening situation. ",Horror
Presumed Innocent,"Prosecuting attorney Raymond Horgan (Brian Dennehy) assigns his chief deputy, the taciturn Rusty Sabitch (Harrison Ford), to investigate the rape and murder of colleague Carolyn Polhemus (Greta Scacchi), unaware of their torrid affair. When evidence implicates Rusty, Horgan's political enemies demand his arrest, devastating Rusty's wife, Barbara (Bonnie Bedelia). In desperation, Rusty turns to crafty defense attorney Sandy Stein (Raul Julia), only to be stunned by his trial's revelations. ",Mystery
Us,"Two schoolteachers, Ida and Krister, enter into an intense and very dependent love affair that threatens their existence. ",Horror
The Autopsy of Jane Doe,"When father and son coroners investigate the death of a beautiful ""Jane Doe,"" they find increasingly bizarre clues. ",Horror
It Follows,"After carefree teenager Jay (Maika Monroe) sleeps with her new boyfriend, Hugh (Jake Weary), for the first time, she learns that she is the latest recipient of a fatal curse that is passed from victim to victim via sexual intercourse. Death, Jay learns, will creep inexorably toward her as either a friend or a stranger. Jay's friends don't believe her seemingly paranoid ravings, until they too begin to see the phantom assassins and band together to help her flee or defend herself. ",Horror
Annihilation,"Lena, a biologist and former soldier, joins a mission to uncover what happened to her husband inside Area X -- a sinister and mysterious phenomenon that is expanding across the American coastline. Once inside, the expedition discovers a world of mutated landscapes and creatures, as dangerous as it is beautiful, that threatens both their lives and their sanity. ",Adventure
The Babadook,A troubled widow (Essie Davis) discovers that her son is telling the truth about a monster that entered their home through the pages of a children's book. ,Horror
Sinister,Emily (Donna Hamblin) unwittingly incurs the wrath of a conjurer (Lucien Eisenach) and has to find out what's happening to her before its too late. ,Horror
Eliza Graves,"A new employee at a mental hospital becomes attracted to one of his colleagues, but he is unaware of a recent, horrifying change in staff. ",Drama
Odd Thomas,A clairvoyant cook (Anton Yelchin) joins forces with his sweetheart (Addison Timlin) and the town sheriff (Willem Dafoe) to prevent an unknown catastrophe that may be linked to a weird stranger. ,Comedy
Insidious,"Parents (Patrick Wilson, Rose Byrne) take drastic measures when it seems their new home is haunted and their comatose son is possessed by a malevolent entity. ",Horror
Martha Marcy May Marlene,"After several years of living with a cult, Martha (Elizabeth Olsen) finally escapes and calls her estranged sister, Lucy (Sarah Paulson), for help. Martha finds herself at the quiet Connecticut home Lucy shares with her new husband, Ted (Hugh Dancy), but the memories of what she experienced in the cult make peace hard to find. As flashbacks continue to torment her, Martha fails to shake a terrible sense of dread, especially in regard to the cult's manipulative leader (John Hawkes). ",Drama
The Imaginarium of Doctor Parnassus,"Dr. Parnassus (Christopher Plummer), the leader of a traveling show, has a dark secret. Thousands of years ago he traded the soul of his daughter, Valentina, to the devil. Now the devil has come to collect his prize. To save her, Parnassus must make a final wager: Whoever collects five souls first will win Valentina. Tony (Heath Ledger), a man saved from hanging by Parnassus' troupe, agrees to help collect them, with his eye on marrying Valentina. ",Adventure
Inland Empire,"Nikki (Laura Dern), an actress, takes on a role in a new film, and because her husband (Peter J. Lucas) is very jealous, her co-star Devon (Justin Theroux) gets a warning not to make any romantic overtures -- especially since the characters they play are having an affair. Both actors learn that the project is a remake of an unfinished film in which the stars were murdered. ",Drama
1408,"Mike Enslin (John Cusack) is a successful author who enjoys worldwide acclaim debunking supernatural phenomena -- before he checks into the Dolphin Hotel, that is. Ignoring the warnings of the hotel manager (Samuel L. Jackson), he learns the meaning of real terror when he spends the night in a reputedly haunted room. ",Fantasy
Signs,"Everything that farmer Graham Hess (Mel Gibson) assumed about the world is changed when he discovers a message - an intricate pattern of circles and lines - carved into his crops. As he investigates the unfolding mystery, what he finds will forever alter the lives of his brother (Joaquin Phoenix) and children (Rory Culkin), (Abigail Breslin). A unique story that explores the mysterious real-life phenomena of crop signs and the effects they have on one man and his family. ",Drama
Spider,"A carnival mind reader (Faye Marlowe) hires a private eye (Richard Conte) to find her sister, missing for years. ",Drama
eXistenZ,"Video game designer Allegra Geller (Jennifer Jason Leigh) has created a virtual reality game called eXistenZ. After a crazed fan attempts to kill her, Allegra goes on the run with Ted (Jude Law), a young businessman who falls into the role of bodyguard. In an attempt to save her game, Allegra implants into Ted's body the video game pod that carries a damaged copy of eXistenZ. Allegra and Ted engage in a series of experiences that blur the lines between fantasy and reality. ",Horror
The Witches,"While staying at a hotel in England with his grandmother, Helga (Mai Zetterling), young Luke (Jasen Fisher) inadvertently spies on a convention of witches. The Grand High Witch (Anjelica Huston) reveals a plan to turn all children into mice through a magical formula. When they find that Luke has overheard, the witches test the formula on him. Now, with the help of Helga and the hotel manager, Mr. Stringer (Rowan Atkinson), Luke the mouse must fight back against the witches. ",Adventure
Freaks,"When trapeze artist Cleopatra (Olga Baclanova) learns that circus midget Hans (Harry Earles) has an inheritance, she marries the lovesick, diminutive performer, all the while planning to steal his fortune and run off with her lover, strong man Hercules (Henry Victor). When Hans' friends and fellow performers discover what is going on, they band together and carry out a brutal revenge that leaves Hercules and Cleopatra knowing what it truly means to be a ""freak."" ",Drama
Run,An isolated teen discovers her mother's sinister secret. ,Mystery
Saint Maud,"The debut film from writer-director Rose Glass, Saint Maud is a chilling and boldly original vision of faith, madness, and salvation in a fallen world. Maud, a newly devout hospice nurse, becomes obsessed with saving her dying patient's soul -- but sinister forces, and her own sinful past, threaten to put an end to her holy calling. ",Drama
The Vast of Night,"In the 1950s, two kids search for the source of a mysterious frequency that has descended on their town. ",Drama
I Am Mother,A teenage girl is raised by a robot designed to repopulate Earth. Their bond is tested when a stranger arrives with alarming news. ,Drama
Summer of 84,"Teenager Davey Armstrong is a conspiracy theorist who begins to suspect that a neighboring police officer is a serial killer. With help from three friends, Davey launches a daring investigation that soon turns dangerous. ",Drama
Housebound,"A would-be thief (Morgana O'Reilly) is remanded to the custody of her estranged mother (Rima Te Wiata), who turns out to be correct in her assertion that evil spirits are afoot in their family domicile. ",Comedy
Los ojos de Julia,"The closer she gets to solving her sister's death, a woman (Belén Rueda) with a degenerative eye disease becomes increasingly blind. ",Horror
Suspiria,"Young American dancer Susie Bannion arrives in 1970s Berlin to audition for the world-renowned Helena Markos Dance Co. When she vaults to the role of lead dancer, the woman she replaces breaks down and accuses the company's female directors of witchcraft. Meanwhile, an inquisitive psychotherapist and a member of the troupe uncover dark and sinister secrets as they probe the depths of the studio's hidden underground chambers. ",Drama
Proof,"Catherine (Gwyneth Paltrow) is a 27-year-old grieving after the loss of her father (Anthony Hopkins), a genius mathematician whose mind gradually deteriorated from mental illness. With her sister, Claire (Hope Davis), urging Catherine to leave their family home, and an ambitious student (Jake Gyllenhaal) searching through her father's notes, Catherine struggles to keep her composure and her sanity in this drama adapted from the stage play by David Auburn. ",Drama
Stay,"Sam Foster (Ewan McGregor), a psychiatrist, has a new patient, Henry Letham (Ryan Gosling), who claims to be suicidal. In trying to diagnose him, Sam visits Henry's prior therapist (Janeane Garofalo) and also finds Henry's mother -- even though Henry has said that he murdered both of his parents. As reality starts to contradict fact, Sam spirals into an unstable mental state. Then he finds a clue as to how and when Henry may try to kill himself, and races to try to stop him. ",Drama
Gin gwai,"After 18 years of blindness, 20-year-old violinist Wong Kar Mun (Lee Sin-Je) regains her vision when she undergoes a corneal transplant. She's overjoyed with the procedure, but Mun's elation dissipates when she begins experiencing ghostly encounters. Desperate to discover why she now sees ghosts, Mun turns to a psychologist, Dr. Wah (Lawrence Chou), who believes the new corneas are causing the problem. When Mun and Wah travel to her cornea donor's hometown to investigate, her symptoms worsen. ",Drama
Cypher,"Morgan Sullivan (Jeremy Northam) is an accountant anxious for a more exciting life. He gets his chance when Digicorp hires him as a corporate spy. While carrying out his first missions, however, Sullivan keeps crossing paths with an enigmatic woman named Rita (Lucy Liu), who claims Digicorp is brainwashing him. Soon Morgan is questioning everything about his life, including his own identity -- making things increasingly complicated when he becomes a double agent for Digicorp's rival, Sunways. ",Mystery
The Gift,A young man with Asperger's syndrome falls in love with a sheltered woman. ,Drama
From Hell,"The first tabloid star of the twentieth century, he remains the most notorious and enigmatic serial killer in history. ""From Hell"" puts an intense urban spin on the horrific legend of Jack the Ripper and unravels a chilling alleged conspiracy involving the highest powers in England. ",Horror
Return to Oz,"After Dorothy's friends are robbed of their prizes by a revived Wicked Witch, she is sent back to Oz to set things straight once again. ",Adventure
2010: The Year We Make Contact,"Brave explorers are headed for the far reaches of the galaxy in the continuation of the story that began with ""2001: A Space Odyssey."" Their destination is Jupiter, where the Russian and American astronauts will conduct their investigation. Drs. Heywood Floyd (Roy Scheider), Walter Curnow (John Lithgow) and R. Chandra (Bob Balaban), along with shipmates Tanya (Helen Mirren) and Dave (Keir Dullea), aim to uncover what led to disaster for the deceased astronauts who preceded them. ",Adventure
Marrowbone,A young man and his younger siblings who have concealed the death of their mother to remain together are plagued by a sinister presence in their home. ,Adventure
Happy Death Day,"Tree Gelbman is a blissfully self-centered collegian who wakes up on her birthday in the bed of a student named Carter. As the morning goes on, Tree gets the eerie feeling that she's experienced the events of this day before. When a masked killer suddenly takes her life in a brutal attack, she once again magically wakes up in Carter's dorm room unharmed. Now, the frightened young woman must relive the same day over and over until she figures out who murdered her. ",Comedy
Bird Box,"When a mysterious force decimates the population, only one thing is certain -- if you see it, you die. The survivors must now avoid coming face to face with an entity that takes the form of their worst fears. Searching for hope and a new beginning, a woman and her children embark on a dangerous journey through the woods and down a river to find the one place that may offer sanctuary. To make it, they'll have to cover their eyes from the evil that chases them -- and complete the trip blindfolded. ",Horror
The Invitation,"While attending a dinner party at his former house, a man (Logan Marshall-Green) starts to believe that his ex-wife (Tammy Blanchard) and her new husband (Michiel Huisman) have sinister plans for the guests. ",Drama
X,A young voyeur spies on unsuspecting guests during masked charity balls that double as sex parties. ,Horror
Saw II,"On the hunt for the twisted vigilante and serial killer Jigsaw (Tobin Bell), Detective Eric Matthews (Donnie Wahlberg) and his team must apprehend the elusive murderer to rescue eight people trapped in an abandoned house, before they succumb to his torturous and murderous games. One twist to this task is that Matthews' own son, Daniel (Erik Knudsen), is among the eight people Jigsaw has chosen to test for their lack of morality. With nerve gas pumping through the house, every second counts. ",Horror
The Village,"In a pastoral town in Turkey, a family goes through changes as the seasons blend into one another. In winter, the daughter and son struggle through lessons at school. Spring comes, and as the frost recedes, the children explore the natural beauty of the terrain that surrounds them. When summer arrives, the siblings have a picnic with their grandmother (Fatma Ceylan) and grandfather (Emin Ceylan), who relate stories about life during World War I. With autumn comes domestic tranquility. ",Drama
What Lies Beneath,"It had been a year since Dr. Norman Spencer (Harrison Ford) betrayed his beautiful wife Claire (Michelle Pfeiffer). But with Claire oblivious to the truth, Norman's life and marriage seem so perfect that when Claire tells him of hearing mysterious voices and seeing a young woman's image in their home, he dismisses her terror as delusion. Claire moves closer to the truth and it becomes clear that this apparition will not be dismissed, and has come back for Dr. Spencer and his beautiful wife. ",Drama
Powder,"A mysterious albino teenager, Jeremy ""Powder"" Reed (Sean Patrick Flanery), is rescued from the basement in which he's lived since birth. But the extremely intelligent Reed is not welcomed into the community. Students at his school fear the outsider because of his bizarre ability to harness extrasensory perception and heal the sick. His relationship with a fellow student, Lindsey (Missy Crider), doesn't help matters either, despite the help of two teachers (Jeff Goldblum, Mary Steenburgen). ",Drama
Copycat,"In 1990, a teenage filmmaker raises money to make a horror film. Twenty-five years later, he tells the story of a cult classic film that was never made. ",Drama
The Night House,"Reeling from the unexpected death of her husband, Beth (Rebecca Hall) is left alone in the lakeside home he built for her. She tries as best she can to keep it together -- but then nightmares come. Disturbing visions of a presence in the house calling to her, beckoning her with a ghostly allure. Against the advice of her friends, she begins digging into her husband's belongings, yearning for answers. What she finds are secrets both strange and disturbing -- a mystery she's determined to unravel. ",Horror
Possessor,"Tasya Vos, an elite, corporate assassin, takes control of other people's bodies using brain-implant technology to execute high-profile targets. ",Horror
Annabelle: Creation,"Former toy maker Sam Mullins and his wife, Esther, are happy to welcome a nun and six orphaned girls into their California farmhouse. Years earlier, the couple's 7-year-old daughter Annabelle died in a tragic car accident. Terror soon strikes when one child sneaks into a forbidden room and finds a seemingly innocent doll that appears to have a life of its own. ",Horror
The Endless,"Two brothers receive a cryptic video message inspiring them to revisit the UFO death cult they escaped a decade earlier. Hoping to find the closure that they couldn't find as young men, they're forced to reconsider the cult's beliefs when confronted with unexplainable phenomena surrounding the camp. As the members prepare for the coming of a mysterious event, the brothers race to unravel the seemingly impossible truth before their lives become permanently entangled with the cult. ",Drama
Ad Astra,"Thirty years ago, Clifford McBride led a voyage into deep space, but the ship and crew were never heard from again. Now his son -- a fearless astronaut -- must embark on a daring mission to Neptune to uncover the truth about his missing father and a mysterious power surge that threatens the stability of the universe. ",Adventure
Crimson Peak,"After marrying the charming and seductive Sir Thomas Sharpe, young Edith (Mia Wasikowska) finds herself swept away to his remote gothic mansion in the English hills. Also living there is Lady Lucille, Thomas' alluring sister and protector of her family's dark secrets. Able to communicate with the dead, Edith tries to decipher the mystery behind the ghostly visions that haunt her new home. As she comes closer to the truth, Edith may learn that true monsters are made of flesh and blood. ",Drama
Oculus,"Haunted by the violent demise of their parents 10 years earlier, adult siblings Kaylie (Karen Gillan) and Tim (Brenton Thwaites) are now struggling to rebuild their relationship. Kaylie suspects that their antique mirror, known as the Lasser Glass, is behind the tragedy. The seemingly harmless reflections contain a malevolent, supernatural force that infects the mind of anyone who gazes into it. As Kaylie gets closer to the truth, the siblings become caught in the mirror's evil spell. ",Horror
Insidious: Chapter 2,"Soon after their showdown with evil spirits that possessed their son, the Lamberts, Renai (Rose Byrne) and Josh (Patrick Wilson), are ready for their lives to return to normal. However, something still is seriously off, especially with Josh, who -- unbeknown to Renai -- is possessed too. In order to free Josh's soul and finally defeat the malevolent forces around them, Lorraine Lambert (Barbara Hershey) and her ghost-hunting friends investigate the past to save her family's future. ",Horror
The Double,"After his friend is murdered, a man returns to England and poses as his dead pal in order to acquire his inheritance. ",Comedy
Host,"Careless American military personnel dump chemicals into South Korea's Han River. Several years later, a creature emerges from the tainted waters and sinks its ravenous jaws into local residents. When the creature abducts their daughter (Go Ah-sung), a vendor (Song Kang-ho) and his family decide that they are the only ones who can save her. ",Horror
A Perfect Getaway,"Newlyweds Cliff (Steve Zahn) and Cydney (Milla Jovovich) are celebrating their honeymoon by hiking through a secluded region of Hawaii. Their idyllic trek takes a dark turn when they find a group of frightened hikers who claim that another couple has been brutally murdered. Far from civilization and unsure who to trust, Cydney and Cliff soon get locked into a terrifying battle for survival. ",Drama
Blindness,"A gun-bearing former convict (Joe Lando) intrudes upon his ex-friend and ex-lover (Vivian Wu), now married, and the friend's blind mother (Lisa Lu). ",Drama
Silent Hill,"Unable to accept the fact that her daughter is dying, Rose (Radha Mitchell) decides to take the girl to a faith healer. On the way, the pair drive through a portal in reality, leading to an eerie town called Silent Hill. The town is surrounded by a potent darkness, and the human survivors fight a losing battle against it. ",Horror
Secret Window,"While in the process of an ugly divorce from his wife (Maria Bello), writer Mort Rainey (Johnny Depp) relocates to his remote cabin in upstate New York for solitude. Attempting to recover his mental health, Rainey has the misfortune of being found by John Shooter (John Turturro), a farmer who claims Rainey plagiarized his work. At first, Rainey ignores the accusations, but Shooter has no intention of quietly disappearing. Soon, Shooter becomes increasingly vicious in his quest for retribution. ",Drama
Dead End,An officer (Eric Roberts) discovers a police cover-up while investigating his ex-wife's suspicious death. ,Adventure
The Blair Witch Project,"Found video footage tells the tale of three film students (Heather Donahue, Joshua Leonard, Michael C. Williams) who've traveled to a small town to collect documentary footage about the Blair Witch, a legendary local murderer. Over the course of several days, the students interview townspeople and gather clues to support the tale's veracity. But the project takes a frightening turn when the students lose their way in the woods and begin hearing horrific noises. ",Horror
Stealing Beauty,"When she was 15, pretty but callow Lucy Harmon (Liv Tyler) visited the Tuscan town where her mother once enchanted the local male population. Four years later, in the wake of her mother's suicide, Lucy returns to the village. She plans to write some poetry, learn more about her family history and reunite with a boy she once kissed. Surveying an expansive field of suitors, Lucy finds herself taken with unattainable Alex (Jeremy Irons), as her journey imparts some unexpected lessons about love. ",Drama
Unsane,"Sawyer Valentini relocates from Boston to Pennsylvania to escape from the man who's been stalking her for the last two years. While consulting with a therapist, Valentini unwittingly signs in for a voluntary 24-hour commitment to the Highland Creek Behavioral Center. Her stay at the facility soon gets extended when doctors and nurses begin to question her sanity. Sawyer now believes that one of the staffers is her stalker -- and she'll do whatever it takes to stay alive and fight her way out. ",Drama
Ghostland,A group of Ju'Hoansi bushmen journey through Europe. ,Drama
A Cure for Wellness,A Wall Street stockbroker (Dane DeHaan) travels to a remote location in the Swiss Alps to retrieve his company's CEO (Harry Groener) from an idyllic but mysterious wellness center. He soon suspects that the miraculous treatments are not what they seem. His sanity is tested when he unravels the spa's terrifying secrets and finds himself diagnosed with the same curious illness that keeps all of the guests there longing for a cure. ,Drama
Luckiest Girl Alive,"Luckiest Girl Alive centers on Ani FaNelli, a sharp-tongued New Yorker who appears to have it all: a sought-after position at a glossy magazine, a killer wardrobe, and a dream Nantucket wedding on the horizon. But when the director of a crime documentary invites her to tell her side of the shocking incident that took place when she was a teenager at the prestigious Brentley School, Ani is forced to confront a dark truth that threatens to unravel her meticulously crafted life. ",Drama
White Bird in a Blizzard,"A teenager (Shailene Woodley) relishes her newfound freedom after her disturbed mother (Eva Green) vanishes, but the strange facts of the disappearance soon begin to haunt her. ",Drama
Europa Report,"When unmanned probes suggest that a hidden ocean and single-celled life exists on one of Jupiter's moons, six astronauts embark on an ill-fated exploratory mission. ",Adventure
Before I Fall,"Samantha Kingston (Zoey Deutch) seems to have it all: popularity, a loving boyfriend (Kian Lawley) and a seemingly perfect future. Everything changes in the blink of an eye when she dies in a car crash but then magically wakes up to find herself reliving the same day over and over again. As Samantha tries to untangle the mystery of a life derailed, she must also unravel the secrets of the people closest to her and discover how the power of a single day can make a difference. ",Drama
The Awakening,A bored landlady (Cynthia Geary) finds new life after joining a handsome bounty hunter's (David Beecroft) search for a missing tenant. ,Drama
The Lucky One,"U.S. Marine Sgt. Logan Thibault (Zac Efron) returns home from his third tour of duty in Iraq with the one thing he believes kept him alive: a photograph of a woman he doesn't even know. He learns the woman's name is Beth (Taylor Schilling) and goes to meet her, eventually taking a job at her family-run kennel. Though Beth is full of mistrust and leads a complicated life, a romance blooms, giving Logan hope that Beth could become more than just his good-luck charm. ",Drama
Chehre,"CHEHRE, about an 80-year-old man with a penchant for real life games, is a story about rights and wrongs. It's a story about the decisions one makes in his/her lifetime and the fact that every decision has its repercussions, hearing and judgement. ",Drama
Alice in Wonderland,Animated adaptation of Lewis Carroll's story. ,Adventure
Session 9,"A tale of terror when a group of asbestos removal workers start work in an abandoned insane asylum. The complex of buildings looms up out of the woods like a dormant beast. Grand, imposing ... abandoned, deteriorating. The residents of Danvers, Massachusetts steer well clear of the place. But Danvers State Mental Hospital, closed down for 15 years, is about to receive five new visitors... ",Drama
Friday the 13th,"In London, near midnight as a rain storm rages, several people travel across the city on a bus. Of the passengers, one elderly woman seems anxious and upset, a young man who has just been robbed by a pickpocket gratefully accepts money for his fare from another passenger, another man boasts of his knowledge of art, and a young woman angrily destroys a photo of a man. When a lightning strike causes the bus to crash, each passenger recalls what brought them on the ill-fated journey. ",Horror
The Conjuring: The Devil Made Me Do It,"""The Conjuring: The Devil Made Me Do It"" reveals a chilling story of terror, murder and unknown evil that shocked even experienced real-life paranormal investigators Ed and Lorraine Warren. One of the most sensational cases from their files, it starts with a fight for the soul of a young boy, then takes them beyond anything they'd ever seen before, to mark the first time in U.S. history that a murder suspect would claim demonic possession as a defense. ",Horror
Apostle,"After Sonny (Robert Duvall), an eccentric Pentecostal preacher, learns that his wife is having an affair, he beats her lover into a coma and flees the state of Texas. Now in a small Louisiana town, Sonny goes by the name of ""Apostle E.F."" and opens a new church with the help of a retired reverend (John Beasley). While battling personal demons and injecting new life into his congregation, Sonny dates a radio station worker (Miranda Richardson) and searches for peace in his new life. ",Drama
The Ritual,"Jack, a young actor facing tough luck in his acting career, decides to sell his soul to the devil in exchange for fame and success. ",Horror
Lights Out,A person asks a private detective to help solve a cold case. ,Horror
Paper Towns,"Young and shy Quentin (Nat Wolff) is in for the night of his life when Margo (Cara Delevingne), the most popular student in high school, recruits him to help her play mischievous pranks on the friends who betrayed her. The next day, however, the mysterious Margo is nowhere to be found. With help from a few buddies and some cryptic clues that she left behind, Quentin embarks on an obsessive mission to find the girl who stole his heart and made him feel truly alive. ",Adventure
Project Almanac,"David Raskin (Jonny Weston) is a high-school science nerd who dreams of going to MIT. When he and his friends (Sam Lerner, Allen Evangelista) find his late father's plans for a ""temporal displacement device,"" David can't wait to start tinkering. When they finally get the device to work, the teenagers jump at the opportunity to manipulate time in their favor -- but their joy is short-lived when they begin to discover the consequences of their actions. ",Drama
The Loft,"For five men (Karl Urban, James Marsden, Wentworth Miller, Eric Stonestreet, Matthias Schoenaerts), the opportunity to share a penthouse in the city -- in which to carry on extramarital affairs -- is a dream come true, until the dead body of an unknown woman turns up. Realizing that her killer must be one of their group, the men are gripped by paranoia as each one suspects another. Friendships are tested, loyalties are questioned, and marriages crumble while fear and suspicion run rampant. ",Mystery
Before I Go to Sleep,"Ever since a vicious attack nearly claimed her life, Christine Lucas (Nicole Kidman) has suffered from anterograde amnesia and is unable to form new memories. Every morning, she becomes reacquainted with her husband, Ben (Colin Firth), and the other constants in her life. In accordance with her doctor's (Mark Strong) instructions, Christine keeps a video diary. As Christine starts to uncover terrifying truths about her past, she begins to question everything -- and everyone -- around her. ",Drama
Under the Skin,A young woman (Samantha Morton) embarks upon a sexual odyssey in reaction to her mother's (Rita Tushingham) sudden death from a brain tumor. ,Drama
Devil,"Five strangers' day begins with an elevator ride in a Philadelphia office tower. But, what happens next is anything but ordinary. The elevator gets stuck, and the trapped passengers, who expected to be together just a few minutes, now face the revelation of their secrets and transgressions. Frightening events turn annoyance into terror, as they begin to realize that one of their number is Lucifer himself. ",Horror
Paranormal Activity,"Soon after moving into a suburban tract home, Katie (Katie Featherston) and Micah (Micah Sloat) become increasingly disturbed by what appears to be a supernatural presence. Hoping to capture evidence of it on film, they set up video cameras in the house but are not prepared for the terrifying events that follow. ",Horror
Scream,"Twenty-five years after a streak of brutal murders shocked the quiet town of Woodsboro, a new killer has donned the Ghostface mask and begins targeting a group of teenagers to resurrect secrets from the town's deadly past. ",Horror
Dear John,"When soldier John Tyree (Channing Tatum) meets an idealistic college student, Savannah Curtis (Amanda Seyfried), it's the beginning of a strong romance. Over the next seven tumultuous years and separated by John's increasingly dangerous deployment, the lovers stay in touch through their letters, meeting in person only rarely. However, their correspondence triggers consequences that neither could foresee. ",Drama
The Uninvited,Malevolent spirits visit a remote house to torment a woman (Marguerite Moreau) who has a history of agoraphobia. ,Drama
Flightplan,"Airplane engineer Kyle Pratt (Jodie Foster) is heading home from Germany to New York on a double-decker Elgin 474 to bury her husband. But three hours into the flight, she awakens to find her young daughter missing -- and the entire flight crew, including Capt. Rich (Sean Bean) and Air Marshal Gene Carson (Peter Sarsgaard), claims that the child was never on board. Determined to find her daughter, Kyle searches the limited space of the plane, all the while trying to maintain her sanity. ",Drama
Scream 2,"Sydney (Neve Campbell) and tabloid reporter Gale Weathers (Courteney Cox) survived the events of the first ""Scream,"" but their nightmare isn't over. When two college students are murdered at a sneak preview of ""Stab,"" a movie based on the events from the first film, it's clear a copycat killer is on the loose. Sydney and Gail, as well as fellow survivors Deputy Dewey (David Arquette) and Randy (Jamie Kennedy) have to find out who is behind this new murder spree, before they all end up dead. ",Horror
The Vanishing,"Rex (Gene Bervoets) and Saskia (Johanna Ter Steege) are enjoying a biking holiday in France when, stopping at a gas station, Saskia disappears. Confounded, Rex searches everywhere, but to no avail. Three years later, he's still obsessed with finding her, pleading his case on television, putting up posters and ruining his new relationship in the process. Eventually an unassuming chemistry teacher, Raymond (Bernard-Pierre Donnadieu), approaches Rex, intimating that he knows what happened. ",Drama
Happy Death Day 2U,"Collegian Tree Gelbman wakes up in horror to learn that she's stuck in a parallel universe. Her boyfriend Carter is now with someone else, and her friends and fellow students seem to be completely different versions of themselves. When Tree discovers that Carter's roommate has been altering time, she finds herself once again the target of a masked killer. When the psychopath starts to go after her inner circle, Tree soon realizes that she must die over and over again to save everyone. ",Comedy
The Empty Man,A series of mysterious disappearances in a small Midwestern town may be linked to a supernatural entity. ,Horror
Color Out of Space,"After a meteorite lands in the front yard of their farm, Nathan Gardner and his family find themselves battling a mutant extraterrestrial organism that infects their minds and bodies, transforming their quiet rural life into a technicolor nightmare. ",Horror
It Comes at Night,"After a mysterious apocalypse leaves the world with few survivors, two families are forced to share a home in an uneasy alliance to keep the outside evil at bay -- only to learn that the true horror may come from within. ",Drama
Ouija: Origin of Evil,"In 1967 Los Angeles, widowed mother Alice Zander (Elizabeth Reaser) unwittingly invites authentic evil into her home by adding a new stunt to bolster her séance scam business. When the merciless spirit overtakes her youngest daughter Doris (Lulu Wilson), the small family must confront unthinkable fears to save her and send her possessor back to the other side. ",Drama
The Visit,A simple birthday card and a first-class ticket bring Andi and Emily face-to-face with a question that neither is ready to confront. ,Horror
Scary Stories to Tell in the Dark,The shadow of the Bellows family has loomed large in the small town of Mill Valley for generations. It's in a mansion that young Sarah Bellows turns her tortured life and horrible secrets into a series of scary stories. These terrifying tales soon have a way of becoming all too real for a group of unsuspecting teens who stumble upon Sarah's spooky home. ,Adventure
Berlin Syndrome,A disturbed teacher holds a young photographer captive in his Berlin apartment after bringing her home for a night of romance. ,Drama
Alice Through the Looking Glass,Based on Lewis Carroll's classic novel about a girl's adventures in a magical place called Wonderland. ,Adventure
Open Grave,"A man awakes-- without memory -- in a pit full of bodies and must figure out if the people who rescued him are the killers, or if he is the murderer. ",Horror
Red Lights,"First-rate mediocre salesman Antoine (Jean-Pierre Darroussin) and his attractive, successful and increasingly aloof wife, Hélène (Carole Bouquet), are en route to pick up their daughter from camp, bickering as usual. When the fight gets out of hand, Hélène goes on alone by train, while Antoine begins a debauched night at a local bar. There he meets a hitchhiker (Vincent Deniard) who insists on a ride, and Antoine can't help but think him the escaped killer he's been hearing about on the radio. ",Drama
Scream 4,"It has been many years since the Ghostface Killer cut a deadly path through the town of Woodsboro. In order to get over the trauma of those horrific events, Sidney Prescott (Neve Campbell) has written a self-help book. She returns to Woodsboro for her book tour, and reconnects with old friends Gale Weathers (Courteney Cox) and Sheriff Dewey (David Arquette). However, Sidney's arrival also sparks the return of Ghostface, putting Sidney and everyone she loves in danger. ",Comedy
Dorian Gray,"Oscar Wilde's English dandy (Helmut Berger) sells his soul for eternal youth, but his portrait reveals his age and depravity. ",Drama
The Nines,"Three actors (Ryan Reynolds, Hope Davis, Melissa McCarthy) tackle the principal roles in a trio of stories. In ""The Prisoner,"" a publicist and a neighbor are the only links to the outside world for an actor under house arrest. ""Reality Television"" charts the production of a TV sitcom. In ""Knowing,"" a video-game designer and his family are stranded in the forest after their car breaks down. ",Drama
Case 39,"In her many years as a social worker, Emily Jenkins (Renée Zellweger) thinks she has seen it all -- until she meets 10-year-old Lilith (Jodelle Ferland) and the girl's cruel parents. When the parents try to harm the child, Emily assumes custody of Lilith while looking for a foster family. However, she soon finds that dark forces surround the seemingly innocent child, and the more she tries to protect Lilith, the more horrors she encounters. ",Horror
Birth,"It took Anna (Nicole Kidman) 10 years to recover from the death of her husband, Sean, but now she's on the verge of marrying her boyfriend, Joseph (Danny Huston), and finally moving on. However, on the night of her engagement party, a young boy named Sean (Cameron Bright) turns up, saying he is her dead husband reincarnated. At first she ignores the child, but his knowledge of her former husband's life is uncanny, leading her to believe that he might be telling the truth. ",Drama
Solaris,"Based on the classic science fiction novel by Stanislaw Lem, ""Solaris"" centers on a psychologist (George Clooney) sent to investigate unexplained behavior of key scientists on a space station orbiting the planet Solaris. Once aboard he, too, falls victim to this unique world's mysteries -- as well as to an erotic obsession with someone he thought he had left behind. ",Drama
Jeepers Creepers,"After making a horrific discovery in the basement of an old abandoned church, Trish (Gina Philips) and her brother Darry (Justin Long) watch their routine road trip home from college turn into a heart-stopping race for their lives. They find themselves the chosen prey of an indestructible force that relentlessly pursues them and gives a new and chilling meaning to the old song ""Jeepers Creepers."" ",Horror
The Hole,"During the economic boom of the 1960s, Europe's highest building is being built in Italy's prosperous north. At the other end of the country, young speleologists explore Europe's deepest cave in the untouched Calabrian hinterland. ",Drama
The Arrival,An FBI agent's (John Saxon) hunt for a serial killer leads to an old man made young and hungry by an alien force. ,Mystery
Brightburn,"After a difficult struggle with fertility, Tori Breyer's dreams of motherhood come true with the arrival of a mysterious baby boy. Brandon appears to be everything Tori and her husband, Kyle, ever wanted -- bright, talented and curious about the world. But as Brandon nears puberty, powerful darkness manifests within him, and Tori becomes consumed by terrible doubts about her son. Once Brandon begins to act on his twisted urges, those closest to him find themselves in grave danger. ",Drama
Personal Shopper,"A young American in Paris works as a personal shopper for a celebrity. She seems to have the ability to communicate with spirits, like her recently deceased twin brother. Soon, she starts to receive ambiguous messages from an unknown source. ",Mystery
Insidious: Chapter 3,"When teenager Quinn Brenner (Stefanie Scott) senses that her late mother is trying to contact her, she seeks help from gifted psychic Elise Rainier (Lin Shaye). However, Elise's tragic past makes her reluctant to use her abilities. After Quinn is attacked by a malevolent entity, her father (Dermot Mulroney) pleads with Elise for help. With support from two parapsychologists, Elise ventures deep into The Further -- where she finds a powerful demon with an insatiable craving for human souls. ",Horror
Grave Encounters,The crew of a ghost-hunting TV show goes insane after being locked in an abandoned psychiatric hospital. ,Horror
Mirrors,"A woman (Kitty Winn) loses a husband, gains a doctor (Peter Donat) and has voodoo visions in New Orleans. ",Horror
The Strangers,"Kristen (Liv Tyler) and James (Scott Speedman) are expecting a relaxing weekend at a family vacation home, but their stay turns out to be anything but peaceful. First, a mysterious and dangerous woman arrives at the door while James is out on an errand. When he returns, he accidentally kills his friend Mike (Glenn Howerton), mistaking him for an intruder. And then real danger does show up -- in the form of three masked torturers, leaving Kristen and James struggling for survival. ",Horror
Dead Silence,"After his wife meets a grisly end, Jamie Ashen (Ryan Kwanten) returns to their creepy hometown of Ravens Fair to unravel the mystery of her murder. Once there, he discovers the legend of Mary Shaw (Joan Heney), a murdered ventriloquist whose eerie presence still looms over the town. As he desperately digs for answers, Jamie encounters the curse that took his wife's life and threatens his own. ",Horror
Dragonfly,"When a loved one dies, are they gone forever? As head of emergency services for Chicago Memorial Hospital, Dr. Joe Darrow (Kevin Costner) is a respected expert in trauma and triage. But his professional knowledge provides little comfort when tragedy claims the life of his wife. A doctor herself, Emily Darrow (Susanna Thompson) was on a medical mercy mission when she died in a bus accident on a remote mountain road in Venezuela. Joe starts believing his wife is trying to communicate with him. ",Drama
Relic,A woman links her mother's increasingly volatile behavior to an evil presence at their family's decaying country home. ,Drama
The Lodge,"During a family retreat to a remote winter cabin over the holidays, the father is forced to abruptly depart for work, leaving his two children in the care of his new girlfriend, Grace. Isolated and alone, a blizzard traps them inside the lodge as terrifying events summon specters from Grace's dark past. ",Drama
Unfriended: Dark Web,"After finding a laptop, a young man goes online to play a game with five of his good friends. He shows them a mysterious folder that plays disturbing videos of people who appear to be in danger. They then receive an anonymous message that tells them they will all die if they disconnect or call the police. The planned night of fun quickly turns deadly as each user becomes the target of something sinister while the others watch helplessly in terror. ",Horror
The Boy,"A young American named Greta (Lauren Cohan) takes a job as a nanny for an 8-year-old boy in a remote English village. To her surprise, Greta learns that the child of her new employers is a life-size doll. They care for the doll as if it was human, which helps the couple to cope with the death of their own son 20 years earlier. When Greta violates a list of strict rules, a series of disturbing and inexplicable events bring her worst fears to life, leading her to believe that the doll is alive. ",Horror
The Taking,Two strangers have to find a way to escape from a sinister family trying to sacrifice their souls. ,Horror
Circle,A father's fear for his daughter's life puts him in the middle of interconnected crime organizations and a series of bizarre events centered around a poker game. ,Drama
The Signal,"Twenty-seven brave men and a woman, trapped by the enemy, are overwhelmed in a world of conflicts. ",Drama
Greta,Swedish teenager Greta Thunberg leads a global movement on the climate change crisis. ,Drama
The Zero Theorem,"Hired to crack a theorem, reclusive computer genius Qohen Leth (Christoph Waltz) begins to make headway until his controlled world is interrupted by seductive Bainsley (Mélanie Thierry) and turbulent Bob (Lucas Hedges). ",Comedy
Rebecca,"A young newlywed arrives at her husband's imposing family estate on a windswept English coast and finds herself battling the shadow of his first wife, Rebecca, whose legacy lives on in the house long after her death. ",Drama
The House with a Clock in Its Walls,"Ten-year-old Lewis goes to live with his oddball uncle in a creaky old house that contains a mysterious ticktock noise. He soon learns that Uncle Jonathan and his feisty neighbor, Mrs. Zimmerman, are powerful practitioners of the magic arts. When Lewis accidentally awakens the dead, the town's sleepy facade suddenly springs to life -- revealing a secret and dangerous world of witches, warlocks and deadly curses. ",Comedy
Dream House,"A computer controlling a state-of-the-art house decides that new homeowners (Timothy Busfield, Jennifer Dale, Dan Petronijevic) are unfit to reside there. ",Drama
Saw VI,"With Jigsaw (Tobin Bell) still directing events from beyond the grave, Hoffman (Costas Mandylor) emerges as the heir to the killer's twisted legacy. But as the FBI closes in, Hoffman sets in motion a game that is designed to reveal Jigsaw's grand scheme. ",Horror
The Rite,"Though he is filled with doubt about the subject, seminary student Michael Kovak (Colin O'Donoghue) finds he must attend a Vatican school of exorcism. Believing possession to be the work of a troubled mind rather than actual demons, hel urges his superiors to look for answers in psychiatry. Then Michael becomes the apprentice of Father Lucas (Anthony Hopkins), a veteran exorcist, and encounters a terrifying force that causes him to question everything he believes. ",Drama
Hellraiser,"Sexual deviant Frank (Sean Chapman) inadvertently opens a portal to hell when he tinkers with a box he bought while abroad. The act unleashes gruesome beings called Cenobites, who tear Frank's body apart. When Frank's brother (Andrew Robinson) and his wife, Julia (Clare Higgins), move into Frank's old house, they accidentally bring what is left of Frank back to life. Frank then convinces Julia, his one-time lover, to lure men back to the house so he can use their blood to reconstruct himself. ",Horror
The Midnight Meat Train,"When struggling photographer Leon Kaufman (Bradley Cooper) meets the owner of a prominent art gallery, he sees a chance for the success that has, so far, eluded him. Determined to show the darker side of humanity for his debut showing, Leon crosses paths with Mahogany (Vinnie Jones) a serial killer who preys on late-night subway commuters. His fascination with Mahogany pulls him -- and his lover (Leslie Bibb) -- deep into an evil abyss. ",Horror
The Good German,"Jake Geismar (George Clooney), an Army correspondent, helps his former lover, Lena Brandt (Cate Blanchett), comb post-World War II Berlin for her missing husband, who is wanted by American and Russian forces. Shadowing their efforts is Jake's driver, Tully (Tobey Maguire), a GI with connections to the black market. His loyalties unclear to them, Lena and Jake know that Tully has the power to lead them to salvation or great danger. ",Drama
Original Sin,"Luis (Antonio Banderas) and Julia (Angelina Jolie) are bound together first by matrimony, and then, by fierce love and desire. But the closer Luis becomes to Julia, the more enigmatic she seems to be. For Luis, the loneliness which led to love becomes a passion which transcends reason and defies convention, as he and Julia engage in a dangerous dance that takes them across the landscape of Cuba, into obsession, eroticism... and perhaps even murder. ",Drama
Friday the 13th Part 2,"The second entry in the long-running horror series focuses on a group of teenage would-be counselors converging on Camp Crystal Lake for training under the tutelage of head counselor Paul (John Furey). Inevitably, Paul relates the story of Jason Voorhees (Warrington Gillette), a boy who ostensibly drowned at the camp and whose mother murdered a group of counselors in revenge. No one takes the tale seriously until a very much alive Jason begins gruesomely eliminating people. ",Horror
Cam,"A camgirl has her principles, until a mysterious woman who looks just like her takes over her channel. ",Drama
Annabelle Comes Home,"Determined to keep Annabelle from wreaking more havoc, paranormal investigators Ed and Lorraine Warren lock the possessed doll in the artifacts room in their house. But when the doll awakens the room's evil spirits, it soon becomes an unholy night of terror for the couple's 10-year-old daughter, her friends and their young baby sitter. ",Horror
Antlers,"From the visionary world of acclaimed director Scott Cooper and horror maestro Guillermo del Toro comes ANTLERS. In an isolated Oregon town, a middle-school teacher (Keri Russell) and her sheriff brother (Jesse Plemons) become embroiled with her enigmatic student (Jeremy T. Thomas) whose dark secrets lead to terrifying encounters with a legendary ancestral creature who came before them. Based on the short story The Quiet Boy by Nick Antosca. ",Drama
After.Life,"Following a terrible car crash, a woman (Christina Ricci) awakes to find an enigmatic mortician (Liam Neeson) preparing her for burial. ",Drama
Premonition,"Linda Hanson (Sandra Bullock) has an idyllic life, until one day she receives word that her husband (Julian McMahon) has died in an auto accident. However, when Linda wakes up the next morning and finds Jim beside her, she assumes she has just had an unusually vivid dream. Soon she finds out that what she experienced was not a dream, and she must battle time and destiny to save her family. ",Drama
The Possession,"When their youngest daughter, Em (Natasha Calis), becomes strangely obsessed with an antique wooden box bought from a yard sale, parents Clyde (Jeffrey Dean Morgan) and Stephanie (Kyra Sedgwick) see little cause for alarm. However, Em becomes increasingly unstable, leading the couple to fear the presence of a malevolent force. To their horror, Clyde and Stephanie learn that the box contains a dybbuk, a dislocated spirit that inhabits -- and ultimately devours -- a human host. ",Horror
The Grudge,"Matthew Williams (William Mapother), his wife, Jennifer (Clea DuVall), and mother, Emma (Grace Zabriskie), are Americans making a new life in Tokyo. Together they move into a house that has been the site of supernatural occurrences in the past, and it isn't long before their new home begins terrorizing the Williams family as well. The house, as it turns out, is the site of a curse that lingers in a specific place and claims the lives of anyone that comes near. ",Horror
Hide and Seek,Six friends must play a lethal game after being abducted by a person dressed as Santa Claus. ,Horror
Eli,A thief is recruited to infiltrate a gang to stop cigarette smuggling. ,Drama
High Life,"An artist must deal with his girlfriend's wish that he become serious about his career, although his younger brother refuses to let him grow up. ",Adventure
The Prodigy,Olga Smirnova's talent and drive are taking her to new heights in the ultracompetitive arena of world-class ballet at the Bolshoi in Moscow. ,Fantasy
The Void,A physicist (Amanda Tapping) tries to stop a greedy industrialist from creating a black hole in a laboratory. ,Horror
Reminiscence,Unconscious Takewaki Shoichi wanders through his past after collapsing in a subway on the way home from his retirement party. ,Mystery
Paranormal Activity 3,"In 1988 sisters Katie (Chloe Csengery) and Kristi (Jessica Tyler Brown) seem to be enjoying a normal, happy childhood at home. But when strange things start going bump in the night, their father, a wedding videographer, decides to use his cameras to discover the source, especially since Kristi appears to having conversations with an imaginary friend. While the cameras do indeed reveal a flurry of supernatural occurrences, the family is unprepared for the terror that awaits. ",Horror
Old,A tropical holiday turns into a horrific nightmare when a family visits a secluded beach that somehow causes them to age rapidly -- reducing their entire lives into a single day. ,Drama
Antebellum,"Successful author Veronica Henley is finishing a book tour before she returns home to her husband and daughter. But a shocking turn of events is about to upend Veronica's existence, plunging her into a horrifying reality that forces her to confront her past, present and future -- before it's too late. ",Drama
Passengers,A couple's marriage deteriorates over a single night. ,Mystery
Cry Wolf,"Mysterious murders occur when students (Lindy Booth, Julian Morris) at a prep school invent a story about a serial killer. ",Drama
Without a Paddle,"After their friend Billy (Anthony Starr) dies, Tom (Dax Shepard), Jerry (Matthew Lillard) and Dan (Seth Green) go on a camping trip to honor his memory. The campsite, however, has special significance. Billy believed famous airplane hijacker D.B. Cooper hid money in the area, and his friends aim to find it. Unfortunately, they are not prepared for the adventure. After falling over a waterfall, they are left to the mercy of wild animals and a harsh wilderness terrain. ",Adventure
The Forgotten,"While on their journey home, three knights encounter an ancient evil. Trapped, they must fight their way out of the forest or face a fate worse than death. ",Drama
Gothika,"The life of psychiatrist Miranda Grey (Halle Berry) is derailed after she nearly hits a girl with her car one night. Later, Miranda wakes up in her own mental hospital under the care of her peer, Pete Graham (Robert Downey Jr.). Completely disoriented, Miranda is accused of killing her own husband, but she has no memory of anything after she encountered the girl. Slowly Miranda begins to uncover what happened, but she has to escape the asylum to solve the mystery. ",Horror
The Relic,A homicide detective (Tom Sizemore) helps a biologist (Penelope Ann Miller) hunt a giant creature that is killing people in a Chicago museum. ,Horror
I Know What You Did Last Summer,"A year after running over a fisherman and dumping his body in the water, four friends reconvene when Julie (Jennifer Love Hewitt) receives a frightening letter telling her that their crime was seen. While pursuing who he thinks is responsible for the letter, Barry (Ryan Phillippe) is run over by a man with a meat hook. The bloodletting only increases from there, as the killer with the hook continues to stalk Julie, Helen (Sarah Michelle Gellar) and Ray (Freddie Prinze Jr.). ",Horror
Velvet Buzzsaw,"After paintings by an unknown artist are discovered, a supernatural force enacts revenge on those who have allowed their greed to get in the way of art. ",Horror
Insidious: The Last Key,"Brilliant parapsychologist Elise Rainier receives a disturbing phone call from a man who claims that his house is haunted. Even more disturbing is the address -- 413 Apple Tree Lane in Five Keys, N.M. -- the home where Elise grew up as a child. Accompanied by her two investigative partners, Rainier travels to Five Keys to confront and destroy her greatest fear -- the demon that she accidentally set free years earlier. ",Horror
Honeymoon,A Frenchwoman (Nathalie Baye) marries an unbalanced stranger (John Shea) in order to stay in New York with her lover (Richard Berry). ,Drama
The Dyatlov Pass Incident,"To determine what happened to some Russian hikers, five U.S. college students go back to where the hikers were found dead. The students don't return from the expedition, either, and the recovered footage is deemed too disturbing for public viewing. ",Horror
Paranormal Activity 2,"When the Reys move into their new Southern California home, little do they realize that the house is already occupied. After coming home one day to find the house in disarray -- but with no signs of forced entry or robbery -- they install a video surveillance system to catch the perpetrators. But nothing prepares them for what happens next. ",Horror
The Last Exorcism,"After years of gulling the faithful, cleric Cotton Marcus (Patrick Fabian) feels remorse and decides to expose his chicanery through filming a documentary. With a crew in tow, Marcus arrives at the Louisiana farm of devout Louis Sweetzer, who believes that his daughter, Nell, is possessed. When the usual stunts fail, he realizes that he is face-to-face with real evil and must summon true faith to protect Nell, the others and himself from demonic power. ",Horror
The Rental,Four nubile collegians learn that the owner (Mike Campbell) of their low-cost rental has a sinister secret. ,Drama
Pet Sematary,"Doctor Louis Creed (Dale Midkiff) moves his family to Maine, where he meets a friendly local named Jud Crandall (Fred Gwynne). After the Creeds' cat is accidentally killed, Crandall advises Louis to bury it in the ground near the old pet cemetery. The cat returns to life, its personality changed for the worse. When Louis' son, Gage (Miko Hughes), dies tragically, Louis decides to bury the boy's body in the same ground despite the warnings of Crandall and Louis' visions of a deceased patient. ",Horror
Ma,A virgin mother (Celia Rowlson-Hall) goes on a pilgrimage to Las Vegas to give birth to our savior. ,Horror
Unfriended,"One night, while teenagers Blaire, Mitch, Jess, Adam Ken and Val take part in an online group chat session, they are suddenly joined by a user known only as ""Billie227."" Thinking it's just a technical glitch, the friends carry on their conversation... until Blaire begins receiving messages from someone claiming to be Laura Barns, a classmate who killed herself exactly one year prior. As Blaire tries to expose Billie's identity, her friends are forced to confront their darkest secrets and lies. ",Horror
Dark Water,"Dahlia (Jennifer Connelly) wants to move away from her ex-husband, Kyle (Dougray Scott), and take her daughter, Ceci (Ariel Gade), with her. Relocating to a dreary tower block, Dahlia and Ceci discover eerie, dark water leaking through the ceiling of their new apartment. Dahlia petitions the supervisor (Pete Postlethwaite) and the building's owner (John C. Reilly) to fix the leak, yet it only gets worse. Now having nightmares about the dripping, Dahlia is driven to confront the problem herself. ",Drama
The Box,An obsessive actor begins to question his sanity after he finds himself repeatedly trapped in a nightmare that is eerily similar to a film he is auditioning for. ,Drama
Club Dread,"Years ago Coconut Pete (Bill Paxton) had a hit record, but now he runs a tropical island resort where he spends his days basking in hedonism with the rest of the resort's offbeat staff. The paradise Coconut Pete presides over, however, becomes a living hell when an unknown killer begins slaughtering the staff. As the body count increases, so too does suspicion among the survivors. Now it's up to Coconut Pete and what's left of his staff to solve the mystery and stop the bloodshed. ",Comedy
Urban Legend,"A university is beset by a rash of gruesome murders that resemble old urban legends. When her friend Michelle (Natasha Gregson Wagner) is killed by someone hiding in her car, Natalie (Alicia Witt) begins to notice the pattern. Her suspicions grow stronger when her own roommate is strangled to death. Soon the quiet college campus is transformed into hunting grounds for a maniac, and Natalie struggles to find the killer and stop the bloodshed before she becomes the next victim. ",Horror
Scream 3,"In the final installment to this trilogy, a murdering spree begins to happen again; this time targeted toward the original Woodsboro survivors and those associated with the movie-inside a-movie, Stab 3. Sydney (Neve Campbell) must face the demons of her past to stop the killer(s). ",Horror
The Innkeepers,"The last two employees (Sara Paxton, Pat Healy) of a century-old haunted hotel go on the hunt for ghosts. ",Drama
The Ward,No one believes the claims of a young woman (Amber Heard) that a dead patient is stalking the residents of the psychiatric facility. ,Horror
Friday the 13th,"In London, near midnight as a rain storm rages, several people travel across the city on a bus. Of the passengers, one elderly woman seems anxious and upset, a young man who has just been robbed by a pickpocket gratefully accepts money for his fare from another passenger, another man boasts of his knowledge of art, and a young woman angrily destroys a photo of a man. When a lightning strike causes the bus to crash, each passenger recalls what brought them on the ill-fated journey. ",Horror
All the Boys Love Mandy Lane,"Beautiful Mandy Lane (Amber Heard) isn't a party girl but, when classmate Chloe (Whitney Able) invites the Texas high school student to a bash in the countryside, she reluctantly accepts. After hitching a ride with a vaguely scary older man (Anson Mount), the teens arrive at their destination. Partying ensues, and Mandy's close pal, Emmet (Michael Welch), keeps a watchful eye on the young males making a play for Mandy. Then two of the students are murdered. ",Horror
Lady in the Water,"When Cleveland Heep (Paul Giamatti) rescues an enigmatic young woman (Bryce Dallas Howard) from danger, little does he know that she is a character from a bedtime story, who is trying to return to her world. As he falls deeply in love with her, he begins to realize that he and fellow tenants are also characters in the fable, and they must work together to protect her from those who would prevent her from returning home. ",Drama
White Noise,"Architect Jonathan Rivers (Michael Keaton) is happily married to author Anna (Chandra West), but tragedy strikes when she is killed in an accident. Deep in grief, Jonathan hears from Raymond Price (Ian McNeice), who claims that he has intercepted messages from Anna via electronic voice phenomena. Jonathan eventually comes to believe Raymond's claims, but, as he is drawn further into investigating the phenomenon, a sinister supernatural presence invades his life. ",Drama
Cube 2: Hypercube,"A group of strangers wakes up in a sealed room with no means of escape. The eight people -- Kate (Kari Matchett), Simon (Geraint Wyn Davies), Sasha (Grace Lynn Kung), Max (Matthew Ferguson), Jerry (Neil Crone), Julia (Lindsey Connell), Mrs. Paley (Barbara Gordon) and Col. Maguire (Bruce Gray) -- must find their way out of the room. But more rooms await them, and each one is increasingly dangerous. Also, it appears physical laws do not apply in this strange and deadly environment. ",Horror
Serenity,"In this continuation of the television series ""Firefly,"" a group of rebels travels the outskirts of space aboard their ship, Serenity, outside the reach of the Alliance, a sinister regime that controls most of the universe. After the crew takes in Simon (Sean Maher) and his psychic sister, River (Summer Glau), whom he has just rescued from Alliance forces, they find themselves being pursued by the Operative (Chiwetel Ejiofor), an Alliance agent who will stop at nothing to find them. ",Drama
Annabelle,"John Form (Ward Horton) thinks he's found the perfect gift for his expectant wife, Mia (Annabelle Wallis) : a vintage doll in a beautiful white dress. However, the couple's delight doesn't last long: One terrible night, devil worshippers invade their home and launch a violent attack against the couple. When the cultists try to summon a demon, they smear a bloody rune on the nursery wall and drip blood on Mia's doll, thereby turning the former object of beauty into a conduit for ultimate evil. ",Horror
Deep Water,A cruise ship carrying naval agents and the daughter of a VIP overturns in the wake of a nuclear blast. ,Drama
Red Riding Hood,"Jenny (Susan Satta), a 12-year-old girl, and her friend George (Fabio Sonnino) are abandoned and commit diabolical crimes on the citizens of Rome. ",Fantasy
Mute,"In a Berlin of the future, a mute bartender's search for his missing lady-love takes him deeper and deeper into the city's criminal underbelly. ",Mystery
My Bloody Valentine,Friends defy the rules of a legendary murderer and discover he is real when they start celebrating Valentine's Day. ,Horror
Winchester,"The most haunted house in the world sits on an isolated stretch of land that's 50 miles outside of San Francisco. Built by Sarah Winchester, heiress to the Winchester fortune, it stands seven stories tall and contains hundreds of rooms. To an outsider, it looks like a monstrous monument to a disturbed woman's madness. But Sarah's actually building a prison, an asylum for hundreds of vengeful ghosts -- and the most terrifying among them have a score to settle with the Winchesters. ",Drama
Turistas,"Travelers (Josh Duhamel, Melissa George, Olivia Wilde) are in the midst of enjoying a dream vacation along the Brazilian coast. Joining a party of revelers on the beach, the friends are drugged and find awake to find themselves robbed of their money, credit cards and passports. Led to a home in the jungle where they are told they will be safe, the friends instead discover a potentially fatal secret. ",Horror
The Nun,"Killed 20 years earlier, the ghost of a cruel nun (Cristina Piaget) returns to torment five former students. ",Horror
Sinister 2,"Hiding from her abusive, estranged husband, Courtney Collins lives in a rural house with her 9-year-old twins, Dylan and Zach. Young Dylan receives nightly visits from ghoulish kids who show him disturbing images of families being slaughtered. It's all part of the grand plan of Bughuul, the evil spirit who recruits innocent children to murder their loved ones. The only hope for his intended new victims may be a former deputy who's familiar with Bughuul's fiendish work from the past. ",Horror
Sleeping Beauty,"Marius Petipa's ""The Sleeping Beauty"" holds a special place in The Royal Ballet's repertory, with its vibrant sets and glittering costumes and featuring such iconic moments, all to Tchaikovsky's richly layered music. ",Drama
The Witches,"While staying at a hotel in England with his grandmother, Helga (Mai Zetterling), young Luke (Jasen Fisher) inadvertently spies on a convention of witches. The Grand High Witch (Anjelica Huston) reveals a plan to turn all children into mice through a magical formula. When they find that Luke has overheard, the witches test the formula on him. Now, with the help of Helga and the hotel manager, Mr. Stringer (Rowan Atkinson), Luke the mouse must fight back against the witches. ",Adventure
The Messengers,"When the Solomons trade in the craziness of big-city life for the quiet of a North Dakota farm, little do they expect the nightmare that follows. Soon after arriving, teenage Jess (Kristen Stewart) and her younger brother see terrifying apparitions and endure attacks from a supernatural source. Jess must warn her disbelieving family before it is too late to save them. ",Drama
Southland Tales,"With the United States under the threat of nuclear attack, the lives of several people converge in a dystopian Los Angeles. Movie star Boxer Santaros (Dwayne Johnson) plans his next film with the help of ambitious porn actress Krysta Now (Sarah Michelle Gellar) and troubled policeman Roland Taverner (Seann William Scott). Meanwhile, Marxist revolutionaries, greedy corporations and secretive government agencies pursue their separate agendas among a paranoid populace. ",Comedy
The Curse of La Llorona,The timeless Mexican folk tale of the Weeping Lady. ,Horror
Friend Request,"Laura is a popular college student who graciously accepts an online friend request from Marina, a young social outcast. To everyone's shock, Marina takes her own life after Laura decides to unfriend her. Soon, a disturbing and mysterious video appears on Laura's profile and her contacts slowly dwindle. When her friends suddenly begin to die one by one, the frightened young woman must figure out a way to stop the carnage before it's too late. ",Horror
The Lazarus Effect,"Medical researcher Frank (Mark Duplass), his fiancee Zoe (Olivia Wilde) and their team have achieved the impossible: they have found a way to revive the dead. After a successful, but unsanctioned, experiment on a lifeless animal, they are ready to make their work public. However, when their dean learns what they've done, he shuts them down. Zoe is killed during an attempt to recreate the experiment, leading Frank to test the process on her. Zoe is revived -- but something evil is within her. ",Horror
Flatliners,"Seeking answers about the afterlife, Chicago medical student Nelson (Kiefer Sutherland) persuades his fellow pupils to help him end his life, and then resuscitate him in the nick of time. Atheist David (Kevin Bacon), playboy Joe (William Baldwin) and troubled Rachel (Julia Roberts) also journey into the unknown, looking for meaning in their own lives. As the experiments become more perilous, each is forced to contend with the paranormal consequences of trespassing on the other side. ",Drama
Apollo 18,"Apollo 17 was the last U.S.-sponsored lunar voyage -- or was it? Hours of found footage, classified for decades, point to a subsequent moon mission -- Apollo 18 -- that ended very badly. Astronauts John Grey (Ryan Robbins), Nathan Walker (Lloyd Owen) and Benjamin Anderson (Warren Christie), on a mission to install radar scanners, discover a Soviet space capsule nearby. The men also discover a dead cosmonaut, and unfortunately for them, learn how he died. ",Horror
Hubie Halloween,"It's October 31st in Salem, Massachusetts, and a town's eccentric, devoted community volunteer and the good-natured object of his fellow citizen's derision and meanest pranks, finds himself in the midst of a real investigation, for a real murderer. ",Comedy
Mutant Chronicles,"In the 28th century, four rival corporations are in a constant state of war for control of the Earth. During one such battle, an ancient machine is uncovered and reactivated, and starts churning out undead mutants by the hundreds. While the corporations make plans to abandon the Earth, a strike force led by Maj. Mitch Hunter (Thomas Jane) and clergyman Brother Samuel (Ron Perlman), embark on a mission to destroy the machine before the mutants overrun the planet. ",Action
Shutter,"After hitting a young woman with her car, Jane (Natthaweeranuch Thongmee) and her photographer boyfriend, Tun (Ananda Everingham), begin seeing a shadowy figure haunting the background of Tun's photographs. Concerned that the figure is the vengeful spirit of the young woman from the accident, Jane does some research and soon discovers that the girl was named Natre (Achita Sikamana) and had been a classmate of Tun's. As the haunting continues, Jane uncovers a shocking secret. ",Horror
Congo,"Scientist Karen Ross (Laura Linney) is sent by her father-in-law, mogul R.B. Travis (Joe Don Baker), to the Congo to determine the whereabouts of his son's missing diamond-hunting team. Led by expert guide Kelly (Ernie Hudson), Ross and a mismatched search party -- including primatologist Dr. Peter Elliot (Dylan Walsh), treasure hunter Herkermer Homolka (Tim Curry) and a gorilla -- discover a danger far more sinister than anything they expected to find, even in the heart of the jungle. ",Action
Grave Encounters 2,Film students break into an abandoned insane asylum to do paranormal research and quickly discover ghosts are real. ,Horror
Abduction,Women face the threat of rampant kidnappings in a New Jersey town. ,Action
Sorority Row,"Cassidy (Briana Evigan), Jessica (Leah Pipes), Ellie (Rumer Willis), Claire (Jamie Chung) and Megan (Audrina Patridge) are sorority sisters and true-blue friends to the end -- until a prank gone wrong results in Megan's demise. Rather than risk their futures by reporting the crime, the friends agree to cover it up. Cassidy and company come to regret the decision a year later when someone begins sending them videos of the night Megan died, and they fall victim to a deadly stalker. ",Horror
The Covenant,A San Francisco banker (Jose Ferrer) rules a Nazi-gold empire; his wife (Jane Badler) shares an evil power with her twin (Michelle Phillips). ,Action
Exorcist: The Beginning,"Father Merrin (Stellan Skarsgard) is haunted by his experiences in World War II, when occupying Nazi troops forced him to be complicit in their atrocities. In the aftermath, he has renounced his faith and begun working as an archaeologist. He travels to Kenya, where a fifth-century Byzantine church holds ancient relics. There he encounters Sarah (Izabella Scorupco), a doctor and concentration camp survivor. The strange occurrences that soon begin reunite him with the evil he sought to escape. ",Horror
Halloween III: Season of the Witch,"Hospital emergency room Dr. Daniel ""Dan"" Challis (Tom Atkins) and Ellie Grimbridge (Stacey Nelkin), the daughter of a murder victim, uncover a terrible plot by small-town mask maker Conal Cochran (Dan O'Herlihy), a madman who's planning a Halloween mass murder utilizing an ancient Celtic ritual. The ritual involves a boulder stolen from Stonehenge, the use of Silver Shamrock masks and a triggering device contained in a television commercial -- all designed to kill millions of children. ",Horror
How It Ends,"In the midst of an apocalypse, a man struggles to reach his pregnant wife, who is thousands of miles away. ",Action
Hot Tub Time Machine 2,"After their first adventure with the ""Hot Tub Time Machine,"" Lou (Rob Corddry) and Nick (Craig Robinson) are living very well off their ill-gotten gains, while Jacob (Clark Duke) still cannot rely on Lou to be a positive role model. When an unknown assailant breaks into Lou's mansion and shoots him, Nick and Jacob take him for another trip in the hot tub. They emerge in the year 2025, where they must figure out who shot Lou and prevent it from happening again. ",Comedy
Paranormal Activity: The Marked Ones,"Teenagers Jesse and Hector look forward to a carefree summer, but the murder of a neighbor leads to a terrifying encounter with the supernatural. After breaking into the neighbor's apartment, Jesse and Hector find a collection of ritualistic art and other bizarre items. Soon after Jesse takes a journal of occult writings, he finds a strange mark on his arm. His subsequent erratic behavior leads Jesse's friends and family to the realization that he is possessed. ",Horror
Chernobyl Diaries,"A group of young tourists (Ingrid Bolsø Berdal, Jonathan Sadowski, Devin Kelley), hoping for an adventure off the beaten path, hires an extreme-tour guide. In spite of warnings, the tour guide takes the sightseers to the town of Pripyat, Ukraine, once home to workers at the nearby Chernobyl nuclear power plant but abandoned after the 1986 nuclear disaster. After briefly exploring the ghost town, the tourists find themselves stranded -- and worse, they are not alone. ",Horror
Blair Witch,"A young man and his friends venture into the Black Hills Forest in Maryland to uncover the mystery surrounding his missing sister. Many believe her disappearance 17 years earlier is connected to the legend of the Blair Witch. At first the group is hopeful, especially when two locals act as guides through the dark and winding woods. As the night wears on, a visit from a menacing presence soon makes them realize that the legend is all too real, and more sinister than they could have ever imagined. ",Horror
An American Haunting,"Landowners in 1817 Tennessee, John (Donald Sutherland) and Lucy Bell (Sissy Spacek) experience strange and terrifying events after fellow parishioners find John guilty of loan-sharking and his victim curses the Bell family. The incidents culminate in the daughter's (Rachel Hurd-Wood) apparent possession by demons. ",Drama
Vanishing on 7th Street,"Darkness empties Detroit, except for a few people (Hayden Christensen, Thandie Newton) who band together to battle it with light. ",Horror
Fantasy Island,"Mr. Roarke (Ricardo Montalban) and his helper, Tattoo (Herve Villechaize), give their rich guests what they ask for. ",Fantasy
Silent Hill: Revelation,"For many years, Heather Mason (Adelaide Clemens) and her father, Harry (Sean Bean), have been on the run from dangerous forces she does not understand. Heather continues to be plagued by terrifying nightmares and frightened by her father's disappearance, and on the eve of her 18th birthday, she discovers that she is not who she thinks she is. The revelation leads her deep into the demonic world of Silent Hill, where she may become trapped forever. ",Horror
Darkness Falls,"In Maine, the residents of Darkness Falls are all aware of the legend of Matilda Dixon, an old woman who was tragically murdered by a mob in the 1800s because the townspeople thought she was killing children. Now Darkness Falls has to contend with Matilda's supernatural wrath. Childhood friends Kyle (Chaney Kley) and Caitlin (Emma Caulfield) return home to uncover the truth behind the legend after Caitlin's little brother (Lee Cormie) has recurring nightmares about Matilda. ",Fantasy
The Titan,"In the near future, a military family is relocated so it can participate in a groundbreaking experiment of man's genetic evolution into space. ",Drama
The Forest,"After 10 years working as a regional educational inspector in an African country, Gonaba (Eriq Ebouaney) is disheartened by how slight an effect his lofty ideals have had. Despite his French education, he is a minor functionary working for a repressive military regime. Gonaba soon becomes interested in advocating for the Baaka, a native tribe whose existence is threatened by economic development and government indifference, and journeys to the forest to meet them. ",Horror
DOA: Dead or Alive,Four beautiful rivals at an invitation-only martial-arts tournament join forces against a sinister threat. Princess Kasumi (Devon Aoki) is an aristocratic warrior trained by martial-arts masters. Tina Armstrong (Jaime Pressly) is a wrestling superstar. Helena Douglas (Sarah Carter) is an athlete with a tragic past. Christie Allen (Holly Valance) earns her keep as a thief and an assassin-for-hire. ,Action
Valentine,"Love is in the air. On the most romantic day of the year, would-be lovers woo hearts with flowers, candy, cards and gifts. Best friends Kate (Marley Shelton), Paige (Denise Richards), Dorothy (Jessica Capshaw), Lily (Jessica Cauffiel) and Shelly (Katherine Heigl) are young women looking for a relationship -- a valentine to die for. And this year they might just get their wish. ",Horror
Zoolander 2,"Former models Derek Zoolander (Ben Stiller) and Hansel find themselves thrust back into the spotlight after living in seclusion for years. Invited to a major fashion event in Rome, the estranged friends are surprised to see how much the business has changed. Even more shocking is their encounter with Valentina Valencia, a special agent who needs their help. Someone is killing famous pop stars, and it's up to Derek and Hansel to help save the world's most beautiful people from a similar fate. ",Action
The Unborn,A pregnant security guard and her colleague battle a supernatural entity inside an old building. ,Horror
I Still Know What You Did Last Summer,"A year after killing vengeful hit-and-run victim Ben Wills (Muse Watson), who gutted her friends with an iron hook, college student Julie James (Jennifer Love Hewitt) is still shaken by the experience. When her roommate, Karla (Brandy), wins a vacation for four to the Bahamas, she plans to bring along her boyfriend, Tyrell (Mekhi Phifer), attractive Will (Matthew Settle) and Julie. At the resort, Julie starts receiving threatening notes and realizes Ben is still alive. ",Horror
Friday the 13th: A New Beginning,"Years after Tommy Jarvis (John Shepherd) murdered hockey-masked serial killer Jason Voorhees, he resides in a mental hospital and struggles with the trauma of the experience. When Tommy moves to an isolated halfway house, he has nightmares about Jason's return, and soon one of the patients (Dominick Brascia) is killed. As the body count grows, Tommy begins to question his sanity and wonder if Jason has risen from the dead. But, to determine the killer's identity, Tommy will need to survive. ",Horror
Paranormal Activity: The Ghost Dimension,"Ryan Fleege, wife Emily, and their 7-year-old daughter, Leila, prepare for Christmas in their new home. After finding an old and mysterious camcorder, Ryan quickly learns that it can record strange apparitions that are invisible to the naked eye. When young Leila starts talking to an imaginary friend and displaying strange behavior, the couple soon find themselves in a terrifying battle with a supernatural force. ",Horror
Paranormal Activity 4,"It has been five years since Katie (Katie Featherston) murdered her sister and disappeared with her infant nephew, Hunter, in tow. Now, a new family is about to fall prey to nighttime terrors. A mysterious accident next door leads to teenage Alex (Kathryn Newton) and her family becoming the temporary guardians of Robbie (Brady Allen), a very creepy neighbor boy. Cameras installed throughout Alex's home capture the sinister events that unfold after Robbie's arrival. ",Horror
Psycho,"Phoenix secretary Marion Crane (Janet Leigh), on the lam after stealing $40,000 from her employer in order to run away with her boyfriend, Sam Loomis (John Gavin), is overcome by exhaustion during a heavy rainstorm. Traveling on the back roads to avoid the police, she stops for the night at the ramshackle Bates Motel and meets the polite but highly strung proprietor Norman Bates (Anthony Perkins), a young man with an interest in taxidermy and a difficult relationship with his mother. ",Horror
Ouija,Several girls accidentally trap a murderous spirit. ,Horror
Basic Instinct 2,"After a crash that kills her boyfriend, Catherine Tramell (Sharon Stone) has her car searched by the police, who find illegal drugs. Prosecutors handling her case send Tramell to see psychiatrist Michael Glass (David Morrissey). Glass determines that Tramell, a novelist whose books deal with sensational murders, might just be a dangerous person herself. But his findings don't prevent him from embarking on a sexually charged relationship with the cunning cougar. ",Drama
Boogeyman,"As a young boy, Tim (Aaron Murphy) witnesses the horrifying event of his father (Charles Mesure) being dragged away by the boogeyman. Despite the reassurances of his mother (Lucy Lawless) that the boogeyman is not real, he is never the same afterward. Years later, Tim (Barry Watson) manages to create a normal life for himself -- though he lives without closets and keeps his mattress on the floor. But when he learns of his mother's death, Tim must return home to face his childhood trauma. ",Drama
One Missed Call,"When Beth Raymond (Shannyn Sossamon) witnesses the deaths of two friends, she knows there is more at work than just a tragic coincidence; days before they die, both victims hear their terrifying final moments on cell phones. Though the police think Beth is crazy, detective Jack Andrews (Ed Burns), believes her. Together the pair try to unravel the mystery behind the horrifying messages before their own phone numbers come up. ",Horror
Book of Shadows: Blair Witch 2,"As it follows the twisted path traveled by five people fixated on ""The Blair Witch Project,"" ""Book of Shadows: Blair Witch 2"" journeys into a dark and dangerous place where the line between truth and fiction blurs and perhaps vanishes altogether. Individual perception grows increasingly untrustworthy as the film's protagonists find themselves caught in a vortex of unspeakable evil, the origins of which -- human or supernatural -- remain chillingly uncertain. ",Adventure
The Wicker Man,"A reclusive lawman (Nicolas Cage) travels to a secluded island to search for a girl who has gone missing. Once there, he discovers sinister forces at work among the island's secretive residents, including strange sexual rituals, a harvest festival and possible human sacrifice. ",Horror
The Fog,An acting class becomes an unexpected battle for a young veteran. ,Horror
I Know Who Killed Me,"A young woman named Aubrey Fleming (Lindsay Lohan) falls victim to a sadistic kidnapper. When her ordeal is finally over, Aubrey has a shocking surprise for her family: She claims to be someone else. Some wonder whether Aubrey is mentally ill, intentionally lying, or if there is some bizarre truth to her claim. ",Horror
Slender Man,"Small-town best friends Hallie, Chloe, Wren and Katie go online to try and conjure up the Slender Man -- a tall, thin, horrifying figure whose face has no discernible features. Two weeks later, Katie mysteriously disappears during a class trip to a historic graveyard. Determined to find her, the girls soon suspect that the legend of the Slender Man may be all too real. ",Horror
The Shawshank Redemption,"Andy Dufresne (Tim Robbins) is sentenced to two consecutive life terms in prison for the murders of his wife and her lover and is sentenced to a tough prison. However, only Andy knows he didn't commit the crimes. While there, he forms a friendship with Red (Morgan Freeman), experiences brutality of prison life, adapts, helps the warden, etc., all in 19 years. ",Drama
777 Charlie,A dog named Charlie gives a lonely and reclusive man a new lease on life. ,Adventure
Fight Club,"A depressed man (Edward Norton) suffering from insomnia meets a strange soap salesman named Tyler Durden (Brad Pitt) and soon finds himself living in his squalid house after his perfect apartment is destroyed. The two bored men form an underground club with strict rules and fight other men who are fed up with their mundane lives. Their perfect partnership frays when Marla (Helena Bonham Carter), a fellow support group crasher, attracts Tyler's attention. ",Drama
Forrest Gump,"Slow-witted Forrest Gump (Tom Hanks) has never thought of himself as disadvantaged, and thanks to his supportive mother (Sally Field), he leads anything but a restricted life. Whether dominating on the gridiron as a college football star, fighting in Vietnam or captaining a shrimp boat, Forrest inspires people with his childlike optimism. But one person Forrest cares about most may be the most difficult to save -- his childhood love, the sweet but troubled Jenny (Robin Wright). ",Drama
Soorarai Pottru,Nedumaaran Rajangam takes on the airline industry with the help of his friends and family. ,Drama
Interstellar,"In Earth's future, a global crop blight and second Dust Bowl are slowly rendering the planet uninhabitable. Professor Brand (Michael Caine), a brilliant NASA physicist, is working on plans to save mankind by transporting Earth's population to a new home via a wormhole. But first, Brand must send former NASA pilot Cooper (Matthew McConaughey) and a team of researchers through the wormhole and across the galaxy to find out which of three planets could be mankind's new home. ",Adventure
Saving Private Ryan,"Captain John Miller (Tom Hanks) takes his men behind enemy lines to find Private James Ryan, whose three brothers have been killed in combat. Surrounded by the brutal realties of war, while searching for Ryan, each man embarks upon a personal journey and discovers their own strength to triumph over an uncertain future with honor, decency and courage. ",Drama
96,A mute woman falls for a rogue and works to change him. ,Drama
Whiplash,"A ferocious, bullying music teacher teaches a dedicated student. ",Drama
Modern Times,"This comedic masterpiece finds the iconic Little Tramp (Charlie Chaplin) employed at a state-of-the-art factory where the inescapable machinery completely overwhelms him, and where various mishaps keep getting him sent to prison. In between his various jail stints, he meets and befriends an orphan girl (Paulette Goddard). Both together and apart, they try to contend with the difficulties of modern life, with the Tramp working as a waiter and eventually a performer. ",Comedy
City Lights,"A hapless but resilient tramp (Charlie Chaplin) falls in love with a blind flower girl (Virginia Cherrill) on the tough city streets. Upon learning that she and her grandmother are to be evicted from their home, the tramp undertakes a series of attempts to provide them with the money they need, all of which end in humiliating failure. But after a drunken millionaire (Harry Myers) lavishly rewards him for saving his life, the tramp can change the flower girl's life forever. ",Comedy
3 Idiots,"In college, Farhan and Raju form a great bond with Rancho due to his positive and refreshing outlook to life. Years later, a bet gives them a chance to look for their long-lost friend whose existence seems rather elusive. ",Comedy
Taare Zameen Par,"Ishaan, a student who has dyslexia, cannot seem to get anything right at his boarding school. Soon, a new unconventional art teacher, Ram Shankar Nikumbh, helps him discover his hidden potential. ",Drama
American Beauty,"Lester Burnham (Kevin Spacey) is a gainfully employed suburban husband and father. Fed up with his boring, stagnant existence, he quits his job and decides to reinvent himself as a pot-smoking, responsibility-shirking teenager. What follows is at once cynical, hysterical, and, eventually, tragically uplifting. ",Drama
Das Boot,"A German submarine patrols the Atlantic Ocean during World War II, manned by a crew that must contend with tense conflicts and long stretches of confined boredom. While war correspondent Werner (Herbert Grönemeyer) observes day-to-day life aboard the U-boat, the grizzled captain (Jürgen Prochnow) struggles to maintain his own motivation as he attempts to keep the ship's morale up in the face of fierce battles, intense storms and dwindling supplies. ",Drama
Paths of Glory,"During World War I, commanding officer General Broulard (Adolphe Menjou) orders his subordinate, General Mireau (George Macready), to attack a German trench position, offering a promotion as an incentive. Though the mission is foolhardy to the point of suicide, Mireau commands his own subordinate, Colonel Dax (Kirk Douglas), to plan the attack. When it ends in disaster, General Mireau demands the court-martial of three random soldiers in order to save face. ",Drama
Jodaeiye Nader az Simin,"When Nader (Payman Maadi), a bank employee, refuses to leave Tehran, his wife, Simin (Leila Hatami) sues for divorce in the hope that she can make a better life for their young daughter abroad. Needing someone to care for his senile father while he's at work, Nader hires Razieh (Sareh Bayat), a married woman whose chador hides her pregnancy. One day, after becoming angry with Razieh, Nader shoves her, and she has a miscarriage, leading Razieh's husband to take Nader to court. ",Drama
The Kashmir Files,"The Kashmir Files is a heart-wrenching narrative of the pain, suffering, struggle and trauma of Kashmiri Pandits, seen through the eyes of Krishna, the protagonist. The film questions eye-opening facts about democracy, religion, politics and humanity. ",Drama
Inglourious Basterds,"It is the first year of Germany's occupation of France. Allied officer Lt. Aldo Raine (Brad Pitt) assembles a team of Jewish soldiers to commit violent acts of retribution against the Nazis, including the taking of their scalps. He and his men join forces with Bridget von Hammersmark, a German actress and undercover agent, to bring down the leaders of the Third Reich. Their fates converge with theater owner Shosanna Dreyfus, who seeks to avenge the Nazis' execution of her family. ",Adventure
Eternal Sunshine of the Spotless Mind,"After a painful breakup, Clementine (Kate Winslet) undergoes a procedure to erase memories of her former boyfriend Joel (Jim Carrey) from her mind. When Joel discovers that Clementine is going to extremes to forget their relationship, he undergoes the same procedure and slowly begins to forget the woman that he loved. Directed by former music video director Michel Gondry, the visually arresting film explores the intricacy of relationships and the pain of loss. ",Drama
Requiem for a Dream,"Imaginatively evoking the inner landscape of human beings longing to connect, to love and feel loved, the film is a parable of happiness gloriously found and tragically lost. ""Requiem for a Dream"" tells parallel stories that are linked by the relationship between the lonely, widowed Sara Goldfarb and her sweet but aimless son, Harry. The plump Sara, galvanized by the prospect of appearing on a TV game show, has started on a dangerous diet regimen to beautify herself for a national audience. ",Drama
Good Will Hunting,"Will Hunting (Matt Damon) has a genius-level IQ but chooses to work as a janitor at MIT. When he solves a difficult graduate-level math problem, his talents are discovered by Professor Gerald Lambeau (Stellan Skarsgard), who decides to help the misguided youth reach his potential. When Will is arrested for attacking a police officer, Professor Lambeau makes a deal to get leniency for him if he will get treatment from therapist Sean Maguire (Robin Williams). ",Drama
Full Metal Jacket,"Stanley Kubrick's take on the Vietnam War follows smart-aleck Private Davis (Matthew Modine), quickly christened ""Joker"" by his foul-mouthed drill sergeant (R. Lee Ermey), and pudgy Private Lawrence (Vincent D'Onofrio), nicknamed ""Gomer Pyle,"" as they endure the rigors of basic training. Though Pyle takes a frightening detour, Joker graduates to the Marine Corps and is sent to Vietnam as a journalist, covering -- and eventually participating in -- the bloody Battle of Hué. ",Drama
Judgment at Nuremberg,"In 1947, four German judges who served on the bench during the Nazi regime face a military tribunal to answer charges of crimes against humanity. Chief Justice Haywood (Spencer Tracy) hears evidence and testimony not only from lead defendant Ernst Janning (Burt Lancaster) and his defense attorney Hans Rolfe (Maximilian Schell), but also from the widow of a Nazi general (Marlene Dietrich), an idealistic U.S. Army captain (William Shatner) and reluctant witness Irene Wallner (Judy Garland). ",Drama
The Apartment,"Insurance worker C.C. Baxter (Jack Lemmon) lends his Upper West Side apartment to company bosses to use for extramarital affairs. When his manager Mr. Sheldrake (Fred MacMurray) begins using Baxter's apartment in exchange for promoting him, Baxter is disappointed to learn that Sheldrake's mistress is Fran Kubelik (Shirley MacLaine), the elevator girl at work whom Baxter is interested in himself. Soon Baxter must decide between the girl he loves and the advancement of his career. ",Comedy
Pather Panchali,"Impoverished priest Harihar Ray (Kanu Bannerjee), dreaming of a better life for himself and his family, leaves his rural Bengal village in search of work. Alone, his wife, Sarbojaya (Karuna Bannerjee), looks after her rebellious daughter, Durga (Uma Das Gupta), and her young son, Apu (Subir Bannerjee), as well as Harihar's elderly aunt Indir (Chunibala Devi). The children enjoy the small pleasures of their difficult life, while their parents suffer the daily indignities heaped upon them. ",Drama
Ikiru,"Mr. Watanabe suddenly finds that he has terminal cancer. He vows to make his final days meaningful. His attempts to communicate his anguish to his son and daughter-in-law lead only to heartbreak. Finally, inspired by an unselfish co-worker, he turns his efforts to bringing happiness to others by building a playground in a dreary slum neighborhood. When the park is finally completed, he is able to face death with peaceful acceptance. ",Drama
Metropolis,"A future society, where humans and robots co-exist. Amidst the chaos created by anti-robot factions, detective Shunsaku Ban and his sidekick Ken-ichi are searching for rebel scientist Dr. Laughton, to arrest him and seize his latest creation, a beautiful young girl named Tima. When they locate them, Shunsaku soon realizes that the eccentric scientist is protected by a powerful man and his fierce desire to reclaim a tragic figure from his past and therefore is beyond their reach. ",Drama
The Kid,"Bruce Willis stars as Russ Duritz, a successful image consultant whose life is suddenly turned upside down when he magically meets Rusty, Russ himself as an 8-year-old kid. Rusty is a sweet, but slightly geeky, awkward little kid who painfully reminds Russ of everything he hated about himself when he was a child-a pudgy, little cry-baby who was the daily victim of the school bullies-an image Russ has worked hard to overcome and consciously forget. ",Comedy
Chhichhore,Friends experience the ups and downs of college life. ,Comedy
Tumbbad,A man and his son encounter a legendary demon while searching for hidden treasure in 19th-century India. ,Drama
Zindagi Na Milegi Dobara,"Two lifelong friends (Hrithik Roshan, Farhan Akhtar) take a third (Abhay Deol) on a road trip through Spain instead of throwing a traditional bachelor party. ",Comedy
There Will Be Blood,"Silver miner Daniel Plainview (Daniel Day-Lewis) leads a hardscrabble life with his son, H.W. (Dillon Freasier). When he hears about oil oozing from the ground near the Western town of Little Boston, Daniel takes his son on a mission to find their fortune. Daniel makes his lucky strike and becomes a self-made tycoon but, as his fortune grows, he deviates into moral bankruptcy. ",Drama
Gone with the Wind,"Presented as originally released in 1939. Includes themes and character depictions which may be offensive and problematic to contemporary audiences. Epic Civil War drama focuses on the life of petulant Southern belle Scarlett O'Hara. Starting with her idyllic life on a sprawling plantation, the film traces her survival through the tragic history of the South during the Civil War and Reconstruction, and her tangled love affairs with Ashley Wilkes and Rhett Butler. ",Drama
Portrait de la jeune fille en feu,In 1770 the young daughter of a French countess develops a mutual attraction to the female artist commissioned to paint her wedding portrait. ,Drama
Dil Bechara,"Kizie and Manny are poles apart in personality and their battle against cancer is the only common thread binding them. Love slowly wraps them in its embrace, but little do they know what fate has in store for them. ",Comedy
Queen,"Rani, a 24-year-old homely girl, decides to go on her honeymoon alone when her fiancé calls off the wedding. Traveling around Europe, she finds joy, makes friends, and gains new-found independence. ",Adventure
Relatos salvajes,A waitress adds a special ingredient to an arrogant loan shark's meal in one of several tales dealing with extremes of human behavior. ,Comedy
Mandariinid,"During the war in Abkhazia, an Estonian man stays behind to harvest tangerines and cares for a wounded fighter. ",Drama
Kis Uykusu,"Aydin, his wife and his recently divorced sister spend the winter in their hotel. ",Drama
PK,"A stranger's childlike curiosity and world-view challenges people's long-held notions, making friends of some and foes of others. ",Comedy
The Help,"In 1960s Mississippi, Southern society girl Skeeter (Emma Stone) returns from college with dreams of being a writer. She turns her small town on its ear by choosing to interview the Black women who have spent their lives taking care of prominent white families. Only Aibileen (Viola Davis), the housekeeper of Skeeter's best friend, will talk at first. But as the pair continue the collaboration, more women decide to come forward, and as it turns out, they have quite a lot to say. ",Drama
Gran Torino,"Retired auto worker and Korean War vet Walt Kowalski (Clint Eastwood) fills emptiness in his life with beer and home repair, despising the many Asian, Latino and black families in his neighborhood. Walt becomes a reluctant hero when he stands up to the gangbangers who tried to force an Asian teen to steal Walt's treasured car. An unlikely friendship develops between Walt and the teen, as he learns he has more in common with his neighbors than he thought. ",Drama
Million Dollar Baby,"Frankie Dunn (Clint Eastwood) is a veteran Los Angeles boxing trainer who keeps almost everyone at arm's length, except his old friend and associate Eddie ""Scrap Iron"" Dupris (Morgan Freeman). When Maggie Fitzgerald (Hilary Swank) arrives in Frankie's gym seeking his expertise, he is reluctant to train the young woman, a transplant from working-class Missouri. Eventually, he relents, and the two form a close bond that will irrevocably change them both. ",Drama
Before Sunset,"A sequel to ""Before Sunrise,"" this film starts nine years later as Jesse (Ethan Hawke) travels across Europe giving readings from a book he wrote about the night he spent in Vienna with Celine (Julie Delpy). After his reading in Paris, Celine finds him, and they spend part of the day together before Jesse has to again leave for a flight. They are both in relationships now, and Jesse has a son, but as their strong feelings for each other start to return, both confess a longing for more. ",Drama
Black,"Paul (Dhritiman Chaterji) and Catherine McNally (Shernaz Patel) give birth to their first daughter, Michelle (Rani Mukerji), who can neither hear nor see. Not knowing how to care for a deaf and blind child, they isolate their daughter from the outside world and as a result, she is ill-behaved and emotionally distraught. Paul even considers putting Michelle in a mental hospital until an eccentric teacher with a questionable past (Amitabh Bachchan) offers to help. ",Drama
Dil Chahta Hai,"Three friends, Akash (Aamir Khan), Sameer (Saif Ali Khan) and Siddharth (Akshaye Khanna), discover that post-collegiate life will test their tight-knit bond. As sweet Sameer falls for Pooja (Sonali Kulkarni), an unavailable beauty, Siddharth risks everything to pursue an older divorcée named Tara (Dimple Kapadia) whom his friends and family find unworthy of him. Meanwhile, brash Akash travels to Australia, where he reconnects with Shalini (Preity Zinta), a girl he'd previously wronged. ",Comedy
Amores perros,"""Amores Perros"" is a bold, intensely emotional, and ambitious story of lives that collide in a Mexico City car crash. Inventively structured as a triptych of overlapping and intersecting narratives, ""Amores Perros"" explores the lives of disparate characters who are catapulted into unforeseen dramatic situations instigated by the seemingly inconsequential destiny of a dog named Cofi. ",Drama
Lagaan: Once Upon a Time in India,"The year is 1893 and India is under British occupation. In a small village, the tyrannical Captain Russell (Paul Blackthorne) has imposed an unprecedented land tax on its citizens. Outraged, Bhuvan (Aamir Khan), a rebellious farmer, rallies the villagers to publicly oppose the tax. Russell offers a novel way to settle the dispute: he challenges Bhuvan and his men to a game of cricket, a sport completely foreign to India. If Bhuvan and his men can defeat Russell's team, the tax will be repealed. ",Drama
Trainspotting,"Heroin addict Mark Renton (Ewan McGregor) stumbles through bad ideas and sobriety attempts with his unreliable friends -- Sick Boy (Jonny Lee Miller), Begbie (Robert Carlyle), Spud (Ewen Bremner) and Tommy (Kevin McKidd). He also has an underage girlfriend, Diane (Kelly Macdonald), along for the ride. After cleaning up and moving from Edinburgh to London, Mark finds he can't escape the life he left behind when Begbie shows up at his front door on the lam, and a scheming Sick Boy follows. ",Drama
Underground,"Twelve fighters compete for money in a violent, no-holds-barred contest. ",Comedy
Before Sunrise,"On his way to Vienna, American Jesse (Ethan Hawke) meets Celine (Julie Delpy), a student returning to Paris. After long conversations forge a surprising connection between them, Jesse convinces Celine to get off the train with him in Vienna. Since his flight to the U.S. departs the next morning and he has no money for lodging, they wander the city together, taking in the experiences of Vienna and each other. As the night progresses, their bond makes separating in the morning a difficult choice. ",Drama
Groundhog Day,"Phil (Bill Murray), a weatherman, is out to cover the annual emergence of the groundhog from its hole. He gets caught in a blizzard that he didn't predict and finds himself trapped in a time warp. He is doomed to relive the same day over and over again until he gets it right. ",Comedy
Dead Poets Society,"A new English teacher, John Keating (Robin Williams), is introduced to an all-boys preparatory school that is known for its ancient traditions and high standards. He uses unorthodox methods to reach out to his students, who face enormous pressures from their parents and the school. With Keating's help, students Neil Perry (Robert Sean Leonard), Todd Anderson (Ethan Hawke) and others learn to break out of their shells, pursue their dreams and seize the day. ",Comedy
Stand by Me,"Jiu Bing has been stuck in the friend zone with Bo He since he was 12. Even though he tries everything to win her heart, he fails in crossing the line. ",Adventure
Platoon,"Chris Taylor (Charlie Sheen) leaves his university studies to enlist in combat duty in Vietnam in 1967. Once he's on the ground in the middle of battle, his idealism fades. Infighting in his unit between Staff Sergeant Barnes (Tom Berenger), who believes nearby villagers are harboring Viet Cong soldiers, and Sergeant Elias (Willem Dafoe), who has a more sympathetic view of the locals, ends up pitting the soldiers against each other as well as against the enemy. ",Drama
Jean de Florette,"In this acclaimed French drama, the enterprising Ugolin Soubeyran (Daniel Auteuil) returns to his native countryside after the serving in the military. Intent on growing expensive flowers, he conspires with his uncle, Cesar (Yves Montand), to gain access to a hidden spring on a neighboring property. When their initial attempt to buy the land fails, they must contend with Jean de Florette (Gérard Depardieu), who arrives with his family to work the coveted plot and turn it into a profitable farm. ",Comedy
The Deer Hunter,"In 1968, Michael (Robert De Niro), Nick (Christopher Walken) and Steven (John Savage), lifelong friends from a working-class Pennsylvania steel town, prepare to ship out overseas following Steven's elaborate wedding and one final group hunting trip. In Vietnam, their dreams of military honor are quickly shattered by the inhumanities of war; even those who survive are haunted by the experience, as is Nick's hometown sweetheart, Linda (Meryl Streep). ",Drama
Rocky,"Pablito needs to raise money to pay for his brother's urgent medical treatment. To accomplish that, he takes his rooster to the city and arranges a fight with Ajiseco. ",Drama
Network,"In this lauded satire, veteran news anchorman Howard Beale (Peter Finch) discovers that he's being put out to pasture, and he's none too happy about it. After threatening to shoot himself on live television, instead he launches into an angry televised rant, which turns out to be a huge ratings boost for the UBS network. This stunt allows ambitious producer Diana Christensen (Faye Dunaway) to develop even more outrageous programming, a concept that she takes to unsettling extremes. ",Drama
Barry Lyndon,How does an Irish lad without prospects become part of 18th-century English nobility? For Barry Lyndon (Ryan O'Neal) the answer is: any way he can! His climb to wealth and privilege is the enthralling focus of this sumptuous Stanley Kubrick version of William Makepeace Thackeray's novel. ,Adventure
Anand,"Dr. Bhaskar Bannerjee (Amitabh Bachchan) struggles with his patients' suffering and the darkness and poverty he confronts daily in his native India. He treats a cancer patient, Anand Saigal (Rajesh Khanna), who upon learning of his impending death determines to use the time he has left to the absolute fullest. Bannarjee's experience with the patient leaves a profound impression on him, and so he writes a heartrending bestseller based on recorded interviews with Anand. ",Drama
Persona,"Famed stage actress Elisabeth Vogler (Liv Ullmann) suffers a moment of blankness during a performance and the next day lapses into total silence. Advised by her doctor to take time off to recover from what appears to be an emotional breakdown, Elisabeth goes to a beach house on the Baltic Sea with only Anna (Bibi Andersson), a nurse, as company. Over the next several weeks, as Anna struggles to reach her mute patient, the two women find themselves experiencing a strange emotional convergence. ",Drama
Ace in the Hole,A bulldog sergeant stands in Woody's way on the airfield. ,Drama
La Grande Illusion,"A group of French soldiers, including the patrician Captain de Boeldieu (Pierre Fresnay) and the working-class Lieutenant Maréchal (Jean Gabin), grapple with their own class differences after being captured and held in a World War I German prison camp. When the men are transferred to a high-security fortress, they must concoct a plan to escape beneath the watchful eye of aristocratic German officer von Rauffenstein (Erich von Stroheim), who has formed an unexpected bond with de Boeldieu. ",Drama
All Quiet on the Western Front,"The film follows a group of German schoolboys, talked into enlisting at the beginning of World War I by their jingoistic teacher. The story is told entirely through the experiences of the young German recruits and highlights the tragedy of war through the eyes of individuals. ",Drama
La La Land,"Sebastian (Ryan Gosling) and Mia (Emma Stone) are drawn together by their common desire to do what they love. But as success mounts they are faced with decisions that begin to fray the fragile fabric of their love affair, and the dreams they worked so hard to maintain in each other threaten to rip them apart. ",Comedy
The Martian,"When astronauts blast off from the planet Mars, they leave behind Mark Watney (Matt Damon), presumed dead after a fierce storm. With only a meager amount of supplies, the stranded visitor must utilize his wits and spirit to find a way to survive on the hostile planet. Meanwhile, back on Earth, members of NASA and a team of international scientists work tirelessly to bring him home, while his crew mates hatch their own plan for a daring rescue mission. ",Adventure
Mommy,The body count rises as an overprotective mother eliminates any and all threats to her daughter's well-being. ,Drama
Her,"A sensitive and soulful man earns a living by writing personal letters for other people. Left heartbroken after his marriage ends, Theodore (Joaquin Phoenix) becomes fascinated with a new operating system which reportedly develops into an intuitive and unique entity in its own right. He starts the program and meets ""Samantha"" (Scarlett Johansson), whose bright voice reveals a sensitive, playful personality. Though ""friends"" initially, the relationship soon deepens into love. ",Drama
The Perks of Being a Wallflower,"Socially awkward teen Charlie (Logan Lerman) is a wallflower, always watching life from the sidelines, until two charismatic students become his mentors. Free-spirited Sam (Emma Watson) and her stepbrother Patrick (Ezra Miller) help Charlie discover the joys of friendship, first love, music and more, while a teacher sparks Charlie's dreams of becoming a writer. However, as his new friends prepare to leave for college, Charlie's inner sadness threatens to shatter his newfound confidence. ",Drama
Black Swan,"With the pardon of notorious pirate Henry Morgan by the English King, Caribbean pirates are offered amnesty if they give up their lawless ways. As governor of Jamaica, Morgan picks Captain Jamie Waring to round up the renegade captain Billy Leech. Beautiful Margaret Denby complicates matters for Waring, as her scorn for him is matched only by his love for her. ",Drama
Lage Raho Munna Bhai,"A beautiful radio disc jockey (Vidya Balan) innocently believes that her roguish boyfriend, Munna Bhai (Sanjay Dutt), is a history professor. The joke is on Munna when his girlfriend asks him to give a history lecture, and Munna and his best friend, Circuit (Arshad Warsi),must do some fancy footwork to maintain the illusion. ",Comedy
Blood Diamond,"As civil war rages through 1990s Sierra Leone, two men, a white South African mercenary (Leonardo DiCaprio) and a black Mende fisherman (Djimon Hounsou), become joined in a common quest to recover a rare gem that has the power to transform their lives. With the help of an American journalist (Jennifer Connelly), the men embark on a hazardous trek through rebel territory to achieve their goal. ",Adventure
Vizontele,"The residents of a Turkish village have never seen TV. That changes when a transmitter is installed and the mayor, Nazmi (Altan Erkekli), gets a set. Everyone is curious, but because the transmission is bad they lose interest. A theater owner, Latif (Cezmi Baskin), spreads rumors about the dangers of TV, hoping to keep people interested in seeing his overplayed movies. Nazmi and the town eccentric, Deli Emin (Yilmaz Erdogan), search for a better signal to win everyone over to their side. ",Comedy
Magnolia,"On one random day in the San Fernando Valley, a dying father, a young wife, a male caretaker, a famous lost son, a police officer in love, a boy genius, an ex-boy genius, a game show host and an estranged daughter will each become part of a dazzling multiplicity of plots, but one story. ",Drama
Sling Blade,"Mentally disabled Karl Childers (Billy Bob Thornton) is released from the mental hospital where he has spent most of his life after murdering his mother and her lover. He soon forms a bond with Frank (Lucas Black), a boy whose father committed suicide. When Frank's mother, Linda (Natalie Canerday), lets Karl stay at their house, her cruel boyfriend, Doyle (Dwight Yoakam), tries to get Karl removed. Determined to protect his friend, Karl devises a way to save Frank from years of Doyle's abuse. ",Drama
Dilwale Dulhania Le Jayenge,"Raj and Simran meet on a trip to Europe. After some initial misadventures, they fall in love. The battle begins to win over two traditional families. ",Drama
Rain Man,"When car dealer Charlie Babbitt (Tom Cruise) learns that his estranged father has died, he returns home to Cincinnati, where he discovers that he has an autistic older brother named Raymond (Dustin Hoffman) and that his father's $3 million fortune is being left to the mental institution in which Raymond lives. Motivated by his father's money, Charlie checks Raymond out of the facility in order to return with him to Los Angeles. The brothers' cross-country trip ends up changing both their lives. ",Drama
Au revoir les enfants,"In 1943, Julien (Gaspard Manesse) is a student at a French boarding school. When three new students arrive, including Jean Bonnett (Raphael Fejto), Julien believes they are no different from the other boys. What Julien doesn't know is that the boys are actually Jews who are evading capture by the Nazis. While Julien doesn't care for Jean at first, the boys develop a tight bond -- while the head of the school, Père Jean (Philippe Morier-Genoud), works to protect the boys from the Holocaust. ",Drama
Nostalgia,A husband and father whose life has become a tiresome routine learns the delicate difference between accident and destiny after getting caught up in nostalgia and watching as everything he has worked so hard to build comes crumbling down. ,Drama
Pink Floyd: The Wall,"In this visual riff on Pink Floyd's album ""The Wall,"" successful but drugged-out musician Pink (Bob Geldof) is looking back on his isolated childhood from the confines of a Los Angeles hotel room. Through a swirl of flashbacks and chemical-induced hallucinations, Pink recalls his lonely upbringing, during which he built a symbolic wall to the world as he coped with the death of his father (James Laurenson) and the overbearing ways of his mother (Christine Hargreaves). ",Drama
Fitzcarraldo,"Opera-loving European Brian Fitzgerald (Klaus Kinski) lives in a small Peruvian city. Better known as Fitzcarraldo, this foreigner is obsessed with building an opera house in his town and decides that to make his dream a reality he needs to make a killing in the rubber business. In order to become a successful rubber baron, Fitzcarraldo hatches an elaborate plan that calls for a particularly impressive feat -- bringing a massive boat over a mountain with the help of a band of natives. ",Adventure
Being There,"Simple-minded Chance (Peter Sellers), a gardener who has resided in the Washington, D.C., townhouse of his wealthy employer for his entire life and been educated only by television, is forced to vacate his home when his boss dies. While wandering the streets, he encounters business mogul Ben Rand (Melvyn Douglas), who assumes Chance to be a fellow upper-class gentleman. Soon Chance is ushered into high society, and his unaffected gardening wisdom makes him the talk of the town. ",Comedy
Fiddler on the Roof,"A lavishly produced and critically acclaimed screen adaptation of the international stage sensation tells the life-affirming story of Tevye (Topol), a poor milkman whose love, pride and faith help him face the oppression of turn-of-the century czarist Russia. ",Drama
What Ever Happened to Baby Jane?,"Jane Hudson (Bette Davis) is an aging child star left to care for her wheelchair-bound sister Blanche (Joan Crawford), also a former child actress. Stuck living together in a mansion in old Hollywood, Blanche plots to get even with Jane for the car crash that left her crippled years earlier. But Jane is desperate to keep Blanche imprisoned as she plans a new rise to fame, and tries to hide Blanche's existence from doctors, visitors and neighbors while she devises a way to get rid of her sister. ",Drama
Ivanovo detstvo,"When Nazi invaders destroy his Russian village and kill his family, 12-year-old Ivan (Kolya Burlyayev) is placed in a German prison camp. Ivan escapes from the camp and crosses back over to Russia, and comes under the care of Capt. Kholin (Valentin Zubkov), who wants to send Ivan to military school. Ivan refuses, requesting that he be allowed to use his powers of stealth to return to Germany to spy on the Nazis and avenge the killing of his family. ",Drama
La dolce vita,"In Federico Fellini's lauded Italian film, restless reporter Marcello Rubini (Marcello Mastroianni) drifts through life in Rome. While Marcello contends with the overdose taken by his girlfriend, Emma (Yvonne Furneaux), he also pursues heiress Maddalena (Anouk Aimée) and movie star Sylvia (Anita Ekberg), embracing a carefree approach to living. Despite his hedonistic attitude, Marcello does have moments of quiet reflection, resulting in an intriguing cinematic character study. ",Comedy
Sweet Smell of Success,"New York City newspaper writer J.J. Hunsecker (Burt Lancaster) holds considerable sway over public opinion with his Broadway column, but one thing that he can't control is his younger sister, Susan (Susan Harrison), who is in a relationship with aspiring jazz guitarist Steve Dallas (Marty Milner). Hunsecker strongly disproves of the romance and recruits publicist Sidney Falco (Tony Curtis) to find a way to split the couple, no matter how ruthless the method. ",Drama
La Strada,"When Gelsomina (Giulietta Masina), a naïve young woman, is purchased from her impoverished mother by brutish circus strongman Zampanò (Anthony Quinn) to be his wife and partner, she loyally endures her husband's coldness and abuse as they travel the Italian countryside performing together. Soon Zampanò must deal with his jealousy and conflicted feelings about Gelsomina when she finds a kindred spirit in Il Matto (Richard Basehart), the carefree circus fool, and contemplates leaving Zampanò. ",Drama
Stalag 17,"One night in 1944 in a German POW camp housing American airmen, two prisoners try to escape the compound and are quickly discovered and shot dead. Among the remaining men, suspicion grows that one of their own is a spy for the Germans. All eyes fall on Sgt. Sefton (William Holden) who everybody knows frequently makes exchanges with German guards for small luxuries. To protect himself from a mob of his enraged fellow inmates, Sgt. Sefton resolves to find the true traitor within their midst. ",Comedy
Brief Encounter,"When doctor Alec Harvey (Richard Burton) helps Anna Jesson (Sophia Loren) get something out of her eye on a train platform, neither suspects they are initiating an affair. Both are married with children and believe their impulse to meet again is completely innocent. But one meeting leads to several, and soon their mutual attraction becomes undeniable. They attempt an unsuccessful tryst in a friend's apartment and, increasingly scared of being discovered, decide to call it off. ",Drama
The Shop Around the Corner,"Alfred Kralik (James Stewart) and Klara Novak (Margaret Sullavan) are employees at Matuschek and Company, a general store in Budapest. Klara and Alfred are constantly at odds with each other, butting heads and disagreeing on almost everything. Both are enamored of their respective pen pals, who serve as welcome distractions in their lives. Little do they know, they are each the other's pen pal and, despite outward differences, have unwittingly fallen in love through their letters. ",Comedy
Badhaai ho,A 25-year-old man tries to suppress his embarrassment when his mother announces that she is pregnant. ,Comedy
Sing Street,"In 1985, a Dublin teenager (Ferdia Walsh-Peelo) forms a rock 'n' roll band to win the heart of an aspiring model (Lucy Boynton). ",Comedy
Jojo Rabbit,Jojo is a lonely German boy who discovers that his single mother is hiding a Jewish girl in their attic. Aided only by his imaginary friend -- Adolf Hitler -- Jojo must confront his blind nationalism as World War II continues to rage on. ,Comedy
Wonder,"Born with facial differences that, up until now, have prevented him from going to a mainstream school, Auggie Pullman becomes the most unlikely of heroes when he enters the local fifth grade. As his family, his new classmates, and the larger community all struggle to discover their compassion and acceptance, Auggie's extraordinary journey will unite them and prove you can't blend in when you were born to stand out. ",Drama
Gully Boy,Street rappers come of age in Mumbai. ,Drama
Short Term 12,A supervisor (Brie Larson) at a group home for at-risk teens connects with a new resident (Kaitlyn Dever) while facing a personal crisis of her own. ,Drama
Before Midnight,"Inspector Steve Trent (Ralph Bellamy) arrives at the Arnold mansion to speak with Edward Arnold, who fears he is about to be killed due to a family curse. Within minutes, Arnold does, in fact, mysteriously die. Trent discovers that Arnold was poisoned. Unfortunately, every other person in the mansion has the means and the motivation to murder this man. Through interviews and investigations, Trent is obliged to slowly piece together the killer's identity. ",Drama
Hoje Eu Quero Voltar Sozinho,A blind teenager's life and world is changed with the arrival of Gabriel. ,Drama
The Artist,"In the 1920s, actor George Valentin (Jean Dujardin) is a bona fide matinee idol with many adoring fans. While working on his latest film, George finds himself falling in love with an ingenue named Peppy Miller (Bérénice Bejo) and, what's more, it seems Peppy feels the same way. But George is reluctant to cheat on his wife with the beautiful young actress. The growing popularity of sound in movies further separates the potential lovers, as George's career begins to fade while Peppy's star rises. ",Comedy
My Name Is Khan,Rizvan Khan embarks on a journey to meet the president of the United States of America and attempts to change people's perception about his religion. ,Adventure
The Wrestler,"Aging wrestler Randy ""The Ram"" Robinson (Mickey Rourke) is long past his prime but still ready and rarin' to go on the pro-wrestling circuit. After a particularly brutal beating, however, Randy hangs up his tights, pursues a serious relationship with a long-in-the-tooth stripper (Marisa Tomei), and tries to reconnect with his estranged daughter (Evan Rachel Wood). But he can't resist the lure of the ring and readies himself for a comeback. ",Drama
Jab We Met,"Aditya, a heartbroken tycoon on the verge of committing suicide, aimlessly boards a train. He meets Geet, a high-spirited girl who plans to elope with her lover, and finds himself pulled into her crazy life. ",Comedy
Mimi,A hungry playwright (Douglas Fairbanks Jr.) and a poor girl (Gertrude Lawrence) fall tragically in love in Paris. ,Comedy
Boyhood,"The joys and pitfalls of growing up are seen through the eyes of a child named Mason (Ellar Coltrane), his parents (Patricia Arquette, Ethan Hawke) and his sister (Lorelei Linklater). Vignettes, filmed with the same cast over the course of 12 years, capture family meals, road trips, birthday parties, graduations and other important milestones. Songs from Coldplay, Arcade Fire and other artists capture the time period. Directed by Richard Linklater. ",Drama
Life of Pi,"After deciding to sell their zoo in India and move to Canada, Santosh and Gita Patel board a freighter with their sons and a few remaining animals. Tragedy strikes when a terrible storm sinks the ship, leaving the Patels' teenage son, Pi (Suraj Sharma), as the only human survivor. However, Pi is not alone; a fearsome Bengal tiger has also found refuge aboard the lifeboat. As days turn into weeks and weeks drag into months, Pi and the tiger must learn to trust each other if both are to survive. ",Adventure
Almost Famous,"Set in 1973, it chronicles the funny and often poignant coming of age of 15-year-old William, an unabashed music fan who is inspired by the seminal bands of the time. When his love of music lands him an assignment from Rolling Stone magazine to interview the up-and-coming band Stillwater -- fronted by lead guitar Russell Hammond and lead singer Jeff Bebe William embarks on an eye-opening journey with the band's tour, despite the objections of his protective mother. ",Adventure
Titanic,"James Cameron's ""Titanic"" is an epic, action-packed romance set against the ill-fated maiden voyage of the R.M.S. Titanic; the pride and joy of the White Star Line and, at the time, the largest moving object ever built. She was the most luxurious liner of her era -- the ""ship of dreams"" -- which ultimately carried over 1,500 people to their death in the ice cold waters of the North Atlantic in the early hours of April 15, 1912. ",Drama
Boogie Nights,"In the San Fernando Valley in 1977, teenage busboy Eddie Adams (Mark Wahlberg) gets discovered by porn director Jack Horner (Burt Reynolds), who transforms him into adult-film sensation Dirk Diggler. Brought into a supportive circle of friends, including fellow actors Amber Waves (Julianne Moore), Rollergirl (Heather Graham) and Reed Rothchild (John C. Reilly), Dirk fulfills all his ambitions, but a toxic combination of drugs and egotism threatens to take him back down. ",Drama
Edward Scissorhands,"A scientist (Vincent Price) builds an animated human being -- the gentle Edward (Johnny Depp). The scientist dies before he can finish assembling Edward, though, leaving the young man with a freakish appearance accentuated by the scissor blades he has instead of hands. Loving suburban saleswoman Peg (Dianne Wiest) discovers Edward and takes him home, where he falls for Peg's teen daughter (Winona Ryder). However, despite his kindness and artistic talent, Edward's hands make him an outcast. ",Drama
Do the Right Thing,"Salvatore ""Sal"" Fragione (Danny Aiello) is the Italian owner of a pizzeria in Brooklyn. A neighborhood local, Buggin' Out (Giancarlo Esposito), becomes upset when he sees that the pizzeria's Wall of Fame exhibits only Italian actors. Buggin' Out believes a pizzeria in a black neighborhood should showcase black actors, but Sal disagrees. The wall becomes a symbol of racism and hate to Buggin' Out and to other people in the neighborhood, and tensions rise. ",Comedy
Hannah and Her Sisters,"Three successive family Thanksgiving dinners mark time for Hannah (Mia Farrow), her younger sisters Lee (Barbara Hershey) and Holly (Dianne Wiest) and the men in their lives. Lee is having an affair with Hannah's husband, Elliot (Michael Caine), and trying to end her Svengali-like romance with artist Frederick (Max von Sydow). Holly is frustrated by her lack of career fulfillment and her increasing dependence on Hannah's largesse, while being courted by the hypochondriac Mickey (Woody Allen). ",Comedy
Brazil,"During a beautician waxing, Camille has to fight to keep her pubic hair intact. ",Drama
Manhattan,"Director Woody Allen's love letter to New York City stars Allen as frustrated television writer Isaac Davis, a twice-divorced malcontent facing middle age alone after his wife, Jill (Meryl Streep), leaves him for a woman. Isaac is dating fresh-faced Tracy (Mariel Hemingway), a high school girl he knows is wrong for him, and begins to wonder if he and brainy writer Mary (Diane Keaton), the mistress of his best friend, Yale (Michael Murphy), might make a better couple. ",Comedy
Amarcord,"In an Italian seaside town, young Titta (Bruno Zanin) gets into trouble with his friends and watches various local eccentrics as they engage in often absurd behavior. Frequently clashing with his stern father (Armando Brancia) and defended by his doting mother (Pupella Maggio), Titta witnesses the actions of a wide range of characters, from his extended family to Fascist loyalists to sensual women, with certain moments shifting into fantastical scenarios. ",Comedy
Harold and Maude,"Cult classic pairs Cort as a dead-pan disillusioned 20-year-old obsessed with suicide and a loveable Gordon as a fun-loving 80-year-old eccentric. They meet at a funeral, and develop a taboo romantic relationship, in which they explore the tired theme of the meaning of life with a fresh perspective. ",Comedy
Doctor Zhivago,"During the Russian Revolution, Yuri Zhivago (Omar Sharif), is a young doctor who has been raised by his aunt and uncle following his father's suicide. Yuri falls in love with beautiful Lara Guishar (Julie Christie), who has been having an affair with her mother's lover, Victor Komarovsky (Rod Steiger), an unscrupulous businessman. Yuri, however, ends up marrying his cousin, Tonya (Geraldine Chaplin). But when he and Lara meet again years later, the spark of love reignites. ",Drama
Hiroshima mon amour,"The deep conversation between a Japanese architect (Eiji Okada) and a French actress (Emmanuelle Riva) forms the basis of this celebrated French film, considered one of the vanguard productions of the French New Wave. Set in Hiroshima after the end of World War II, the couple -- lovers turned friends -- recount, over many hours, previous romances and life experiences. The two intertwine their stories about the past with pondering the devastation wrought by the atomic bomb dropped on the city. ",Drama
A Streetcar Named Desire,"Based on the play by Tennessee Williams, this renowned drama follows troubled former schoolteacher Blanche DuBois (Vivien Leigh) as she leaves small-town Mississippi and moves in with her sister, Stella Kowalski (Kim Hunter), and her husband, Stanley (Marlon Brando), in New Orleans. Blanche's flirtatious Southern-belle presence causes problems for Stella and Stanley, who already have a volatile relationship, leading to even greater conflict in the Kowalski household. ",Drama
Harvey,Harmless tippler Elwood P. Dowd (Harry Anderson) confides in a 6-foot rabbit called Harvey that only he can see. ,Comedy
Miracle on 34th Street,"In this Christmas classic, an old man going by the name of Kris Kringle (Edmund Gwenn) fills in for an intoxicated Santa in Macy's annual Thanksgiving Day parade. Kringle proves to be such a hit that he is soon appearing regularly at the chain's main store in midtown Manhattan. When Kringle surprises customers and employees alike by claiming that he really is Santa Claus, it leads to a court case to determine his mental health and, more importantly, his authenticity. ",Comedy
Notorious,A CIA agent (John Shea) falls for a traitor's daughter (Jenny Robertson) recruited to seduce a Soviet arms dealer her father knew. ,Drama
Secret Superstar,"A talented teenage singer-songwriter must conceal who she really is to fulfil her musical dream. But to save her mother, she might have to sacrifice everything. ",Drama
Hindi Medium,"Raj and Mita yearn to get Pia, their daughter, educated from a reputed school. When they learn that their background is holding her back, they are willing to go to any lengths to change her fate. ",Comedy
Call Me by Your Name,"It's the summer of 1983, and precocious 17-year-old Elio Perlman is spending the days with his family at their 17th-century villa in Lombardy, Italy. He soon meets Oliver, a handsome doctoral student who's working as an intern for Elio's father. Amid the sun-drenched splendor of their surroundings, Elio and Oliver discover the heady beauty of awakening desire over the course of a summer that will alter their lives forever. ",Drama
Hunt for the Wilderpeople,A boy (Julian Dennison) and his foster father (Sam Neill) become the subjects of a manhunt after they get stranded in the New Zealand wilderness. ,Adventure
Manchester by the Sea,"After the death of his older brother Joe, Lee Chandler (Casey Affleck) is shocked that Joe has made him sole guardian of his teenage nephew Patrick. Taking leave of his job as a janitor in Boston, Lee reluctantly returns to Manchester-by-the-Sea, the fishing village where his working-class family has lived for generations. There, he is forced to deal with a past that separated him from his wife, Randi (Michelle Williams), and the community where he was born and raised. ",Drama
Captain Fantastic,"Ben Cash (Viggo Mortensen), his wife Leslie and their six children live deep in the wilderness of Washington state. Isolated from society, Ben and Leslie devote their existence to raising their kids -- educating them to think critically, training them to be physically fit and athletic, guiding them in the wild without technology and demonstrating the beauty of co-existing with nature. When Leslie dies suddenly, Ben must take his sheltered offspring into the outside world for the first time. ",Comedy
Little Women,A musical adaptation of the Louisa May Alcott novel about the growth to womanhood of the four March sisters in 1860s New England. ,Drama
The Lunchbox,"Lonely housewife Ila (Nimrat Kaur) decides to try adding some spice to her stale marriage by preparing a special lunch for her neglectful husband. Unfortunately, the delivery goes astray and winds up in the hands of Saajan (Irrfan Khan), an irritable widower. Curious about her husband's lack of response, Ila adds a note to the next day's lunchbox, and thus begins an unusual friendship in which Saajan and Ila can talk about their joys and sorrows without ever meeting in person. ",Drama
About Time,"When Tim Lake (Domhnall Gleeson) is 21, his father (Bill Nighy) tells him a secret: The men in their family can travel through time. Although he can't change history, Tim resolves to improve his life by getting a girlfriend. He meets Mary (Rachel McAdams), falls in love and finally wins her heart via time-travel and a little cunning. However, as his unusual life progresses, Tim finds that his special ability can't shield him and those he loves from the problems of ordinary life. ",Comedy
English Vinglish,A tradition-minded Indian housewife (Sridevi) enrolls in an accelerated English-language course after she finds herself unable to place a simple order in an American restaurant. ,Comedy
Moonrise Kingdom,"The year is 1965, and the residents of New Penzance, an island off the coast of New England, inhabit a community that seems untouched by some of the bad things going on in the rest of the world. Twelve-year-olds Sam (Jared Gilman) and Suzy (Kara Hayward) have fallen in love and decide to run away. But a violent storm is approaching the island, forcing a group of quirky adults (Bruce Willis, Edward Norton, Bill Murray) to mobilize a search party and find the youths before calamity strikes. ",Comedy
Once,"A vacuum repairman (Glen Hansard) moonlights as a street musician and hopes for his big break. One day a Czech immigrant (Marketa Irglova), who earns a living selling flowers, approaches him with the news that she is also an aspiring singer-songwriter. The pair decide to collaborate, and the songs that they compose reflect the story of their blossoming love. ",Drama
The Fall,Michael and Evie fall deeply in love. Their romance is soon troubled by the harsh realities of life. ,Adventure
Little Miss Sunshine,"The Hoover family -- a man (Greg Kinnear), his wife (Toni Collette), an uncle (Steve Carell), a brother (Paul Dano) and a grandfather (Alan Arkin) -- puts the fun back in dysfunctional by piling into a VW bus and heading to California to support a daughter (Abigail Breslin) in her bid to win the Little Miss Sunshine Contest. The sanity of everyone involved is stretched to the limit as the group's quirks cause epic problems as they travel along their interstate route. ",Comedy
The Notebook,"In 1940s South Carolina, mill worker Noah Calhoun (Ryan Gosling) and rich girl Allie (Rachel McAdams) are desperately in love. But her parents don't approve. When Noah goes off to serve in World War II, it seems to mark the end of their love affair. In the interim, Allie becomes involved with another man (James Marsden). But when Noah returns to their small town years later, on the cusp of Allie's marriage, it soon becomes clear that their romance is anything but over. ",Drama
Todo sobre mi madre,New friends help a woman (Cecilia Roth) struggling to get her life in order after her son's (Eloy Azorín) death. ,Drama
Cast Away,"Obsessively punctual FedEx executive Chuck Noland (Tom Hanks) is en route to an assignment in Malaysia when his plane crashes over the Pacific Ocean during a storm. The sole survivor of the flight, Chuck washes ashore on a deserted island. When his efforts to sail away and contact help fail, Chuck learns how to survive on the island, where he remains for years, accompanied by only his handmade volleyball friend, Wilson. Will Chuck ever return to civilization and reunite with his loved ones? ",Adventure
Being John Malkovich,"In this quirky cult-favorite comedy, unemployed New York City puppeteer Craig Schwartz (John Cusack) reluctantly takes a temp job as a filing clerk for the eccentric Dr. Lester (Orson Bean). While at work, Craig discovers a portal that leads into the mind of renowned actor John Malkovich. When he lets his attractive co-worker Maxine (Catherine Keener) in on the secret, they begin both an unusual business scheme and an odd relationship that involves Craig's restless wife, Lotte (Cameron Diaz). ",Comedy
Gattaca,"Vincent Freeman (Ethan Hawke) has always fantasized about traveling into outer space, but is grounded by his status as a genetically inferior ""in-valid."" He decides to fight his fate by purchasing the genes of Jerome Morrow (Jude Law), a laboratory-engineered ""valid."" He assumes Jerome's DNA identity and joins the Gattaca space program, where he falls in love with Irene (Uma Thurman). An investigation into the death of a Gattaca officer (Gore Vidal) complicates Vincent's plans. ",Drama
Hamlet,"A ghostly visitation prompts Denmark's Prince Hamlet (David Tennant) to feign madness and avenge his father, who died at the hands of Hamlet's uncle (Patrick Stewart). ",Drama
Breaking the Waves,"In a small and religious coastal town, a simple, devoutly religious Scottish woman, Bess McNeill (Emily Watson), finds a partner in an oil rig worker from Norway, Jan Nyman (Stellan Skarsgard). However, the relationship grows strained when Nyman breaks his neck in a horrific work accident on the rig and becomes paralyzed. Unable to perform sexually and suffering mentally from the accident as well, Jan convinces Bess to have sex with other men, which she comes to believe is God's work. ",Drama
Misery,"After a serious car crash, novelist Paul Sheldon (James Caan) is rescued by former nurse Annie Wilkes (Kathy Bates), who claims to be his biggest fan. Annie brings him to her remote cabin to recover, where her obsession takes a dark turn when she discovers Sheldon is killing off her favorite character from his novels. As Sheldon devises plans for escape, Annie grows increasingly controlling, even violent, as she forces the author to shape his writing to suit her twisted fantasies. ",Drama
Crimes and Misdemeanors,"Judah (Martin Landau) is a philandering eye doctor who wants to preserve his marriage, and his dangerous brother Jack (Jerry Orbach) comes up with what appears to be the only viable solution. Certain that his mistress (Anjelica Huston) is about to tell his wife (Claire Bloom) about his affair, Judah agrees to Jack's murderous plan. Twinned with Judah's tale is that of Cliff Stern (Woody Allen), a documentary filmmaker whose problems, which involve love and art, are tame but funny. ",Comedy
All That Jazz,"When he is not planning for his upcoming stage musical or working on his Hollywood film, choreographer/director Joe Gideon (Roy Scheider) is popping pills and sleeping with a seemingly endless line of women. The physical and mental stress begins to take a toll on the ragged perfectionist. Soon, he must decide whether or not his non-stop work schedule and hedonistic lifestyle are worth risking his life. The film is a semi-autobiographical tale written and directed by the legendary Bob Fosse. ",Drama
Days of Heaven,A screen poem about life in America at the turn of the century. A story of love and murder told through the voice of a child and expressive images of nature in 1916. A steelworker flees Chicago after a fight with his boss; he takes his little sister and girlfriend with him. ,Drama
Cabaret,"In Berlin in 1931, American cabaret singer Sally Bowles (Liza Minnelli) meets British academic Brian Roberts (Michael York), who is finishing his university studies. Despite Brian's confusion over his sexuality, the pair become lovers, but the arrival of the wealthy and decadent playboy Maximilian von Heune (Helmut Griem) complicates matters for them both. This love triangle plays out against the rise of the Nazi party and the collapse of the Weimar Republic. ",Drama
Midnight Cowboy,"Convinced of his irresistible appeal to women, Texas dishwasher Joe Buck (Jon Voight) quits his job and heads for New York City, thinking he'll latch on to some rich dowager. New York, however, is not as hospitable as he imagined, and Joe soon finds himself living in an abandoned building with a Dickensian layabout named Enrico ""Ratso"" Rizzo (Dustin Hoffman). The two form a rough alliance, and together they kick-start Joe's hustling career just as Ratso's health begins to deteriorate. ",Drama
Les parapluies de Cherbourg,"Geneviève (Catherine Deneuve), a beautiful young Frenchwoman who works at a small-town boutique selling umbrellas, falls for dashing mechanic Guy (Nino Castelnuovo). Their brief romance is interrupted when Guy is drafted to serve in the Algerian War. Though pregnant by Guy, Geneviève marries an older businessman, Roland (Marc Michel), and begins to move on with her life. Throughout the musical film, all the characters' dialogue is conveyed through song. ",Drama
My Fair Lady,"In this beloved musical, pompous phonetics professor Henry Higgins (Rex Harrison) is so sure of his abilities that he takes it upon himself to transform a Cockney working-class girl into someone who can pass for a cultured member of high society. His subject turns out to be the lovely Eliza Doolittle (Audrey Hepburn), who agrees to speech lessons to improve her job prospects. Higgins and Eliza clash, then form an unlikely bond -- one that is threatened by an aristocratic suitor (Jeremy Brett). ",Drama
East of Eden,"In this film based on John Steinbeck's epic novel, Cal Trask (James Dean), the son of a California farmer (Raymond Massey), feels that his father cares only about his brother, Aron (Richard Davalos). When Cal embarks on a business venture to gain the favor of his dad, he finds himself dealing with his estranged mother (Jo Van Fleet), now the owner of a brothel, and tensions in the family rise even further when he begins to fall for Aron's girlfriend, Abra (Julie Harris). ",Drama
His Girl Friday,"When hard-charging New York newspaper editor Walter Burns discovers that his ex-wife, investigative reporter Hildy Johnson, has gotten engaged to milquetoast insurance agent Bruce Baldwin, he unsuccessfully tries to lure her away from tame domestic life with a story about the impending execution of convicted murderer Earl Williams. But when Hildy discovers Williams may be innocent, her reporter instincts take over. ",Comedy
Bride of Frankenstein,"After recovering from injuries sustained in the mob attack upon himself and his creation, Dr. Frankenstein (Colin Clive) falls under the control of his former mentor, Dr. Pretorius (Ernest Thesiger), who insists the now-chastened doctor resume his experiments in creating new life. Meanwhile, the Monster (Boris Karloff) remains on the run from those who wish to destroy him without understanding that his intentions are generally good despite his lack of socialization and self-control. ",Drama
Freaks,"When trapeze artist Cleopatra (Olga Baclanova) learns that circus midget Hans (Harry Earles) has an inheritance, she marries the lovesick, diminutive performer, all the while planning to steal his fortune and run off with her lover, strong man Hercules (Henry Victor). When Hans' friends and fellow performers discover what is going on, they band together and carry out a brutal revenge that leaves Hercules and Cleopatra knowing what it truly means to be a ""freak."" ",Drama
Frankenstein,A female scientist's (Helen McCrory) research leads to the creation of a modern-day monster. ,Drama
Roma,"Cleo is one of two domestic workers who help Antonio and Sofía take care of their four children in 1970s Mexico City. Complications soon arise when Antonio suddenly runs away with his mistress and Cleo finds out that she's pregnant. When Sofía decides to take the kids on vacation, she invites Cleo for a much-needed getaway to clear her mind and bond with the family. ",Drama
Sound of Metal,"During a series of adrenaline-fueled one-night gigs, itinerant punk-metal drummer Ruben (Riz Ahmed) begins to experience intermittent hearing loss. When a specialist tells him his condition will rapidly worsen, he thinks his music career — and with it his life — is over. His bandmate and girlfriend Lou (Olivia Cooke) checks the recovering heroin addict into a secluded sober house for the deaf in hopes it will prevent a relapse and help him learn to adapt to his new situation. But after being welcomed into a community that accepts him just as he is, Ruben has to choose between his equilibrium and the drive to reclaim the life he once knew. Utilizing startling, innovative sound design techniques, director Darius Marder takes audiences inside Ruben’s experience to vividly recreate his journey into a rarely examined world. ",Drama
Perfetti sconosciuti,"During a dinner party, seven friends decide to play a dangerous game. The attendees place their cellphones on the table and agree to make all texts and calls public in an attempt to prove that they have nothing to hide. ",Comedy
The Fault in Our Stars,"Hazel Grace Lancaster (Shailene Woodley), a 16-year-old cancer patient, meets and falls in love with Gus Waters (Ansel Elgort), a similarly afflicted teen from her cancer support group. Hazel feels that Gus really understands her. They both share the same acerbic wit and a love of books, especially Grace's touchstone, ""An Imperial Affliction"" by Peter Van Houten. When Gus scores an invitation to meet the reclusive author, he and Hazel embark on the adventure of their brief lives. ",Drama
Me and Earl and the Dying Girl,An awkward high-school senior (Thomas Mann) and a gravely ill classmate (Olivia Cooke) surprise themselves by becoming inseparable friends. ,Comedy
La grande bellezza,An aging writer bitterly recollects his passionate youth. ,Drama
The Broken Circle Breakdown,"The loss of their young daughter threatens to destroy the love and faith of two married musicians (Veerle Baetens, Johan Heldenbergh). ",Drama
Rockstar,Janardan wants to be a star and realizes he has to suffer through a tragedy to become famous. ,Drama
Nebraska,"Cantankerous old buzzard Woody Grant (Bruce Dern) can barely walk down the street of his home in Billings, Mont., without stopping for a drink. So when Woody receives receives a sweepstakes notice in the mail and insists on making a 750-mile trip to Lincoln, Neb., to collect his prize, it falls to baffled son David (Will Forte) to accompany him. During a stop in their Nebraska hometown, word gets out about Woody's fortune, first making him a hero, then later, the target of predatory people. ",Adventure
Detachment,"Henry Barthes (Adrien Brody) is a substitute teacher who shuns emotional connections, and never stays long enough in one district to bond with his students or colleagues. Troubled and lost, Henry lands at a public school where an apathetic student body and disinterested parents have created a frustrated, burned-out group of teachers and administrators. Inadvertently, Henry becomes a role model to his disaffected students and bonds with a teenage runaway who is just as lost as he is. ",Drama
Beasts of No Nation,"As civil war rages in Africa, a fierce warlord (Idris Elba) trains a young orphan (Abraham Attah) to join his group of guerrilla soldiers. ",Drama
Silver Linings Playbook,"After losing his job and wife, and spending time in a mental institution, Pat Solatano (Bradley Cooper) winds up living with his parents (Robert De Niro, Jacki Weaver). He wants to rebuild his life and reunite with his wife, but his parents would be happy if he just shared their obsession with the Philadelphia Eagles. Things get complicated when Pat meets Tiffany (Jennifer Lawrence), who offers to help him reconnect with his wife, if he will do something very important for her in exchange. ",Comedy
Flipped,"When they meet in second grade, Juli Baker falls instantly in love with her neighbor, Bryce Loski. Bryce, however, does not feel the spark. From that day forward, he (Callan McAuliffe) tries hard to keep brash and unpredictable Juli (Madeline Carroll) at bay. After six years, she begins to feel that she was wrong about him being the love of her life. Unfortunately, that is just about the time that Bryce begins to think he was wrong about Juli, too. ",Comedy
Ex Machina,"Caleb Smith (Domhnall Gleeson) a programmer at a huge Internet company, wins a contest that enables him to spend a week at the private estate of Nathan Bateman (Oscar Isaac), his firm's brilliant CEO. When he arrives, Caleb learns that he has been chosen to be the human component in a Turing test to determine the capabilities and consciousness of Ava (Alicia Vikander), a beautiful robot. However, it soon becomes evident that Ava is far more self-aware and deceptive than either man imagined. ",Drama
Brokeback Mountain,"In 1963, rodeo cowboy Jack Twist (Jake Gyllenhaal) and ranch hand Ennis Del Mar (Heath Ledger) are hired by rancher Joe Aguirre (Randy Quaid) as sheep herders in Wyoming. One night on Brokeback Mountain, Jack makes a drunken pass at Ennis that is eventually reciprocated. Though Ennis marries his longtime sweetheart, Alma (Michelle Williams), and Jack marries a fellow rodeo rider (Anne Hathaway), the two men keep up their tortured and sporadic affair over the course of 20 years. ",Drama
The Machinist,"Factory worker Trevor Reznik (Christian Bale) suffers from insomnia so severe that his condition has taken its toll on his weight and his mental health. When Trevor unintentionally causes an on-the-job accident that horribly injures a coworker (Michael Ironside), he begins to become even more troubled. Despite a relationship with Stevie (Jennifer Jason Leigh), a pretty prostitute, Trevor descends further into paranoia, blaming his problems on an enigmatic figure named Ivan (John Sharian). ",Drama
Lost in Translation,"A lonely, aging movie star named Bob Harris (Bill Murray) and a conflicted newlywed, Charlotte (Scarlett Johansson), meet in Tokyo. Bob is there to film a Japanese whiskey commercial; Charlotte is accompanying her celebrity-photographer husband. Strangers in a foreign land, the two find escape, distraction and understanding amidst the bright Tokyo lights after a chance meeting in the quiet lull of the hotel bar. They form a bond that is as unlikely as it is heartfelt and meaningful. ",Comedy
In America,"The Sullivan family emigrates from Ireland to New York City as father Johnny (Paddy Considine) chases his dream of being an actor. Living in a small Hell's Kitchen apartment, the family settles into American life despite their deplorable living conditions. Wife Sarah (Samantha Morton) works at an ice parlor while Johnny looks for work as an actor, both haunted by memories of their dead son, Frankie. Daughter Christie (Sarah Bolger) documents the family's American journey with a video camera. ",Drama
Billy Elliot,"The life of 11-year-old Billy Elliot, a coal miner's son in Northern England, is forever changed one day when he stumbles upon a ballet class during his weekly boxing lesson. Before long, he finds himself in dance, demonstrating the kind of raw talent seldom seen by the class' exacting instructor, Mrs. Wilkinson. With a tart tongue and a never-ending stream of cigarettes in her hand, Mrs. Wilkinson's zest for teaching is revived when she sees Billy's potential. ",Drama
Hedwig and the Angry Inch,"A German emigrant living in a trailer in Kansas is the victim of a botched sex-change operation. Adapted from the critically acclaimed off-Broadway rock theater hit, ""Hedwig and the Angry Inch"" tells the story of the ""internationally ignored"" rock singer, Hedwig, and her search for stardom and love. ",Comedy
Happiness,"An app designed to bring its users happiness helps a man build the perfect life, which he ends up destroying when he learns the app is faulty. ",Comedy
As Good as It Gets,"Melvin Udall (Jack Nicholson) is an obsessive-compulsive writer of romantic fiction who's rude to everyone he meets, including his gay neighbor Simon (Greg Kinnear), but when he has to look after Simon's dog, he begins to soften and, if still not completely over his problems, finds he can conduct a relationship with the only waitress (Helen Hunt) at the local diner who'll serve him. ",Comedy
Sense and Sensibility,"Two British sisters (Irene Richard, Tracey Childs) search for wealthy husbands after the death of their father. ",Drama
Short Cuts,"Many loosely connected characters cross paths in this film, based on the stories of Raymond Carver. Waitress Doreen Piggot (Lily Tomlin) accidentally runs into a boy with her car. Soon after walking away, the child lapses into a coma. While at the hospital, the boy's grandfather (Jack Lemmon) tells his son, Howard (Bruce Davison), about his past affairs. Meanwhile, a baker (Lyle Lovett) starts harassing the family when they fail to pick up the boy's birthday cake. ",Comedy
Philadelphia,"Fearing it would compromise his career, lawyer Andrew Beckett (Tom Hanks) hides his homosexuality and HIV status at a powerful Philadelphia law firm. But his secret is exposed when a colleague spots the illness's telltale lesions. Fired shortly afterwards, Beckett resolves to sue for discrimination, teaming up with Joe Miller (Denzel Washington), the only lawyer willing to help. In court, they face one of his ex-employer's top litigators, Belinda Conine (Mary Steenburgen). ",Drama
Naked,"Three German couples discuss problems concerning marriage, fidelity, happiness and sex. ",Comedy
Night on Earth,"This film presents five stories, each involving a cab ride and set in a different city around the world. In Los Angeles, no-nonsense taxi driver Corky (Winona Ryder) gets an engaging customer in the form of a Hollywood casting agent (Gena Rowlands), while a Parisian cabbie (Isaach de Bankolé) must contend with some rowdy African diplomats. Among the other tales, a standout is the Italian taxi ride that finds quirky driver Gino (Roberto Benigni) making a lively confession to an ailing priest. ",Comedy
Fried Green Tomatoes,"On one of trapped housewife Evelyn Couch's (Kathy Bates) Wednesday nursing home visits, she encounters Ninny Threadgoode (Jessica Tandy), a colorful old woman who brightens Evelyn's outlook by sharing tales from her past. As Ninny recounts the exploits of her free-spirited sister-in-law Idgie (Mary Stuart Masterson), owner of a small Alabama café in the 1920s, and the bond Idgie shared with her friend Ruth (Mary-Louise Parker), Evelyn gains the confidence to change her own life for the better. ",Drama
The Color Purple,"A story of love and resilience based on the novel and the Broadway musical, THE COLOR PURPLE is a decades-spanning tale of one woman's journey to independence. Celie faces many hardships in her life, but ultimately finds extraordinary strength and hope in the unbreakable bonds of sisterhood. ",Drama
The Verdict,An international crook facing prosecution arranges for a friendly jury. ,Drama
Ordinary People,"Tormented by guilt following the death of his older brother, Buck, in a sailing accident, alienated teenager Conrad Jarrett (Timothy Hutton) attempts suicide. Returning home following an extended stay in a psychiatric hospital, Conrad tries to deal with his mental anguish and also reconnect with his mother, Beth (Mary Tyler Moore), who has grown cold and angry, and his emotionally wounded father, Calvin (Donald Sutherland), with the help of his psychiatrist, Dr. Berger (Judd Hirsch). ",Drama
Nashville,"In this acclaimed Robert Altman drama, the lives of numerous people in the Tennessee capital intersect in unpredictable ways. Delbert Reese (Ned Beatty) is a lawyer and political organizer who is having difficulties in his marriage to Linnea (Lily Tomlin), a gospel vocalist. Other performers heavily featured in this renowned ensemble production include country singers Barbara Jean (Ronee Blakley) and Connie White (Karen Black), who are rivals in the city's thriving music scene. ",Comedy
Deliverance,"Four city-dwelling friends (Jon Voight, Burt Reynolds, Ned Beatty, Ronny Cox) decide to get away from their jobs, wives and kids for a week of canoeing in rural Georgia. When the men arrive, they are not welcomed by the backwoods locals, who stalk the vacationers and savagely attack them in the woods. Reeling from the ambush, the friends attempt to return home but are surrounded by dangerous rapids and pursued by a madman. Soon, their canoe trip turns into a fight for survival. ",Adventure
Belle de jour,"Beautiful young housewife Séverine Serizy (Catherine Deneuve) cannot reconcile her masochistic fantasies with her everyday life alongside dutiful husband Pierre (Jean Sorel). When her lovestruck friend Henri (Michel Piccoli) mentions a secretive high-class brothel run by Madame Anais (Genevieve Page), Séverine begins to work there during the day under the name Belle de Jour. But when one of her clients (Pierre Clémenti) grows possessive, she must try to go back to her normal life. ",Drama
The African Queen,"In a remake of John Huston's 1951 classic, a hard-drinking riverboat captain and a straight-laced missionary fall in love. ",Adventure
Black Narcissus,"A group of Anglican nuns, led by Sister Clodagh (Deborah Kerr), are sent to a mountain in the Himalayas. The climate in the region is hostile and the nuns are housed in an odd old palace. They work to establish a school and a hospital, but slowly their focus shifts. Sister Ruth (Kathleen Byron) falls for a government worker, Mr. Dean (David Farrar), and begins to question her vow of celibacy. As Sister Ruth obsesses over Mr. Dean, Sister Clodagh becomes immersed in her own memories of love. ",Drama
The Florida Project,"Set in the shadow of the most magical place on Earth, 6-year-old Moonee and her two best friends forge their own adventures, while Moonee's struggling mom and a kindhearted motel manager protect the kids from the harsh reality that surrounds them. ",Drama
Gifted,A Southern family uses supernatural powers inherited from African ancestors to stave off an alien force. ,Drama
The Peanut Butter Falcon,"After running away from a residential nursing home to pursue his dream of becoming a pro wrestler, a man who has Down syndrome befriends an outlaw who becomes his coach and ally. ",Adventure
Mustang,"Aging rodeo rider Gabe (Jack Beutel) is down on his luck. He's gambled away all his money and injured himself badly enough to put a halt to his rodeo career, perhaps permanently. Desperate for cash, he responds to an advertisement placed by Lou (Steve Keyes) and Nancy (Madalyn Trahey), siblings and co-owners of a ranch, who need someone to capture and kill a wild mustang disrupting their herd. Despite their skepticism, Gabe is determined to prove he's still up to the task. ",Drama
Piku,A cab driver (Irrfan Khan) is caught between a dysfunctional father (Amitabh Bachchan) and daughter (Deepika Padukone) as he drives them to Calcutta. ,Comedy
Tanu Weds Manu Returns,Tanu and Manu's marriage falls apart. ,Comedy
Weekend,"Jakob throws an end of the year party, and everyone in school has an agenda for the night. ",Drama
A Star Is Born,"Seasoned musician Jackson Maine discovers -- and falls in love with -- struggling artist Ally. She has just about given up on her dream to make it big as a singer until Jackson coaxes her into the spotlight. But even as Ally's career takes off, the personal side of their relationship is breaking down, as Jackson fights an ongoing battle with his own internal demons. ",Drama
Wake Up Sid,"Sid Mehra (Ranbir Kapoor) is a young man living in Mumbai who benefits from the indulgence of his parents. After graduating from university, he makes a stab at working in his father's business, but lasts only a week. He then meets Aisha (Konkona Sen Sharma), an aspiring writer from Calcutta. Sid helps her get settled in the city and then wants to take things further -- but Aisha isn't interested because of Sid's slacker personality. Will her rejection serve as a wake-up call for Sid? ",Comedy
Boy A,"Freed after a lengthy term in a juvenile detention center, convicted child killer Jack Burridge (Andrew Garfield) finds work as a deliveryman and begins dating co-worker Michelle (Katie Lyons). While out on the road one day, the young Englishman notices a distressed child, and, after reuniting the girl with her family, becomes a local celebrity. But, when a local newspaper unearths his past, Jack must cope with the anger of citizens who fear for the safety of their children. ",Drama
Die Welle,A man (Michael Graziadei) finds unexpected success when friends convince him to surf professionally. ,Drama
The Reader,A college student is kidnapped by goons and forced to translate a German manuscript containing clues to finding a mysterious briefcase. ,Drama
The Visitor,An injured man (Pavel Liska) finds refuge with a woman (Emilia Ikäheimo) and her mute son (Vitali Bobrov) at a farm. ,Drama
Seven Pounds,"A life-shattering secret torments Ben Thomas (Will Smith). In order to find redemption, he sets out to change the lives of seven strangers. Over the course of his journey, he meets and falls in love with a cardiac patient named Emily (Rosario Dawson), and in so doing, complicates his mission. ",Drama
Volver,"Raimunda (Penélope Cruz) works and lives Madrid with her husband Paco and daughter Paula. Her sister Sole (Lola Dueñas) lives nearby and they both miss their mother Irene (Carmen Maura), who died several years ago in a house fire along with their father. A former neighbor from their hometown reports that she has seen the ghost of Irene and both daughters do not believe her. After a murder and a family tragedy, Irene's spirit materializes around her daughters to help comfort them. ",Comedy
Stranger Than Fiction,"A mentally unstable IRS auditor (Will Ferrell) hears an author's (Emma Thompson) voice in his head and discovers that he is the ill-fated protagonist of her latest work. While a book-company employee (Queen Latifah) tries to cure the author's case of writer's block, the auditor and a professor (Dustin Hoffman) set out to find the woman and make her change her story. ",Comedy
Match Point,"Tennis instructor Chris Wilton (Jonathan Rhys-Meyers) grows friendly with Tom Hewett (Matthew Goode), a wealthy student who shares an interest in opera. Invited to attend a performance with Tom, Chris meets the family and instantly attracts Tom's sister, Chloe (Emily Mortimer). Chris marries her to get a job with her millionaire father, Alec (Brian Cox), but a dangerous affair with Nola Rice (Scarlett Johansson), Tom's American girlfriend, threatens his newfound social status. ",Drama
Mysterious Skin,"One youth (Brady Corbet) becomes obsessed with UFOs, while another (Joseph Gordon-Levitt) becomes a gay hustler in the years following a childhood trauma. ",Drama
Love Actually,"Nine intertwined stories examine the complexities of the one emotion that connects us all: love. Among the characters explored are David (Hugh Grant), the handsome newly elected British prime minister who falls for a young junior staffer (Martine McCutcheon), Sarah (Laura Linney), a graphic designer whose devotion to her mentally ill brother complicates her love life, and Harry (Alan Rickman), a married man tempted by his attractive new secretary. ",Comedy
25th Hour,"In New York City in the days following the September 11, 2001, terrorist attacks, Monty Brogan (Edward Norton) steels himself for a lengthy jail term. Brogan is a convicted drug dealer about to start a seven-year prison sentence, and his final hours of freedom are devoted to hanging out with his closest buddies (Philip Seymour Hoffman, Barry Pepper) and trying to prepare his girlfriend, Naturelle Riviera (Rosario Dawson), for his extended absence. ",Drama
I Am Sam,"""I Am Sam"" is the compelling story of Sam Dawson (Sean Penn), a mentally-challenged father raising his daughter Lucy (Dakota Fanning) with the help of a unique group of friends. As Lucy turns seven and begins to intellectually surpass her father, their close bond is threatened when their unconventional living arrangement comes to the attention of a social worker who wants Lucy placed in foster care. ",Drama
The Royal Tenenbaums,"Royal Tenenbaum and his wife Etheline had three children and then they separated. All three children are extraordinary --- all geniuses. Virtually all memory of the brilliance of the young Tenenbaums was subsequently erased by two decades of betrayal, failure, and disaster. Most of this was generally considered to be their father's fault. ""The Royal Tenenbaums"" is the story of the family's sudden, unexpected reunion one recent winter. ",Comedy
Rushmore,"When a beautiful first-grade teacher (Olivia Williams) arrives at a prep school, she soon attracts the attention of an ambitious teenager named Max (Jason Schwartzman), who quickly falls in love with her. Max turns to the father (Bill Murray) of two of his schoolmates for advice on how to woo the teacher. However, the situation soon gets complicated when Max's new friend becomes involved with her, setting the two pals against one another in a war for her attention. ",Comedy
A Little Princess,"A man (Nigel Havers) tries to locate his friend's daughter (Amelia Shankley), now a penniless orphan treated poorly by her headmistress (Maureen Lipman) in Victorian London. ",Drama
Barton Fink,"Set in 1941, an intellectual New York playwright Barton Fink (John Turturro) accepts an offer to write movie scripts in L.A. He finds himself with writer's block when required to do a B-movie script. His neighbor tries to help, but he continues to struggle as a bizarre sequence of events distracts him. ",Comedy
The Fly,"A day in the life of a fly, from the fly's perspective. ",Drama
On Golden Pond,"Cantankerous retiree Norman Thayer (Henry Fonda) and his conciliatory wife, Ethel (Katharine Hepburn), spend summers at their New England vacation home on the shores of idyllic Golden Pond. This year, their adult daughter, Chelsea (Jane Fonda), visits with her new fiancée and his teenage son, Billy (Doug McKeon) on their way to Europe. After leaving Billy behind to bond with Norman, Chelsea returns, attempting to repair the long-strained relationship with her aging father before it's too late. ",Drama
Close Encounters of the Third Kind,"Science fiction adventure about a group of people who attempt to contact alien intelligence. Roy Neary (Richard Dreyfuss) witnesses an unidentified flying object, and even has a ""sunburn"" from its bright lights to prove it. Roy refuses to accept an explanation for what he saw and is prepared to give up his life to pursue the truth about UFOs. ",Drama
Le locataire,Nicole is pregnant. ,Drama
Walkabout,"Under the pretense of having a picnic, a geologist (John Meillon) takes his teenage daughter (Jenny Agutter) and 6-year-old son (Lucien John) into the Australian outback and attempts to shoot them. When he fails, he turns the gun on himself, and the two city-bred children must contend with harsh wilderness alone. They are saved by a chance encounter with an Indigenous Australian boy (David Gulpilil) who shows them how to survive, and in the process underscores the disharmony between nature and modern life. ",Adventure
Romeo and Juliet,"Amidst their families' long-simmering animosity, Romeo and Juliet fall head over heels in love with each other. ",Drama
Repulsion,"In Roman Polanski's first English-language film, beautiful young manicurist Carole (Catherine Deneuve) suffers from androphobia (the pathological fear of interaction with men). When her sister and roommate, Helen (Yvonne Furneaux), leaves their London flat to go on an Italian holiday with her married boyfriend (Ian Hendry), Carole withdraws into her apartment. She begins to experience frightful hallucinations, her fear gradually mutating into madness. ",Drama
Peeping Tom,"Ben Makiguri, a pornography writer, spies on his unsuspecting neighbors for inspiration. What started out as a simple job becomes an overriding obsession, and he becomes involved with the lives of his neighbors. ",Drama
Les yeux sans visage,"Dr. Génessier (Pierre Brasseur) is riddled with guilt after an accident that he caused disfigures the face of his daughter, the once beautiful Christiane (Édith Scob), who outsiders believe is dead. Dr. Génessier, along with accomplice and laboratory assistant Louise (Alida Valli), kidnaps young women and brings them to the Génessier mansion. After rendering his victims unconscious, Dr. Génessier removes their faces and attempts to graft them on to Christiane's. ",Drama
Rebel Without a Cause,"After moving to a new town, troublemaking teen Jim Stark (James Dean) is supposed to have a clean slate, although being the new kid in town brings its own problems. While searching for some stability, Stark forms a bond with a disturbed classmate, Plato (Sal Mineo), and falls for local girl Judy (Natalie Wood). However, Judy is the girlfriend of neighborhood tough, Buzz (Corey Allen). When Buzz violently confronts Jim and challenges him to a drag race, the new kid's real troubles begin. ",Drama
Sabrina,A toy manufacturer and his wife are terrorized by a demon after their orphaned niece tries to summon her late mother's spirit using a strange ritual. ,Comedy
From Here to Eternity,Five people stationed in Hawaii experience the calm before the storm of the bombing of Pearl Harbor in World War II. ,Drama
Gilda,"Johnny Farrell (Glenn Ford) is a small-time American gambler, newly arrived in Buenos Aires, Argentina. When he is caught cheating at a game of blackjack, Farrell manages to talk his way into a job with the casino's owner, the powerful Ballin Mundson (George Macready). The two form an uneasy partnership based off their mutual lack of scruples until Mundson introduces Farrell to his beautiful new wife, Gilda (Rita Hayworth), who just happens to be Farrell's ex-lover. ",Drama
Lifeboat,"In this tense Alfred Hitchcock thriller, based on a John Steinbeck novella, American and British civilians who have survived the sinking of their ship by a German submarine struggle to reach land in a crowded lifeboat. When a German officer (Walter Slezak) is rescued from the water, the group allows him to board, but his presence only increases the tensions on the boat. Soon treachery ensues, and the population of the vessel gradually decreases as conflicts come to a head. ",Drama
The Farewell,A gravely ill soccer star (Carlos Renê Issa Castello) wants to continue playing despite his condition. ,Comedy
Dolor y gloria,An aging Spanish film director in the middle of a creative crisis revisits memorable events of his past. ,Drama
A Quiet Place,"If they hear you, they hunt you. A family must live in silence to avoid mysterious creatures that hunt by sound. Knowing that even the slightest whisper or footstep can bring death, Evelyn and Lee are determined to find a way to protect their children while desperately searching for a way to fight back. ",Drama
The Big Sick,"Kumail is a Pakistani comic, who meets an American graduate student named Emily at one of his stand-up shows. As their relationship blossoms, he soon becomes worried about what his traditional Muslim parents will think of her. When Emily suddenly comes down with an illness that leaves her in a coma, Kumail finds himself developing a bond with her deeply concerned mother and father. ",Comedy
Nocturnal Animals,"A successful Los Angeles art-gallery owner's idyllic life is marred by the constant traveling of her handsome second husband. While he is away, she is shaken by the arrival of a manuscript written by her first husband, who she has not seen in years. The manuscript tells the story of a teacher who finds a trip with his family turning into a nightmare. As Susan reads the book, it forces her to examine her past and confront some dark truths. ",Drama
Miss Sloane,"Willing to bend the rules for her clients, Elizabeth Sloane (Jessica Chastain) remains one of the most sought-after lobbyists in Washington, D.C. When asked to help oppose a bill that imposes regulations on firearms, she instead joins a scrappy boutique firm that represents the backers of the law. Her defiant stance and determination to win now makes her the target of powerful new enemies who threaten her career and the people she cares about. ",Drama
Still Alice,"Dr. Alice Howland (Julianne Moore) is a renowned linguistics professor at Columbia University. When words begin to escape her and she starts becoming lost on her daily jogs, Alice must come face-to-face with a devastating diagnosis: early-onset Alzheimer's disease. As the once-vibrant woman struggles to hang on to her sense of self for as long as possible, Alice's three grown children must watch helplessly as their mother disappears more and more with each passing day. ",Drama
Brooklyn,"Young Irish immigrant Eilis Lace (Saoirse Ronan) navigates her way through 1950s Brooklyn. Lured by the promise of America, Eilis departs Ireland and the comfort of her mother's home for the shores of New York City. The initial shackles of homesickness quickly diminish as a fresh romance sweeps Eilis into the intoxicating charm of love. But soon, her past disrupts her new vivacity, and Eilis must choose between two countries and the lives that exist within. ",Drama
No se aceptan devoluciones,An irresponsible playboy (Eugenio Derbez) must grow up quickly when a former lover gives him their daughter to raise -- then leaves without a trace. ,Comedy
Boy,A New Zealand youth (James Rolleston) finds that his father (Taika Waititi) is a far cry from the heroic adventurer he's imagined the man to be. ,Comedy
The Art of Racing in the Rain,"Denny Swift is a Formula One race car driver who understands that the techniques needed on the racetrack can also be used to successfully navigate everyday life. Besides his career, Denny has three loves of his life -- his beautiful wife, their young daughter and his best friend, which is a dog that wants to be reincarnated into a human. ",Comedy
Disconnect,A young woman finds a cell phone that allows her to talk to her dead mother in the past. She is shocked to learn her mother was murdered and she hopes to use the phone to stop the killer in the past and the present. ,Drama
A Single Man,A middle-aged man tries to look and act younger after he falls for a vivacious flapper. ,Drama
Tyrannosaur,"An angry, violent alcoholic (Peter Mullan) finds respite with a devout woman (Olivia Colman) whose husband abuses her. ",Drama
The Hurt Locker,"Staff Sgt. William James (Jeremy Renner), Sgt. J.T. Sanborn (Anthony Mackie) and Specialist Owen Eldridge (Brian Geraghty) are members of a bomb-disposal unit in Baghdad. As their tour of duty enters its final weeks, the men face a set of increasingly hazardous situations, any of which could end their lives in an explosive instant. ",Drama
The Book Thief,"In 1938, young orphan Liesel (Sophie Nélisse) arrives at the home of her new foster parents, Hans (Geoffrey Rush) and Rosa (Emily Watson). When Hans, a kindly housepainter, learns that Liesel cannot read, he teaches the child the wonders of the written language. Liesel grows to love books, even rescuing one from a Nazi bonfire. Though Liesel's new family barely scrape by, their situation becomes even more precarious when they secretly shelter a Jewish boy whose father once saved Hans' life. ",Drama
Juno,"When precocious teen Juno MacGuff becomes pregnant, she chooses a failed rock star and his wife to adopt her unborn child. Complications occur when Mark, the prospective father, begins viewing Juno as more than just the mother of his future child, putting both his marriage and the adoption in jeopardy. ",Comedy
The Wind that Shakes the Barley,"In 1920s Ireland young doctor Damien O'Donovan (Cillian Murphy) prepares to depart for a new job in a London hospital. As he says his goodbyes at a friend's farm, British Black and Tans arrive, and a young man is killed. Damien joins his brother Teddy (Padraic Delaney) in the Irish Republican Army, but political events are soon set in motion that tear the brothers apart. ",Drama
Babel,"An accident connects four groups of people on three different continents: two young Moroccan goatherds, a vacationing American couple (Brad Pitt, Cate Blanchett), a deaf Japanese teen and her father, and a Mexican nanny who takes her young charges across a border without parental permission. ",Drama
Thank You for Smoking,"Nick Naylor (Aaron Eckhart), a lobbyist for big tobacco, finds it difficult to balance his duties defending the dangerous substance with those of being a good role model for his young son. Nick's life gets even more complicated when a liberal senator mounts an anti-smoking campaign that he must counter. Based on the novel by Christopher Buckley. ",Comedy
Little Children,"Sarah (Kate Winslet) is a well-educated woman who cannot come to terms with her life as a housewife and mother. Brad (Patrick Wilson), a stay-at-home dad, is married to a beautiful filmmaker (Jennifer Connelly) and goes skateboarding instead of studying for the bar exam. The pair meet at a playground and soon begin having secret trysts while their children nap and their spouses are at work. ",Drama
Sideways,"Struggling writer and wine enthusiast Miles (Paul Giamatti) takes his engaged friend, Jack (Thomas Haden Church), on a trip to wine country for a last single-guy bonding experience. While Miles wants to relax and enjoy the wine, Jack is in search of a fling before his wedding. Soon Jack is sleeping with Stephanie (Sandra Oh), while her friend Maya (Virginia Madsen) connects with Miles. When Miles lets slip that Jack is getting married, both women are furious, sending the trip into disarray. ",Comedy
Secondhand Lions,"A shy adolescent boy, Walter (Haley Joel Osment), is taken by his greedy mother (Kyra Sedgwick) to spend the summer with his two hard-boiled great-uncles, Hub (Robert Duvall) and Garth (Michael Caine), who are rumored to possess a great fortune. At first, the two old men, both set in their ways, find Walter's presence a nuisance, but they eventually warm up to the boy and regale him with tall tales from their past. In return, Walter helps reawaken their youthful spirit. ",Comedy
Whale Rider,"Only males are allowed to ascend to chiefdom in a Maori tribe in New Zealand. This ancient custom is upset when the child selected to be the next chief dies at birth. However his twin sister, Pai (Keisha Castle-Hughes), survives. At age 12, she enlists the help of her grandmother (Vicky Haughton) and the training of her uncle (Grant Roa) to claim her birthright. But to break with convention, she'll have to do the impossible: win over her ultra-traditional grandfather (Rawiri Paratene). ",Drama
Life as a House,"""Life as a House"" is the poignant, often humorous journey of one man who decides to tear down his house -- and winds up rebuilding the world around him. From the day he picks up his sledgehammer, George Monroe embarks on a grand adventure that will shatter expectations and build a foundation for many different dreams among his family and neighbors. ",Drama
Devdas,"Privileged Devdas and poor Paro grew up sharing a special connection, unaware of their societal differences. After returning from his education in Calcutta, Devdas wants to marry her, but the proposal causes a rift in his family. ",Drama
You Can Count on Me,Sammy is a single mother who is extremely protective of her 8-year old son. She is satisfied with living in the small town she grew up in and working in a local bank. When her brother Terry visits he fits the void in the life of both her and her son. Temporarily free of the constraints of single motherhood she begins to break free of her normal routine. In a string of traumatic events Sammy is torn between helping her brother and her maternal instinct to protect her son from getting hurt. ,Drama
Kuch Kuch Hota Hai,"Before dying, a woman (Rani Mukerji) leaves letters asking her daughter to play matchmaker for her father (Shahrukh Khan) and his college friend (Kajol). ",Comedy
Pleasantville,"Impressed by high school student David's (Tobey Maguire) devotion to a 1950s family TV show, a mysterious television repairman (Don Knotts) provides him with a means to escape into the black-and-white program with his sister, Jennifer (Reese Witherspoon). While David initially takes to the simplistic, corny world of the show, Jennifer sets about jolting the characters with doses of reality that unexpectedly bring a little color into their drab existence. ",Comedy
Fear and Loathing in Las Vegas,"Raoul Duke (Johnny Depp) and his attorney Dr. Gonzo (Benicio del Toro) drive a red convertible across the Mojave desert to Las Vegas with a suitcase full of drugs to cover a motorcycle race. As their consumption of drugs increases at an alarming rate, the stoned duo trash their hotel room and fear legal repercussions. Duke begins to drive back to L.A., but after an odd run-in with a cop (Gary Busey), he returns to Sin City and continues his wild drug binge. ",Adventure
Leaving Las Vegas,"Adapted from the novel by John O'Brien, this acclaimed drama follows alcoholic screenwriter Ben Sanderson (Nicolas Cage) as he drinks himself into oblivion in Las Vegas. When Ben meets the beautiful prostitute Sera (Elisabeth Shue), they strike up an unconventional relationship -- one where she can't ask him to curb his drinking, and he can't fault her for her job. Though they offer each other support, Ben's self-destruction threatens to eclipse their bond. ",Drama
Field of Dreams,"When Iowa farmer Ray (Kevin Costner) hears a mysterious voice one night in his cornfield saying ""If you build it, he will come,"" he feels the need to act. Despite taunts of lunacy, Ray builds a baseball diamond on his land, supported by his wife, Annie (Amy Madigan). Afterward, the ghosts of great players start emerging from the crops to play ball, led by ""Shoeless"" Joe Jackson. But, as Ray learns, this field of dreams is about much more than bringing former baseball greats out to play. ",Drama
Hair,"In New York City for the first time while on his way to enlist in the U.S. Army during the Vietnam War, Oklahoma farm hand Claude Hooper Bukowski (John Savage) meets up with a freewheeling group of Central Park hippies led by the irrepressible George Berger (Treat Williams). When the unlikely friends meet upper-middle-class debutante Sheila Franklin (Beverly D'Angelo), sparks fly between the country boy and the city girl, and Berger's troupe attempts to keep the young lovers together. ",Comedy
Never Rarely Sometimes Always,"Faced with an unintended pregnancy and a lack of local support, Autumn and her cousin, Skylar, travel across state lines to New York City on a fraught journey of friendship, bravery and compassion. ",Drama
Eighth Grade,Thirteen-year-old Kayla endures the tidal wave of contemporary suburban adolescence as she makes her way through the last week of middle school -- the end of her thus far disastrous eighth-grade year. ,Comedy
Downton Abbey,"The beloved Crawleys and their intrepid staff prepare for the most important moment of their lives. A royal visit from the king and queen of England soon unleashes scandal, romance and intrigue -- leaving the future of Downton hanging in the balance. ",Drama
Dear Zindagi,"Kaira, a young girl, faces problems in her relationships. She meets Dr Jehangir, who helps her resolve her issues with her parents and get a new perspective on life, which leads to her following her passion and an improvement in her love life. ",Drama
Phantom Thread,"Renowned dressmaker Reynolds Woodcock and his sister Cyril are at the center of British fashion in 1950s London -- dressing royalty, movie stars, heiresses, socialites and debutantes. Women come and go in Woodcock's life, providing the confirmed bachelor with inspiration and companionship. His carefully tailored existence soon gets disrupted by Alma, a young and strong-willed woman who becomes his muse and lover. ",Drama
Moonlight,A recent college graduate clashes with an author after landing her dream job at a publishing company. ,Drama
Lady Bird,A teenager (Saoirse Ronan) navigates a loving but turbulent relationship with her strong-willed mother (Laurie Metcalf) over the course of an eventful and poignant senior year of high school. ,Comedy
A Monster Calls,"Conor (Lewis MacDougall) is dealing with far more than other boys his age. His beloved and devoted mother (Felicity Jones) is ill. He has little in common with his imperious grandmother. His father has resettled thousands of miles away. But Conor finds a most unlikely ally when the Monster (Liam Neeson) appears at his bedroom window one night. Ancient, wild, and relentless, the Monster guides Conor on a journey of courage, faith, and truth that powerfully fuses imagination and reality. ",Adventure
The Jungle Book,"In this classic Walt Disney animation based on Rudyard Kipling's book, Mowgli, an abandoned child raised by wolves, has his peaceful existence threatened by the return of the man-eating tiger Shere Khan . Facing certain death, Mowgli must overcome his reluctance to leave his wolf family and return to the ""man village."" But he is not alone on his quest: Aided by Bagheera the panther, and later by the carefree bear Balloo , he braves the jungle's many perils. ",Adventure
Ida,A woman wakes up by a river with a bag of cash and amnesia. ,Drama
Me Before You,"Young and quirky Louisa ""Lou"" Clark (Emilia Clarke) moves from one job to the next to help her family make ends meet. Her cheerful attitude is put to the test when she becomes a caregiver for Will Traynor (Sam Claflin), a wealthy young banker left paralyzed from an accident two years earlier. Will's cynical outlook starts to change when Louisa shows him that life is worth living. As their bond deepens, their lives and hearts change in ways neither one could have imagined. ",Drama
Mudbound,"Set in the rural American South during World War II, Dee Rees' Mudbound is an epic story of two families pitted against one another by a ruthless social hierarchy, yet bound together by the shared farmland of the Mississippi Delta. Mudbound follows the McAllan family, newly transplanted from the quiet civility of Memphis and unprepared for the harsh demands of farming. Despite the grandiose dreams of Henry, his wife Laura struggles to keep the faith in her husband's losing venture. Meanwhile, Hap and Florence Jackson -- sharecroppers who have worked the land for generations -- struggle bravely to build a small dream of their own despite the rigidly enforced social barriers they face. The war upends both families' plans as their returning loved ones, Jamie McAllan and Ronsel Jackson, forge a fast but uneasy friendship that challenges the brutal realities of the Jim Crow South in which they live. ",Drama
Frances Ha,Frances (Greta Gerwig) goes from apartment to apartment in Brooklyn as she looks for a job and a stable partner. ,Comedy
Inside Llewyn Davis,"In 1961 New York City, folk singer Llewyn Davis (Oscar Isaac) is at a crossroads. Guitar in hand, he struggles against seemingly insurmountable obstacles to make a name for himself in the music world, but so far, success remains elusive. Relying on the kindness of both friends and strangers, Llewyn embarks on an odyssey that takes him from the streets of Greenwich Village to a Chicago club, where awaits a music mogul who could give him the big break that he desperately needs. ",Drama
Begin Again,"After 12-year-old Jessica is taken from her abusive home, authorities place her in foster care. ",Comedy
Mud,"While exploring a Mississippi River island, Arkansas boys Ellis (Tye Sheridan) and Neckbone (Jacob Lofland) encounter Mud (Matthew McConaughey),a fugitive who needs their help. Though Mud killed a man in Texas and has bounty hunters on his trail, he is most concerned about reuniting with Juniper (Reese Witherspoon), the love of his life. Ellis, who is suffering the pangs of his first crush, agrees to help Mud. He and Neckbone do all they can to protect Mud and help him reunite with Juniper. ",Drama
What Maisie Knew,"The offspring of a hot-headed musician (Julianne Moore) and an art dealer (Steve Coogan), little Maisie (Onata Aprile) learns the hard way about how difficult divorce can be on a youngster. The quiet, obedient child gets caught in the middle as her self-absorbed parents use her as a pawn in a bitter custody battle. After her parents marry new mates, Maisie finds reason to hope for some genuine affection -- but permanent damage to her psyche may have already been done. ",Drama
The Way Way Back,"Duncan (Liam James) is an awkward teen who must spend the summer at a beach house with his mother (Toni Collette), her boyfriend, Trent (Steve Carell), and Trent's obnoxious daughter. Trent can't resist badgering Duncan, so the youth steals away to a water park and gets a job that will help him stay off Trent's radar. As Duncan tends to the slides and pools of the aging park, he finds a father figure in wisecracking park manager Owen (Sam Rockwell) at a time when he desperately needs one. ",Comedy
Another Year,"Tom (Jim Broadbent) and Gerri (Ruth Sheen) are an older couple who have been happily married for a long time, making them an anomaly among their friends and family members. Gerri's friend Mary (Lesley Manville) is a single woman whose husband left her and who disguises her loneliness. Gerri tries to fix her up with another friend, Ken (Peter Wight), but is taken aback when Mary is more interested in the couple's adult son, Joe (Oliver Maltman), a lawyer who is considerably younger than she is. ",Comedy
Up in the Air,An aspiring young comic looking for his big break on the radio attempts to solve a series of on-air murders. ,Comedy
City Island,"Prison guard Vince Rizzo (Andy Garcia) wants to quit his job to become an actor, but he also needs to make up for lost time with Tony (Steven Strait), a long lost son who's an inmate where Vince works. When Tony is freed, Vince suggests the ex-convict move in with his wife, Joyce (Julianna Margulies), and their children. But because Vince neglects to tell his family that Tony is not just a stranger, but the son he fathered before he met Joyce, this leads to a series of comic misunderstandings. ",Comedy
Biutiful,"Uxbal (Javier Bardem), a career criminal, plies his trade in Barcelona's underground sweatshops and back alleys. Unlike his associates, he has some respect for the poor workers under his thumb and is a devoted father. Told that he is ill and has just a few months to live, Uxbal tries to get his affairs in order before the spirits, with whom he communes, come to claim him. ",Drama
Minari,"A tender and sweeping story about what roots us, Minari follows a Korean-American family that moves to a tiny Arkansas farm in search of their own American Dream. The family home changes completely with the arrival of their sly, foul-mouthed, but incredibly loving grandmother. Amidst the instability and challenges of this new life in the rugged Ozarks, Minari shows the undeniable resilience of family and what really makes a home. ",Drama
Hokkabaz,An inept magician (Cem Yilmaz) goes on tour and makes a bride disappear for real. ,Comedy
The Bucket List,"Billionaire Edward Cole (Jack Nicholson) and car mechanic Carter Chambers (Morgan Freeman) are complete strangers, until fate lands them in the same hospital room. The men find they have two things in common: a need to come to terms with who they are and what they have done with their lives, and a desire to complete a list of things they want to see and do before they die. Against their doctor's advice, the men leave the hospital and set out on the adventure of a lifetime. ",Adventure
Reign Over Me,"Charlie Fineman (Adam Sandler), who lost his family in the terrorist attacks of Sept. 11, still grieves over their deaths. He runs into his former college roommate, Alan Johnson (Don Cheadle), and the two rekindle their friendship. Alan himself is feeling the strain of family and professional responsibilities, and his renewed bond with Charlie gives both men the strength to carry on during a turning point in their lives. ",Drama
The Painted Veil,"Caught in an affair with another man (Liev Schreiber), a scientist's callow wife (Naomi Watts) accompanies her husband (Edward Norton) to mainland China in the 1920s to fight a cholera epidemic. There, she embarks on a journey of self-discovery that leads to an unexpected chance at redemption. ",Drama
August Rush,"A musically gifted orphan, Evan (Freddie Highmore), runs away from his orphanage and searches New York City for his birth parents. On his journey, he's taken under the wing of the Wizard (Robin Williams), a homeless man who lives in an abandoned theater. After discovering his talent, the Wizard gives Evan the name ""August Rush"" and devises a plan to profit from his talent. Little does Evan know that his parents, Lyla (Keri Russell) and Louis (Jonathan Rhys Meyers), are searching for him too. ",Drama
Transamerica,"Right in the midst of important changes in her life, Bree Osborne (Felicity Huffman) learns that she fathered a son, Toby (Kevin Zegers), 17 years ago. Bailing him out of jail in New York, Bree poses as a Christian missionary. She plans to take Toby to his stepfather's house, but when she learns that the stepfather sexually abused the boy, Bree brings her son back to Los Angeles with her. As Toby begins to fall for Bree, she must find a way to reveal who she really is. ",Adventure
Everything Is Illuminated,"A young Jewish-American man obsessed with his family history, Jonathan Safran Foer (Elijah Wood) decides to journey to the Ukraine to find out more about the life of his grandfather. Guided by Alex (Eugene Hutz), a rap-obsessed local, Jonathan ventures into the heartland of the Ukraine seeking to shed light on events that occurred to his grandfather during World War II. Joining Jonathan and Alex is the latter's surly grandfather (Boris Leskin) and a dog named Sammy Davis Jr. Jr. ",Comedy
Garden State,"After many years away, television bit part actor Andrew Largeman (Zach Braff) returns to his small home town in New Jersey to attend his mother's funeral. There he is confronted by various aspects of the life he left behind, including his overbearing father (Ian Holm). Largeman also meets compulsive liar and amateur musician Sam (Natalie Portman), with whom he feels an immediate connection. Together with several other figures from his past, Largeman heals old wounds and forges new friendships. ",Comedy
My Life Without Me,"When hard-working mother of two Ann (Sarah Polley) discovers she has terminal ovarian cancer and the doctors give her two months to live, she decides to keep the news from her family. Passing off her increasing weakness as a mild case of anemia, Ann begins to put her priorities in order in preparation for the last few months of her life. She records birthday messages for her daughters, visits her estranged father in prison and even seeks a replacement wife for her husband, Lee (Mark Ruffalo). ",Drama
2046,"A train in a futuristic landscape takes passengers to a place where they can recapture their memories, a place from which no one has ever returned. This is the premise of a novel by the womanizing sci-fi writer Chow (Tony Leung Chiu Wai), who engages in passionate affairs with a series of intriguing women he meets at the Oriental Hotel in Hong Kong. As Chow's lovers offer him inspiration for his writing, reality blends with fiction, and the past commingles with the future. ",Drama
Welcome to the Dollhouse,"Middle-school student Dawn Weiner (Heather Matarazzo) faces degradation at school -- where she is teased constantly -- and at home. The middle child between nerdy older brother Mark (Matthew Faber) and perky younger sister Missy (Daria Kalinina), Dawn can't seem to find a place to belong. Although she has a crush on a cute boy (Eric Mabius) whom her brother knows, she can only catch the attention of bully Brandon (Brendan Sexton Jr.), who threatens her to show affection. ",Comedy
Smoke,A boy (Ron Howard) runs away from his stepfather (Earl Holliman) with a German shepherd dog after nursing it back to health. ,Comedy
Howards End,"Helen Schlegel falls for Paul Wilcox, but is rebuffed. Her sister Margaret becomes friends with his mother, who promises her the family house, Howards End. Unfortunately, after her death, the will disappears and it appears the inheritance will disappear. Until the widower, Henry Wilcox, becomes attracted to Margaret. ",Drama
Dracula,"Traveling from Transylvania to Scotland by train, the Count's two companions Lucy and Renfield start on a series of changes in order to get the Count over his many fears. ",Drama
Hoosiers,"Failed college coach Norman Dale (Gene Hackman) gets a chance at redemption when he is hired to direct the basketball program at a high school in a tiny Indiana town. After a teacher (Barbara Hershey) persuades star player Jimmy Chitwood to quit and focus on his long-neglected studies, Dale struggles to develop a winning team in the face of community criticism for his temper and his unconventional choice of assistant coach: Shooter (Dennis Hopper), a notorious alcoholic. ",Drama
Witness,A reporter and a doctor are kidnapped in the Congo and held hostage. ,Drama
Stranger Than Paradise,"New York City layabout Willie (John Lurie) and his dopey sidekick, Eddie (Richard Edson), get by on TV dinners and beer financed by haphazard card-sharking. Willie gets an unwelcome visit from his Hungarian teen cousin, Eva (Eszter Balint), but, just as he warms to her, she ditches him for her aunt in Cleveland. Impulsively, Willie and Eddie take a road trip to pick up Eva, after which they head out to find fortune and paradise in Florida -- or at least alleviation from their constant boredom. ",Comedy
Terms of Endearment,"Widow Aurora Greenway (Shirley MacLaine) and her daughter, Emma (Debra Winger), have a strong bond, but Emma marries teacher Flap Horton (Jeff Daniels) against her mother's wishes. When the marriage grows sour due to Flap's cheating, Emma eventually splits from him, returning to her mother, who is involved with a former astronaut (Jack Nicholson). Soon, Emma learns that she has terminal cancer. In the hospital, supported by Aurora, she tries to make peace with Flap and her children. ",Comedy
Tootsie,"New York actor Michael Dorsey (Dustin Hoffman) is a talented perfectionist who is so hard on himself and others that his agent (Sydney Pollack) can no longer find work for him. After a soap opera audition goes poorly, Michael reinvents himself as actress Dorothy Michaels and wins the part. What was supposed to be a short-lived role turns into a long-term contract, but when Michael falls for his castmate Julie (Jessica Lange), complications develop that could wreck everything. ",Comedy
Cross of Iron,"During World War II, Cpl. Rolf Steiner (James Coburn) is a well-respected member of the German military and a recipient of the Iron Cross, Germany's highest military honor. Envious of Steiner's award, Capt. Hauptmann Stransky (Maximilian Schell) clashes with Steiner while leading soldiers into battle along the Russian front. Desperate to receive his own Iron Cross, Stransky takes the credit for a significant attack and sparks a heated rivalry with Steiner. ",Drama
American Graffiti,"From director George Lucas (Star Wars) and producer Francis Ford Coppola (The Godfather), American Graffiti is a classic coming-of-age story set against the 1960s backdrop of hot rods, drive-ins and rock n’ roll. Starring Ron Howard, Richard Dreyfuss, Harrison Ford, Cindy Williams, Mackenzie Phillips and Suzanne Somers in their breakout roles, this nostalgic look back follows a group of teenagers as they cruise the streets on their last summer night before college. Nominated for five Academy Awards, including Best Picture and Best Director, American Graffiti features the howling sounds of Wolfman Jack and an unforgettable soundtrack with songs by Buddy Holly, Chuck Berry, The Beach Boys and Bill Haley &amp; His Comets. ",Comedy
Five Easy Pieces,"Rejecting his cultured upper-class background as a classical pianist, Robert Dupea (Jack Nicholson) opts for a blue-collar existence, working in a California oil field and spending time with his waitress girlfriend, Rayette (Karen Black). But when Robert discovers that his father is gravely ill, he wants to reunite with his estranged family in the state of Washington. He and Rayette take a road trip that brings the two paths of his life to an uncomfortable intersection. ",Drama
The Man Who Knew Too Much,"On a family vacation in Switzerland, Bob (Leslie Banks) and his wife, Jill (Edna Best), become friendly with a man staying in their hotel. When the stranger is assassinated in their presence, the vacation turns dangerous. Before dying, the stranger passes along a secret to Jill. Then, to keep the couple silent, a band of foreign assassins kidnaps their daughter. Offered no help by the police, Bob and Jill hunt for their daughter as they try to understand the information that they have. ",Drama
Dracula,"Traveling from Transylvania to Scotland by train, the Count's two companions Lucy and Renfield start on a series of changes in order to get the Count over his many fears. ",Drama
Nomadland,A woman embarks on a journey through the American West after losing everything during the recession. ,Drama
Hustle,"Pete Rose (Tom Sizemore) becomes one of baseball's greatest players, but gambling on games leads to his banishment from the sport. ",Comedy
Instant Family,"When Pete and Ellie decide to start a family, they stumble into the world of foster care adoption. They hope to take in one small child, but when they meet three siblings, including a rebellious 15-year-old girl, they find themselves speeding from zero to three kids overnight. Now, Pete and Ellie must try to learn the ropes of instant parenthood in the hope of becoming a family. ",Comedy
Mid90s,"In 1990s Los Angeles, a 13-year-old spends his summer navigating between a troubled home life and a crew of new friends he meets at a skate shop. ",Comedy
Doctor Sleep,"Struggling with alcoholism, Dan Torrance remains traumatized by the sinister events that occurred at the Overlook Hotel when he was a child. His hope for a peaceful existence soon becomes shattered when he meets Abra, a teen who shares his extrasensory gift of the ""shine."" Together, they form an unlikely alliance to battle the True Knot, a cult whose members try to feed off the shine of innocents to become immortal. ",Drama
Paterson,"Paterson (Adam Driver) is a hardworking bus driver in Paterson, N.J., who follows the same routine every day. He observes the city and listens to fragments of conversations while picking up and dropping off his passengers. Paterson also writes heartfelt poems in a notebook, walks his dog and drinks one beer in a bar after his shift is over. Waiting for him at home is Laura (Golshifteh Farahani), his beloved wife who champions his gift for writing. ",Comedy
Demain tout commence,"A man's life is turned upside down when an old flame leaves a child on his doorstep, claiming it is his. He moves to London and raises the child by himself. ",Comedy
20th Century Women,"In 1979 Santa Barbara, Calif., Dorothea Fields is a determined single mother in her mid-50s who is raising her adolescent son, Jamie, at a moment brimming with cultural change and rebellion. Dorothea enlists the help of two younger women -- Abbie, a free-spirited punk artist living as a boarder in the Fields' home and Julie, a savvy and provocative teenage neighbor -- to help with Jamie's upbringing. ",Comedy
The Nightingale,Two sisters come of age during the Nazi occupation of France in 1939. ,Adventure
Toni Erdmann,A film by Maren Ade. ,Comedy
Pek Yakinda,"Zafer (Cem Yilmaz) gives up selling pirated DVDs to keep his wife happy, and works hard to make a science fiction movie. ",Comedy
Youth,Two teens must decide whether to remain in Djibouti or go to France to study. ,Comedy
Tamasha,A man (Ranbir Kapoor) falls in love with a woman (Deepika Padukone) after spending one week with her on the French island of Corsica. ,Comedy
The Fundamentals of Caring,"A writer (Paul Rudd) retires after a personal tragedy and becomes a disabled teen's caregiver. When the two embark on an impromptu road trip, their ability to cope is tested as they start to understand the importance of hope and friendship. ",Comedy
Blue Jasmine,"After her marriage to a wealthy businessman (Alec Baldwin) collapses, New York socialite Jasmine (Cate Blanchett) flees to San Francisco and the modest apartment of her sister, Ginger (Sally Hawkins). Although she's in a fragile emotional state and lacks job skills, Jasmine still manages to voice her disapproval of Ginger's boyfriend, Chili (Bobby Cannavale). Jasmine begrudgingly takes a job in a dentist's office, while Ginger begins dating a man (Louis C.K.) who's a step up from Chili. ",Comedy
Flight,A Jamaican boy dreams of flying to the moon. ,Drama
The Edge of Seventeen,"Everyone knows that growing up is hard, and life is no easier for high school junior Nadine (Hailee Steinfeld), who is already at peak awkwardness when her all-star older brother Darian (Blake Jenner) starts dating her best friend Krista (Haley Lu Richardson). All at once, Nadine feels more alone than ever, until an unexpected friendship with a thoughtful teen (Hayden Szeto) gives her a glimmer of hope that things just might not be so terrible after all. ",Comedy
Take Shelter,"Curtis LaForche (Michael Shannon) lives in a small Ohio town with his loving wife (Jessica Chastain) and hearing-impaired daughter (Tova Stewart). Though money is tight, he and his family are very happy. But then, Curtis begins having terrifying dreams about an apocalypse that threatens them all. Rather than confiding in Samantha, he begins building a storm shelter in the backyard, and his strange behavior causes tension in their marriage and the surrounding community. ",Drama
The Way,"Sun-ae, who is known for her kindness, always welcomes her guests who visit her home. Sang-bum, who is also a visitor of Sun-ae, falls into a love due to Sun-ae's warm characteristic. Su-mi, who wants to end her life, also gets hope from her. ",Comedy
Submarine,"Oliver (Craig Roberts) is a Welsh teen who has some things on his mind. First is losing his virginity before his 16th birthday. He sets out to woo his feisty classmate Jordana (Yasmin Paige). Then Oliver focuses on holding his family together. His father (Noah Taylor), a depressed marine biologist, seems unequal to the task of preventing Oliver's mother (Sally Hawkins) from succumbing to the dubious charms of a spiritual guru (Paddy Considine) from down the road. ",Comedy
The Guernsey Literary and Potato Peel Pie Society,"In 1946 a London-based writer begins exchanging letters with residents on the island of Guernsey, which was German-occupied during WWII. Feeling compelled to visit the island, she starts to get a picture of what it was like during the occupation. ",Drama
Fish Tank,"Mia (Katie Jarvis) is a rebellious teenager on the verge of being kicked out of school. Her hard-partying mother, Joanne (Kierston Wareing), neglects Mia's welfare in favor of her own, and her younger sister (Rebecca Griffiths) hangs out with a much older crowd. Sparks fly between Mia and Connor (Michael Fassbender), Joanne's new boyfriend, and he encourages Mia to pursue her interest in dance. As the boundaries of the relationships become blurred, Mia and Joanne compete for Connor's affection. ",Drama
An Education,"Despite her sheltered upbringing, Jenny (Carey Mulligan) is a teen with a bright future; she's smart, pretty, and has aspirations of attending Oxford University. When David (Peter Sarsgaard), a charming but much older suitor, motors into her life in a shiny automobile, Jenny gets a taste of adult life that she won't soon forget. ",Drama
Blue Valentine,"Dean (Ryan Gosling) and Cindy (Michelle Williams) live a quiet life in a modest neighborhood. To the casual observer, everything appears normal, if a bit subdued. But a closer examination reveals a couple caught in a downward spiral. They appear to have the world at their feet at the outset of the relationship. However, his lack of ambition and her retreat into self-absorption cause potentially irreversible cracks in their marriage. ",Drama
Revolutionary Road,"Frank (Leonardo DiCaprio) and April Wheeler (Kate Winslet) always see themselves as far-removed from the conventionality of suburbia. Yet that is exactly what creeps up on them when they buy a house in Connecticut. He toils 10 hours a day in a job he hates, while she, as a 1950s homemaker, yearns for fulfillment and passion. Rebelling against the torpor of their lives, the couple plan an escape that may push them to their limits. ",Drama
Precious,"Pregnant by her own father for the second time, 16-year-old Claireece ""Precious"" Jones (Gabourey Sidibe) can neither read nor write and suffers constant abuse at the hands of her vicious mother (Mo'Nique). Precious instinctively sees a chance to turn her life around when she is offered the opportunity to transfer to an alternative school. Under the patient, firm guidance of her new teacher, Ms. Rain (Paula Patton), Precious begins the journey from oppression to self-determination. ",Drama
Sweeney Todd: The Demon Barber of Fleet Street,"Barber Sweeney Todd returns to London to uncover the past, along the way meeting pie shop owner Mrs. Nellie Lovett, and begins to start his life of crime. ",Drama
Memoirs of a Geisha,"In the 1920s, 9-year-old Chiyo (Suzuka Ohgo) gets sold to a geisha house. There, she is forced into servitude, receiving nothing in return until the house's ruling hierarchy determines if she is of high enough quality to service the clientele -- men who visit and pay for conversation, dance and song. After rigorous years of training, Chiyo becomes Sayuri (Ziyi Zhang), a geisha of incredible beauty and influence. Life is good for Sayuri, but World War II is about to disrupt the peace. ",Drama
Eight Below,"The frozen wasteland of Antarctica serves as the background for a tale about the bonds of friendship and loyalty. Three members of a scientific expedition, Jerry Shepard (Paul Walker), his friend Cooper (Jason Biggs) and an American geologist (Bruce Greenwood), must leave their beloved sled dogs behind after a devastating accident and increasingly perilous weather conditions. Alone, the dogs struggle to survive the harsh Antarctic winter. ",Adventure
North Country,"Single mother Josey Aimes (Charlize Theron) is part of a group of the first women to work at a local iron mine in Minnesota. Offended that they have to work with women, male workers at Eveleth Mines lash out at them and subject them to sexual harassment. Appalled by the constant stream of insults, sexually explicit language and physical abuse, Josey -- despite being cautioned against it by family and friends -- files a historic sexual harassment lawsuit. ",Drama
The Secret Life of Walter Mitty,"Walter Mitty (Ben Stiller), an employee at Life magazine, spends day after monotonous day developing photos for the publication. To escape the tedium, Walter inhabits a world of exciting daydreams in which he is the undeniable hero. Walter fancies a fellow employee named Cheryl (Kristen Wiig) and would love to date her, but he feels unworthy. However, he gets a chance to have a real adventure when Life's new owners send him on a mission to obtain the perfect photo for the final print issue. ",Adventure
Far from Heaven,"The story - which crosses both sexual and racial lines - revolves around a privileged suburban family whose lives are filled with daily family etiquette, social events at the club, and an overall desire to keep up with the Joneses. The family is turned upside down when both husband and wife are faced with choices that not only create a gossip mill for the entire community but also change their entire lives forever. ",Drama
A Walk to Remember,"Set in North Carolina, ""A Walk To Remember"" follows the rite of passage of a jaded, aimless high school senior (Shane West) who falls in love with a guileless young woman (Mandy Moore) he and his friends once scorned. The two develop a powerful and inspirational relationship in which they discover truths that take most people a lifetime to learn. ",Drama
Monsoon Wedding,"The exuberant ensemble comedy unites a Punjabi family for the wedding of a family member. Relatives from all over the world descend on Delhi for the wedding ceremony. Universal in theme, the film explores the bonds that unite families in touching, dramatic, and comedic ways. ",Comedy
Chocolat,"When mysterious Vianne and her child arrive in a tranquil French town in the winter of 1959, no one could have imagined the impact that she and her spirited daughter would have on the community stubbornly rooted in tradition. Within days, she opens an unusual chocolate shop, across the square from the church. Her ability to perceive her customers' desires and satisfy them with just the right confection, coaxes the villagers to abandon themselves to temptation -- just as Lent begins. ",Drama
Finding Forrester,"A unique relationship develops between an eccentric, reclusive novelist and a young, amazingly gifted scholar-athlete. After the novelist discovers that the young athlete is also an excellent writer and secretly takes him on as his protégé, they develop an unlikely friendship. As they learn more about each other, they learn more about themselves, and ultimately, with the help of his new mentor, the basketball star must choose the right path. ",Drama
Ghost World,"The story of neo-cool Enid (Thora Birch) and Rebecca (Scarlett Johansson) who, faced with graduation from high school, take a hard look at the world they wryly observe and decide what they really want. When Enid takes an interest in the offbeat Seymour (Steve Buscemi) and Rebecca focuses her attention on their mutual romantic fixation Josh (Brad Renfro), the girls' friendship is forever changed. ",Comedy
10 Things I Hate About You,"Kat Stratford (Julia Stiles) is beautiful, smart and quite abrasive to most of her fellow teens, meaning that she doesn't attract many boys. Unfortunately for her younger sister, Bianca (Larisa Oleynik), house rules say that she can't date until Kat has a boyfriend, so strings are pulled to set the dour damsel up for a romance. Soon Kat crosses paths with handsome new arrival Patrick Verona (Heath Ledger). Will Kat let her guard down enough to fall for the effortlessly charming Patrick? ",Comedy
Dogma,Two fallen angels who were ejected from paradise find themselves banned in Wisconsin. They are now headed for New Jersey where they find a loophole that can get them back into heaven. The only catch is that it will destroy humanity. A group bands together to stop them. ,Adventure
Jerry Maguire,"When slick sports agent Jerry Maguire (Tom Cruise) has a crisis of conscience, he pens a heartfelt company-wide memo that promptly gets him fired. Desperate to hang on to the athletes that he represents, Jerry starts his own management firm, with only single mother Dorothy Boyd (Renee Zellweger) joining him in his new venture. Banking on their sole client, football player Rod Tidwell (Cuba Gooding Jr.), Jerry and Dorothy begin to fall in love as they struggle to make their business work. ",Comedy
Murder in the First,"Henry, a small-time criminal sent to Alcatraz, is caught attempting to escape and as punishment, he's put in solitary confinement. Instead of staying the maximum nineteen days, he is kept alone, in the cold and complete darkness for years, only to emerge a madman and a murderer. It's a rookie lawyer who proves Alcatraz is to blame, and that Henry should not be executed. ",Drama
Little Women,A musical adaptation of the Louisa May Alcott novel about the growth to womanhood of the four March sisters in 1860s New England. ,Drama
The Secret Garden,"Adaptation of Frances Hodgson Burnett's classic fairy tale, ""The Secret Garden."" Mary Lennox (Kate Maberly) is an orphan sent to live with her uncle at his mansion that is full of secrets. She discovers a crippled cousin she never knew she had and a neglected garden she is determined to bring back to life. ",Drama
A League of Their Own,"As America's stock of athletic young men is depleted during World War II, a professional all-female baseball league springs up in the Midwest, funded by publicity-hungry candy maker Walter Harvey (Garry Marshall). Competitive sisters Dottie Hinson (Geena Davis) and Kit Keller (Lori Petty) spar with each other, scout Ernie Capadino (Jon Lovitz) and grumpy has-been coach Jimmy Dugan (Tom Hanks) on their way to fame. Madonna and Rosie O'Donnell co-star as two of the sisters' teammates. ",Comedy
Steel Magnolias,"M'Lynn (Sally Field) is the mother of bride-to-be Shelby Eatenton (Julia Roberts), and as friend Truvy Jones (Dolly Parton) fixes the women's hair for the ceremony, they welcome a helping hand from aspiring beautician Annelle Dupuy Desoto (Daryl Hannah). Diabetic Shelby has a health scare, which is averted but doesn't bode well for her hopes of having children. Time passes, and the women and their friends encounter tragedy and good fortune, growing stronger and closer in the process. ",Comedy
Driving Miss Daisy,"Daisy Werthan (Jessica Tandy), an elderly Jewish widow living in Atlanta, is determined to maintain her independence. However, when she crashes her car, her son, Boolie (Dan Aykroyd), arranges for her to have a chauffeur, an African-American driver named Hoke Colburn (Morgan Freeman). Daisy and Hoke's relationship gets off to a rocky start, but they gradually form a close friendship over the years, one that transcends racial prejudices and social conventions. ",Comedy
The Unbearable Lightness of Being,"Successful surgeon Tomas (Daniel Day-Lewis) leaves Prague for an operation, meets a young photographer named Tereza (Juliette Binoche), and brings her back with him. Tereza is surprised to learn that Tomas is already having an affair with the bohemian Sabina (Lena Olin), but when the Soviet invasion occurs, all three flee to Switzerland. Sabina begins an affair, Tom continues womanizing, and Tereza, disgusted, returns to Czechoslovakia. Realizing his mistake, Tomas decides to chase after her. ",Drama
Big,"After a wish turns 12-year-old Josh Baskin (David Moscow) into a 30-year-old man (Tom Hanks), he heads to New York City and gets a low-level job at MacMillen Toy Company. A chance encounter with the owner (Robert Loggia) of the company leads to a promotion testing new toys. Soon a fellow employee, Susan Lawrence (Elizabeth Perkins), takes a romantic interest in Josh. However, the pressure of living as an adult begins to overwhelm him, and he longs to return to his simple, former life as a boy. ",Comedy
The NeverEnding Story,"On his way to school, Bastian (Barret Oliver) ducks into a bookstore to avoid bullies. Sneaking away with a book called ""The Neverending Story,"" Bastian begins reading it in the school attic. The novel is about Fantasia, a fantasy land threatened by ""The Nothing,"" a darkness that destroys everything it touches. The kingdom needs the help of a human child to survive. When Bastian reads a description of himself in the book, he begins to wonder if Fantasia is real and needs him to survive. ",Adventure
Possession,"Maud Bailey (Gwyneth Paltrow), a brilliant English academic, is researching the life and work of poet Christabel La Motte. Roland Michell (Aaron Eckhart) is an American scholar in London to study Randolph Henry Ash (Jeremy Northam), now best-known for a collection of poems dedicated to his wife. When Maud and Roland discover a cache of love letters that appear to be from Ash to La Motte, they follow a trail of clues across England, echoing the journey of the couple over a century earlier. ",Drama
Excalibur,"The magical sword of Excalibur starts off in the hands of British lord Uther Pendragon (Gabriel Byrne) and then, years later, finds its way to his bastard son, Arthur (Nigel Terry), the knave destined to become king. Aided by the sorcerer Merlin (Nicol Williamson), Arthur fulfills his fate by bringing together the Knights of the Round Table at Camelot and unifying the country. However, this flawed monarch faces greater tests ahead in pursuit of love, the Holy Grail and his nation's survival. ",Adventure
Rocky II,"Although working-class Philadelphia boxer Rocky Balboa (Sylvester Stallone) lost his high-profile bout with the cocky world champion Apollo Creed (Carl Weathers), his Cinderella story has caught the national sports media's attention, and he now has the opportunity to capitalize on his sudden fame. Meanwhile, Creed is still smarting from nearly losing to some palooka no one has ever heard of, and arrogantly prods his newfound nemesis into getting back into the ring. ",Drama
Slap Shot,"In the small New England town of Charlestown, the local mill is about to lay off 10,000 workers. The town's minor league hockey team, the Charlestown Chiefs, is doing no better. After years of failure, this will be the team's last season. Exasperated player and coach Reggie Dunlop (Paul Newman) lets the club's recent acquisitions, the Hanson Brothers, play. The brothers' actively violent and thuggish style of play excites the fans. Dunlop retools the team, using violence to draw big crowds. ",Comedy
Easy Rider,"Wyatt (Peter Fonda) and Billy (Dennis Hopper), two Harley-riding hippies, complete a drug deal in Southern California and decide to travel cross-country in search of spiritual truth. On their journey, they experience bigotry and hatred from the inhabitants of small-town America and also meet with other travelers seeking alternative lifestyles. After a terrifying drug experience in New Orleans, the two travelers wonder if they will ever find a way to live peacefully in America. ",Adventure
The French Dispatch,THE FRENCH DISPATCH brings to life a collection of stories from the final issue of an American magazine published in a fictional 20th-century French city. ,Comedy
A Quiet Place Part II,"Following the deadly events at home, the Abbott family must now face the terrors of the outside world as they continue their fight for survival in silence. Forced to venture into the unknown, they quickly realize that the creatures that hunt by sound are not the only threats that lurk beyond the sand path. ",Drama
Honey Boy,"When 12-year-old Otis begins to find success as a television star, his abusive, alcoholic father returns and takes over as his guardian, and their contentious relationship is followed over a decade. ",Drama
Palmer,"Former high school football star Eddie Palmer (Justin Timberlake) went from hometown hero to convicted felon, earning himself 12 years in a state penitentiary. He returns home to Louisiana, where he moves back in with Vivian (June Squibb), the grandmother who raised him. While trying to keep his head down and rebuild a quiet life for himself, Palmer is haunted by memories of his glory days and the suspicious eyes of his small town community. Things become more complicated when Vivian’s hard-living neighbor Shelly (Juno Temple) disappears on a prolonged bender, leaving her precocious and unique 7-year-old son Sam (Ryder Allen), often the target of bullying, in Palmer’s reluctant care. In time, Palmer is drawn into a more hopeful world as he forges a connection with Sam through their shared experience of being made to feel different by those around them. Life improves for Palmer, and a romance develops between him and Sam’s teacher Maggie (Alisha Wainwright). An inspiring and unexpected journey unfolds for the three of them, but soon Palmer’s past threatens to tear apart this new life. ",Drama
Five Feet Apart,"Seventeen-year-old Stella spends most of her time in the hospital as a cystic fibrosis patient. Her life is full of routines, boundaries and self-control -- all of which get put to the test when she meets Will, an impossibly charming teen who has the same illness. There's an instant flirtation, though restrictions dictate that they must maintain a safe distance between them. As their connection intensifies, so does the temptation to throw the rules out the window and embrace that attraction. ",Drama
Jolly LLB 2,An ambitious lawyer (Akshay Kumar) finds himself in a battle with a ruthless advocate after making an innocent mistake. ,Comedy
The Square,"Ray (David Roberts), a construction worker trapped in an unhappy marriage, pursues an affair with his neighbor, Carla (Claire van der Boom). Carla's husband, Greg (Anthony Hayes), is a mobster who keeps large sums of drug money in their home. With this in mind, Carla comes up with a plan: She and Ray will steal Greg's money, burn down her house, convince Greg the money was lost in the fire and then run away together. Carla's scheme, however, doesn't go off as planned. ",Comedy
Christopher Robin,"Christopher Robin -- now a family man living in London -- receives a surprise visit from his old childhood pal, Winnie-the-Pooh. With Christopher's help, Pooh embarks on a journey to find his friends -- Tigger, Eeyore, Owl, Piglet, Rabbit, Kanga and Roo. Once reunited, the lovable bear and the gang travel to the big city to help Christopher rediscover the joy of life. ",Adventure
T2 Trainspotting,"First there was an opportunity, then there was a betrayal. Twenty years later, Mark Renton (Ewan McGregor) returns to the only place that he can ever call home. There waiting for him are old buddies Spud (Ewen Bremner), Sick Boy (Jonny Lee Miller) and Begbie (Robert Carlyle). Sorrow, loss, joy, vengeance, hatred, love, fear, regret, self-destruction and mortal danger are also all lined up and ready to welcome him. ",Drama
Fences,"From beginning to end, life is filled with partitions that people deal with in their own ways. ",Drama
The Light Between Oceans,"Tom is a World War I veteran who maintains a lighthouse off the shore of Australia with his wife Isabel, a woman desperate to have a baby. Her prayers are answered when an infant washes up on shore in a rowboat. Tom thinks they should notify the authorities but ultimately gives in to Isabel's wish to keep the girl. Fate strikes again when the couple meet the child's biological mother on the mainland. Now, Tom and Isabel must make a decision that will forever affect the lives of four people. ",Drama
Carol,"Aspiring photographer Therese spots the beautiful, elegant Carol perusing the doll displays in a 1950s Manhattan department store. The two women develop a fast bond that becomes a love with complicated consequences. ",Drama
Stuck in Love,"A successful writer (Greg Kinnear) tries to reconnect with his two children (Lily Collins, Nat Wolff) after his divorce. ",Comedy
Yeh Jawaani Hai Deewani,Bunny (Ranbir Kapoor) and Naina (Deepika Padukone) meet when they graduate from college and again in their late 20s. ,Drama
Beasts of the Southern Wild,"Six-year-old Hushpuppy (Quvenzhané Wallis) lives with her father, Wink (Dwight Henry), in a remote Delta community. Wink is a stern taskmaster, but he is preparing his young daughter for the end of the world. When Wink falls mysteriously ill, nature seems to fall ill with him. Temperatures rise, the ice caps melt and fearsome prehistoric beasts called aurochs run loose. Rising waters threaten to engulf their community, sending Hushpuppy in search of her long-lost mother. ",Adventure
Ruby Sparks,"Young author Calvin Weir-Fields (Paul Dano), once a literary darling, is having trouble composing his next novel. Following a therapist's advice, Calvin pulls out an old manual typewriter and creates a vivacious, flame-haired woman he dubs Ruby Sparks (Zoe Kazan). Overnight, Ruby leaps from the page into Calvin's home as a real flesh-and-blood woman. And, what's more, she's unaware that she's actually a fictional character and that her actions and feelings are dictated by whatever Calvin writes. ",Comedy
Shame,"Former musicians Jan Rosenberg (Max von Sydow) and his wife, Eva (Liv Ullmann), have left the city to avoid a civil war and now live on a rural island where they tend a farm. While the situation seems idyllic, the couple's isolation begins to wear on their relationship, and eventually the armed conflict that they've tried to flee arrives on the quiet island in the form of soldiers. Try as they might, Jan and Eva ultimately can't evade either the war or their own marital problems. ",Drama
Only Lovers Left Alive,"Artistic, sophisticated and centuries old, two vampire lovers (Tilda Swinton, Tom Hiddleston) ponder their ultimate place in modern society. ",Comedy
The Age of Adaline,"Adaline Bowman (Blake Lively) has miraculously remained a youthful 29 years of age for nearly eight decades, never allowing herself to get close to anyone lest they discover her secret. However, a chance encounter with a charismatic philanthropist named Ellis Jones (Michiel Huisman) reawakens Adaline's long-suppressed passion for life and romance. When a weekend with Ellis' parents threatens to expose the truth, Adaline makes a decision that changes her life forever. ",Drama
Beginners,"After his mother dies, Oliver (Ewan McGregor) is stunned when his father, Hal (Christopher Plummer), recently diagnosed with terminal cancer, comes out of the closet. When Hal passes away a few years later, Oliver grows depressed, struggling with his failing career as an artist while constantly remembering his childhood and time spent with his dad. Oliver's loneliness is eased when he meets actress Anna (Mélanie Laurent), but their relationship is threatened by their mutual fear of commitment. ",Comedy
The Best Exotic Marigold Hotel,"Some British retirees (Judi Dench, Maggie Smith, Bill Nighy) decide to outsource their retirement to exotic -- and less expensive -- India. Lured by advertisements for the newly restored Marigold Hotel and imagining a life of leisure in lush surroundings, they arrive and find that the Marigold is actually a shell of its former self. Though their new home is not quite what they had imagined, the retirees find that life and love can begin again when they let go of their pasts. ",Comedy
The Great Gatsby,"Although she is married to another man, Gatsby, a millionaire, woos his dream girl. ",Drama
August: Osage County,"The death and funeral of their father brings three sisters to the home of their mother, Violet (Meryl Streep), an acid-tongued, pill-popping cancer patient. Daughters Barbara (Julia Roberts), Karen (Juliette Lewis) and Ivy (Julianne Nicholson) -- along with their significant others and various other kin -- take the full brunt of their dysfunctional matriarch's venom, for Violet tells every one of them exactly what she thinks of them. Based on the play by Tracy Letts. ",Comedy
Crazy Heart,"With too many years of hazy days and boozy nights,former country-music legend Bad Blake (Jeff Bridges) is reduced to playing dives and bowling alleys. In town for his latest gig, Blake meets Jean Craddock (Maggie Gyllenhaal), a sympathetic reporter who has come to do a story on him. He unexpectedly warms to her and a romance begins, then the singer finds himself at a crossroads that may threaten his last shot at happiness. ",Drama
Enter the Void,"This psychedelic tour of life after death is seen entirely from the point of view of Oscar (Nathaniel Brown), a young American drug dealer and addict living in Tokyo with his prostitute sister, Linda (Paz de la Huerta). When Oscar is killed by police during a bust gone bad, his spirit journeys from the past -- where he sees his parents before their deaths -- to the present -- where he witnesses his own autopsy -- and then to the future, where he looks out for his sister from beyond the grave. ",Drama
Adam,"Reve Walsh (JoBeth Williams) takes her six-year-old son Adam (John Boston) to the mall and briefly leaves him in the toy department -- but he's gone when she returns. Reve and her husband, John (Daniel J. Travanti), search tirelessly for Adam, but to no avail. Frustrated by the underwhelming support the FBI offers in a case like theirs, the Walshes create their own organization to help find Adam, and then set out to create new regulations to reunite missing children with their parents. ",Comedy
Rab Ne Bana Di Jodi,"A dying woman (Olympia Dukakis) seeks a wife for her footloose son (John Stamos), a divorce lawyer determined not to wed. ",Comedy
Licorice Pizza,"LICORICE PIZZA is the story of Alana Kane and Gary Valentine growing up, running around and falling in love in the San Fernando Valley, 1973. Written and directed by Paul Thomas Anderson, the film tracks the treacherous navigation of first love. ",Comedy
The Road,"Even though he's a successful filmmaker and a faithful husband, Amir Kobessov (Jamshed Usmonov) feels like he's starting to lose everything. He's unsure if audiences still want to see his work, and his once strong marriage is starting to split apart at the seams. When he hears his mother is seriously ill, Amir, who is plagued with recurring nightmares and fantastic visions, packs up his car and sets out on a journey to make amends with his past and prepare for the future. ",Drama
Wristcutters: A Love Story,"Despondent after breaking up with his girlfriend, Zia (Patrick Fugit) kills himself and wakes up in a bland purgatory populated by other suicides. He takes a job at Kamikaze Pizza and befriends a Russian rocker named Eugene (Shea Whigham) while trying to make the best of a very dull afterlife. Learning that his ex-girlfriend has also killed herself, Zia embarks on a road trip with Eugene to find her, picking up a feisty hitchhiker (Shannyn Sossamon) along the way. ",Comedy
Peaceful Warrior,"Dan Millman (Scott Mechlowicz) is a gifted athlete whose desire for success drives everything he does. When a mysterious stranger (Nick Nolte) opens Dan's eyes to a new vision of strength and understanding, the Olympic hopeful finds that he still has much to learn and more sacrifices to make. ",Drama
Candy,"A fatherly chemistry professor (Geoffrey Rush) indulges two young lovers (Heath Ledger, Abbie Cornish) in their ever-increasing heroin habits. Eventually the pair, an artist named Candy and an aspiring poet named Dan, become caught in a harrowing downward spiral of drug dependency and failed efforts to get clean. ",Drama
Me and You and Everyone We Know,"Single dad Richard (John Hawkes) meets Christine (Miranda July), a starving artist who moonlights as a cabbie. They awkwardly attempt to start a romance, but Richard's divorce has left him emotionally damaged, and he struggles to remain open to the possibilities of this new relationship. Meanwhile, Richard's sons, the adolescent Peter (Miles Thompson) and 6-year-old Robby (Brandon Ratcliff), take part in their own clumsy experiments with the opposite sex. ",Comedy
Bridge to Terabithia,"The life of Jesse (Josh Hutcherson), an adolescent, changes when he befriends Leslie (AnnaSophia Robb), the class outsider. The children create an imaginary world called Terabithia, which is inhabited by all manner of magical creatures. Though difficulties fill their ordinary lives, Jesse and Leslie rule as king and queen in Terabithia. Soon one of the friends must draw on the strength of their imaginary kingdom to cope with a tragedy. ",Drama
Speak,"Freshman high-school student Melinda (Kristen Stewart) has refused to speak ever since she called the cops on a popular summer party. With her old friends snubbing her for being a rat, and her parents (Elizabeth Perkins, D.B. Sweeney) too busy to notice her troubles, she folds into herself, trying to hide her secret: that star senior Andy (Eric Lively) raped her at the party. But Melinda does manage to find solace in her art class headed by Mr. Freeman (Steve Zahn). ",Drama
Closer,"Alice (Natalie Portman), an American stripper who has moved to London, meets Dan (Jude Law) on the street. While looking at him, a taxi hits her. After taking her to the hospital, Dan begins dating Alice. A year later, Dan -- who has written a novel about Alice -- is bored. He flirts with photographer Anna (Julia Roberts). Pretending to be her in a chat room, he leads dermatologist Larry (Clive Owen) to an accidental meeting with Anna. As the years pass, both relationships disintegrate. ",Drama
The Woodsman,"After 12 years in prison, Walter (Kevin Bacon) returns home. Few people know he's a sex offender and pedophile. Walter finds an apartment where he's regularly visited by his parole officer (Mos Def). He gets a job at a lumber mill and starts seeing a coworker (Kyra Sedgwick). Then his new world begins to unravel. As his past becomes known, he begins a high-risk friendship with a young girl and realizes that a man loitering near a schoolyard is a child molester prowling for his next victim. ",Drama
8 Mile,"The people of Detroit know 8 Mile as the city limit, a border, a boundary. It is also a psychological dividing line that separates Jimmy Smith Jr. (Eminem) from where and who he wants to be. A provocative fictional examination of a critical week in Jimmy's life. ",Drama
About Schmidt,"Warren Schmidt (Jack Nicholson) has arrived at several of life's crossroads all at the same time. To begin with, he is retiring from a lifetime of service as an actuary for Woodmen of the World Insurance Company, and he feels utterly adrift. Furthermore, his only daughter Jeannie (Hope Davis) is about to marry a boob. And his wife Helen (June Squibb) dies suddenly after 42 years of marriage. ",Drama
Pay It Forward,"The story of a social studies teacher who gives an assignment to his junior high school class to think of an idea to change the world for the better, then put it into action. When one young student creates a plan for ""paying forward"" favors, he not only affects the life of his struggling single mother, but he sets in motion an unprecedented wave of human kindness which, unbeknownst to him, has blossomed into a profound national phenomenon. ",Drama
Wonder Boys,"Grady (Michael Douglas) is a 50-ish English professor who hasn't had a thing published in years -- not since he wrote his award winning ""Great American Novel"" 7 years ago. This weekend proves even worse than he could imagine as he finds himself reeling from one misadventure to another in the company of a new wonder boy author. ",Comedy
Sweet and Lowdown,"Emmet Ray (Sean Penn) isn't an easy guy to be around -- among other things, he's inconsiderate and egomaniacal. He also happens to be a jazz guitarist with undeniable talent, and despite his many faults, he ends up winning the heart of Hattie (Samantha Morton), a kind young mute woman. Hattie's seemingly endless patience with Emmet is tested, however, with his incessant irresponsibility and infidelity, leading their relationship to the breaking point. ",Comedy
Notting Hill,"William Thacker (Hugh Grant) is a London bookstore owner whose humdrum existence is thrown into romantic turmoil when famous American actress Anna Scott (Julia Roberts) appears in his shop. A chance encounter over spilled orange juice leads to a kiss that blossoms into a full-blown affair. As the average bloke and glamorous movie star draw closer and closer together, they struggle to reconcile their radically different lifestyles in the name of love. ",Comedy
Meet Joe Black,"Bill Parrish (Anthony Hopkins), businessman and devoted family man, is about to celebrate his 65th birthday. However, before he reaches that landmark, he is visited by Death (Brad Pitt), who has taken human form as Joe Black, a young man who recently died. Joe and Bill make a deal: Bill will be given a few extra days of his life, and Joe will spend the same time getting to know what it's like to be human. It seems like a perfect arrangement, until Joe falls in love -- with Bill's daughter. ",Drama
Chasing Amy,"Holden and Banky are best friends and authors of a popular comic book. Holden falls in love with Alyssa, who happens to be a lesbian. Holden's relationship with Alyssa strains his life-long friendship with Banky, and soon the relationship between Holden and Alyssa has problems when he cannot deal with her past. ",Comedy
Swingers,"A transplanted New Yorker attempting to acclimate to Los Angeles, Mike Peters (Jon Favreau), is struggling to both boost his comedy career and get over his last relationship. A self-proclaimed master of seduction, Mike's buddy, Trent Walker (Vince Vaughn), tries to show him how to make connections and get the attention of women. Slowly moving toward regaining his confidence, Mike meets the gorgeous and down-to-earth Lorraine (Heather Graham), sparking a welcome new romance. ",Comedy
Friday,"It's Friday and Craig Jones (Ice Cube) has just gotten fired for stealing cardboard boxes. To make matters worse, rent is due, he hates his overbearing girlfriend, Joi (Paula Jai Parker), and his best friend, Smokey (Chris Tucker), owes the local drug dealer money -- and that's all before lunch. As the hours drag on, Jones and Smokey experience the gamut of urban life, complete with crackheads, shoot-outs and overly sexual pastors, concentrated into one single, unbelievable Friday. ",Comedy
The Hudsucker Proxy,"Greedy executive Sidney J. Mussburger (Paul Newman) hopes to take control of the company he works for by purchasing a majority share -- but he must first devalue the stock. So he convinces the board to appoint know-nothing recent graduate Norville Barnes (Tim Robbins). But Mussburger's plot backfires when Barnes' latest invention succeeds, thereby increasing the company's value. Worse yet, undercover reporter Amy Archer (Jennifer Jason Leigh) has the scoop on Mussburger's shady dealings. ",Comedy
Arizona Dream,"Axel (Johnny Depp) gets caught up into the family car business when his cousin, Paul (Vincent Gallo), coaxes him to come to Arizona to attend the wedding of their Uncle Leo (Jerry Lewis). As Axel makes the decision to try selling Cadillacs with his family, he meets an eccentric woman named Elaine (Faye Dunaway) and her equally quirky stepdaughter, Grace (Lili Taylor). Their lives become inextricably intertwined through romance, dreams -- and death. ",Comedy
The Age of Innocence,Love with a future divorcee (Irene Dunne) means ruin for an ambitious young lawyer (John Boles) engaged to a dull socialite. ,Drama
Bitter Moon,An alcoholic writer (Peter Coyote) in a wheelchair recalls his sexy wife (Emmanuelle Seigner) for an English aristocrat (Hugh Grant) on an ocean liner. ,Drama
Pump Up the Volume,"In Arizona, an introverted and insightful teenager, Mark Hunter (Christian Slater), finds an outlet for his viewpoints through a shortwave radio. Broadcasting as ""Hard Harry,"" Hunter uses his pirate radio show to rant against the injustices and hypocrisies taking place in the area, and in society in general. Hunter conceals his off-air identity, but a determined student (Samantha Mathis) discovers the truth, while Principal Creswood (Annie Ross) seeks to shut down Hunter once and for all. ",Comedy
Dead Ringers,"Elliot (Jeremy Irons), a successful gynecologist, works at the same practice as his identical twin, Beverly (also Irons). Elliot is attracted to many of his patients and has affairs with them. When he inevitably loses interest, he will give the woman over to Beverly, the meeker of the two, without the woman knowing the difference. Beverly falls hard for one of the patients, Claire (Geneviève Bujold), but when she inadvertently deceives him, he slips into a state of madness. ",Drama
Broadcast News,"Intelligent satire of American television news. A highly strung news producer finds herself strangely attracted to a vapid anchorman even through she loathes everything he personifies. To make matters worse, her best friend, a talented but not particularly telegenic news reporter, is secretly in love with her. ",Comedy
A Room with a View,"Merchant-Ivory's adaptation of E M Forster's novel. Helena Bonham Carter and Maggie Smith star as Lucy Honeychurch and her companion Charlotte Bartlett who, while on holiday in Florence, meet the uncouth Mr Emerson and his son George. After an unpleasant incident, the two women return to Surrey but when the Emersons turn up as tenants of a nearby house, all sorts of romantic complications ensue. ",Drama
Somewhere in Time,"In 1972, playwright Richard Collier (Christopher Reeve) becomes fascinated by a photo of Elise McKenna (Jane Seymour), a turn-of-the-century stage actress, while staying at the Grand Hotel in Mackinac Island, Michigan. As Richard's obsession grows, he learns from a friend that time travel may actually be possible through hypnosis. Richard travels in time to meet Elise, and the two appear destined to be together. However, Elise's jealous manager (Christopher Plummer) attempts to keep them apart. ",Drama
Fahrenheit 451,"In a future society where books are banned and burned, a fireman begins to read in secret and discovers an underground rebellion committed to protecting literature. ",Drama
Dracula,"Traveling from Transylvania to Scotland by train, the Count's two companions Lucy and Renfield start on a series of changes in order to get the Count over his many fears. ",Drama
An American in Paris,"Jerry Mulligan (Gene Kelly) is an American ex-GI who stays in post-war Paris to become a painter, and falls for the gamine charms of Lise Bouvier (Leslie Caron). However, his paintings come to the attention of Milo Roberts, a rich American heiress, who is interested in more than just art. ",Drama
The King of Staten Island,"An aimless slacker dreams of becoming a tattoo artist while living with his mother and hanging out with his friends in Staten Island, N.Y. ",Comedy
If Beale Street Could Talk,"In early 1970s Harlem, daughter and wife-to-be Tish vividly recalls the passion, respect and trust that have connected her and her artist fiancé Alonzo Hunt, who goes by the nickname Fonny. Friends since childhood, the devoted couple dream of a future together, but their plans are derailed when Fonny is arrested for a crime he did not commit. ",Drama
Creed II,"In 1985, Russian boxer Ivan Drago killed former U.S. champion Apollo Creed in a tragic match that stunned the world. Against the wishes of trainer Rocky Balboa, Apollo's son Adonis Johnson accepts a challenge from Drago's son -- another dangerous fighter. Under guidance from Rocky, Adonis trains for the showdown of his life -- a date with destiny that soon becomes his obsession. Now, Johnson and Balboa must confront their shared legacy as the past comes back to haunt each man. ",Drama
Leave No Trace,"A father and daughter live a perfect but mysterious existence in Forest Park, a beautiful nature reserve near Portland, Ore., rarely making contact with the world. But when a small mistake tips them off to authorities, they are sent on an increasingly erratic journey in search of a place to call their own. ",Adventure
45 Years,"As their 45th wedding anniversary approaches, a woman (Charlotte Rampling) learns that her husband (Tom Courtenay) was once engaged to someone else. ",Drama
The Lobster,"In a dystopian society, single people must find a mate within 45 days or be transformed into an animal of their choice. ",Drama
Locke,A man's (Tom Hardy) life unravels after he leaves a construction site at a critical time and drives to London to be present for the birth of a child conceived during a one-night stand. ,Drama
The Intern,"Starting a new job can be a difficult challenge, especially if you're already retired. Looking to get back into the game, 70-year-old widower Ben Whittaker (Robert De Niro) seizes the opportunity to become a senior intern at an online fashion site. Ben soon becomes popular with his younger co-workers, including Jules Ostin (Anne Hathaway), the boss and founder of the company. Whittaker's charm, wisdom and sense of humor help him develop a special bond and growing friendship with Jules. ",Comedy
The Kings of Summer,"Three teenagers (Nick Robinson, Gabriel Basso, Moises Arias) carry out a plan to leave their dysfunctional parents, build a house in the woods and live off the land. ",Adventure
The Spectacular Now,"An innocent, bookish teenager (Shailene Woodley) begins dating the charming, freewheeling high-school senior (Miles Teller) who awoke on her lawn after a night of heavy partying. ",Drama
Carnage,"When some roughhousing between two 11-year-old boys named Zachary and Ethan erupts into real violence, Ethan loses two teeth. Zachary's parents, Alan and Nancy Cowen (Kate Winslet, Christoph Waltz), meet with Ethan's parents, Penelope and Michael Longstreet (Jodie Foster, John C. Reilly), to try to smooth things over. However, what starts as a polite meeting among adults descends into finger-pointing, tantrums and insults. Based on the play ""God of Carnage"" by Yasmina Reza. ",Comedy
Margin Call,"When an analyst uncovers information that could ruin them all, the key players (Kevin Spacey, Paul Bettany) at an investment firm take extreme measures to control the damage. ",Drama
Les amours imaginaires,"Francis (Xavier Dolan) is a young gay man, Marie (Monia Chokri) is a young straight woman and the two of them are best friends -- until the day the gorgeous Nicolas (Niels Schneider) walks into a Montreal coffee shop. The two friends, instantly and equally infatuated, compete for Nicolas' indeterminate affections, a conflict that climaxes when the trio visit the vacation home of Nicolas' mother. The frothy comedy unfolds through narrative, fantasy sequences and confessional monologues. ",Drama
The Master,"Gang Sin-cheol and his daughter Gang Yu-jin are taekwondo masters. Together, they share their love and passion for the sport, as well as the challenges they face. ",Drama
Melancholia,A writer loses his entire family. ,Drama
Les petits mouchoirs,"After a traumatic event, friends go on a beach vacation where their relationships are sorely tested as they are forced to admit the little lies they have been telling one another. ",Comedy
Remember Me,"A wealthy, married Briton (Robert Lindsay) and his girlfriend pay an unexpected visit to his former girlfriend (Imelda Staunton) and her suburban family. ",Drama
We Bought a Zoo,"Following his wife's untimely death, Los Angeles journalist Benjamin Mee (Matt Damon) decides to make a fresh start by quitting his job and moving his children (Colin Ford, Maggie Elizabeth Jones) to an 18-acre property containing the Rosemoor Wildlife Park. Though closed for years, Rosemoor is still home to many animals, cared for by Kelly Foster (Scarlett Johansson) and her small staff. Mee opens his heart and his checkbook as he, Kelly and the others work to renovate and reopen the zoo. ",Comedy
Never Let Me Go,"A U.S. reporter (Clark Gable) smuggles his ballerina wife (Gene Tierney) out of Russia, with an Englishman in the same boat. ",Drama
Runway 34,"Runway 34 tells the turbulent tale of Captain Vikrant Khanna (Ajay Devgn), a pilot prodigy whose flight takes a stirring and mysterious trajectory after take-off from an international destination. Consequently, it follows the tenacious Narayan Vedant (Amitabh Bachchan) in his pursuit to uncover the truth. ",Drama
The Ides of March,"As Ohio's Democratic primary nears, charming Gov. Mike Morris (George Clooney) seems a shoo-in for the nomination over his opponent, Sen. Pullman (Michael Mantell). Morris' idealistic press secretary, Stephen Meyers (Ryan Gosling), believes in his candidate's integrity and the democratic process. But Meyers' meeting with Pullman's campaign manager (Paul Giamatti) and a dalliance with a young intern (Evan Rachel Wood) set in motion events that threaten Morris' election chances. ",Drama
De slag om de Schelde,"November 1944. On the flooded island of Walcheren in Zeeland, thousands of allies fight the German army. Touching three young lives inextricably connected. A Dutch boy fighting for the Germans, an English glider pilot and a Zeeland girl who reluctantly joined the resistance become involved, and are faced with crucial choices that are not only about their own freedom, but also about the freedom of others. ",Drama
Forgetting Sarah Marshall,"Struggling musician Peter Bretter (Jason Segel) is better-known as the boyfriend of TV star Sarah Marshall (Kristen Bell). After she unceremoniously dumps him, he feels lost and alone but makes a last-ditch bid to get over it by going to Hawaii. However, she and her new boyfriend (Russell Brand) are there in the same hotel. ",Comedy
The Messenger,"After being injured in Iraq, soldier Will Montgomery (Ben Foster) returns home to finish the rest of his tour of duty in the Army's Casualty Notification service. Teamed with veteran officer Tony Stone (Woody Harrelson), Will tries to come to terms with his own pain while dealing with the cold realities of his new mission. Will finds himself in the grip of an ethical problem when he becomes involved with Olivia (Samantha Morton), the widow of a fallen soldier. ",Drama
The Savages,A group of girls is united by a common goal to get justice for crimes committed by a corrupt family. ,Comedy
Brothers,Young Britons consume alcohol and chase women while on vacation. ,Drama
Bakjwi,"Sang-hyun (Song Kang-ho), a respected priest, volunteers for an experimental procedure that may lead to a cure for a deadly virus. He gets infected and dies, but a blood transfusion of unknown origin brings him back to life as a vampire. Now, Sang-hyun is torn between faith and bloodlust, and has a newfound desire for Tae-ju (Kim Ok-bin), the wife of his childhood friend. ",Drama
Vicky Cristina Barcelona,"Americans Vicky (Rebecca Hall) and Cristina (Scarlett Johansson) arrive in Spain for a summer vacation at a friend's (Patricia Clarkson) Barcelona home. Visiting an art gallery, they meet seductive painter Juan Antonio (Javier Bardem), who invites them for a weekend of food, art and sex. Sparks really ignite when his fiery former lover (Penélope Cruz) arrives on the scene, making for a very crowded house. ",Comedy
Things We Lost in the Fire,"After her husband dies in an act of senseless violence, Audrey Burke (Halle Berry) is left alone with two young children and no idea how to cope. Nearly paralyzed by grief, Audrey tracks down her husband's childhood friend, Jerry (Benicio del Toro). Jerry is a drug addict, but Audrey invites him to move into her home nevertheless, and a mutually dependent relationship develops between the two damaged souls. ",Drama
Gwoemul,"Careless American military personnel dump chemicals into South Korea's Han River. Several years later, a creature emerges from the tainted waters and sinks its ravenous jaws into local residents. When the creature abducts their daughter (Go Ah-sung), a vendor (Song Kang-ho) and his family decide that they are the only ones who can save her. ",Drama
Half Nelson,"Dan Dunne (Ryan Gosling) is a history teacher at a Brooklyn school. Though well-liked by his students and colleagues, he secretly spends his evenings hopping bars and getting high. A female student named Drey (Shareeka Epps) catches him in a drug-induced haze after a basketball game, and the two strike up an unlikely friendship. As Dan struggles with his addiction, he tries to act as a mentor to the girl, whose brother is serving time for dealing drugs. ",Drama
Cashback,"Would-be artist Ben (Sean Biggerstaff) realizes he has an extraordinary way of dealing with the tedium of his dead-end job stocking shelves at a store - he has acquired the ability to halt time and explore the world while the rest of the earth's population remains frozen in place. Ben's unusual talent helps him forget about a nasty breakup with his ex-girlfriend Suzy (Michelle Ryan), but he begins to stop time so often that he may miss out on a new romance with his coworker Sharon (Emilia Fox). ",Comedy
White Oleander,"""White Oleander"" chronicles the life of Astrid (Alison Lohman), a young teenager who journeys through a series of foster homes after her mother (Michelle Pfeiffer) goes to prison for committing a crime of passion. Set adrift in the world, Astrid struggles to become her own person while coming to terms with the challenges of living life on her own. ",Drama
About a Boy,"A comedy-drama starring Hugh Grant as Will, a rich, child-free and irresponsible Londoner in his thirties who, in search of available women, invents an imaginary son and starts attending single parent meetings. As a result of one of his liaisons, he meets Marcus, an odd 12-year-old boy with problems at school. Gradually, Will and Marcus become friends, and as Will teaches Marcus how to be a cool kid, Marcus helps Will to finally grow up. ",Comedy
The Believer,"A little knowledge is a dangerous thing -- an adage proven with shocking ramifications in Henry Bean's ""The Believer."" The film's stringent, intellectual approach to the topics of anti-Semitism and neo-fascism will move and astound viewers, a testament to this first-time director's important undertaking. ",Drama
Wag the Dog,"Two weeks prior to reelection, the United States president lands in the middle of a sex scandal. In need of outside help to quell the situation, presidential adviser Winifred Ames (Anne Heche) enlists the expertise of spin doctor Conrad Brean (Robert De Niro), who decides a distraction is the best course of action. Brean approaches Hollywood producer Stanley Motss (Dustin Hoffman) to help him fabricate a war in Albania -- and once underway, the duo has the media entirely focused on the war. ",Comedy
Beautiful Girls,"An all-star cast sparks this captivating comedy about a group of old friends whose 10-year high school reunion creates some hilariously unexpected surprises. Willie (Timothy Hutton), Tommy (Matt Dillon), and Paul may have lost a bit of their youth, but they're still ready to party with Uma Thurman, Rosie O'Donnell, Lauren Holly, and Mira Sorvino -- the beautiful girls who've turned their lives upside down! ",Comedy
Four Weddings and a Funeral,"Lovable Englishman Charles (Hugh Grant) and his group of friends seem to be unlucky in love. When Charles meets a beautiful American named Carrie (Andie MacDowell) at a wedding, he thinks his luck may have changed. But, after one magical night, Carrie returns to the States, ending what might have been. As Charles and Carrie's paths continue to cross -- over a handful of nuptials and one funeral -- he comes to believe they are meant to be together, even if their timing always seems to be off. ",Comedy
Moonstruck,"No sooner does Italian-American widow Loretta (Cher) accept a marriage proposal from her doltish boyfriend, Johnny (Danny Aiello), than she finds herself falling for his younger brother, Ronny (Nicolas Cage). She tries to resist, but Ronny lost his hand in an accident he blames on his brother, and has no scruples about aggressively pursuing her while Johnny is out of the country. As Loretta falls deeper in love, she comes to learn that she's not the only one in her family with a secret romance. ",Comedy
The World According to Garp,"A nurse during World War II, Jenny Fields (Glenn Close) conceives with a dying pilot and bears a boy named T.S. Garp (Robin Williams) whom she raises alone. When Garp grows up, he has some success writing fiction, but not nearly so much as his mother has with feminist-themed nonfiction. Rich and famous, she starts a center for troubled women, and while Garp marries and has children, he remains a constant, if somewhat critical, observer of the strange community that forms around Jenny. ",Comedy
Fast Times at Ridgemont High,"Stacy Hamilton (Jennifer Jason Leigh) is a pretty, but inexperienced, teen interested in dating. Given advice by her uninhibited friend, Linda Barrett (Phoebe Cates), Stacy gets trapped in a love triangle with nice guy Mark Ratner (Brian Backer) and his more assured buddy Mike Damone (Robert Romanus). Meanwhile, Stacy's classmate Jeff Spicoli (Sean Penn), who lives for surfing and being stoned, faces off against Mr. Hand (Ray Walston), a strict teacher who has no time for the slacker's antics. ",Comedy
Grave,"The quest for buried treasure leads two escaped convicts (Craig Sheffer, Josh Charles) to old friends, an ex-flame (Gabrielle Anwar) and one's shooting. ",Drama
Er ist wieder da,"When Adolf Hitler reawakens at the site of his former bunker 70 years later, he's mistaken for a brilliant comedian and becomes a media phenomenon. ",Comedy
American Honey,"Star (Sasha Lane), an adolescent girl from a troubled home, runs away with a traveling sales crew that drives across the American Midwest selling subscriptions door-to-door. Finding her feet in this gang of teenagers, one of whom is Jake (Shia LaBeouf), she soon gets into the group's lifestyle of hard-partying nights, law-bending days and young love. ",Adventure
The Little Death,"Murder is part of a young woman's (Pamela Gidley) plot to control her rich husband's (J.T. Walsh) estate, but love with her stepson (Brent Fraser) isn't. ",Comedy
The One I Love,"A couple (Mark Duplass, Elisabeth Moss) whose marriage is crumbling have a surreal experience during a weekend getaway at a house recommended by their therapist (Ted Danson). ",Comedy
Enough Said,"Eva (Julia Louis-Dreyfus), a divorced single parent, seems generally happy but dreads her daughter's departure for college. Unexpectedly, Eva begins a romance with Albert (James Gandolfini), a nice man with whom she has much in common. Meanwhile, Eva finds a new friend in Marianne (Catherine Keener), a poet who is just about perfect except for one thing: She constantly denigrates her ex-husband -- Albert. The more Eva hears, the more she doubts her relationship with him. ",Comedy
Aashiqui 2,"Rahul, a singing sensation, falls in love with Aarohi, a girl who sings in the bar. He helps her accomplish her dream of becoming a famous singer, but his own shortcomings jeopardize their future. ",Drama
Holy Motors,"Driven around Paris by a loyal driver (Édith Scob), a mysterious man (Denis Lavant) dresses up in costumes and plays a number of strange, semiscripted roles. ",Drama
The Upside,"Phillip is a wealthy quadriplegic who needs a caretaker to help him with his day-to-day routine in his New York penthouse. He decides to hire Dell, a struggling parolee who's trying to reconnect with his ex and his young son. Despite coming from two different worlds, an unlikely friendship starts to blossom as Dell and Phillip rediscover the joy of living life to the fullest. ",Comedy
Now Is Good,Tessa (Dakota Fanning) makes a list of things she wants to do before she passes away from leukemia. Topping the list is her desire to lose her virginity. ,Drama
One Day,"Singing lives with her mother on the Taiwanese island of Kinmen. In a constantly recurring dream she meets a man. She can neither recognize him, nor does she understand the words he shouts at her. Singing works on a ferry where she meets a soldier who claims that he will be her boyfriend one day. ",Drama
Perfect Sense,A chef (Ewan McGregor) and a scientist (Eva Green) fall in love amid a plague that robs people of their senses. ,Drama
Passengers,A couple's marriage deteriorates over a single night. ,Drama
Easy A,"Prompted by her popular best friend to spill details of her boring weekend, Olive (Emma Stone), a clean-cut teen, decides to spice things up by telling a little lie about losing her virginity. When the high-school busybody (Amanda Bynes) overhears the conversation and spreads it all over campus, Olive is suddenly notorious but for the wrong reasons. ",Comedy
Away We Go,"As they await the birth of their baby, a couple (John Krasinski, Maya Rudolph) travel across America in search of the perfect place to raise their family. During their journey, they share assorted misadventures and reconnect with old friends and relatives. The experiences and people they encounter help them define the word home on their own terms, possibly for the first time in their lives. ",Adventure
Demolition,A former international courier is called back to active duty to deliver an unusual package to Australia. ,Comedy
Pieces of a Woman,"Martha (Vanessa Kirby) and Sean (Shia LaBeouf) are a Boston couple on the verge of parenthood whose lives change irrevocably when a home birth ends in unimaginable tragedy. Thus begins a yearlong odyssey for Martha, who must navigate her grief while working through fractious relationships with Sean and her domineering mother (Ellen Burstyn), along with the publicly vilified midwife (Molly Parker), whom she must face in court. ",Drama
Two Lovers,"Following a broken engagement, sometime photographer Leonard Kraditor (Joaquin Phoenix) moves in with his parents in Brighton Beach. He soon becomes involved with Sandra (Vinessa Shaw), an honest and sensible young woman. They appear to be a perfect match, then Michelle (Gwyneth Paltrow) enters the picture. Beautiful but manipulative, she wraps him around her finger, even though she has a rich, married boyfriend. ",Drama
Thappad,A woman reevaluates her marriage after her husband slaps her in the face in front of a group of people at a party. ,Drama
A Serious Man,"Larry Gopnik (Michael Stuhlbarg) is a physics professor at a 1960s university, but his life is coming apart at the seams. His wife (Sari Lennick) is leaving him, his jobless brother (Richard Kind) has moved in, and someone is trying to sabotage his chances for tenure. Larry seeks advice from three different rabbis, but whether anyone can help him overcome his many afflictions remains to be seen. ",Drama
Rabbit Hole,"Eight months after the accidental death of their 4-year-old son, Howie (Aaron Eckhart) and Becca (Nicole Kidman) are trying to overcome their grief. He wants to hold on to everything that reminds him of Danny, while she would rather sell their home and make a fresh start. Cracks begin to appear in the relationship as Howie bonds with a member of his therapy group and Becca reaches out to a teenage boy with telling facial scars. Based on the play by David Lindsay-Abaire. ",Drama
The Kids Are All Right,"Lesbian couple Jules (Julianne Moore) and Nic (Annette Bening) have been together for almost 20 years and have two teenage offspring named Joni and Laser, who were conceived via artificial insemination. Unbeknown to their mothers, Joni and Laser seek out their biological father, a restaurateur named Paul (Mark Ruffalo). Complications arise when the teens bond with Paul and invite him into their lives. ",Comedy
We Are Marshall,"In 1970, Marshall University and the small town of Huntington, W.Va., reel when a plane crash claims the lives of 75 of the school's football players, staff members and boosters. New coach Jack Lengyel (Matthew McConaughey) arrives on the scene in March 1971, determined to rebuild Marshall's Thundering Herd and heal a grieving community in the process. ",Drama
Waitress,"Jenna (Keri Russell) works in a diner in a small Southern town and is a genius at creating luscious desserts, but her marriage to an overbearing lout (Jeremy Sisto) makes happiness impossible. When she discovers she is pregnant, she makes plans to skip town before her condition is obvious. However, she begins an affair with the new town doctor (Nathan Fillion), who is the only one who knows her secret. ",Comedy
Hard Candy,"Hayley is a precocious teenager who goes to a coffee shop to meet Jeff, the photographer she met on the internet. Jeff thinks he is in for a real treat, but Hayley plays a trick on him. After drugging Jeff and tying him down, Hayley reveals that she knows Jeff preys on teenage girls, and she has a plan to wring a confession from him. ",Drama
The Merchant of Venice,"Recorded live at the Center for Jewish History in New York on the sold-out opening night of June 14, 2015. ",Drama
Coffee and Cigarettes,"This 11-vignette film focuses on the human interactions that happen while partaking in the everyday indulgence of coffee and cigarettes. Featuring well-known actors and other artists as themselves or some version thereof, the film highlights the nuances and subtle hostilities that can be a part of seemingly normal conversations. Bill Murray waits on the Wu-Tang Clan, Iggy Pop and Tom Waits get on each others' nerves and Jack and Meg White of the White Stripes discuss Nikola Tesla. ",Comedy
If Only,Andrea is about to marry a man she does not love when a mysterious guest arrives and reminds her of the man she truly loves. ,Comedy
Mohabbatein,"Six sprightly, vivacious young students come to study in his Gurukul. They do the forbidden. They fall in love. The patriarch is outraged. The lovers feel helpless. Gradually they start accepting that their relationship was probably doomed from the start. Right then steps in their savior in the form of a music teacher. ",Musical
Tigerland,"1971. A nation stands divided over the escalating war in Vietnam. Thousands of young Americans lie dead on foreign soil. And at Fort Polk, Louisiana, thousands more prepare to join them. The specter of combat hangs over the men of A-Company, Second Platoon, as they enter the final stage of infantry training. They will be sent to the war. But each man deals with this prospect in his own way. One man's defiance, however, galvanizes every member of the platoon. ",Drama
Ever After,"This updated adaptation of the classic fairytale tells the story of Danielle (Drew Barrymore), a vibrant young woman who is forced into servitude after the death of her father. Danielle's stepmother Rodmilla (Anjelica Huston) is a heartless woman who forces Danielle to do the cooking and cleaning, while she tries to marry off her own two daughters. But Danielle's life takes a wonderful turn when she meets the charming Prince Henry (Dougray Scott). ",Comedy
Kids,"Amoral teen Telly (Leo Fitzpatrick) has made it his goal to sleep with as many virgin girls as possible -- but he doesn't tell them that he's HIV positive. While on the hunt for his latest conquest, Telly and his best friend, Casper (Justin Pierce), smoke pot and steal from shops around New York. Meanwhile, Jenny (Chloë Sevigny), one of Telly's early victims, makes it her mission to save other girls from him. But before she has a chance to confront him at a party, everything goes horribly wrong. ",Drama
Grumpy Old Men,"John Gustafson (Jack Lemmon) and Max Goldman (Walter Matthau) are two curmudgeonly neighbors who have been at each other's throats for years. The rivalry of the former friends intensifies when Ariel (Ann-Margret) comes along and provides a love interest for both of them. When Max finds out that John is experiencing family troubles and financial ruin, however, he steps in to help. Their bond is further cemented when John has a health scare and Max makes the ultimate sacrifice for his friend. ",Comedy
My Own Private Idaho,"In this loose adaptation of Shakespeare's ""Henry IV,"" Mike Waters (River Phoenix) is a gay hustler afflicted with narcolepsy. Scott Favor (Keanu Reeves) is the rebellious son of a mayor. Together, the two travel from Portland, Oregon to Idaho and finally to the coast of Italy in a quest to find Mike's estranged mother. Along the way they turn tricks for money and drugs, eventually attracting the attention of a wealthy benefactor and sexual deviant. ",Drama
Parenthood,"Perfectionist Gil Buckman (Steve Martin) struggles with the deficiencies of his children, thinking they reflect poorly on his parenting -- and Gil's siblings only add to the stress of his life. One of his sisters (Dianne Wiest) faces difficulty when her teenage daughter (Martha Plimpton) becomes pregnant. Another (Harley Jane Kozak) clashes with her husband (Rick Moranis) when she asks for more children. Gil's immature brother (Tom Hulce) turns up as well, with a young son he can barely handle. ",Comedy
Some Kind of Wonderful,"Keith Nelson (Eric Stoltz), an artsy high school outcast, tries to land a date with popular girl Amanda Jones (Lea Thompson) with some help from his tomboy best friend, Watts (Mary Stuart Masterson). However, his advances draw the ire of Amanda's snobby ex-boyfriend, Hardy Jenns (Craig Sheffer), who makes plans to get even. Matters are further complicated when Watts realizes she likes Keith as more than just a friend and tries to convince him to stop pursuing Amanda. ",Drama
Dirty Dancing,"Baby (Jennifer Grey) is one listless summer away from the Peace Corps. Hoping to enjoy her youth while it lasts, she's disappointed when her summer plans deposit her at a sleepy resort in the Catskills with her parents. Her luck turns around, however, when the resort's dance instructor, Johnny (Patrick Swayze), enlists Baby as his new partner, and the two fall in love. Baby's father forbids her from seeing Johnny, but she's determined to help him perform the last big dance of the summer. ",Drama
The Way We Were,"Opposites attract when, during their college days, Katie Morosky (Barbra Streisand), a politically active Jew, meets Hubbell Gardiner (Robert Redford), a feckless WASP. Years later, in the wake of World War II, they meet again and, despite their obvious differences, marry. Hubbell wants to be a screenwriter, so the two move to California despite Katie's objections. They prosper there, but as the Hollywood blacklist looms, Katie's activism threatens her husband's reputation. ",Drama
The Half of It,"A shy, introverted student helps the school jock woo a girl whom, secretly, they both want. ",Comedy
Climax,"When members of a dance troupe are lured to an empty school, drug-laced sangria causes their jubilant rehearsal to descend into a dark and explosive nightmare as they try to survive the night -- and find out who's responsible -- before it's too late. ",Drama
Blinded by the Light,"Javed is a Pakistani teenager who experiences racial and economic turmoil while living in Luton, England, in 1987. He writes poetry as a way to escape the intolerance of his hometown and the stubborn views of his traditional father. When a classmate introduces him to the music of Bruce Springsteeen, Javed sees parallels between the singer's powerful lyrics and his own working-class environment. Springsteen's melodies soon inspire Javed to find his own voice and follow his dreams. ",Comedy
Last Flag Flying,"Thirty years after serving together in the Vietnam War, Larry ""Doc"" Shepherd, Sal Nealon and the Rev. Richard Mueller reunite for a different type of mission: to bury Doc's son, a young Marine killed in Iraq. Forgoing burial at Arlington National Cemetery, Doc and his old buddies take the casket on a bittersweet trip up the coast to New Hampshire. Along the way, the three men find themselves reminiscing and coming to terms with the shared memories of a war that continues to shape their lives. ",Comedy
Sorry to Bother You,"In an alternate reality of present-day Oakland, Calif., telemarketer Cassius Green finds himself in a macabre universe after he discovers a magical key that leads to material glory. As Green's career begins to take off, his friends and co-workers organize a protest against corporate oppression. Cassius soon falls under the spell of Steve Lift, a cocaine-snorting CEO who offers him a salary beyond his wildest dreams. ",Comedy
Swiss Army Man,"Being stranded on a deserted island leaves young Hank (Paul Dano) bored, lonely and without hope. As a rope hangs around his neck, Hank prepares to end it all, until he suddenly spots a man (Daniel Radcliffe) laying by the shore. Unfortunately, he is dead and quite flatulent. Using the gassy body to his advantage, Hank miraculously makes it back to the mainland. However, he now finds himself lost in the wilderness, and dragging the talking corpse named Manny along for the adventure. ",Comedy
Finch,"In ""Finch,"" a man, a robot and a dog form an unlikely family in a powerful and moving adventure of one man's quest to ensure that his beloved canine companion will be cared for after he's gone. Tom Hanks stars as Finch, a robotics engineer and one of the few survivors of a cataclysmic solar event that has left the world a wasteland. But Finch, who has been living in an underground bunker for a decade, has built a world of his own that he shares with his dog, Goodyear. He creates a robot, played by Caleb Landry Jones, to watch over Goodyear when he no longer can. As the trio embarks on a perilous journey into a desolate American West, Finch strives to show his creation, who names himself Jeff, the joy and wonder of what it means to be alive. Their road trip is paved with both challenges and humor, as it's as difficult for Finch to goad Jeff and Goodyear to get along as it is for him to manage the dangers of the new world. ",Adventure
Crazy Rich Asians,"Rachel Chu is happy to accompany her longtime boyfriend, Nick, to his best friend's wedding in Singapore. She's also surprised to learn that Nick's family is extremely wealthy and he's considered one of the country's most eligible bachelors. Thrust into the spotlight, Rachel must now contend with jealous socialites, quirky relatives and something far, far worse -- Nick's disapproving mother. ",Comedy
2 States,"Krish and Ananya come from two very different cultural backgrounds, and decide that they won't get married until they convince their parents. As feared, differences between the families pose a hurdle. ",Comedy
A Girl Walks Home Alone at Night,Residents of a worn-down Iranian city encounter a skateboarding vampire (Sheila Vand) who preys on men who disrespect women. ,Drama
Safety Not Guaranteed,"A disaffected magazine intern (Aubrey Plaza) befriends an unusual guy (Mark Duplass), who is looking for a partner to accompany him on a trip back through time. ",Adventure
Trolljegeren,"While investigating reports of illegal poaching, three student filmmakers encounter a man (Otto Jespersen) who slays trolls for the Norwegian government. ",Drama
Cinderella,"With a wicked stepmother (Eleanor Audley) and two jealous stepsisters (Rhoda Williams, Lucille Bliss) who keep her enslaved and in rags, Cinderella (Ilene Woods) stands no chance of attending the royal ball. When her fairy godmother (Verna Felton) appears and magically transforms her reality into a dream come true, Cinderella enchants the handsome Prince Charming at the ball, but must face the wrath of her enraged stepmother and sisters when the spell wears off at midnight. ",Adventure
Hector and the Search for Happiness,"Disillusioned with the tedium of his existence, psychiatrist Hector (Simon Pegg) confesses to his girlfriend (Rosamund Pike) that he feels he is a fraud for dispensing recommendations to patients who never seem to improve or get any happier. He considers breaking out of his lackluster routine. Summoning up some courage, Hector gives his starved curiosity free rein and embarks on an international quest to find the right formula to bring him joy and vitality. ",Adventure
Frank,"In a moment of desperation, Ruby Chase makes a vow of servitude to a monster, Frank. She breaks her vow by committing suicide, setting Frank on a course of bloody revenge against the people she loved the most. ",Comedy
Another Earth,"Following her release from prison, a morose young woman (Brit Marling) seeks out the man (William Mapother) whose life she shattered in a car accident several years earlier. ",Drama
Hesher,An anarchist (Joseph Gordon-Levitt) shakes things up after moving -- uninvited -- into the garage of a troubled youth (Devin Brochu) and the kid's father (Rainn Wilson). ,Drama
Whip It,"Bliss Cavendar lives in small-town Texas and yearns to break free of her mother's world of beauty pageants and conformity. She sees her chance when she meets the Hurl Scouts, a roller-derby team; she tries out for the team and wins a slot, lying to her parents about her new hobby. Bliss finds friendship and freedom with her teammates, but a conflict between a championship game and the Bluebonnet beauty pageant threatens to spill her secret. ",Drama
The Wackness,"An 18-year-old pot dealer falls for the stepdaughter of his eccentric, weed-smoking shrink. ",Comedy
Water for Elephants,"Jacob Jankowski (Robert Pattinson), a veterinary student, is close to graduating when a terrible tragedy forces him to leave school. With nowhere else to go, he hops on a passing train and finds it belongs to a traveling circus. Jacob takes a job as an animal caretaker and meets Marlena (Reese Witherspoon), a beautiful circus performer. Their shared compassion for a special elephant named Rosie leads to love, but August (Christoph Waltz), Marlena's cruel husband, stands in their way. ",Drama
Black Snake Moan,"After her lover (Justin Timberlake) leaves to serve in the military, Rae (Christina Ricci) gives in to her raging libido and leaps into a life of wild abandon. Lazarus (Samuel L. Jackson), a troubled bluesman, finds Rae beaten and left for dead. He takes her in and holds her captive in an attempt to help her find a cure for her affliction. ",Drama
The Devil Wears Prada,"Andy (Anne Hathaway) is a recent college graduate with big dreams. Upon landing a job at prestigious Runway magazine, she finds herself the assistant to diabolical editor Miranda Priestly (Meryl Streep). Andy questions her ability to survive her grim tour as Miranda's whipping girl without getting scorched. ",Comedy
Charlie Bartlett,"Awkward teenager Charlie Bartlett (Anton Yelchin) has trouble fitting in at a new high school. Charlie needs some friends fast, and decides that the best way to find them is to appoint himself the resident psychiatrist. He becomes one of the most popular guys in school by doling out advice and, occasionally, medication, to the student body. ",Comedy
Syriana,"The Middle Eastern oil industry is the backdrop of this tense drama, which weaves together numerous story lines. Bennett Holiday (Jeffrey Wright) is an American lawyer in charge of facilitating a dubious merger of oil companies, while Bryan Woodman (Matt Damon), a Switzerland-based energy analyst, experiences both personal tragedy and opportunity during a visit with Arabian royalty. Meanwhile, veteran CIA agent Bob Barnes (George Clooney) uncovers an assassination plot with unsettling origins. ",Drama
Calendar Girls,"After the death of her best friend's husband from cancer, spirited Yorkshire housewife Chris Harper (Helen Mirren) hatches a scheme to raise money for a memorial to him. Utilizing a tradition from the hidebound Woman's Institute association, Chris encourages Annie (Julie Walters) and their friends to create a calendar -- with the novel detail of using the middle-aged women of their village as nude models. The idea stuns the husbands and a wary young photographer (Philip Glenister). ",Comedy
Igby Goes Down,"Igby Slocumb (Kieran Culkin), a rebellious and sarcastic 17-year-old boy, is at war with the stifling world of old money privilege he was born into. With a schizophrenic father (Bill Pullman), a self-absorbed, distant mother (Susan Sarandon), and a shark-like young Republican big brother (Ryan Phillippe), Igby figures there must be a better life out there -- and sets about finding it. ",Comedy
Secretary,"Lee Holloway (Maggie Gyllenhaal), a young woman with a history of severe emotional problems, is released into the care of her overbearing parents following a stay at a mental institution. She finds work as a secretary for a rigid and demanding attorney, E. Edward Grey (James Spader), and starts dating the kind but dull Peter (Jeremy Davies). However, Lee soon realizes she's turned on by Grey's stern demeanor, and begins a sadomasochistic relationship with him. ",Comedy
The Majestic,"Rising Hollywood screenwriter Peter Appleton (Jim Carrey) is blacklisted in the early 1950s Red Scare. Following a drunken car accident, he wakes with amnesia near the small town of Lawson, Calif., where the residents mistake him for Luke Trimble, a local boy declared missing in action during World War II. As Peter helps Luke's father (Martin Landau) and high school sweetheart (Laurie Holden) reopen the town's sole movie theater, questions arise about his true identity and motivations. ",Drama
The Rookie,"A true story about a coach who discovers that it's never too late for dreams to come true. Jim Morris (Dennis Quaid) never made it out of the minor leagues before a shoulder injury ended his pitching career twelve years ago. Now a married-with-children high-school chemistry teacher and baseball coach in Texas, Jim's team makes a deal with him: if they win the district championship, Jim will try out with a major-league organization. ",Drama
Shadow of the Vampire,"F. W. Murnau (John Malkovich) is struggling to create his silent classic ""Nosferatu"" on location in Eastern Europe. The director is obsessed with making this the most authentic vampire movie ever. To that end, Murnau has employed a real vampire, Max Schreck (Willem Dafoe), explaining to the crew that he is the ultimate of that new breed, the ""method actor"" -- trained by Stanislavsky himself. Schreck will appear only in character and only at night. ",Drama
Bicentennial Man,"Richard Martin (Sam Neill) buys a gift, a new NDR-114 robot. The product is named Andrew (Robin Williams) by the youngest of the family's children. ""Bicentennial Man"" follows the life and times of Andrew, a robot purchased as a household appliance programmed to perform menial tasks. As Andrew begins to experience emotions and creative thought, the Martin family soon discovers they don't have an ordinary robot. ",Drama
Any Given Sunday,"Four years ago, DAmato's (Al Pacino) Miami Sharks were at the top. Now, his team is struggling with three consecutive losses, sliding attendance, and aging heroes, particularly 39-year-old quarterback Jack ""Cap"" Rooney (Dennis Quaid). Off the field, DAmato is struggling with a failed marriage and estranged children, and is on a collision course with Christina Pagniacci (Cameron Diaz), the young president/co-owner of the Sharks organization. ",Drama
He Got Game,"Jake Shuttleworth (Denzel Washington) has spent the last six years in prison after accidentally killing his wife during a violent domestic dispute, leaving his son, star basketball prospect Jesus Shuttleworth (Ray Allen), to fend for himself. One day, the prison warden (Ned Beatty) approaches Jake with an unusual offer: He'll be given a week of parole to convince Jesus to attend the governor's alma mater, with the promise of a shortened sentence if he succeeds. ",Drama
What Dreams May Come,"After Chris Nielsen (Robin Williams) dies in a car accident, he is guided through the afterlife by his spirit guide, Albert (Cuba Gooding Jr.). His new world is beautiful and can be whatever Chris imagines. Even his children are there. But, when his wife, Annie (Annabella Sciorra), commits suicide and is sent to hell, Chris ignores Albert's warnings and journeys there to save her. Upon arrival, Chris finds that rescuing Annie will be more difficult than he'd imagined. ",Drama
Velvet Goldmine,"Glam rock star Brian Slade (Jonathan Rhys Myers) plays a character on stage named Maxwell Demon who predicts his death on stage. Shortly after he announces his prediction, he fakes his own death and is exposed as a fraud. A decade later in 1984, a reporter and former fan, Arthur Stuart (Christian Bale), tracks down the former rocker to do an article on his life and downfall. Arthur interviews the man who discovered Slade and a peer (Ewan McGregor) to understand Slade's motivations. ",Drama
Fly Away Home,"After Amy (Anna Paquin) loses her mother in a car accident, she must uproot her life and move to Canada to live with her father, Thomas, (Jeff Daniels), an oddball inventor with whom she has no relationship. She initially struggles to find her her place in her new home, but things change when she stumbles upon a collection of abandoned goose eggs. When the eggs hatch, Amy and her dad work together teaching the motherless birds to fly south for the winter, and their relationship blooms. ",Adventure
Homeward Bound: The Incredible Journey,"Before the Seavers leave for a family vacation to San Francisco, they drop off their pets -- Chance (Michael J. Fox), an adventurous American bulldog; Shadow (Don Ameche), a wise golden retriever; and Sassy (Sally Field), a cautious cat -- at a friend's ranch. But when the animals start to worry that they've been left for good, the three embark together on a treacherous and thrilling journey to find their way back home through the California wilderness. ",Adventure
Naked Lunch,"Blank-faced bug killer Bill Lee (Peter Weller) and his dead-eyed wife, Joan (Judy Davis), like to get high on Bill's pest poisons while lounging with Beat poet pals. After meeting the devilish Dr. Benway (Roy Scheider), Bill gets a drug made from a centipede. Upon indulging, he accidentally kills Joan, takes orders from his typewriter-turned-cockroach, ends up in a constantly mutating Mediterranean city and learns that his hip friends have published his work -- which he doesn't remember writing. ",Drama
Scrooged,"In this modern take on Charles Dickens' ""A Christmas Carol,"" Frank Cross (Bill Murray) is a wildly successful television executive whose cold ambition and curmudgeonly nature has driven away the love of his life, Claire Phillips (Karen Allen). But after firing a staff member, Eliot Loudermilk (Bobcat Goldthwait), on Christmas Eve, Frank is visited by a series of ghosts who give him a chance to re-evaluate his actions and right the wrongs of his past. ",Comedy
Beaches,"Hillary (Barbara Hershey) and CC (Bette Midler) meet as children vacationing in Atlantic City, N.J., and remain friends throughout the decades. As CC, a loud New Yorker, pursues a singing career, Hillary, a staid Californian, becomes a successful lawyer. Over the years, they often quarrel or compete, but, as other relationships flourish and die, the two women are always there for each other, traveling from coast to coast through the most tumultuous times. ",Comedy
Fatal Attraction,"A therapist (Sally Kellerman) and a psychology professor (Stephen Lack) collide, go to court, then play kinky games. ",Drama
Ladyhawke,"Upon breaking out of a dungeon, youthful thief Phillipe Gaston (Matthew Broderick) befriends Capt. Navarre (Rutger Hauer), a man with a strange secret. Navarre and his lover Lady Isabeau d'Anjou (Michelle Pfeiffer) were cursed by the wicked Bishop of Aquila (John Wood), who desires Lady Isabeau for himself. His dark magic prevents the pair from ever being in each other's presence except at twilight, so they enlist Gaston in a dangerous plot to overthrow the Bishop and break his evil enchantment. ",Adventure
Ultimo tango a Parigi,"Distraught following his wife's suicide, American hotelier Paul (Marlon Brando) becomes transfixed by the beautiful younger Frenchwoman Jeanne (Maria Schneider) when he meets her by chance at an apartment both are attempting to rent. The couple begin an extended but purely anonymous sexual relationship in which they do not even tell each other their names, but it soon becomes clear that the couple's deliberate level of disassociation cannot continue. ",Drama
Play Misty for Me,"Popular radio show host Dave Garver (Clint Eastwood) becomes restless in his relationship with his girlfriend (Donna Mills). Impulsively, he goes out and sleeps with a woman (Jessica Walter) he meets at a nightclub. After the fact, he finds out she was not an anonymous hookup, but an obsessive fan who has called in repeatedly to request he play the song ""Misty."" Garver soon discovers extricating himself from the woman will be no easy feat as she becomes increasingly psychotic. ",Drama
Love Story,"When wealthy Harvard University law student Oliver Barrett IV (Ryan O'Neal) meets Jenny Cavilleri (Ali MacGraw), a middle-class girl who is studying music at Radcliffe College, it's love at first sight. Despite the protests of Oliver's father (Ray Milland), the young couple marry. Oliver finds a job at a legal firm in New York City, but their happy life comes crashing down when it's discovered that Jenny has a terminal illness. Together, they try to cope with the situation as best they can. ",Drama
A Ghost Story,"A passionate young couple, unexpectedly separated by a shocking loss, discover an eternal connection and a love that is infinite. ",Drama
Calibre,Two friends have their nerves and morals tested during a hunting trip in Scotland. ,Drama
To the Bone,"Ellen is an unruly 20-year-old anorexic girl who spent the better part of her teenage years being shepherded through various recovery programs, only to find herself several pounds lighter every time. Determined to find a solution, her dysfunctional family agrees to send her to a group home for youths, which is led by a non-traditional doctor. Surprised by the unusual rules, Ellen must discover for herself how to confront her addiction and attempt self-acceptance. ",Drama
Under the Shadow,"After Shideh's building is hit by a missile during the Iran-Iraq War, a superstitious neighbor suggests that the missile was cursed and might be carrying malevolent Middle-Eastern spirits. She becomes convinced a supernatural force within the building is attempting to possess her daughter Dorsa, and she has no choice but to confront these forces if she is to save her daughter and herself. ",Drama
The Diary of a Teenage Girl,"In 1970s San Francisco, a precocious 15-year-old (Bel Powley) embarks on an enthusiastic sexual odyssey, beginning with her mother's current lover (Alexander Skarsgård). ",Comedy
Man Up,A suburban father of three girls tries to reform an undisciplined and fatherless boy by teaching him what it really means to be a man. ,Comedy
Draft Day,"Sonny Weaver Jr. is the general manager of the Cleveland Browns. One of pro football's most important days, NFL draft day, is drawing near, but Sonny has much more on his mind than just which players to recruit. His lover is pregnant, and the team's owner wants to fire him. After Sonny accepts a deal with Seattle that nets him that team's first-round pick, he immediately wonders if he has made the right choice for himself and the Browns. ",Drama
Trouble with the Curve,"For decades Gus Lobel (Clint Eastwood) has been one of baseball's best scouts -- but now his age is catching up with him. Still, he refuses to be benched even though his bosses are questioning his judgment. Tasked with checking out the country's hottest batting prospect, Gus is forced to accept help from his daughter, Mickey (Amy Adams). Though they haven't spent time together in years, father and daughter make new discoveries about their shared past, which could change their future. ",Drama
The First Time,"In this semi-autobiographical film, Claude Berri looks back to his youth. In early 1950s France, Claude (Alain Cohen), a hormonal Jewish student in his final year of high school, is more focused on making good with his female classmates than excelling at his school work. Claude isn't considered an especially good-looking young man, which, of course, makes his situation difficult. Things change, though, when he receives an invitation from a classmate named Carole (Danielle Schneider). ",Comedy
Stoker,"Betrayed by his wife (Natalie Moorhead), a man (Monte Blue) hops a ship to a South American plantation. ",Drama
The Vow,A priest falls in love with a nun and writes songs dedicated to her. ,Drama
Contagion,Blondes lure an Australian salesman (John Doyle) to a fantasy mansion whose master wants him to kill someone. ,Drama
The Skeleton Twins,"Following many years of estrangement, twins Milo (Bill Hader) and Maggie (Kristen Wiig) have an unexpected reunion after a set of near-tragedies. The situation forces them to confront how their lives became so broken. For Maggie, it means examining why she's so unhappy in a marriage to a loving husband. For Milo, it means meeting with his first love to see if their romance can reignite. Eventually, they learn that living truthfully and accepting each other is the only way to move forward. ",Comedy
Anonymous,"When Todd tires of his steady relationship and uninspired office job, he looks for a way to return to the sexually charged atmosphere of days gone by. ",Drama
Goon,"Though a misfit among his brainy family members, Massachusetts bouncer Doug Glatt (Seann William Scott) has a knockout punch that lands him a spot on a minor-league Canadian hockey team. ",Comedy
Salmon Fishing in the Yemen,"Dr. Alfred Jones (Ewan McGregor) is a fisheries scientist who one day receives an unusual request: A businesswoman named Harriet Chetwode-Talbot (Emily Blunt) wants his help in fulfilling a wealthy sheik's (Amr Waked) request to bring sport fishing to Yemen. Jones declines at first, but when the British prime minister's spokeswoman latches on to the project as a way to improve Middle East relations, he joins in. Romance blooms as Jones and Harriet work to make the sheik's dream come true. ",Comedy
The Debt,A boy from an isolated Argentine village learns of the outside world through his friendship with a schoolteacher. ,Drama
Adventureland,"It's the summer of 1987, and recent college grad James Brennan (Jesse Eisenberg) can't wait to begin his long-anticipated dream trip to Europe. Unfortunately, James' plans come to a screeching halt when his parents announce that they are unable to subsidize his trip. Forced to take a job at the local amusement park, James prepares for the worst summer ever, until he finds love with a captivating co-worker named Em (Kristen Stewart). ",Comedy
Sunshine Cleaning,"Though they once seemed to have a bright future, life seems to be passing by the Norkowski sisters. Rose (Amy Adams), once the most popular girl in high school, is a single mom and works as a maid. Norah (Emily Blunt) still lives at home with their father (Alan Arkin) and parties all the time. When Rose's married lover tells her about the lucrative field of crime-scene cleanup, she pours all her remaining resources into her new business, and recruits the squeamish Norah to help. ",Comedy
Rendition,"Isabella El-Ibrahimi (Reese Witherspoon), the wife of an Egyptian engineer, tries desperately to track down her husband after he disappears on an international flight. Meanwhile, a CIA analyst's (Jake Gyllenhaal) world spins out of control as he witnesses the engineer's unorthodox interrogation at the hands of secret police. ",Drama
Dan in Real Life,"Dan Burns (Steve Carell), a widower and advice columnist, meets a beautiful stranger (Juliette Binoche) in a bookstore and is instantly smitten. Unfortunately the woman, named Marie, is already involved with Dan's charismatic brother (Dane Cook). As a weekend family gathering gets underway, Dan and Marie try to hide their mutual attraction, but fall in love anyway. ",Comedy
The Hunting Party,"Brandt Ruger (Gene Hackman) is a rich cattle rancher. He has a bad relationship with his wife, Melissa (Candice Bergen), whom he treats like a possession. While Brandt is away from home on a hunting trip, Frank Calder (Oliver Reed), a brazen outlaw, kidnaps Melissa and holds her for ransom. Frank, however, treats Melissa better than her own husband does, and before long she begins to develop feelings for him. When Brandt returns, he's enraged and vows to take violent revenge against Frank. ",Adventure
Before We Go,"A chance encounter between two strangers (Chris Evans, Alice Eve) in Grand Central Terminal sparks a life-changing, nighttime sojourn through New York City. ",Comedy
The Lake House,"A lonely doctor (Sandra Bullock), who once lived in a beautiful lakeside home, falls in love via letters with its latest resident, a frustrated architect (Keanu Reeves). When they discover that they are living two years apart, the pair must unravel the mystery behind their incredible romance. ",Drama
Primer,"Intellectual engineers Aaron (Shane Carruth) and Abe (David Sullivan) build and sell error-checking technology with the help of their friends Robert (Casey Gooden) and Phillip (Anand Upadhyaya). But when Aaron and Abe accidentally invent what they think is a time machine, Abe builds a version capable of transporting a human and puts the device to the test. As the two friends obsess over their creation, they discover the dark consequences of their actions. ",Drama
50 First Dates,"Playboy vet Henry sets his heart on romancing Lucy, but she has short-term memory loss; she can't remember anything that happened the day before. So every morning, Henry has to woo her again. Her friends and family are very protective, and Henry must convince them that he's in it for love. ",Comedy
Thirteen,"Honor student Tracy Freeland (Evan Rachel Wood) has a troubling home life, but she is close to her mother, Melanie (Holly Hunter). While trying to conceal her inner turmoil by excelling academically, she befriends the calculating Evie (Nikki Reed), her school's queen bee. Evie talks Tracy into experimenting with drugs, exploring her sexuality and pickpocketing strangers to finance shopping sprees -- but before long, Melanie realizes she must step in and stop her daughter's destructive lifestyle. ",Drama
One Hour Photo,"Casual shoppers stocking up at the local SavMart may not pay much attention to the man at the photo counter. In fact, they may not even see him. Sy Parrish (Robin Williams), a lonely technician, is a store fixture who develops an unsettling obsession with the Yorkin family, long-time customers. ",Drama
The Family Man,"Middle-aged New Yorker Eddie Madden (Edward Asner) has a relatively comfortable life with his family and runs a modestly successful parking garage. His predictable existence is thrown for a loop when he falls for one of his customers, the beautiful -- and much younger -- Mercedes Cole (Meredith Baxter Birney). While Eddie and Mercedes get swept up in the rush of a new romance, he eventually begins to question his adulterous behavior and must decide between his lover and his wife. ",Comedy
Ginger Snaps,"The story of two outcast sisters, Ginger (Katharine Isabelle) and Brigitte (Emily Perkins), in the mindless suburban town of Bailey Downs. On the night of Ginger's first period, she is savagely attacked by a wild creature. Ginger's wounds miraculously heal but something is not quite right. Now Brigitte must save her sister and save herself. ",Drama
Bringing Out the Dead,"After a disheartening and haunting career wears him down, New York City paramedic Frank Pierce (Nicolas Cage) begins to collapse under the strain of saving lives and witnessing deaths. Through the course of a few nights, three co-workers (John Goodman, Ving Rhames, Tom Sizemore) accompany Pierce as he grasps for sanity and pushes to be fired. Before Pierce falls off the edge, he still has a hope when he forms a friendship with a victim's daughter (Patricia Arquette). ",Drama
Cruel Intentions,"Annette (Reese Witherspoon) unwittingly becomes a pawn in Sebastian's (Ryan Phillippe) and Kathryn's (Sarah Michelle Gellar) deliciously diabolical wager of sexual conquest when she writes an article in Seventeen Magazine about how she intends to stay pure until she marries her boyfriend. However, Sebastian gets more than he bargained for as he attempts to woo Annette into his bed. ",Drama
Stepmom,"Three years after divorcing Jackie (Susan Sarandon), the mother of his children, Luke Harrison (Ed Harris) decides to take the next step with his significantly younger girlfriend, fashion photographer Isabel Kelly (Julia Roberts). But, when the flaky Kelly meets Harrison's children for the first time, their fierce allegiance to their mother is obvious. Try as she might, Kelly fails to endear herself to her young charges -- and to Jackie -- until a looming family crisis changes everything. ",Comedy
Great Expectations,Dickens' orphan Pip has an anonymous benefactor (John Stanton) who helps him become a London gentleman. ,Drama
Bulworth,"Jay Bulworth (Warren Beatty), a financially ruined senator, is now disillusioned with politics. The forlorn statesman orders a contract killing -- the target himself -- so his family will be able to collect a fortune from his insurance policy. Facing imminent death, a devil-may-care Bulworth speaks his mind in public, forsaking platitudes for honest but controversial observations. But when he falls in love with a hip young woman (Halle Berry), Bulworth urgently rethinks his impending murder. ",Comedy
The American President,"With the end of his first term in sight, widowed U.S. President Andrew Shepherd (Michael Douglas) knows that overwhelming public support will guarantee his re-election. But when he falls in love with lobbyist Sydney Ellen Wade (Annette Bening), Shepherd's supporters question the relationship, and his approval ratings drop. As a rival presidential candidate goes on the attack, Shepherd must choose between his political career and his love for Sydney. ",Comedy
Sleepless in Seattle,"After the death of his wife, Sam Baldwin (Tom Hanks) moves to Seattle with his son, Jonah (Ross Mallinger). When Jonah calls in to a talk-radio program to find a new wife for his father, Sam grudgingly gets on the line to discuss his feelings. Annie Reed (Meg Ryan), a reporter in Baltimore, hears Sam speak and falls for him, even though she is engaged. Unsure where it will lead, she writes Sam a letter asking him to meet her at the Empire State Building on Valentine's Day. ",Comedy
Working Girl,"Savvy New York City receptionist Tess McGill (Melanie Griffith) gives her conniving boss, Katharine Parker (Sigourney Weaver), an excellent business tip, but Katharine simply steals the idea without giving due credit to her secretary. After Katharine winds up in the hospital with an injured leg, Tess decides to exact revenge. Pretending to be her boss, Tess initiates a major deal with an investment broker (Harrison Ford) -- but things turn ugly after Katharine finds out what Tess has been up to. ",Comedy
Heartbreak Ridge,"Marine Sgt. Thomas Highway (Clint Eastwood) is a decorated veteran of two wars. On his last posting before retirement, he is surrounded by officers with no combat experience who view him as an odd, even dangerous, holdover. Highway is assigned to train a group of undisciplined recruits including Cpl. Stitch Jones (Mario Van Peebles), a slick hustler who has previously encountered Highway. As the old soldier prepares his men for a war they don't believe will come, the U.S. invades Grenada. ",Drama
Rocky IV,"After reclaiming the boxing championship title, Rocky Balboa (Sylvester Stallone) plans to retire and live with his wife, Adrian (Talia Shire). However, during an exhibition match, Rocky's friend Apollo Creed (Carl Weathers) is mercilessly beaten to death by hulking Russian newcomer Ivan Drago (Dolph Lundgren). Rocky vows payback against Drago and flies to Russia to train for a Christmas Day fight. Despite their different training methods, Rocky and Drago both wage a long and intense match. ",Drama
Rocky III,"Having become the world heavyweight champion, former working-class boxer Rocky Balboa (Sylvester Stallone) is rich and famous beyond his wildest dreams, which has made him lazy and overconfident. In a double whammy, he loses his trainer and father figure Mickey (Burgess Meredith) and then has his title stolen by the arrogant, menacing challenger Clubber Lang (Mr. T). Turning to his former adversary, Apollo Creed (Carl Weathers), for help, Rocky struggles to get his old fire back. ",Drama
Saturday Night Fever,"Tony Manero (John Travolta) doesn't have much going for him during the weekdays. He still lives at home and works as a paint store clerk in his Brooklyn, N.Y., neighborhood. But he lives for the weekends, when he and his friends go to the local disco and dance the night away. When a big dance competition is announced, he wrangles the beautiful and talented Stephanie (Karen Lynn Gorney) to be his partner. As the two train for the big night, they start to fall for each other as well. ",Drama
Three Thousand Years of Longing,"Dr. Alithea Binnie (Tilda Swinton) is an academic -- content with life and a creature of reason. While in Istanbul attending a conference, she happens to encounter a Djinn (Idris Elba) who offers her three wishes in exchange for his freedom. This presents two problems. First, she doubts that he is real and second, because she is a scholar of story and mythology, she knows all the cautionary tales of wishes gone wrong. The Djinn pleads his case by telling her fantastical stories of his past. Eventually she is beguiled and makes a wish that surprises them both. ",Drama
The Lost Daughter,"Alone on a seaside vacation, Leda becomes consumed with a young mother and daughter as she watches them on the beach. Unnerved by their compelling relationship, (and their raucous and menacing extended family), Leda is overwhelmed by her own memories of the terror, confusion and intensity of early motherhood. An impulsive act shocks Leda into the strange and ominous world of her own mind, where she is forced to face the unconventional choices she made as a young mother and their consequences. ",Drama
The Way Back,"Denounced by his wife as a possible spy in 1939, Janusz (Jim Sturgess) finds himself in a remote Siberian labor camp. Faced with brutal conditions inside and out, Janusz is determined to escape. A blizzard provides him with the perfect opportunity, and he and a small group of fellow prisoners make a break for it. Escape, however, is the easy part, for Janusz and his companions face a 4,000 mile trek on foot through the frozen Himalayas before they can truly be free. ",Drama
The Call of the Wild,"George Redfeather returns from Carlisle, where he graduated with honors and starred on the football team. At a reception given in his honor by Lieutenant Penrose, he meets the lieutenant's daughter, Gladys, and falls desperately in love with her. ",Adventure
The Professor,"Roberta is a student of art history. After being rejected once again by the professor, she decides to seduce him and lure him into a trap at his home. ",Comedy
Hillbilly Elegy,A Yale Law student drawn back to his Appalachian hometown reflects on his family's history and his own future. ,Drama
Moxie,"Vivian (Hadley Robinson), a seemingly shy 16-year-old, has always preferred to keep her head down and fly under the radar. But when the arrival of a new student (Alycia Pascual-Peña) forces her to examine the unchecked behavior of her fellow students running rampant at her high school, Vivian realizes she's fed up. Inspired by her mother's (Amy Poehler) rebellious past, Vivian anonymously publishes an underground zine called Moxie to expose bias and wrongdoing in her high school, and unexpectedly sparks a movement. Now at the center of a revolution, Vivian begins to forge new friendships with other young women and allies, reaching across the divide of cliques and clubs as they learn to navigate the highs and lows of high school together. ",Comedy
Collateral Beauty,"When a successful New York advertising executive (Will Smith) suffers a great tragedy, he retreats from life. While his concerned friends try desperately to reconnect with him, he seeks answers from the universe by writing letters to Love, Time and Death. When his notes bring unexpected personal responses, he begins to understand how these constants interlock in a life fully lived and how even the deepest loss can reveal moments of meaning and beauty. ",Drama
Purple Hearts,A Navy doctor (Ken Wahl) and a nurse (Cheryl Ladd) fall in love in Vietnam; each thinks at times the other has been killed. ,Drama
Popstar: Never Stop Never Stopping,"Childhood friends Conner (Andy Samberg), Owen (Jorma Taccone) and Lawrence (Akiva Schaffer) found fame and fortune after forming the hip-hop group the Style Boyz. Owen and Lawrence faded into the background when frontman Conner left the band to launch a successful solo career. Now, the egotistical singer decides to film a documentary about his life while he's still on top. When his second album flops, the camera is there to capture his world come crashing down. ",Comedy
The Tender Bar,"The Tender Bar tells the story of J.R. (Tye Sheridan), a fatherless boy growing up in the glow of a bar where the bartender, his Uncle Charlie (Ben Affleck), is the sharpest and most colorful of an assortment of quirky and demonstrative father figures. As the boy's determined mother (Lily Rabe) struggles to provide her son with opportunities denied to her -- and leave the dilapidated home of her outrageous if begrudgingly supportive father (Christopher Lloyd) -- J.R. begins to gamely, if not always gracefully, pursue his romantic and professional dreams -- with one foot persistently placed in Uncle Charlie's bar. The Tender Bar is based on the best-selling memoir of the same name by J.R. Moehringer. ",Drama
Obvious Child,"An immature, newly unemployed comic (Jenny Slate) must navigate the murky waters of adulthood after her fling with a graduate student (Jake Lacy) results in an unplanned pregnancy. ",Comedy
Mistress America,A college freshman (Lola Kirke) cures her disappointment and loneliness by allowing herself to be pulled into the wacky schemes of her future stepsister (Greta Gerwig). ,Comedy
Clouds of Sils Maria,A veteran actress (Juliette Binoche) comes face-to-face with an uncomfortable reflection of herself when she agrees to take part in a revival of the play that launched her career 20 years earlier. ,Drama
Jab Tak Hai Jaan,An emotionally damaged man tries to forget the past so he can find true love. ,Drama
Liberal Arts,A New York college adviser (Josh Radnor) becomes involved with a student (Elizabeth Olsen) when he returns to his alma mater in Ohio for a favorite professor's (Richard Jenkins) retirement party. ,Comedy
Killer Joe,A cop (Matthew McConaughey) who moonlights as a hit man agrees to kill the hated mother of a desperate drug dealer (Emile Hirsch) in exchange for a tumble with the young man's virginal sister (Juno Temple). ,Drama
The Hunter,"A young man kills two police officers, then runs into a forest, where he is arrested by two people. Surrounded by trees, the three men become lost, blurring the boundaries between hunter and hunted. ",Adventure
Happythankyoumoreplease,"Young New Yorkers try to navigate a rocky course of careers and personal relationships. Sam, an aspiring novelist, takes in a boy he saw abandoned on the subway. Sam's best friend, Annie (Malin Akerman), suffers from alopecia and finds herself torn between two men, one good, one bad. Meanwhile, Sam meets an aspiring singer, who may be the one to break his endless stream of one-night stands. ",Comedy
This Must Be the Place,"At 50 years of age, former rock star Cheyenne (Sean Penn) still dresses the part and lives in Ireland off the royalties and dividends from smart investments. The death of his estranged father brings Cheyenne back to New York, where he discovers the old man had one obsession: to hunt down a Nazi war criminal (Heinz Lieven). Cheyenne decides to pick up the quest where his late father left off, and sets out at his own pace on a journey across America. ",Adventure
If I Stay,"Mia Hall (Chloë Grace Moretz), a talented young cellist, thought the most difficult decision she would ever have to make would be whether to pursue her musical dreams at prestigious Juilliard or follow her heart to be with the love of her life, Adam (Jamie Blackley), a rock singer/guitarist. However, a car wreck changes everything in an instant, and now Mia's life hangs in the balance. Suspended between life and death, Mia faces a choice that will decide her future. ",Drama
Seeking a Friend for the End of the World,"The announcement that an enormous asteroid will obliterate Earth in less than a month brings an end to the marriage of mild-mannered insurance salesman Dodge (Steve Carell), whose wife leaves him on the spot. After his bold young neighbor, Penny (Keira Knightley), belatedly delivers a letter from Dodge's former sweetheart, Dodge decides that he must find the love of his life before it's too late. Dodge and Penny embark on a road trip that eventually brightens their outlook, if not the world's. ",Adventure
The Company Men,"A young executive at a shipping and manufacturing conglomerate, Bobby Walker (Ben Affleck) is on the fast track to the top. He is a rising star at work and has all the material trappings of success. Then his company goes through a few rounds of layoffs, so Bobby and colleagues Phil (Chris Cooper) and Gene (Tommy Lee Jones) find themselves on the unemployment line. As the year unfolds, all three must redefine their lives as they struggle to survive in a hostile post-career landscape. ",Drama
Rachel Getting Married,"As an affluent New England family prepares for one daughter's wedding, another named Kym (Anne Hathaway) -- just out of her latest stint in rehab -- whirls into town causing upheaval. The sister, Rachel (Rosemarie DeWitt), is more than a bit resentful of Kym's antics taking center stage, and as time ticks by, long-simmering family tensions come boiling to the surface. ",Drama
The Proposal,"Terry (Nick Moran) is an undercover agent on an assignment, getting closer and closer to bringing down crime boss Simon Bacig (Stephen Lang). When Bacig invites Terry and his wife to a swank party, Terry panics because he made the wife up. His commanding officer (Michael Kopsa) appoints sexy Susan (Jennifer Esposito), a rookie cop with no undercover experience, to the role. Susan throws herself into it, starting an affair with Bacig to further the case. But this only complicates matters. ",Comedy
Ghost Town,Villagers in a remote part of China struggle to survive while trying to preserve their culture. ,Comedy
2 Days in Paris,"A European vacation was intended to repair the tattered relationship between American Jack (Adam Goldberg) and French native Marion (Julie Delpy). But, by the time they arrive in Paris to visit Marion's family, it is clear the trip is not going well. The city brings out aspects of Marion that only alienate neurotic Jack further, from her in-your-face politics to her former boyfriends, who surface in every cafe. Thus the most romantic city in the world could mean the end of the couple's romance. ",Comedy
Fido,"When a cloud of space dust causes the dead to rise as ravenous zombies, the ZomCon Corp. emerges to conquer the creatures and domesticate them to become menial workers and pets for humans. Now, in an idyllic town, a skeptical boy (K'Sun Ray) finds a best friend in his family's new fiend, which he promptly names Fido (Billy Connolly). But Fido's control collar malfunctions, and the neighbors wind up on the menu. ",Comedy
Hairspray,"In 1960s Baltimore, dance-loving teen Tracy Turnblad (Nikki Blonsky) auditions for a spot on ""The Corny Collins Show"" and wins. She becomes an overnight celebrity, a trendsetter in dance, fun and fashion. Perhaps her new status as a teen sensation is enough to topple Corny's reigning dance queen and bring racial integration to the show. ",Comedy
Just Like Heaven,"David (Mark Ruffalo) is a recently widowed architect moving into a new apartment in San Francisco. But the apartment isn't entirely empty; it's haunted by the ghost of a woman named Elizabeth (Reese Witherspoon). And although Elizabeth can't remember much about her life, she's convinced that she isn't really dead. While David recruits Darryl (Jon Heder), an absent-minded psychic, to get to the bottom of Elizabeth's identity, he and Elizabeth begin to fall in love. ",Comedy
Where the Wild Things Are,"Feeling misunderstood at home and at school, mischievous Max (Max Records) escapes to the land of the Wild Things, majestic -- and sometimes fierce -- creatures. They allow Max to become their leader, and he promises to create a kingdom where everyone will be happy. However, Max soon finds that being king is not easy and that, even being with the Wild Things, there is something missing. ",Adventure
Under the Tuscan Sun,"When Frances Mayes (Diane Lane) learns her husband is cheating on her from a writer whom she gave a bad review, her life is turned upside down. In an attempt to bring her out of a deep depression, her best friend, Patti (Sandra Oh), encourages Frances to take a tour of Italy. During the trip, the new divorcée impulsively decides to purchase a rural Tuscan villa and struggles to start her life anew amid colorful local characters, including the handsome Marcello (Raoul Bova). ",Comedy
Bend It Like Beckham,"Jess Bhamra (Parminder Nagra), the daughter of a strict Indian couple (Anupam Kher, Shaheen Khan) in London, is not permitted to play organized soccer, even though she is 18. When Jess is playing for fun one day, her impressive skills are seen by Jules Paxton (Keira Knightley), who then convinces Jess to play for her semi-pro team. Jess uses elaborate excuses to hide her matches from her family while also dealing with her romantic feelings for her coach, Joe. ",Comedy
The Girl Next Door,Theresa turns her horrifying past as a sex slave into her calling by traveling the country and helping people who are being trafficked. ,Comedy
Unfaithful,"Described by director Adrian Lyne (""Fatal Attraction"") as ""an erotic thriller about the body language of guilt."" When Edward (Richard Gere) innocently learns that his wife Connie (Diane Lane) has lied to him about an affair, suspicion propels him to uncover the devastating details of her infidelity. Tormented by the knowledge, he confronts her lover, only to discover a level of rage within himself that he could never have imagined. ",Drama
Sweet November,"Sara (Sandy Dennis), a free-spirited single woman living in Brooklyn, invites a new man to stay with her every month. For Sara, this is an opportunity to expose a man to new things, but it's also a way to make sure she will always be remembered by someone. Her latest boarder is Charlie (Anthony Newley), an uptight British businessman. Things, however, don't go as planned, and the two fall in love. Despite this, Charlie cannot stay any longer than his allotted month. ",Drama
Blast from the Past,"Adam Webber (Brendan Fraser) has lived his entire life in confinement in a fallout shelter in Pasadena, Calif. When the Webber family's rations of food and supplies grow thin, Adam's eccentric father, Calvin (Christopher Walken), sends him on a dangerous restocking mission. When Adam emerges from the Webber family's subterranean refuge for the first time, he finds that rumors of a nuclear apocalypse were totally false -- and meets gorgeous Eve Rustikov (Alicia Silverstone). ",Comedy
City of Angels,"This is the story of Seth (Nicolas Cage), an angel who wanders the Los Angeles area invisible to humans. As the demise of an individual approaches, he spends time near them and becomes visible while acting as their traveling companion during their trip to the great hereafter. His discovery of distraught heart surgeon Maggie (Meg Ryan) inspires him to forego his immortality and exist on earth with her as a feeling and mortal entity. ",Drama
Sliding Doors,"When Helen (Gwyneth Paltrow), a London ad executive, is fired from her job and rushes out to catch a train, two scenarios take place. In one, she gets on the train and comes home to find her boyfriend, Gerry (John Lynch), in bed with another woman. In the second, she misses the train and arrives after the woman has left. In the first scenario, Helen dumps Gerry, finds a new man and gradually improves her life. In the second, she becomes suspicious of Gerry's fidelity and grows miserable. ",Comedy
Primary Colors,"In this adaptation of the best-selling roman a clef about Bill Clinton's 1992 run for the White House, the young and gifted Henry Burton (Adrian Lester) is tapped to oversee the presidential campaign of Gov. Jack Stanton (John Travolta). Burton is pulled into the politician's colorful world and looks on as Stanton -- who has a wandering eye that could be his downfall -- contends with his ambitious wife, Susan, (Emma Thompson) and an outspoken adviser, Richard Jemmons (Billy Bob Thornton). ",Comedy
While You Were Sleeping,"Lonely transit worker Lucy Eleanor Moderatz (Sandra Bullock) pulls her longtime crush, Peter (Peter Gallagher), from the path of an oncoming train. At the hospital, doctors report that he's in a coma, and a misplaced comment from Lucy causes Peter's family to assume that she is his fiancée. When Lucy doesn't correct them, they take her into their home and confidence. Things get even more complicated when she finds herself falling for Peter's sheepish brother, Jack (Bill Pullman). ",Comedy
Now and Then,"Three strong women -- Roberta Martin (Rosie O'Donnell), Samantha Albertson (Demi Moore) and Tina ""Teeny"" Tercell (Melanie Griffith) -- return home to reunite with their childhood friend Chrissy DeWitt Williams (Rita Wilson) and see her through the end of her first pregnancy. The four lifelong friends share their memories of the unforgettable summer of 1970, the summer their innocent younger selves (Christina Ricci, Gaby Hoffmann, Thora Birch, Ashleigh Aston Moore) grew up. ",Comedy
Empire Records,"Joe (Anthony LaPaglia) runs Empire Records, an independent Delaware store that employs a tight-knit group of music-savvy youths. Hearing that the shop may be sold to a big chain, slacker employee Lucas (Rory Cochrane) bets a chunk of the store's money, hoping to get a big return. When this plan fails, Empire Records falls into serious trouble, and the various other clerks, including lovely Corey (Liv Tyler) and gloomy Deb (Robin Tunney), must deal with the problem, among many other issues. ",Comedy
Don Juan DeMarco,An aging psychiatrist (Marlon Brando) believes in a patient (Johnny Depp) who sees himself as the world's greatest lover. ,Comedy
The Hand That Rocks the Cradle,"When she was assaulted by her doctor, Claire Bartel (Annabella Sciorra) reported him to the police, and rather than go to prison for his crime, he killed himself. The shock of the accusations and suicide caused the doctor's pregnant wife, Peyton (Rebecca De Mornay), to have a miscarriage. Driven mad with rage, Peyton poses as a nanny for the Bartel family. Her plan: to tear Claire's life apart, seduce her husband (Matt McCoy) and eventually murder the woman she blames for ruining her life. ",Drama
Cronos,"Antique dealer Jesus Gris (Federico Luppi) stumbles across Cronos, a 400-year-old scarab that, when it latches onto him, grants him youth and eternal life -- but also a thirst for blood. As Jesus enjoys his newfound vitality, he's unaware that a dying old man, Dieter de la Guardia (Claudio Brook), has sent his nephew, Angel (Ron Perlman), to find the scarab and bring it back to him. But Jesus will not give immortality up easily, even risking the life of his orphan granddaughter (Tamara Shanath). ",Drama
Regarding Henry,"An unscrupulous corporate lawyer, Henry Turner (Harrison Ford) will do whatever it takes to win a case, and treats his family with the same degree of ruthlessness. After Henry gets caught in the middle of a robbery and is shot in the head, he wakes from a coma to find that he has amnesia and can't even remember how to do the simplest of tasks. As he recovers and relearns how to function, Henry reveals a much kinder and more thoughtful personality, much to the surprise of his family and friends. ",Drama
Frankie and Johnny,A woman is done wrong by a man. ,Comedy
Mermaids,"Fifteen-year-old Charlotte Flax (Winona Ryder) is tired of her wacky mom (Cher) moving their family to a different town any time she feels it is necessary. When they move to a small Massachusetts town and Mrs. Flax begins dating a shopkeeper (Bob Hoskins), Charlotte and her 9-year-old sister, Kate (Christina Ricci), hope that they can finally settle down. But when Charlotte's attraction to an older man gets in the way, the family must learn to accept each other for who they truly are. ",Comedy
Pretty in Pink,"Andie (Molly Ringwald) is an outcast at her Chicago high school, hanging out either with her older boss (Annie Potts), who owns the record store where she works, or her quirky classmate Duckie (Jon Cryer), who has a crush on her. When one of the rich and popular kids at school, Blane (Andrew McCarthy), asks Andie out, it seems too good to be true. As Andie starts falling for Blane, she begins to realizes that dating someone from a different social sphere is not easy. ",Comedy
Cocoon,"Oscar-winning fantasy in which the residents of a Florida rest home get a new lease of life when they stumble across an alien ""fountain of youth"" in a disused holiday home. Unbeknown to them, aliens have been using the swimming pool in the house to store their cocooned brethren, giving the waters a powerful, rejuvenating quality. ",Comedy
THX 1138,"In the future, mankind lives in vast underground cities and free will is outlawed by means of mandatory medication that controls human emotion. But when THX 1138 (Robert Duvall) and LUH 3417 (Maggie McOmie) stop taking their meds, they wake up to the bleak reality of their own existence and fall in love with each other in the process. But love is also illegal in this Orwellian dystopia, and the act of making love has made both of them outlaws on the run from an army of robotic police. ",Drama
The Green Knight,"An epic fantasy adventure based on the timeless Arthurian legend, THE GREEN KNIGHT tells the story of Sir Gawain (Dev Patel), King Arthur's reckless and headstrong nephew, who embarks on a daring quest to confront the eponymous Green Knight, a gigantic emerald-skinned stranger and tester of men. Gawain contends with ghosts, giants, thieves, and schemers in what becomes a deeper journey to define his character and prove his worth in the eyes of his family and kingdom by facing the ultimate challenger. From visionary filmmaker David Lowery comes a fresh and bold spin on a classic tale from the knights of the round table. ",Adventure
Happiest Season,"This romantic comedy is about longtime lesbian couple Abby (Kristen Stewart) and Harper (Mackenzie Davis), who made plans to go home to the latter's family for the Christmas holidays. Aside from spending the yuletide season with Harper's conservative parents, Abby is also planning to spring a marriage proposal on Harper. Trouble begins, though, when she discovers that Harper hasn't come out as a lesbian yet to her family, leaving them clueless as to who Abby really is in her life. Co-written and directed by Clea Duvall. Co-starring Dan Levy, Victor Garber, and Mary Steenburgen. ",Comedy
Glass,Two misfits use their entrepreneurial spirit and harness the energy of an island to create art. ,Drama
Disobedience,"Aristides de Sousa Mendes, the Portuguese Consul General stationed in Bordeaux, France, during World War II defies orders from his government and issues more than 30,000 visas to people fleeing the Holocaust. ",Drama
Ingrid Goes West,"Following the death of her mother and a series of self-inflicted setbacks, young Ingrid Thorburn escapes a humdrum existence by moving out West to befriend her Instagram obsession, a Los Angeles socialite named Taylor Sloane. After a quick bond is forged between these unlikeliest of buddies, the facade begins to crack in both women's lives -- with comically malicious results. ",Comedy
Fatherhood,"Featuring genre spanning songs from hip-hop to blues, FATHERHOOD follows young people in Memphis, Los Angeles, New York and London as they write and perform songs that address healing, with the goal of closing the gap between children and their fathers. Directed by Ben Gregor--who worked with APCH in South Central LA, The Door in NYC, STAX Music Academy in Memphis and Homeboy Industries in LA, as well as young people formerly of Kids Company in London--FATHERHOOD explores the reasons why some fathers choose to remain absent, the impact on their kids and families and the discovery of new and innovative ways forward. ",Comedy
Max,"This is the story of a young artist named Adolf Hitler (Noah Taylor) and his relationship with a Jewish art dealer and teacher, Max Hoffman (John Cusack) in 1918. As the 29-year-old WWI veteran's attempts to learn his art fail to match his hopes, Hitler's interests turn elsewhere ... to hatred of Jews, and Germany's future. ",Adventure
Wish I Was Here,"Aidan Bloom (Zach Braff), a struggling actor, lives in Los Angeles with his wife (Kate Hudson) and two children, Grace and Tucker. Up until now, Aidan's father, Gabe (Mandy Patinkin), has been paying for the children's schooling, but he is now gravely ill. Thus, Aidan attempts to home-school his offspring. As his chaotic curriculum leads to some surprising self-discoveries for his family, Aidan must reassess his career, his relationships and his faith. ",Comedy
Burnt,"Adam Jones (Bradley Cooper) was once a top chef in Paris until drugs and alcohol led to a meltdown that put his career on hold. After moving from New Orleans to London, Adam gets a shot at redemption when his former maitre d' (Daniel Brühl) reluctantly hires him as the head chef of his fine-dining restaurant. Demanding perfection from his newly formed staff (Sienna Miller, Omar Sy), the acerbic and temperamental Jones gets a second chance to fulfill his dream of earning a third Michelin star. ",Comedy
Bad Words,"Guy Trilby (Jason Bateman), a 40-year-old misanthrope, makes waves at a regional spelling bee when, due to a loophole in the rules, he is allowed to enter -- and later wins. Hurling insults at every turn, Guy advances to the national contest in Los Angeles, accompanied by a reporter (Kathryn Hahn) who wants to discover his hidden motives for entering the bee. As the competition gears up, friendless Guy inexplicably forms a bond with a young speller who is feeling parental pressure to win. ",Comedy
Promised Land,"When ambitious Polish aristocrat Karol Borowiecki (Daniel Olbrychski) decides to open his own textile factory, he recruits two enterprising friends, Jewish businessman Moryc Welt (Wojciech Pszoniak) and German industrial heir Maks Baum (Andrzej Seweryn), to begin the new venture. Unfortunately, Karol's affair with Lucy Zuckerowa (Kalina Jedrusik), the wife of a business rival, threatens to derail the trio's attempts at establishing their own company. ",Drama
The Best of Me,"Amanda (Michelle Monaghan) and Dawson (James Marsden) were once high-school sweethearts. They have a bittersweet reunion when they return to their hometown for the funeral of a mutual, beloved friend. Seeing each other again after 20 years apart reignites the love they've never forgotten, but Amanda and Dawson soon discover that the forces that drove them apart when they were younger pose even more threats today. Based on the novel by Nicholas Sparks. ",Drama
The Immigrant,A Bosnian immigrant struggles to live a dignified life in an alien society. ,Drama
Anna Karenina,"The young and beautiful aristocrat Anna Karenina (Tatyana Samoylova) is married to Alexei Karenin (Nikolai Gritsensko), a man 20 years her senior. While traveling, Anna meets the dashing Count Vronsky (Vasili Lanovoy), who falls for her despite her being married. Vronsky flirts with Anna, and though she initially rejects his advances, she becomes involved with him. When Karenin discovers Anna's affair with Vronsky, it sets a dramatic chain of events into motion. ",Drama
Arbitrage,"As he approaches his 60th birthday, New York hedge-fund magnate Robert Miller (Richard Gere) is the picture of success -- at least on the surface. In reality, Miller is in over his head, trying desperately to sell his empire to a big bank before the authorities and his family uncover the depth of his fraud. Unexpectedly, a critical error forces Miller to juggle family, business and crime with the aid of a former associate, but a detective's (Tim Roth) suspicions mean it may already be too late. ",Drama
Like Crazy,"While attending college in Los Angeles, Jacob (Anton Yelchin), an American, and Anna (Felicity Jones), who hails from London, fall madly in love. However, the young lovers are forced apart when Anna violates the terms of her visa and must return to England. Jacob and Anna discover the difficulties of maintaining a long-distance relationship in the face of their changing lives. Yet, no matter how often circumstances pull them apart, they always find themselves back together again. ",Drama
Safe Haven,"Katie Feldman (Julianne Hough) moves to a small town on the North Carolina coast, determined to make a new life for herself. She takes a job as a waitress and keeps a low profile, but she is soon won over by the warmth and caring of the close-knit community, especially that of widower Alex (Josh Duhamel). With the help of Alex and his children, Katie learns to love and trust again -- but when a mysterious stranger arrives and starts asking questions, Katie's dark past threatens to reclaim her. ",Drama
Elysium,A troubled runaway (Erin Biszak) and a homeless immigrant (Christian Briceno) join forces to survive. ,Action
The Odd Life of Timothy Green,"Cindy (Jennifer Garner) and Jim Green (Joel Edgerton) live in the town of Stanleyville, home of the Stanleyville Pencil Factory. Though happily married, Cindy and Jim long for a child; unfortunately, they are unable to conceive. They bury a box in their backyard, containing all their wishes for what they hope a child of theirs might be. When a boy named Timothy (CJ Adams) magically appears at their door, the Greens learn that sometimes the unexpected can bring some of life's greatest gifts. ",Comedy
This Is Where I Leave You,"When their father passes away, four grown, world-weary siblings return to their childhood home and are requested -- with an admonition -- to stay there together for a week, along with their free-speaking mother (Jane Fonda) and a collection of spouses, exes and might-have-beens. As the brothers and sisters re-examine their shared history and the status of each tattered relationship among those who know and love them best, they reconnect in hysterically funny and emotionally significant ways. ",Comedy
The Beaver,"Walter Black (Mel Gibson), the head of a failing toy company, is deeply depressed. His marriage to Meredith (Jodie Foster) is broken and his oldest son, Porter (Anton Yelchin), hates him. When Meredith finally throws him out of the house, Walter begins his final tailspin. Drunk and alone, Walter is about to commit suicide -- but is saved by the voice of the beaver puppet he found in a dumpster. Wearing the puppet on his hand, Walter speaks only through it and tries to get his life on track. ",Drama
Last Vegas,"Aging pals Billy (Michael Douglas), Paddy (Robert De Niro), Archie (Morgan Freeman) and Sam (Kevin Kline) have been best friends since childhood. When Billy finally proposes to his much-younger girlfriend, all four friends go to Las Vegas to celebrate the end of Billy's longtime bachelorhood and relive their glory days. However, the four quickly realize that the intervening decades have changed Sin City and tested their friendship in ways they had not imagined. ",Comedy
Titane,"Titane: A metal highly resistant to heat and corrosion, with high tensile strength alloys, often used in medical prostheses due to its pronounced biocompatibility. ",Drama
My Blueberry Nights,"After her boyfriend of five years breaks up with her, Elizabeth (Norah Jones) consoles herself by consuming creamy confections at a sympathetic cafe owner's (Jude Law) eatery. She sets out on a road trip, supporting herself as a waitress along the way. Elizabeth meets a host of interesting characters on her journey, including an alcoholic policeman (David Strathairn), his unfaithful wife (Rachel Weisz), and a gambler (Natalie Portman). ",Drama
Chaos Theory,"Celebrated author and efficiency expert Frank Allen (Ryan Reynolds) has always lived in step with a well-planned series of lists and timetables. His wife (Emily Mortimer) decides to play a joke on him and sets his clock back 10 minutes, but the consequences are far greater than expected. As Frank's well-ordered existence unravels, he opens up to the randomness of life. ",Comedy
Take the Lead,"When internationally renowned dancer Pierre Dulaine (Antonio Banderas) takes a teaching job in a New York City public school, he meets ridicule from the street-wise students, who scoff at the notion of ballroom dancing. Far from being discouraged, he melds their hip-hop moves with his classical style, helping them create a dance form and, in the process, becoming their mentor. ",Drama
Dreamgirls,"Deena (Beyoncé Knowles),Effie (Jennifer Hudson) and Lorrell (Anika Noni Rose) form a music trio called the Dreamettes. When ambitious manager Curtis Taylor Jr. (Jamie Foxx) spots the act at a talent show, he offers the chance of a lifetime, to be backup singers for a national star (Eddie Murphy). Taylor takes creative control of the group and eventually pushes the singers into the spotlight. However, one becomes the star, forcing another out, which teaches them about the high cost of fame. ",Drama
A Lot Like Love,An heiress and her husband - who's also her father's most trusted aide - have a romantic weekend getaway disrupted when things take a nightmarish turn. ,Comedy
May,"Young misfit May (Angela Bettis) endured a difficult childhood because of her lazy eye. And though contact lenses have helped May adjust as a young adult, her deep-seated awkwardness remains a problem. Adam (Jeremy Sisto), a young man obsessed with fixing wrecked cars, takes a shine to May's oddball ways. But May's strangeness ultimately drives him away, leaving her open to the advances of her co-worker Polly (Anna Faris). When Polly dumps her too, May's emotional instability turns violent. ",Comedy
My Big Fat Greek Wedding,"Everyone in the Portokalos family worries about Toula (Nia Vardalos). Still unmarried at 30 years old, she works at Dancing Zorba's, the Greek restaurant owned by her parents, Gus (Michael Constantine) and Maria (Lainie Kazan). After taking a job at her aunt's travel agency, she falls in love with Ian Miller (John Corbett), a teacher who is tall, handsome and definitely not Greek. Toula isn't sure which will be more upsetting to her father, that Ian is a foreigner or that he's a vegetarian. ",Comedy
The Beach,A doctor's wife invites a young journalist to spend a few days in her house for a show. ,Adventure
For Love of the Game,"Forty-year-old pitcher Billy Chapel (Kevin Costner) is practically a dinosaur by professional baseball standards, fast approaching the end of his career. But, as Chapel stands on the mound pitching the game of his life, his thoughts don't turn to his prized history in sports, but rather return again and again to his tumultuous relationship with Jane Aubrey (Kelly Preston), a single mom who has stood at his side through the good and the bad but is now on the verge of leaving him. ",Drama
The Parent Trap,"In this update of a 1961 film, twins Annie and Hallie (Lindsay Lohan) are strangers until happenstance unites them. The preteen girls' divorced parents, Nick (Dennis Quaid) and Elizabeth (Natasha Richardson), are living on opposite sides of the Atlantic, each with one child. After meeting at camp, American Hallie and British-raised Annie engineer an identity swap, giving both the chance to spend time with the parent they've missed. If the scheme works, it might just make the family whole again. ",Adventure
Gummo,"Teen friends Tummler (Nick Sutton) and Solomon (Jacob Reynolds) navigate the ruins of a tiny, tornado-ravaged town in Ohio that is populated by the deformed, disturbed and perverted. When not gunning down stray cats for a few bucks, the boys pass their time getting stoned on household inhalants. Elsewhere, the mute Bunny Boy (Jacob Sewell) dons rabbit ears and is bullied by kids half his age, and sisters Dot (Chloe Sevigny) and Helen (Carisa Glucksman) dodge a pedophile. ",Comedy
French Kiss,"When Kate (Meg Ryan) learns that her fiance, Charlie (Timothy Hutton), has become smitten with a young Parisian woman, she boards a plane for France. She is seated next to Luc (Kevin Kline), a small-time crook who uses her to smuggle a stolen necklace, leading Luc to the hotel where she's staying to confront Charlie. As Kate and Luc get to know each other, their sarcastic rapport grows warmer, and Kate must decide where her heart truly lies as Charlie tries to win her back. ",Comedy
Reality Bites,"After college, Lelaina (Winona Ryder) films a documentary about herself and friends as they flounder in their attempts to forge relationships and begin careers. Vickie (Janeane Garofalo) works retail, has an endless string of one-night stands and awaits the results of her HIV test. Sammy (Steve Zahn) tries to come out to his parents. Lelaina gets involved with yuppie Michael (Ben Stiller) while maintaining a love-hate relationship with Troy (Ethan Hawke), who's undergoing an existential crisis. ",Comedy
Heavyweights,"Gerry (Aaron Schwartz) is not looking forward to his summer vacation, since he'll be spending it at a camp for overweight boys in order to shed pounds. Fortunately, a kindly couple, the Bushkins (Jerry Stiller, Anne Meara), run the camp and make the process fun and relaxed. However, they're soon forced to declare bankruptcy and sell the camp to Tony Perkis (Ben Stiller), a fitness fanatic who turns the camp into a living nightmare of over-the-top training. But the kids plan to fight back. ",Comedy
The Mosquito Coast,A brilliant but unstable inventor and his family create what they hope will be their Utopia in Central America. ,Adventure
Footloose,"Moving in from Chicago, newcomer Ren McCormack (Kevin Bacon) is in shock when he discovers the small Midwestern town he now calls home has made dancing and rock music illegal. As he struggles to fit in, Ren faces an uphill battle to change things. With the help of his new friend, Willard Hewitt (Christopher Penn), and defiant teen Ariel Moore (Lori Singer), he might loosen up this conservative town. But Ariel's influential father, Reverend Shaw Moore (John Lithgow), stands in the way. ",Drama
The Hunger,"John (David Bowie) is the lover of the gorgeous immortal vampire Miriam (Catherine Deneuve), and he's been led to believe that he'll live forever, too. Unfortunately, he quickly deteriorates into a horrible living death, and Miriam seeks a new companion. She soon sets her sights on Sarah (Susan Sarandon), a lovely young scientist, who quickly falls under Miriam's spell. However, Sarah doesn't warm up to the concept of vampirism easily, leading to conflict with Miriam. ",Drama
Annie,"An orphan in a facility run by the mean Miss Hannigan (Carol Burnett), Annie (Aileen Quinn) believes that her parents left her there by mistake. When a rich man named Oliver ""Daddy"" Warbucks (Albert Finney) decides to let an orphan live at his home to promote his image, Annie is selected. While Annie gets accustomed to living in Warbucks' mansion, she still longs to meet her parents. So Warbucks announces a search for them and a reward, which brings out many frauds. ",Comedy
Victory,"A couple gets separated on the first night of their marriage; devastated by this, the groom tries to commit suicide but in vain. He hires a contract killer and gives him a week's time to kill him, but the wife comes back. ",Drama
The Man Who Fell to Earth,A stranded alien (Lewis Smith) hopes to reach his dying planet in a rocket funded by a New York businessman (James Laurenson). ,Drama
Silent Running,"After the end of all botanical life on Earth, ecologist Freeman Lowell (Bruce Dern) maintains a greenhouse on a space station in order to preserve various plants for future generations. Assisted by three robots and a small human crew, Lowell rebels when he is ordered to destroy the greenhouse in favor of carrying cargo, a decision that puts him at odds with everyone but his mechanical companions. Lowell and his robots are forced to do anything necessary to keep their invaluable greenery alive. ",Drama
Torn Curtain,"American physicist Michael Armstrong (Paul Newman) shocks his friends and family by defecting to East Germany to work with the Soviets during the height of the Cold War. Even his fiancée (Julie Andrews) is surprised by the move, but when she follows him behind the Iron Curtain, she discovers that her husband-to-be isn't a spy, but a double agent working to discover Soviet nuclear secrets. As they plot a way to escape back to America, his cover is blown, putting both of their lives in jeopardy. ",Drama
Da 5 Bloods,Four African American vets battle the forces of man and nature when they return to Vietnam seeking the remains of their fallen squad leader and the gold fortune he helped them hide. ,Adventure
Last Christmas,"A youngster gets a chance to tie up loose ends with his late father, who has visited him as an angel-in-training. ",Comedy
His House,"A refugee couple makes a harrowing escape from war-torn South Sudan, but then they struggle to adjust to their new life in an English town that has an evil lurking beneath the surface. ",Drama
It Chapter Two,"Defeated by members of the Losers' Club, the evil clown Pennywise returns 27 years later to terrorize the town of Derry, Maine, once again. Now adults, the childhood friends have long since gone their separate ways. But when people start disappearing, Mike Hanlon calls the others home for one final stand. Damaged by scars from the past, the united Losers must conquer their deepest fears to destroy the shape-shifting Pennywise -- now more powerful than ever. ",Drama
All the Bright Places,"After meeting each other, two people struggle with the emotional and physical scars of their past. They discover that even the smallest moments can mean something. ",Drama
The Choice,"Travis Shaw (Benjamin Walker) is a ladies' man who thinks a serious relationship would cramp his easygoing lifestyle. Gabby Holland (Teresa Palmer) is a feisty medical student who's preparing to settle down with her long-term boyfriend (Tom Welling). Fate brings the two together as Gabby moves next door to Travis, sparking an irresistible attraction that upends both of their lives. As their bond grows, the unlikely couple must decide how far they're willing to go to keep the hope of love alive. ",Drama
Sleeping with Other People,"Twelve years after a one-night stand, a man (Jason Sudeikis) and a woman (Alison Brie) run into each other and try to maintain a platonic relationship despite their mutual attraction. ",Comedy
Magic in the Moonlight,"In the 1920s, magician Stanley Crawford (Colin Firth) enjoys widespread acclaim as Chinese conjurer Wei Ling Soo, his stage persona. As arrogant as he is talented, Stanley despises claims by phony spiritualists that they can perform real magic. At the behest of his friend, Stanley travels to the Côte d'Azur mansion of the Catledge family to expose a young medium named Sophie (Emma Stone). However, Stanley is left surprised and shaken by evidence that Sophie's gifts may be real. ",Comedy
The Second Best Exotic Marigold Hotel,"As his marriage to Sunaina draws near, Sonny sets his eye on opening a second residence for the elderly, but finds the project requires more time than he can spare. Meanwhile, Evelyn and Douglas wonder where their relationship is going, Norman and Carol try to remain exclusive, Madge juggles two rich suitors, and the single remaining vacancy poses a problem for two new arrivals. As the demands of Sonny's traditional Indian wedding threaten to overwhelm them all, an unexpected solution appears. ",Comedy
Barefoot,A self-indulgent bachelor (Til Schweiger) falls for an escaped mental patient (Johanna Wokalek). ,Comedy
Don Jon,"New Jersey bartender Jon Martello (Joseph Gordon-Levitt) knows what's important: his friends, his family, his car, his church, his sexual conquests -- and porn. In fact, Jon is a porn addict and has never had a genuine relationship with a woman. However, when he meets Barbara (Scarlett Johansson) he has to change his operating methods, because Barbara won't be bedded easily. For the first time in his life, Jon begins a real courtship, but his obsession with erotica threatens to ruin everything. ",Comedy
Upstream Color,"A woman (Amy Seimetz) unwittingly undergoes a series of bizarre experiments, then meets a kindred spirit (Shane Carruth) who may have experienced the same ordeal. ",Drama
Entourage,"While hanging with pals Eric (Kevin Connolly), Turtle (Jerry Ferrara) and Johnny Drama (Kevin Dillon), movie star Vince Chase (Adrian Grenier) gets a phone call from Ari Gold (Jeremy Piven), his former agent, who now runs a major studio. Ari offers Vince the leading role in his first production, but the actor insists on also directing the film. Things get out of hand when the $100 million flick goes over budget, leaving Ari, Vince and the boys at the mercy of the cutthroat world of Hollywood. ",Comedy
The Art of Getting By,"George (Freddie Highmore) is a senior at a posh Manhattan prep school, but his disaffected attitude leaves little room for toeing the line. He'd rather doodle and read philosophy, and he strenuously avoids his parents (Rita Wilson, Sam Robards) whenever possible. Unfortunately, George's attitude is endangering his chances of graduating. Then he meets Sally (Emma Roberts). George finds himself falling in love with her, but an older artist (Michael Angarano) adds a complication to the mix. ",Drama
Take This Waltz,"A young woman (Michelle Williams) is torn between the husband (Seth Rogen) that she loves and a new man (Luke Kirby) in her life, whom she's unable to ignore. ",Comedy
Byzantium,Mayhem follows when two female vampires who are on the run from a kindred group take refuge at a seaside British community. ,Drama
Last Night,"Sky's last night in Washington, D.C., before moving with her boyfriend becomes a whirlwind of emotions when a meeting with a handsome stranger tests her will. ",Drama
Due Date,"Peter Highman (Robert Downey Jr.) will be a dad for the first time when his wife gives birth in five days. He intends to catch a flight home from Atlanta so he can be there for the delivery, but a chance encounter with aspiring actor Ethan Tremblay (Zach Galifianakis) throws a monkey wrench into his plans. Desperate to reach his wife before their baby is born, Peter's sanity is tested when he must take a road trip cross-country with dog-toting Ethan. ",Comedy
Hereafter,"Three people set out on a spiritual journey after death touches their lives in different ways. George (Matt Damon) is a construction worker in San Francisco who can communicate with the dead. French reporter Marie LeLay (Cécile de France) has a supernatural vision after nearly dying in the 2004 Indian Ocean tsunami. Meanwhile, a London schoolboy suffers the loss of the person closest to him. ",Drama
Morning Glory,"In a provincial town, an actress harbors aspirations of greatness. Dying to be Broadway's next big thing, Eva Lovelace (Katharine Hepburn) finds her path to critical acclaim blocked by performers who've spent more time on the stage. But her career seems to be picking up steam when she catches the eye of theater mogul Joseph Sheridan (Douglas Fairbanks Jr.), and when another starlet's sudden absence threatens his production, Joseph looks to Eva to save his play. ",Comedy
Dog,"A teenage girl gets ready to go out to meet her boyfriend, despite her mother's disapproval of her clothes. ",Comedy
Letters to Juliet,"While visiting Verona, Italy, with her busy fiance, a young woman named Sophie (Amanda Seyfried) visits a wall where the heartbroken leave notes to Shakespeare's tragic heroine, Juliet Capulet. Finding one such letter from 1957, Sophie decides to write to its now elderly author, Claire (Vanessa Redgrave). Inspired by Sophie's actions, Claire sets out to find her long-lost lover, accompanied by her disapproving grandson (Christopher Egan) and Sophie. ",Adventure
Antichrist,An Italian nobleman seeks help after his paralyzed daughter becomes possessed by the spirit of a malevolent ancestress. ,Drama
Youth in Revolt,"As a fan of Albert Camus and Jean-Luc Godard, teenage Nick Twisp (Michael Cera) is definitely out of his element when his mother and her boyfriend move the family to a trailer park. When a pretty neighbor named Sheeni (Portia Doubleday) plays records by French crooners, it's love at first sight for frustrated and inexperienced Nick. Learning that she is dating someone, Nick launches a hilarious quest to find his way into Sheeni's heart -- and bed. ",Comedy
In Her Shoes,"Irresponsible party girl Maggie (Cameron Diaz) is kicked out of her father's (Ken Howard) and stepmother's (Candice Azzara) home, where she lives for free, and is taken in by her hard-working sister, Philadelphia lawyer Rose (Toni Collette). After Maggie's disruptive ways ruin her sister's love life, Rose turns her out as well. But when their grandmother, who they never knew existed, comes into their lives, the sisters face some complicated truths about themselves and their family. ",Comedy
In Good Company,"After years of working as an ad executive at a sports magazine, Dan Foreman (Dennis Quaid) is demoted and replaced with Carter Duryea (Topher Grace), a rising star in the business world who is young enough to be Dan's son. Carter's business style leaves Dan shaking his head and wondering if the young man is ready for the corporate world. Dan's life is further complicated when he learns his wife is pregnant and Carter is dating his daughter, Alex (Scarlett Johansson). ",Comedy
Mona Lisa Smile,"Katherine Watson (Julia Roberts) is a recent UCLA graduate hired to teach art history at the prestigious all-female Wellesley College, in 1953. Determined to confront the outdated mores of society and the institution that embraces them, Katherine inspires her traditional students including Betty (Kirsten Dunst) and Joan (Julia Stiles) to challenge the lives they are expected to lead. ",Drama
Changing Lanes,"A rush-hour fender-bender on New York City's crowded FDR Drive, under most circumstances, wouldn't set off a chain reaction that could decimate two people's lives. But on this day, at this time, a minor collision will turn two complete strangers into vicious adversaries. Their means of destroying each other might be different, but their goals, ultimately, will be the same: Each will systematically try to dismantle the other's life in a reckless effort to reclaim something he has lost. ",Drama
Varsity Blues,"In West Canaan, Texas, high school football reigns supreme. When starting quarterback Lance Harbor (Paul Walker) turns up injured, the Coyotes' ruthless coach, Bud Kilmer (Jon Voight), must promote benchwarmer Jonathon ""Mox"" Moxon (James Van Der Beek) to lead the team in its quest for a divisional title. Suddenly thrown into the spotlight, Mox must deal with the pressure of carrying the aspirations of an entire town on his shoulders, as he struggles to pursue his own very different dreams. ",Comedy
Instinct,"Years after he goes missing in the jungles of Africa, anthropologist Ethan Powell (Anthony Hopkins) resurfaces when it's discovered that he has murdered two poachers who were killing the gorillas he was studying. After spending an extended time living with the primates and without any human contact, Powell seems to be unhinged, and psychiatrist Theo Caulder (Cuba Gooding Jr.) is called in to try to get through to the withdrawn and angry man -- who may be wiser and saner than he appears. ",Drama
Nell,"Cut off from the modern world, Nell (Jodie Foster) is a wild child, who has lived her entire life with her mother in an isolated mountain cabin in North Carolina. When her mother dies, she is found by kindly Dr. Jerome Lovell (Liam Neeson), who is fascinated by Nell and the language she has developed. Lovell and the equally curious psychologist Dr. Paula Olsen (Natasha Richardson) eventually camp out near Nell's cabin, slowly introducing her to the larger world she's never known. ",Drama
Miracle on 34th Street,"In this Christmas classic, an old man going by the name of Kris Kringle (Edmund Gwenn) fills in for an intoxicated Santa in Macy's annual Thanksgiving Day parade. Kringle proves to be such a hit that he is soon appearing regularly at the chain's main store in midtown Manhattan. When Kringle surprises customers and employees alike by claiming that he really is Santa Claus, it leads to a court case to determine his mental health and, more importantly, his authenticity. ",Drama
Flatliners,"Seeking answers about the afterlife, Chicago medical student Nelson (Kiefer Sutherland) persuades his fellow pupils to help him end his life, and then resuscitate him in the nick of time. Atheist David (Kevin Bacon), playboy Joe (William Baldwin) and troubled Rachel (Julia Roberts) also journey into the unknown, looking for meaning in their own lives. As the experiments become more perilous, each is forced to contend with the paranormal consequences of trespassing on the other side. ",Drama
Atrangi Re,"Runaway Rinku gets forcefully married to an already engaged Vishu. The love triangle gets weirder when Rinku's lover, Sajjad, shows up. ",Comedy
On the Rocks,"Faced with sudden doubts about her marriage, a young New York mother teams up with her larger-than-life playboy father to tail her husband. ",Comedy
The Ottoman Lieutenant,"A strong-willed woman, frustrated by ongoing injustice at home, leaves the United States after meeting Jude, an American doctor who runs a remote medical mission within the Ottoman Empire -- a world both exotic and dangerous, and on the brink of what is about to become the first World War. There, she finds her loyalty tested to both Jude and the mission's founder when she falls in love with their perceived enemy, a lieutenant in the Ottoman Imperial Army. ",Drama
The Space Between Us,"Gardner Elliot, the first human born on Mars, begins an online friendship with Tulsa, a teen in Colorado. On his maiden voyage to Earth, the 16-year-old finally gets to experience all the joys and wonders of a world he could only read about. Problems arise when scientists discover that Gardner's organs can't withstand the atmosphere. United with Tulsa and on the run, the interplanetary visitor races against time to unravel the mysteries of how he came to be, and where he belongs in the universe. ",Drama
Black Sea,"Soon after losing his salvage job, former naval officer Robinson (Jude Law) assembles a misfit crew of unemployed sailors for a risky mission: Find a sunken Nazi U-boat, rumored to contain a fortune in gold. Promising each man an equal share, Robinson leads the mixed British and Russian crew to comb the depths of the Black Sea. Before long, greed takes hold of a crew already divided along language and cultural lines -- and the fewer men that make it back alive, the more gold to go around. ",Adventure
The Mountain Between Us,"Stranded on a mountain after a tragic plane crash, two strangers must work together to endure the extreme elements of the remote, snow-covered terrain. Realizing that help is not on the way, they embark on a perilous journey across hundreds of miles of wilderness, pushing each other to survive and discovering their inner strength. ",Drama
A Bigger Splash,"While vacationing on a Sicilian island with her boyfriend (Matthias Schoenaerts), a rock star (Tilda Swinton) receives an unexpected visit from an old flame (Ralph Fiennes) and his seductive daughter (Dakota Johnson). ",Drama
Laggies,"When 28-year-old Megan attends her 10-year high-school reunion, she realizes that very little in her life has changed. An unexpected marriage proposal from her boyfriend sparks panic in Megan, causing her to wander off into the night. She meets 16-year-old Annika and proceeds to get drunk. Deciding she needs a break from her unfulfilling life, she tells her boyfriend she's going to a seminar but hangs with Annika. ",Comedy
Thanks for Sharing,A recovering sex addict (Mark Ruffalo) tries not to fall off the wagon as he woos a new girlfriend (Gwyneth Paltrow) who feels the need to express her rampant sexuality. ,Comedy
Step Up Revolution,"Newly arrived in Miami, young dancer Emily (Kathryn McCormick) dreams of becoming a professional. She soon meets and falls in love with Sean (Ryan Guzman), the leader of a dance crew called ""the Mob."" When a rich businessman's plans to develop the dancers' historic neighborhood threatens to displace thousands of people, Emily must join forces with Sean and the Mob to turn their performance art into protest art, even though doing so may place her dreams in jeopardy. ",Drama
Grudge Match,"Pittsburgh boxers Billy ""The Kid"" McDonnen (Robert De Niro) and Henry ""Razor"" Sharp (Sylvester Stallone) shared a fierce rivalry back in the 1980s. Each had scored a victory in two matches, but on the eve of their decisive third bout, Henry suddenly announced his retirement, effectively ending both boxers' careers. Thirty years later, boxing promoter Dante Slate Jr. (Kevin Hart) makes Billy and Henry an offer they can't refuse: Return to the ring and settle the score once and for all. ",Comedy
Our Idiot Brother,"Easygoing, dimwitted slacker Ned Rochlin (Paul Rudd) makes the biggest mistake of his so-far uninspired life when he sells some pot to a cop. Homeless and jobless upon his release from jail, Ned must prevail upon his three sisters (Elizabeth Banks, Zooey Deschanel, Emily Mortimer) for help. Though Ned himself is utterly without a shred of ambition or guile, it's a different story with his sisters, who find their carefully ordered lives thrown into chaos whenever he's around. ",Comedy
Everything Must Go,"Longtime salesman Nick Halsey (Will Ferrell) has seen better days. No longer at the top of his game, Nick, an alcoholic, loses his job for showing up drunk one too many times. On the same day, he finds that his wife has dumped him -- and his possessions -- on the front lawn of their home. Facing the fact that his life is collapsing around him, Nick holds a giant yard sale that turns into a unique survival strategy. Based on a short story by Raymond Carver. ",Drama
Monsters,A married couple decides that letting go may be biggest proof of love. ,Adventure
Stake Land,"After a plague turns America into a realm of vampires, a hunter (Nick Damici) of the depraved creatures travels cross-country with an orphan (Connor Paolo) he rescued, searching for a safe haven. ",Drama
The Company You Keep,"Decades after an ill-fated robbery, a former member (Susan Sarandon) of the Weather Underground turns herself in to authorities. While covering the story, reporter Ben Shepard (Shia LaBeouf) discovers that recently widowed lawyer Jim Grant (Robert Redford) was also a member of that particular group. Grant slips by the FBI agents tracking him and goes on the run, hoping to track down his former lover, Mimi (Julie Christie), who's still underground and fighting for the cause. ",Drama
Burlesque,"Ali (Christina Aguilera), a small-town gal with a great voice, leaves a troubled life behind and follows her dreams to Los Angeles. She lands a job as a cocktail waitress at the Burlesque Lounge, a once-majestic theater that houses an inspired musical revue led by Tess (Cher), the proprietor. Ali vows to perform there and, with the help of a savvy stage manager and a gender-bending host, she makes the leap from bar to stage, helping restore the club's former glory. ",Drama
Choke,"Destitute, a sex addict (Sam Rockwell) fakes choking in expensive restaurants, whose patrons ""save"" him, then fund his hospitalized mother's care. ",Comedy
The Experiment,"After Hurricane Katrina devastates the Gulf Coast, New Orleans' entire school system revises its curriculum -- after decades of poor education. ",Drama
17 Again,"Mike O'Donnell (Matthew Perry) was a high-school basketball star with a bright future, but he threw it all away to marry his girlfriend and raise their child. Almost 20 years later, Mike's marriage has failed, his kids think he's a loser, and his job is going nowhere. He gets a chance to correct the mistakes of his past and change his life when he is miraculously transformed into a teenager (Zac Efron), but in trying to fix his past, Mike may be jeopardizing his present and future. ",Comedy
The Giver,"Jonas (Brenton Thwaites) lives in a seemingly idyllic world of conformity and contentment. When he begins to spend time with The Giver (Jeff Bridges), an old man who is the sole keeper of the community's memories, Jonas discovers the dangerous truths of his community's secret past. Armed with the power of knowledge, Jonas realizes that he must escape from their world to protect himself and those he loves -- a challenge no one has ever completed successfully. ",Drama
The Last Kiss,"Italian couple Giulia (Giovanna Mezzogiorno) and Carlo (Stefano Accorsi) are in a happy and stable relationship. But when Giulia reveals she's pregnant, Carlo is terrified of the responsibility that a child represents. He becomes infatuated with a young woman he meets at a wedding, Francesca (Martina Stella), and pursues what he thinks will be a carefree tryst. Meanwhile, his friends and relatives deal with their own relationship issues in odd ways, including infidelity and travel plans. ",Comedy
In the Land of Women,"After a bad breakup with his girlfriend leaves him heartbroken, Carter Webb (Adam Brody) moves to Michigan to take care of his ailing grandmother (Olympia Dukakis). Once there, he gets mixed up in the lives of the mother (Meg Ryan) and daughters who live across the street. ",Comedy
Click,"Michael Newman (Adam Sandler) seems to have it all but his wife, Donna (Kate Beckinsale), is increasingly frustrated by the amount of time he has to spend at work. Michael cannot find time to be at home until he meets an eccentric inventor (Christopher Walken) who gives him a universal remote that controls time. At first he happily skips the boring times until he realizes the remote is in control of his life and he learns to cherish all the precious moments with his family. ",Comedy
Melinda and Melinda,"While dining out with friends, Sy (Wallace Shawn) suggests the difficulty of separating comedy from tragedy. To illustrate his point, he tells his guests two parallel stories about Melinda (Radha Mitchell) ; both versions have the same basic elements, but one take on her state of affairs leans toward levity, while the other is full of anguish. Each story involves Melinda coping with a recent divorce through substance abuse while beginning a romantic relationship with a close friend's husband. ",Comedy
Spanglish,"Mexican immigrant and single mother Flor Moreno (Paz Vega) finds housekeeping work with Deborah (Téa Leoni) and John Clasky (Adam Sandler), a well-off couple with two children of their own. When Flor admits she can't handle the schedule because of her daughter, Cristina (Shelbie Bruce), Deborah decides they should move into the Clasky home. Cultures clash and tensions run high as Flor and the Claskys struggle to share space while raising their children on their own, and very different, terms. ",Comedy
Shortbus,"John Cameron Mitchell's SHORTBUS explores the lives of several emotionally challenged characters as they navigate the comic and tragic intersections between love and sex in and around a modern-day underground salon. A sex therapist who has never had an orgasm, a dominatrix who is unable to connect, a gay couple who are deciding whether to open up their relationship, and the people who weave in and out of their lives, all converge on a weekly gathering called Shortbus: a mad nexus of art, music, politics, and polysexual carnality. Set in a post-9/11, Bush-exhausted New York City, SHORTBUS tells its story with sexual frankness, suggesting new ways to reconcile questions of the mind, pleasures of the flesh, and imperatives of the heart. ",Comedy
Beyond Borders,An American socialite (Angelina Jolie) living in London joins a renegade doctor's (Clive Owen) humanitarian efforts in war-torn nations. ,Adventure
Keeping the Faith,"Best friends since they were kids, Rabbi Jacob Schram (Ben Stiller) and Father Brian Finn (Edward Norton) are dynamic and popular young men living and working on New York's Upper West Side. When Anna Reilly (Jenna Elfman), once their childhood friend and now grown into a beautiful corporate executive, suddenly returns to the city, she reenters Jake and Brian's lives and hearts with a vengeance. Sparks fly and an unusual and complicated love triangle ensues. ",Comedy
Along Came a Spider,"A psychological suspense thriller adapted from James Patterson's first highly acclaimed novel in the Alex Cross series, Morgan Freeman reprises his role as the Washington, D.C. police detective and psychologist who is through playing mind games with criminals -- that is until a methodical predator, Gary Soneji (Michael Wincott) commits a daring kidnapping and lures Cross into the case. ",Drama
Rules of Engagement,"Col. Terry Childers (Samuel L. Jackson) is a 30-year Marine veteran: a decorated officer with combat experience in Vietnam, Beirut and Desert Storm -- a patriot, a hero. But now, the country he served so well has put him on trial for a rescue mission that went terribly wrong. For his attorney, he has chosen Marine Col. Hays Hodges (Tommy Lee Jones), a comrade-in-arms who owes his life to Childers. ",Drama
Big Daddy,"Thirty-two-year-old Sonny Koufax (Adam Sandler) has spent his whole life avoiding responsibility. But when his girlfriend dumps him for an older man, he's got to find a way to prove he's ready to grow up. In a desperate last-ditch effort, Sonny adopts 5-year-old Julian (Dylan Sprouse), (Cole Sprouse) to impress her. She's not impressed ... and he can't return the kid. Uh-oh for Sonny! ",Comedy
Tin Cup,"Roy McAvoy (Kevin Costner) was a golf pro with a bright future, but his rebellious nature and bad attitude cost him everything. Now working as a golf instructor, he falls for his newest pupil, Dr. Molly Griswold (Rene Russo), a psychiatrist who happens to be the girlfriend of PGA Tour star and Roy's rival, David Simms (Don Johnson). After he is humiliated by Simms at a celebrity golf tournament, McAvoy decides to make a run for the PGA Tour, as well as Molly's heart. ",Comedy
Phenomenon,"On his birthday, mechanic George Malley (John Travolta) sees a flash of light and proceeds to exhibit extraordinary mental abilities. He becomes a genius, even showing an ability to move objects with his mind. George wishes to help people, but the government wants to take him in for observation. Soon, George finds out from Dr. Brunder (Robert Duvall) that he has a massive brain tumor. With this new knowledge, George decides to spend his time with girlfriend Lace (Kyra Sedgwick). ",Drama
Crash,The exhausted mother of a newborn and a man seen leaving the scene of an accident hurdle headlong into a confrontation. ,Drama
The Craft,"After transferring to a Los Angeles high school, Sarah (Robin Tunney) finds that her telekinetic gift appeals to a group of three wannabe witches, who happen to be seeking a fourth member for their rituals. Bonnie (Neve Campbell), Rochelle (Rachel True) and Nancy (Fairuza Balk), like Sarah herself, all have troubled backgrounds, which combined with their nascent powers lead to dangerous consequences. When a minor spell causes a fellow student to lose her hair, the girls grow power-mad. ",Drama
It Could Happen to You,An attorney gallantly defends his adopted brother against murder charges. ,Comedy
Single White Female,"Having recently split from fiancé Sam Rawson (Steven Weber), Allison Jones (Bridget Fonda) welcomes new roommate Hedra Carlson (Jennifer Jason Leigh). The young women quickly form a bond, but as Allison starts to rethink her engagement, Hedra grows jealous and hostile. As Allison learns new details about her roommate's life, Hedra gets violent in her efforts to get Sam out of the picture. With Hedra turning more menacing by the minute, Allison finally understands what she's up against. ",Drama
Lord of the Flies,"In this updated take on William Golding's classic novel, a group of American military schoolboys become marooned on a remote island after a plane crash. While initially cooperative, after the discovery of a ""beast,"" the boys split into two warring camps, one headed by the liberal-minded Ralph (Balthazar Getty), the other by the militaristic Jack (Chris Furrh). Their society begins to descend into violence, and boys soon learn there's a thin line between society and savagery. ",Adventure
Always,"Aerial firefighter Pete (Richard Dreyfuss) risks himself and his vintage World War II airplane in a constant and death-defying quest to fight forest wildfires, much to the dismay of his girlfriend, Dorinda (Holly Hunter). His love for Dorinda and the advice of fellow pilot Al (John Goodman) convince Pete to give up his perilous career, but he flies one last mission. Pete heroically saves Al's plane from certain destruction, but with supernatural consequences. ",Drama
Peggy Sue Got Married,"Peggy Sue Bodell (Kathleen Turner) attends her 25-year high school reunion after separating from her cheating husband, Charlie (Nicolas Cage). She regrets the decisions she has made in her life, such as getting pregnant by Charlie in high school. When she faints at the reunion, she awakens in 1960. Given the chance to relive her life, she changes many things. However, some choices are more complicated, as she begins to see young Charlie's charm and true feelings. ",Comedy
The Great Gatsby,"Although she is married to another man, Gatsby, a millionaire, woos his dream girl. ",Drama
Prospect,A teenage girl and her father try to strike it rich on a toxic alien planet. ,Adventure
The Beguiled,"Cpl. John McBurney is an injured Union soldier who finds himself on the run as a deserter during the Civil War. He seeks refuge at an all-female Southern boarding school where the teachers and students seem more than willing to help. Soon, sexual tensions lead to dangerous rivalries as the women tend to his wounded leg while offering him comfort and companionship. ",Drama
Cargo,A young German stowaway (Daniel Brühl) learns terrible secrets about a ship traveling to Europe. ,Drama
Delivery Man,"Amiable slacker David Wozniak (Vince Vaughn) drives a delivery truck for his family's company and is content with a life of mediocrity. However, when he learns that he is the biological father of more than 500 offspring and many of them are suing to learn his identity, he decides to hold himself accountable for his actions. He finds some of his progeny and becomes involved in their lives; however, when David's girlfriend announces her pregnancy, she keeps her expectations low. ",Comedy
Third Person,"An acclaimed novelist (Liam Neeson) struggles to write an analysis of love in one of three stories, each set in a different city, that detail the beginning, middle and end of a relationship. ",Drama
Hours,"""The Hours"" is the story of three women searching for more potent, meaningful lives. Each is alive at a different time and place, all are linked by their yearnings and their fears. Their stories intertwine, and finally come together in a surprising, transcendent moment of shared recognition. ",Drama
Young Adult,"Mavis Gary (Charlize Theron) is a successful writer of teen literature who returns to her hometown with a dual mission: to relive her glory days and steal away her now-married high-school sweetheart (Patrick Wilson). However, her mission does not go exactly to plan, and she finds her homecoming more problematic than she expected. Instead, Mavis forms an unusual bond with a former classmate (Patton Oswalt), who has also found it difficult to move past high school. ",Comedy
Hope Springs,"British artist Colin Ware (Colin Firth) discovers that his fiancée, Vera (Minnie Driver), is going to marry another man. Distraught and despondent, he gets on a plane for America and ends up in the tiny town of Hope in New England. At first, Colin is depressed, but he soon finds more than a shoulder to cry on when his innkeepers introduce him to Mandy (Heather Graham), a beautiful nurse. All's going well and Colin has almost forgotten his old flame until Vera shows up with a surprise of her own. ",Comedy
Cyrus,"Seven years after his divorce, John (John C. Reilly) has given up hope that he will find love again. Then he meets Molly (Marisa Tomei), and romance quickly blossoms. But she is unusually hesitant to bring him to her house and, when he secretly follows her home, he learns why: Cyrus (Jonah Hill), Molly's grown son, refuses to share her with anyone. John soon finds himself locked in a battle of wills with a possessive man-child. ",Comedy
Funny People,"Recently learning that he has a fatal disease, comic George Simmons (Adam Sandler) spots a struggling performer named Ira (Seth Rogen) and decides to become his mentor. The men become close friends as George teaches Ira the art of stand-up comedy, and Ira helps George define his legacy. When an old flame (Leslie Mann) reappears and the disease goes into remission, George gets a chance to re-evaluate his life and figure out what is truly important to him. ",Comedy
You Will Meet a Tall Dark Stranger,"Two married couples find only trouble and heartache as their complicated lives unfold. After 40 years of marriage, Alfie leaves his wife to pursue what he thinks is happiness with a call girl. His wife, Helena, reeling from abandonment, decides to follow the advice of a psychic. Sally, the daughter of Alfie and Helena, is unhappy in her marriage and develops a crush on her boss, while her husband, Roy, falls for a woman engaged to be married. ",Comedy
To All the Boys: Always and Forever,"As Lara Jean Covey prepares for the end of high school and the start of adulthood, a pair of life-changing trips lead her to reimagine what life with her family, friends, and Peter will look like after graduation. ",Comedy
Take Me Home Tonight,"Recent MIT grad Matt Franklin (Topher Grace) should be well on his way to a successful career at a Fortune 500 company, but instead, he rebels against maturity by taking a job at a video store. Matt rethinks his position when his unrequited high-school crush, Tori (Teresa Palmer), walks in and invites him to an end-of-summer party. With the help of his twin sister (Anna Faris) and his best friend (Dan Fogler), Matt hatches a plan to change the course of his life. ",Comedy
No Reservations,"Master chef Kate Armstrong (Catherine Zeta-Jones) runs her life and her kitchen with intimidating intensity. However, a recipe for disaster may be in the works when she becomes the guardian of her young niece (Abigail Breslin) while crossing forks with the brash sous-chef (Aaron Eckhart) who just joined her staff. Though romance blooms in the face of rivalry, Kate needs to look outside the kitchen to find true happiness. ",Comedy
A Long Way Down,Four strangers who planned to jump off the same roof on New Year's Eve join together as a kind of family and give themselves six weeks to find valid reasons to live. ,Comedy
Stick It,"Haley (Missy Peregrym) is a naturally gifted athlete but, with her social behavior, the teen seems intent on squandering her abilities. After a final brush with the law, a judge sentences her to an elite gymnastics academy run by a legendary, hard-nosed coach (Jeff Bridges). Once there, Haley's rebellious attitude wins her both friends and enemies. ",Comedy
Tideland,"Little Jeliza-Rose (Jodelle Ferland) has a very warped childhood. Her parents (Jeff Bridges, Jennifer Tilly) are both drug addicts, and one of her daily chores is to prepare their syringes. After her mother dies of an overdose, her father, Noah, takes her away to his childhood home, but his own mother has passed away and the house is decaying. Then Noah overdoses, and while his body rots in his chair, Jeliza-Rose meets a taxidermist and her unstable brother. ",Drama
Elizabethtown,"Aspiring young shoe designer Drew Baylor (Orlando Bloom) gets fired from his high-profile job after the failure of his latest project. To make matters worse, his girlfriend, Ellen (Jessica Biel), leaves him, and he becomes suicidal. Drew's morbid plans are interrupted by the news of his father's death, and he is called back to his Kentucky hometown. On his flight home, he meets the lovely Claire (Kirsten Dunst), a sunny flight attendant who tries to help him embrace life once again. ",Comedy
Barbershop,"A smart comedy about a day in the life of a barbershop on the south side of Chicago. Calvin (Ice Cube), who inherited the struggling business from his deceased father, views the shop as nothing but a burden and a waste of his time. After selling the shop to a local loan shark, Calvin slowly begins to see his father's vision and legacy and struggles with the notion that he just sold it out. ",Comedy
Rock Star,"A comedy set in the world of '80s rock 'n' roll, ""Rock Star"" is the story of an office supplies salesman who moonlights as a musician in a tribute band and whose life is changed forever when he is chosen out of the blue to replace the lead singer of his all-time favorite band, Steel Dragon. ",Drama
Sabrina,A toy manufacturer and his wife are terrorized by a demon after their orphaned niece tries to summon her late mother's spirit using a strange ritual. ,Comedy
Frankenstein,A female scientist's (Helen McCrory) research leads to the creation of a modern-day monster. ,Drama
Forever Young,"A young publicist attends a meeting and encounters a girl he connects with. Together they reminisce about the most attractive and emotional time of his childhood, his dreams and desires, and the last summer they spent with the gang. ",Drama
Doc Hollywood,"Cocky young doctor Ben Stone (Michael J. Fox) is off on a road trip to California in pursuit of a relaxed and high-paying career as a plastic surgeon to the rich and famous. But before he can pass the Mississippi River, he crashes his car on a small-town judge's property in South Carolina and incurs a community service fine, to be served out at the local hospital assisting the aged town doctor, Dr. Hogue (Barnard Hughes). Ben is soon tempted to stay by a pretty ambulance driver (Julie Warner). ",Comedy
Mystic Pizza,"""Mystic Pizza"" charts the lives and loves of three unforgettable waitresses in a little town called Mystic. For sexy Daisy Araujo (Julia Roberts), her sensible sister Kat (Annabeth Gish) and their wisecracking friend Jojo (Lili Taylor), the summer after high school is a summer they'll never forget. Slinging pizza at a local restaurant, the three girls share their hopes, dreams and plans for escaping their small town. ",Comedy
The Perfection,A troubled musical prodigy and a new star pupil embark down a sinister path. ,Drama
Wonder Wheel,"Four peoples' lives intertwine amid the hustle and bustle of the Coney Island amusement park in the 1950s: Ginny, an emotionally volatile former actress now working as a waitress in a clam house; Humpty, Ginny's rough-hewn carousel operator husband; Mickey, a handsome young lifeguard who dreams of becoming a playwright; and Carolina, Humpty's long-estranged daughter, who is now hiding out from gangsters at her father's apartment. ",Drama
Colossal,"Gloria is an out-of-work party girl who leaves New York and moves back to her hometown after getting kicked out of her apartment by her boyfriend. When news reports surface that a giant creature is destroying Seoul, South Korea, Gloria gradually comes to the realization that she is somehow connected to this far-off phenomenon. As events begin to spiral out of control, she must figure out why her seemingly insignificant existence is having such a colossal effect on the fate of the world. ",Comedy
Krampus,"While the holiday season represents the most magical time of year, ancient European folklore warns of Krampus, a horned beast who punishes naughty children at Christmastime. When dysfunctional family squabbling causes young Max (Emjay Anthony) to lose his festive spirit, it unleashes the wrath of the fearsome demon. As Krampus lays siege to the Engel home, mom (Toni Collette), pop (Adam Scott), sister (Stefania LaVie Owen) and brother must band together to save one another from a monstrous fate. ",Comedy
Girls Trip,"Best friends Ryan, Sasha, Lisa and Dina are in for the adventure of a lifetime when they travel to New Orleans for the annual Essence Festival. Along the way, they rekindle their sisterhood and rediscover their wild side by doing enough dancing, drinking, brawling and romancing to make the Big Easy blush. ",Adventure
Before I Wake,"Foster parents Mark and Jessie welcome 8-year-old Cody into their home. The boy tells Jessie that he's terrified to fall asleep, but she assumes it's just a natural fear for any young child. The couple become startled when their dead biological son suddenly appears in their living room. To their surprise, Cody's dreams can magically become real but so can his nightmares. Mark and Jessie must now uncover the truth behind Cody's mysterious ability before his imagination harms them all. ",Drama
Trainwreck,"Ever since her father drilled into her head that monogamy isn't realistic, magazine writer Amy (Amy Schumer) has made promiscuity her credo. As much as she enjoys an uninhibited life free of commitment, Amy is really in a rut. While writing a profile about charming and successful sports doctor Aaron Conners (Bill Hader), she finds herself actually falling in love for the first time -- and what's more, Aaron seems to like her too. Amy starts to wonder if it's time to clean up her act. ",Comedy
The Shack,"After suffering a family tragedy, Mack Phillips spirals into a deep depression that causes him to question his innermost beliefs. Facing a crisis of faith, he receives a mysterious letter urging him to an abandoned shack in the Oregon wilderness. Despite his doubts, Mack journeys to the shack and encounters an enigmatic trio of strangers led by a woman named Papa. Through this meeting, Mack finds important truths that will transform his understanding of his tragedy and change his life forever. ",Drama
Blockers,"Julie, Kayla and Sam are three high school seniors who make a pact to lose their virginity on prom night. Lisa, Mitchell and Hunter are three overprotective parents who flip out when they find out about their daughters' plans. They soon join forces for a wild and chaotic quest to stop the girls from sealing the deal -- no matter what the cost. ",Comedy
Palo Alto,A lack of parental guidance encourages teens in an affluent California town to rebel with substance abuse and casual sex. ,Drama
Endless Love,"Parental disapproval of two teenage lovers (Brooke Shields, Martin Hewitt) causes a confusion of arson, death and insanity. ",Drama
Maps to the Stars,"Driven by an intense need for fame and validation, members of a dysfunctional Hollywood dynasty have lives as dramatic as any movie. ",Comedy
Adoration,"A straightforward translation assignment in a high school French class leads to unexpected drama for Simon (Devon Bostick), an imaginative Canadian student, and his teacher, Sabine (Arsinée Khanjian). The son of a Palestinian father, Simon takes an article about a terrorist plot and weaves it into his own tragic family history. Encouraged by Sabine, Simon passes the tale off as a true story -- but the ramifications of this action, which end up online, deliver surprising results. ",Drama
American Mary,Mary Mason (Katharine Isabelle) is lured into a world of freakish surgeries for easy money. ,Drama
This Is 40,"After many years of marriage, Pete (Paul Rudd) is the sole male in a household that includes his wife, Debbie (Leslie Mann), and two young daughters (Iris Apatow, Maude Apatow). As Pete struggles to keep his record label afloat, he and Debbie navigate a three-week course of sex and romance, career victories and financial hardships, aging parents and maturing children. They'll have to learn to forgive, forget and enjoy the rest of their lives -- before they kill each other. ",Comedy
A Little Bit of Heaven,A 12-year-old singing sensation loses her voice when her parents refuse to give in to her harebrained schemes. ,Comedy
Jug Jugg Jeeyo,Two couples from different generations confront their issues after marriage. ,Comedy
Frozen,A performance artist turns his suicide into a work of art by melting ice with his body. ,Adventure
Diary of a Wimpy Kid,"Middle school is not an enjoyable experience for preteen Greg Heffley (Zachary Gordon) but a horrid ordeal of social land-mines that he must bear. To do so, he devises schemes to win him the recognition and status he feels he deserves -- all of which fail miserably. Greg chronicles his misadventures, thoughts and opinions in a diary to prepare for the day that he will no longer have to put up with nonsense. ",Comedy
Wall Street: Money Never Sleeps,"Following a long prison term for insider trading, Gordon Gekko (Michael Douglas) finds himself on the outside looking in at a world he once commanded. Ostensibly hoping to repair his broken relationship with his daughter, Gekko forges an alliance with her fiance, Jake (Shia LaBeouf). Although Jake comes to view Gordon as a father figure, he learns the hard way that Gekko is still a master manipulator who will stop at nothing to achieve his goals. ",Drama
Step Up 2: The Streets,"When rebellious street dancer Andie (Briana Evigan) enrolls at the prestigious Maryland School of the Arts, she finds it difficult to adapt. Joining forces with Chase (Robert Hoffman), the hottest dancer at the school, she finds a way to merge her old life and the new by forming a team of misfit classmates and training with them to compete in an underground dance contest known as The Streets. ",Drama
Sydney White,"College freshman Sydney White (Amanda Bynes) arrives at Southern Atlantic University, determined to pledge her late mother's sorority. Unfortunately, she finds that the sisterhood has changed since her parent's day. Banished to a condemned house, Sydney joins forces with seven outcasts to take over the student government and win equal rights for nerd and noted alike. ",Comedy
Man of the Year,"Tom Dobbs (Robin Williams), the satirical host of a political talk show, decides to shake things up by running for president after making comments that he would be a better president than the leader who currently occupies the White House. His fans begin a grassroots campaign that catapults him into the Oval Office, but soon after moving in it is revealed a computer glitch mistakenly awarded him the presidency. Tom is left with a tough choice, stay the course or head back behind the microphone. ",Comedy
Prime,"Rafi Gardet (Uma Thurman) is a 37-year-old divorced Catholic businesswoman falling for David (Bryan Greenberg), a 23-year-old Jewish artist. With the help of her therapist, Dr. Lisa Metzger (Meryl Streep), Rafi tries to overcome her insecurities and accept the age difference between her and David. But when Lisa learns more about her client's new love, she realizes that David is her son. As Lisa tries to separate the couple, Rafi and David fear that they may not be right for each other after all. ",Comedy
Alfie,"British-born ladies' man Alfie (Jude Law) exploits his job as a New York City limousine driver to meet and sleep with attractive women -- which infuriates his pseudo-girlfriend Julie (Marisa Tomei), a single mom. His libertine lifestyle is interrupted, however, when his girl-crazy ways end up hurting his best friend, Marlon (Omar Epps). Desperate, Alfie attempts a go at monogamy with the ravishing Nikki (Sienna Miller), but even her good looks aren't enough to keep him out of trouble for long. ",Comedy
Shall We Dance?,"Despite having a great career and a loving family, lawyer John Clark (Richard Gere) is missing something in his life as he meanders listlessly from day to day. On his commute back home one night, Clark notices a stunning woman (Jennifer Lopez) in a dance studio and decides on a whim to join a class for ballroom dancing. While Clark finds a new spark in his life, his wife, Beverly (Susan Sarandon), grows suspicious of his frequent absences, since he decides to keep his dancing a secret. ",Comedy
Fever Pitch,"When Ben Wrightman (Jimmy Fallon), a young teacher, begins dating pretty businesswoman Lindsey Meeks (Drew Barrymore), the two don't seem to have a lot of the same interests, but they fall in love, regardless. Their romance goes well until baseball season begins, and Lindsey soon realizes that Ben is completely obsessed with the Boston Red Sox. Though she tries to understand Ben's passionate team loyalty, eventually it threatens to end their otherwise happy relationship. ",Comedy
Jersey Girl,"Ollie Trinke (Ben Affleck) is young and at the top of his game as a music promoter. He is both a workaholic and a silver-tongued expert at manipulating the press. At a company Christmas party, Ollie meets Gertrude Steiney (Jennifer Lopez), a book editor for a New York publishing house. They are instantly attracted to each other, and begin a whirlwind romance that changes the course of his personal and professional life. ",Comedy
Orange County,A smart high-school student with his heart set on going to Stanford is horrified when his guidance counselor accidentally sends the wrong transcript with his college application. He spends the rest of the film trying to prove that he's actually a good student with a terrific grade-point average. ,Comedy
Save the Last Dance,"Sara (Julia Stiles) is moved from a small Midwestern town to the south side of Chicago when her mother dies in a car accident, and must live with her father. She soon falls for an African American teenager (Sean Patrick Thomas) at her new high school and he has less than an idyllic past. They share a love for dance (ballet and hip hop respectively) and together they tackle the problems that go with an interracial relationship. ",Drama
Message in a Bottle,"During her morning jog on the beach, journalist Theresa Osborne (Robin Wright Penn) discovers a bottle protruding from the sand. Inside it, she finds a heartbreaking, anonymous love letter. After her paper publishes the letter, Osborne tracks down the letter's reclusive author, world-weary widower Garret Blake (Kevin Costner), in the Carolinas. But, as Osborne finds herself falling hopelessly in love with Blake, she becomes wracked with guilt over the real impetus for her visit. ",Drama
Practical Magic,"Sally (Sandra Bullock) and Gillian Owens (Nicole Kidman), born into a magical family, have mostly avoided witchcraft themselves. But when Gillian's vicious boyfriend, Jimmy Angelov (Goran Visnjic), dies unexpectedly, the Owens sisters give themselves a crash course in hard magic. With policeman Gary Hallet (Aidan Quinn) growing suspicious, the girls struggle to resurrect Angelov -- and unwittingly inject his corpse with an evil spirit that threatens to end their family line. ",Comedy
Fear,A woman (Ingrid Bergman) who cheats on her busy husband (Mathias Wieman) falls prey to blackmail in order to save her marriage. ,Drama
Wolf,A search party for missing men turns into a deadly fight for survival when Roman soldiers encounter a pack of bloodthirsty werewolves. ,Drama
Sleeping with the Enemy,"After faking her death in order to flee from her violent husband, Martin (Patrick Bergin), Laura Burney (Julia Roberts) leaves Cape Cod and moves to Iowa, where she adopts a new identity and starts dating a local teacher, Ben Woodward (Kevin Anderson). Martin, meanwhile, unearths evidence suggesting that she isn't dead, and when her mother confirms this, he tracks her to Iowa. He finds Laura and Ben and confronts them, forcing her to fight for her life once again. ",Drama
Flashdance,"Alex Owens (Jennifer Beals) is a beautiful young woman who works a day job in a steel mill and dances in a bar at night. When Alex discovers that her handsome boss, Nick Hurley (Michael Nouri), is both interested in her and supportive of her performing career, she renews her efforts to get accepted into a prestigious dance conservatory. Although Alex is frightened of failure, she is cheered on by Nick, as well as by her mentor, former ballet performer Hanna Long (Lilia Skala). ",Drama
Book Club,"Four friends' lives are turned upside down when their book club tackles the infamous ""50 Shades of Grey."" From discovering new romance to rekindling old flames, they inspire each other to make their next chapter the best chapter. ",Comedy
I Kill Giants,A teen must face her fears in increasingly dangerous ways when horrible giants threaten to destroy her small town. ,Drama
We Are Your Friends,"Young Cole Carter (Zac Efron) dreams of hitting the big time as a Hollywood disc jockey, spending his days and nights hanging with buddies and working on the one track that will set the world on fire. Opportunity comes knocking when he meets James Reed, a charismatic DJ who takes the 23-year-old under his wing. Soon, his seemingly clear path to success gets complicated when he starts falling for his mentor's girlfriend, jeopardizing his new friendship and the future he seems destined to fulfill. ",Drama
A Hologram for the King,A beautiful doctor (Sarita Choudhury) and a wise-cracking taxi driver (Alexander Black) help an American businessman (Tom Hanks) who's trying to close the deal of a lifetime in Saudi Arabia. ,Comedy
Drinking Buddies,"Although they're both dating other people, two co-workers (Olivia Wilde, Jake Johnson) hang out together in bars and try to ignore their mutual attraction. ",Comedy
Dear White People,A campus culture war between blacks and whites at a predominantly white school comes to a head when the staff of a humor magazine stages an offensive Halloween party. ,Comedy
Magic Mike,"By day, Mike (Channing Tatum) makes ends meet any way he can -- handyman jobs, detailing cars or designing furniture. But nighttime is when Mike really gets to display his many talents: He's the hot headliner in an all-male revue. Mike sees potential in a 19-year-old he dubs the Kid (Alex Pettyfer), takes the teen under his wing and instructs him in the tricks of the trade. However, Mike learns there's a downside to the stripper lifestyle when it threatens his romance with the Kid's sister. ",Comedy
Friends with Kids,"In the wake of their friends' marriages and eventual offspring, longtime pals Julie (Jennifer Westfeldt) and Jason (Adam Scott) decide to have a child together without becoming a couple. By becoming ""time-share"" parents, they reason, they can experience the joys of parenthood without significantly curbing their personal freedom. However, when Julie and Jason both become involved with others, they discover that they secretly harbor romantic feelings for each other. ",Comedy
10 Years,"Former high-school friends (Channing Tatum, Rosario Dawson, Justin Long) meet again after a decade and discover that the passage of time has changed some things, but not others. ",Comedy
Larry Crowne,"Once well-respected at his company, Larry Crowne (Tom Hanks) finds himself on the unemployment line after a wave of corporate downsizing. Drowning in debt and unsure of what to do with his life, Larry enrolls in college, where he becomes part of a community of misfits who are all trying to carve out a better future. The possibility of romance enters the picture when Larry meets Mercedes Tainot (Julia Roberts), an instructor who has lost her passion for both teaching and her marriage. ",Comedy
Beautiful Creatures,"After being abused by her boyfriend, Tony (Iain Glen), Dorothy (Susan Lynch) leaves him. At a bus station, she sees Petula (Rachel Weisz) being attacked by her boyfriend, Brian (Tom Mannion), and knocks him out. The girls drag him to Petula's apartment, where he dies. Panicked, the pair fakes a kidnapping to get a ransom from Brian's psychotic brother, Ronnie (Maurice Roëves). When corrupt Inspector Hepburn (Alex Norton) is sent to investigate, he forces the women to cut him in on their scheme. ",Drama
Men,"In the aftermath of a personal tragedy, Harper (Jessie Buckley) retreats alone to the beautiful English countryside, hoping to have found a place to heal. But someone or something from the surrounding woods appears to be stalking her. What begins as simmering dread becomes a fully-formed nightmare, inhabited by her darkest memories and fears in visionary filmmaker Alex Garland's (Ex Machina, Annihilation) feverish, shape-shifting new horror film. ",Drama
Coriolanus,A fearless military leader seeking Rome's highest public office battles his enemies with catastrophe results. ,Drama
Greenberg,"Roger Greenberg (Ben Stiller), a failed musician now making a living as a carpenter in New York, returns to Los Angeles to house-sit for his brother (Chris Messina). He is stranded there -- since he doesn't drive -- until his brother's assistant, Florence (Greta Gerwig), comes to his rescue. She is as much a lost soul as he is, and as the pair begin spending more time together, they form a significant connection -- giving Roger a much-needed reason to be happy. ",Comedy
Step Up 3D,"New York's street-dancing underground forms the background for the tale of two tight-knit dancers, Luke (Rick Malambri) and Natalie (Sharni Vinson). The talented duo join forces with a New York University freshman named Moose (Adam G. Sevani) for a high-stakes showdown against the world's best hip-hop dancers. Win or lose, the contest will change their lives forever. ",Drama
Wild Child,"A young boy (Jean-Pierre Cargol) is discovered in a forest, living a feral existence among a pack of wolves. Captured by hunters, he is sent to Paris and placed in a school for deaf-mute children. There he is observed by Dr. Itard (François Truffaut) who concludes that the boy is neither deaf nor intellectually stunted, but has simply been deprived of normal, humanizing influences. With no shortage of tenderness, patience and ambition, Itard devotes himself to educating and civilizing the boy. ",Comedy
The Switch,A young hustler meets his match when he encounters a sexy older woman. ,Comedy
Bug,"At a rundown desert motel, Agnes (Ashley Judd) begins a tentative relationship with a newcomer named Peter (Michael Shannon). He has a strange charisma, one that offers fearful and unstable Agnes a flicker of hope. When Peter reveals that the military deliberately infected him with a bug and that he has tiny insects crawling under his skin, paranoia begins to envelop the desperate pair. ",Drama
The Final Cut,"In the future, microchips in people's heads record their experiences. Alan Hakman (Robin Williams), a ""cutter,"" edits footage from immoral dead people into pleasing narratives. Alan is troubled by childhood memories and has a difficult relationship with a bookstore clerk (Mira Sorvino). Fletcher (James Caviezel), an ex-cutter, offers Alan $500,000 for footage of a prominent technology manager. Alan refuses, but when he tries to destroy the footage, he learns a dark secret about himself. ",Drama
Uptown Girls,"Molly Gunn (Brittany Murphy) has never worked a day in her life and has lived like a queen since her father, a famous rock 'n' roll star, died and left her his fortune. But everything changes when Molly realizes that her manager has stolen her money. She lands a job as a nanny for Ray (Dakota Fanning), a young girl whose serious attitude is the opposite of Molly's carefree one. With help from her boyfriend, Neal (Jesse Spencer), Molly tries to bond with Ray and learn how to be an adult. ",Comedy
S1m0ne,"A contemporary satire on Hollywood, ""Simone"" is the story of disillusioned producer Viktor Taransky (Al Pacino), who creates the first totally believable synthetic actress, Simone. However, swept up by her instant success, including a major singing career, the producer cannot bear to admit his fraud to the world or himself. ",Comedy
28 Days,"The story of Gwen Cummings (Sandra Bullock), a successful New York writer living in the fast lane and everyone's favorite party girl -- until she gets drunk with boyfriend Jasper (Dominic West), borrows her sister's (Elizabeth Perkins) wedding limo and earns herself a stay in court-ordered rehab. ",Comedy
Edtv,"In a desperate attempt to boost ratings, a cable channel decides to document the life of someone on a daily basis and air the footage as a show. That lucky someone turns out to be Ed Pekurny (Matthew McConaughey), a laid-back video-store clerk. While the TV series makes Ed an overnight celebrity, it also begins to wreak havoc on his personal life, complicating his relationship with his new girlfriend, Shari (Jenna Elfman), and causing tension with his brother, Ray (Woody Harrelson). ",Comedy
Fools Rush In,"Three months after a one-night stand with Isabel Fuentes (Salma Hayek) in Las Vegas, New York City real estate developer Alex Whitman (Matthew Perry) learns she is pregnant. Despite being a terminal bachelor, Alex is drawn to Isabel, and the pair marries. Isabel's father, Miguel (Tomas Milian), suspects Alex has bad intentions, and the couple finds themselves pressured by both their families. When Alex is offered a promotion, he is torn between his new life in Las Vegas and success in New York. ",Comedy
Disclosure,"In this Michael Crichton adaptation, Tom Sanders (Michael Douglas) is a senior executive at a cutting-edge technology corporation on the verge of releasing an innovative new product. Sanders' boss, Bob Galvin (Donald Sutherland), is putting the final touches on a potentially lucrative merger and everything is in order for Tom until a vamp from his past, Meredith Johnson (Demi Moore), swoops in, stealing his impending promotion and then -- doubling down -- suing him for sexual harassment. ",Drama
D2: The Mighty Ducks,"An international competition for junior league hockey teams is being held in Los Angeles. Coach Gordon Bombay (Emilio Estevez) is picked to lead Team U.S.A. He reunites the ""Mighty Ducks,"" the teen misfits he once coached to victory. This time, crass sports promoter Tibbles (Michael Tucker) tempts the Ducks to cash in on their fame in lieu of practicing, but the team eventually gets back into training and takes on Iceland and their violence-prone coach, Wolf Stansson (Carsten Norgaard). ",Comedy
The Princess Switch,"One week before Christmas, a duchess switches places with an ordinary woman from Chicago, who looks exactly like her, and they each fall in love with each other's beaus. ",Comedy
Destination Wedding,"When Frank and Lindsay meet on their way to a destination wedding, they soon discover they have a lot in common: they both hate the bride, the groom, the wedding, themselves, and each other. As the weekend's events continually force them together -- and their cheerlessness immediately isolates them from the other guests -- Frank and Lindsay find that if you verbally spar with someone long enough, anything can happen. ",Comedy
Love,Astronaut Lee Miller (Gunner Wright) becomes stranded in the International Space Station after losing contact with Earth. ,Drama
Equals,An omnibus film on children's rights and the problems that the youngest members of our society have to face. Each story tackles a specific theme and has its own hero. ,Drama
The Machine,"In an effort to better understand the link between spirit and body, psychiatrist Marc Lacroix (Gérard Depardieu) constructs a device that can probe the brain of anyone attached to it. To test it, Marc recruits murderer Michel Zyto (Didier Bourdon) and connects them both to the machine -- but when their minds swap bodies during the process, the killer escapes. Worried his family is in danger, Marc sends his mistress, Marianne (Natalia Wörner), to warn his wife and child before it is too late. ",Action
Z for Zachariah,"Following a disaster that wipes out most of civilization, a scientist (Chiwetel Ejiofor) and a miner (Chris Pine) compete for the love of a woman (Margot Robbie) who may be the last female on Earth. ",Drama
The Last Song,A Korean woman working at a karaoke bar bonds with a mysterious stranger who refuses to leave at closing time. ,Drama
How to Be Single,"After four years of college, young Alice (Dakota Johnson) decides she needs a break from her long-term boyfriend Josh. Excited and ready for new challenges, the eager grad moves to New York to take a job as a paralegal. Helping her navigate her way through an unfamiliar city is Robin (Rebel Wilson), a fun-loving, wild co-worker who enjoys partying and one-night stands. With Robin as her freewheeling guide, Alice can now learn how to get free drinks, meet men and enjoy the single lifestyle. ",Comedy
Jayeshbhai Jordaar,"Ranveer Singh starrer JAYESHBHAI JORDAAR is set to release on 13 May 2022. With this film, Shalini Pandey will mark her debut in the Hindi film industry as a lead actress alongside Ranveer Singh. Produced by Maneesh Sharma, a home-grown producer at YRF, the film is being directed by debutant writer-director Divyang Thakkar. 'JAYESHBHAI JORDAAR' is a humorous entertainer set in Gujarat and Ranveer Singh will be seen playing the role of a Gujarati man. Ranveer as Jayeshbhai is the unlikely hero who will be seen championing the cause of women empowerment in this film. ",Comedy
Nights in Rodanthe,"When Adrienne Willis (Diane Lane) arrives at the coastal town of Rodanthe, N.C., her life is in chaos. There, she hopes to sort through the trouble surrounding her, while tending a friend's inn for the weekend. The only guest at the inn is Dr. Paul Flanner (Richard Gere), a man tormented by a crisis of conscience. As a storm approaches the coast, Paul and Adrienne find comfort and a life-changing romance. ",Drama
Ice Princess,"Casey Carlyle (Michelle Trachtenberg) is supposed to go to Harvard, just like her mother (Joan Cusack). While Casey has the grades to get into her mom's alma mater, what she really wants to do is pursue her passion: figure skating. Both Casey's mom and Gen (Hayden Panettiere), the captain of the local team, scoff at the idea of Casey on the ice. But Casey soon finds an unlikely ally, and coach, in Gen's mom, Tina (Kim Cattrall), a former skater trying to live down mistakes from her past. ",Comedy
Leatherheads,"Dodge Connolly (George Clooney), captain of a 1920s football team, wants to give the sagging sport a boost and capture the country's attention. He recruits Carter Rutherford (John Krasinski) to play for the team. Carter is not only a war hero, but he is also fast, handsome, and guaranteed to pack the stands with fans. Newswoman Lexie Littleton (Renée Zellweger) goes digging for dirt on Carter, while both Dodge and Carter try to score with her off the field. ",Comedy
Raising Helen,"Single and self-involved, Helen Harris (Kate Hudson) has a thriving fashion career and a lavish lifestyle in New York City. Helen is shocked to hear that her sister and brother-in-law have died in an accident, and alarmed that they have named her the guardian of their three kids (Hayden Panettiere, Spencer Breslin, Abigail Breslin). As the children struggle with the change, Helen has to decide whether she'll cling to her old ways or come to terms with her new family role. ",Comedy
On the Road,"An aspiring writer (Sam Riley), his new friend (Garrett Hedlund) and his friend's seductive wife (Kristen Stewart) heed the call of the open road. ",Adventure
Bridget Jones: The Edge of Reason,"The sequel to ""Bridget Jones's Diary"" finds Bridget (Renée Zellweger) working as a TV host and still dating barrister Mark (Colin Firth). But Bridget is jealous of the time Mark spends with a co-worker (Jacinda Barrett), and, despite a vacation meant to smooth things over, ends their relationship. On assignment in Thailand, she has a dalliance with her disreputable ex, Daniel (Hugh Grant), and is temporarily jailed on the false accusation of drug smuggling, before Mark comes to the rescue. ",Comedy
Shallow Hal,"The story revolves around Hal (Jack Black) who, taking his dying father's advice, dates only the embodiments of female physical perfection. But that all changes after Hal has an unexpected run-in with self-help guru Tony Robbins. Intrigued by Hal's shallowness, Robbins hypnotizes him into seeing the beauty that exists even in the least physically appealing women. ",Comedy
Never Been Kissed,"Josie Geller (Drew Barrymore), a baby-faced junior copywriter at the Chicago Sun-Times, must pose as a student at her former high school to research contemporary teenage culture. With the help of her brother, Rob (David Arquette), Josie infiltrates the inner circle of the most popular clique on campus. But she hits a major snag in her investigation -- not to mention her own failed love life -- when she falls for her dreamy English teacher, Sam Coulson (Michael Vartan). ",Comedy
Pushing Tin,"Two air traffic controllers (John Cusack, Billy Bob Thornton) who thrive on living dangerously compete to outdo each other on several levels. ",Comedy
Hope Floats,"Birdee Pruitt (Sandra Bullock) has been humiliated on live television by her best friend, Connie (Rosanna Arquette), who's been sleeping with Birdee's husband, Bill (Michael Paré). Birdee tries starting over with her daughter, Bernice (Mae Whitman), by returning to her small Texas hometown, but she's faced with petty old acquaintances who are thrilled to see Birdee unhappy -- except for her friend Justin (Harry Connick Jr.). As he helps Birdee get back on her feet, love begins to blossom. ",Drama
Indecent Proposal,"David (Woody Harrelson) and Diana Murphy (Demi Moore) are a loving couple with a bright future. David is a talented architect; Diana is a top-notch real estate agent. But when the recession hits, their finances take a nosedive. In a last-ditch effort to save their dream home, they head to Las Vegas to win their mortgage money gambling. After they lose everything, a mysterious billionaire (Robert Redford) offers the solution to their money problems: $1 million -- if he can sleep with Diana. ",Drama
Free Willy,"When maladjusted orphan Jesse (Jason James Richter) vandalizes a theme park, he is placed with foster parents and must work at the park to make amends. There he meets Willy, a young Orca whale who has been separated from his family. Sensing kinship, they form a bond and, with the help of kindly whale trainer Rae Lindley (Lori Petty), develop a routine of tricks. However, greedy park owner Dial (Michael Ironside) soon catches wind of the duo and makes plans to profit from them. ",Adventure
Step Up All In,"After struggling for a year to make it big in Hollywood, Sean's (Ryan Guzman) dance crew gives up and moves back to Miami. Not ready to relinquish his own dream quite yet, Sean remains in Los Angeles. When he hears about an upcoming dance competition in Las Vegas, Sean teams with talented dancers Andie (Briana Evigan) and Moose (Adam Sevani) to put together a new crew. Now with some old friends and some new faces, Sean and his crew intend to win. ",Drama
Rock of Ages,An Irish model converts an atheist by posing for a church mural. ,Comedy
Gehraiyaan,"Alisha runs her own yoga studio while seeking investors to back her yoga phone app. Flashbacks reveal a wealthy and idyllic childhood with extended family. For reasons she can't understand, her father dragged her and her mother away from that happiness into a life of isolation and need, which somehow led to her mother's suicide. All of that is the backdrop to an affair Alisa begins with her cousin Tia's fiancé, who is a go-getter real estate whiz kid who seems to have money to burn. ",Drama
Georgia Rule,"Teenage Rachel (Lindsay Lohan) is a real thorn in the side of her mother, Lilly (Felicity Huffman). More than just rebellious, she is incorrigible. After Rachel crashes a car, Lilly decides to haul the girl off to a place to which she vowed never to return: Her own mother's (Jane Fonda) Idaho home. Georgia, the family matriarch, lives by a strict code and expects all under her roof to do the same. Given structure and purpose, Rachel's anger at the world begins to subside. ",Comedy
Catch and Release,"A woman (Jennifer Garner) struggles to rebuild her life in the wake of her fiance's untimely death and the discovery of secrets he kept from her. Along the way, she bonds with his best pals (Sam Jaeger, Kevin Smith), including a n'er-do-well (Timothy Olyphant) she initially disliked. ",Comedy
Dirty Dancing: Havana Nights,"American high-school student Katey (Romola Garai) moves with her wealthy parents (Sela Ward, John Slattery) to Cuba in 1958. She encounters Javier (Diego Luna), a poor local who works as a waiter, and soon a relationship blossoms between them. At a nightclub, Javier teaches Katey the nuances of Cuban dance, which becomes her passion. As the young lovers grow closer, Fidel Castro suddenly rises to power. When her parents decide to flee to the United States, Katey must make a difficult choice. ",Drama
Drumline,"Set against the high-energy, high-stakes world of show-style marching bands, ""Drumline"" is a fish-out-of-water comedy about a talented street drummer from Harlem who enrolls in a Southern university, expecting to lead its marching band's drumline to victory. He initially flounders in his new world before realizing that it takes a more than talent to reach the top. ",Comedy
Joe Dirt,"He's the wrong person, at the wrong place, at the wrong time. Joe Dirt (David Spade) is a janitor with a mullet hairdo, acid-washed jeans and a dream -- to find the parents that he lost at the Grand Canyon when he was eight. As his wandering, misguided search takes him from one misadventure to another, he finds his way to Los Angeles, where a shock-jock (Dennis Miller) brings Joe on the radio to insult him. But as Joe's story unfolds, jeers turn to cheers, and an entire city is captivated. ",Adventure
Drop Dead Fred,"An unhappy housewife (Phoebe Cates) gets a lift from the return of her imaginary childhood friend, Drop Dead Fred (Rik Mayall). ",Comedy
Cocktail,"Brian Flanagan (Tom Cruise) wants a high-paying marketing job, but needs a business degree first. Working as a bartender to pay for college, Flanagan is mentored by his veteran boss, Doug Coughlin (Bryan Brown). Together, their showy tricks and charisma command large crowds and tip payments -- until Flanagan and the cynical Coughlin have a falling out. Flanagan moves to Jamaica to raise enough money to open his own bar, where he falls in love with artist Jordan Mooney (Elisabeth Shue). ",Comedy
Home Again,Three Jamaicans make their way in an unfamiliar land after they are deported. ,Comedy
The Cobbler,A cobbler receives his back pension and invites the gang to celebrate with him at a picnic. ,Comedy
Sierra Burgess Is a Loser,A case of mistaken identity leads to an unexpected romance when a teen joins forces with a popular student to win the heart of her high school crush. ,Comedy
Carrie,"High school can be tough for many teenagers, but for Carrie White (Chloë Grace Moretz), it's especially hellish. A shy and awkward teen being raised by a religious zealot (Julianne Moore), Carrie is frequently the target of bullies. But Carrie has a secret talent: She can make things move with her mind. One fateful night, an especially cruel prank at her senior prom pushes her over the edge, and Carrie unleashes her telekinetic powers on all who get in her way. ",Drama
The Guilt Trip,"Before embarking on a once-in-a-lifetime road trip, Andy Brewster pays a visit to his overbearing mother, Joyce. That proves to be a big mistake; Andy caves in under pressure to take his mom along for the ride. Early on -- as the miles roll by -- Andy feels nothing but aggravation at her antics. Eventually however, he comes to realize that they have more in common than he first thought and that Joyce's wisdom might be just what he needs. ",Comedy
To the Wonder,A man (Ben Affleck) reconnects with a childhood sweetheart (Rachel McAdams) after problems arise in his relationship with the Frenchwoman (Olga Kurylenko) he brought home to Oklahoma with him. ,Drama
The Divide,"Raf and Julie, a couple on the verge of breaking up, find themselves in an emergency ward bordering on collapse on the evening of a Parisian Yellow Vest protest. ",Drama
Table 19,"Ex-maid of honor Eloise - having been relieved of her duties after being unceremoniously dumped by the best man via text - decides to hold her head high and attend her oldest friend's wedding anyway. She finds herself seated at the random table in the back of the ballroom with a disparate group of strangers, most of whom should have known to just send regrets. As everyone's secrets are revealed, Eloise learns a thing or two from the denizens of Table 19. ",Comedy
Downsizing,"Mild-mannered therapist Paul Safranek and his wife, Audrey, decide to undergo a process in which scientists shrink people down to miniature size to live in small communities. The irreversible procedure allows the people to gain wealth and a life of leisure while helping to cut down on the consumption of natural resources. As Paul gets to know his new neighbors and surroundings, he soon learns that living in a tiny suburb comes with its own set of huge problems. ",Drama
Spread,"Young, charming and handsome, Nikki (Ashton Kutcher) lives the good life in Hollywood by giving rich, older women plenty of what they want: sex. While his latest conquest, Samantha (Anne Heche) is out of town, Nikki throws a party and meets Heather (Margarita Levieva), a pretty waitress who's cut from the same cloth. After Samantha throws him out, Nikki and Heather begin a game of sexual one-upmanship, but the stakes are higher than Nikki realizes. ",Comedy
Footloose,"Moving in from Chicago, newcomer Ren McCormack (Kevin Bacon) is in shock when he discovers the small Midwestern town he now calls home has made dancing and rock music illegal. As he struggles to fit in, Ren faces an uphill battle to change things. With the help of his new friend, Willard Hewitt (Christopher Penn), and defiant teen Ariel Moore (Lori Singer), he might loosen up this conservative town. But Ariel's influential father, Reverend Shaw Moore (John Lithgow), stands in the way. ",Comedy
A Thousand Words,"Jack McCall (Eddie Murphy) is a selfish literary agent whose fast-talking ways allow him to close any deal. His next target is New Age guru Dr. Sinja (Cliff Curtis), but the savvy doctor sees right through Jack. A magical tree appears in Jack's yard, and, according to Dr. Sinja, the tree and Jack are connected; every time Jack says a word, a leaf falls from the tree. When the last leaf drops, Jack will die. With just a thousand leaves left, Jack must learn to curb his speech or he's a goner. ",Comedy
Friends with Money,"The lives of four best friends intertwine around their relationships with one another, their significant others and their wallets. However, one of them, who is unmarried and less well-off than the others, decides to go out and clean houses to make ends meet. ",Comedy
Open Water,"Daniel (Daniel Travis) and Susan (Blanchard Ryan) embark on a tropical vacation with their scuba-diving certifications in tow. During a group dive, the two separate themselves from the others to dive a little deeper. An incorrect head-count suggests the entire group has returned, so the boat departs. When the pair surfaces, they make out a vessel in the distance, but it does not immediately set in that they have been left behind. With sharks lurking beneath, their survival chances grow smaller. ",Adventure
What a Girl Wants,"On a whim, American teenager Daphne (Amanda Bynes) boards a plane to England to find the father she never met. Upon arriving there, though, she makes a startling discovery: The man she's looking for is Lord Henry Dashwood (Colin Firth), a member of the British upper class, who is running for political office. Lord Henry didn't know Daphne existed, but he welcomes her into his life. However, she isn't so sure -- and his family and his current betrothed look on her disapprovingly. ",Comedy
Babe: Pig in the City,"When Babe accidentally puts farmer Hoggett (James Cromwell) in traction, the debtors come looking for their payments. In order to pay their debt, Mrs. Hoggett (Magda Szubanski) sends Babe off across the ocean to the city to demonstrate his talents as a sheep herder. Along with his friends, Babe meets a lot of new friends and gets into new adventures. ",Adventure
54,"In 1970s New York City, Studio 54 is the epicenter of sex, drugs and disco music. It's there that up-and-comer Shane O'Shea (Ryan Phillippe) endeavors to make his big-city dreams come true. After catching the eye of the nightclub's owner, Steve Rubell (Mike Myers), Shane quickly rises from busboy to bartender. While coat-check girl Anita (Salma Hayek) tries to get her big break as a singer, Shane finds himself smitten with soap-opera starlet Julie Black (Neve Campbell). ",Drama
Jack,Stacy wants revenge. And all she needs is for one little boy to pick just the right pumpkin. ,Comedy
The Blue Lagoon,"Seven-year-old cousins Emmeline (Elva Josephson) and Richard (Glenn Kohan) survive a shipwreck and find themselves marooned on a beautiful island somewhere in the Pacific Ocean. Under the tutelage of a fellow castaway, Paddy Button (Leo McKern), the two learn the basics of survival. When Paddy dies, however, the now adolescent Emmeline (Brooke Shields) and Richard (Christopher Atkins) are on their own to discover sex, love and loneliness in a tropical paradise. ",Adventure
Aftermath,"Brothers Jozek (Maciej Stuhr) and Franek (Ireneusz Czop) discover a secret and are forced to revise their perception of their father, their entire family, their neighbors and the history of their nation. ",Drama
Admission,"When straight-laced Princeton University admissions officer Portia Nathan (Tina Fey) pays a recruiting visit to an alternative high school, she receives some news that catches her way off-guard. John Pressman (Paul Rudd), head of the school and Portia's former college classmate, has surmised that his student, Jeremiah, is the son that Portia secretly gave up for adoption. Portia puts her career at risk by bending the rules for Jeremiah but also discovers a life and romance she never imagined. ",Comedy
Persuasion,"Living with her snobby family on the brink of bankruptcy, Anne Elliot is a nonconforming woman with modern sensibilities. When Frederick Wentworth--the dashing one she let get away--crashes back into her life, Anne must choose between putting the past behind her or listening to her heart when it comes to second chances. Adapted from the Jane Austen novel. ",Drama
Death at a Funeral,"Chaos reigns when members of a dysfunctional family gather to bury a loved one. Son Daniel (Matthew MacFadyen) anticipates a face-off with his famous brother Robert (Rupert Graves), while cousin Martha (Daisy Donovan) and her fiance Simon (Alan Tudyk) are desperate to make a good impression on her father. In the midst of the family turmoil, a mystery guest threatens to bring the deceased's skeleton out of the closet. ",Comedy
Sex and the City,"Four years after the earlier adventures of Carrie Bradshaw (Sarah Jessica Parker) and her best gal pals, she and her intermittent lover, Big (Chris Noth), are in a committed relationship. Samantha (Kim Cattrall), having survived cancer, has a monogamous relationship with Smith Jerrod. Charlotte (Kristin Davis) and her husband live on Park Avenue, and Miranda (Cynthia Nixon), now in Brooklyn, feels the pressure of family life. ",Comedy
Four Christmases,"When their plans for an exotic vacation fall apart, unmarried couple Brad (Vince Vaughn) and Kate (Reese Witherspoon) must spend Christmas Day trudging around to a quartet of family get-togethers. While Brad counts the hours till he can escape the onslaught of crazy relatives, Kate begins to wonder about her own choices and ponders whether her family members are so crazy after all. ",Comedy
Blue Crush,"Nothing gets between Anne Marie (Kate Bosworth) and her board. Living in a beach shack with three roommates including her rebellious younger sister, she is up before dawn every morning to conquer the waves and count the days until the Rip Masters surf competition. Anne Marie finds all she needs in the adrenaline-charged surf scene ... until pro quarterback Matt Tollman (Matthew Davis) comes along. Like it or not, Anne Marie starts losing her balance - and finding it - as she falls for Matt. ",Drama
Friday After Next,"Finds Craig (Ice Cube) and Day-Day (Mike Epps) back in the old neighborhood where it all began. It's Christmas time and a ghetto Santa Claus breaks into their run-down apartment, stealing all their presents, along with anything else he can stuff into his sack, including the rent money hidden in their stereo speakers. Their only hope to not get evicted before Christmas is to take jobs as security guards at a local mall, where they learn some comic lessons about the true meaning of the holidays. ",Comedy
Coyote Ugly,"Graced with a velvet voice, 21-year-old Violet Sanford heads to New York to pursue her dream of becoming a songwriter only to find her aspirations sidelined by the accolades and notoriety she receives at her ""day"" job as a barmaid at Coyote Ugly. The ""Coyotes"" as they are affectionately called tantalize customers and the media alike with their outrageous antics, making Coyote Ugly the watering hole for guys on the prowl. ",Comedy
Short Circuit 2,"Having rescued robot Johnny Five (Tim Blaney) from being destroyed by the military in ""Short Circuit,"" Indian scientist Ben Jahrvi (Fisher Stevens) moves to New York City to become an American citizen. After struggling to sell a few toy replicas of Johnny, Ben must scramble to make more when Sandy Banatoni (Cynthia Gibb) orders 1,000 for her department store. With Johnny's help, Ben begins making the gadgets, but his plans are endangered when thief Oscar Baldwin (Jack Weston) steals Johnny. ",Comedy
The Marksman,Mike Martin becomes a deputy marshal and takes on a gang of cattle rustlers. ,Drama
47 Meters Down,"Young sisters Kate and Lisa and travel to Mexico for a vacation filled with sun, fun and adventure. Lisa needs some extra persuasion when Kate suggests that they go diving in shark-infested waters. Safe in their protective cage, the thrill-seeking siblings come face to face with a group of majestic great whites. Their worst fears soon become a reality when the cage breaks away from their boat, sending them plummeting to the ocean floor with a dwindling supply of oxygen. ",Adventure
Magic Mike XXL,"It's been three years since Mike Lane's (Channing Tatum) retirement from stripping, but the former dancer misses the excitement and feeling of being on stage. Most of all, though, he misses the best friends that he ever had, the crew known as the Kings of Tampa. Opportunity comes knocking when the guys look him up as they travel to Myrtle Beach, S.C., for a stripper convention. With the promise of outrageous fun, a reinvigorated Mike can't resist the chance to join in and take it off again. ",Comedy
Knight of Cups,"A Los Angeles screenwriter (Christian Bale) indulges his wild side with a stripper (Teresa Palmer), a model (Freida Pinto) and a married woman (Natalie Portman). ",Drama
The Big Wedding,"Don (Robert De Niro) and Ellie Griffin (Diane Keaton) are long-divorced, but when their adopted son's ultraconservative biological mother unexpectedly decides to fly in for the young man's nuptials, they are forced to play the happy couple to avoid an awkward situation. With their heartily amused friends and adult children looking on, Don and Ellie must confront their past, present and future -- and hopefully avoid killing each other in the process. ",Comedy
Maggie,"Calvin B. Marshall (Paul Douglas), a wealthy American, plans to surprise his wife with a summer residence in the British Isles. Arrogantly certain that he can make a shrewd deal, he charters a small, rundown transport boat, ""The Maggie,"" to carry his furnishings to the new property. Pilot Capt. McTaggert (Alex Mackenzie) desperately needs the job to save his boat -- but he and the crew of two men and a boy nevertheless plan to get the most out of Marshall on their most unorthodox journey. ",Drama
Mirror Mirror,An antique mirror gives a student (Rainbow Harvest) the black-magic power to punish classmates who torment her. ,Adventure
Paranoia,"A widowed socialite (Carroll Baker) meets a college student (Lou Castel) who seduces her, then introduces her to drugs, liquor and orgies. ",Drama
The Midnight Sky,A lone scientist in the Arctic races to contact a crew of astronauts returning home to a mysterious global catastrophe. ,Adventure
Love Happens,"Dr. Burke Ryan (Aaron Eckhart) is a self-help guru who is on the verge of a lucrative multimedia deal. But there's a problem: though he advises his patients to confront their pain, Burke has never come to terms with his wife's death. Eloise Chandler (Jennifer Aniston) has had enough of men and dating, and is busy concentrating on her floral business. When they meet, Burke and Eloise feel an instant attraction, but wonder if they'll be able to let go of their painful pasts and embrace the future. ",Drama
What Just Happened,"During the course of an ordinary week in Hollywood, movie producer Ben must navigate his way through shark-infested waters as he struggles to complete his latest projects. A demanding studio boss demands extensive changes to a movie starring Sean Penn, while another chief won't greenlight a project unless star Bruce Willis shaves his beard. Meanwhile, Ben tries to reconcile with his wife and maintain a relationship with his young daughter. ",Comedy
Autumn in New York,"Autumn in New York follows the sexual exploits of Will Keane, a New York restaurateur, infamous verging-on-50 playboy, master of the no-commitment seduction until he runs into an unexpected dead end when he meets Charlotte Fielding. Charlotte is half Will's age and twice his match, a 21-year-old free spirit yearning to get out and taste the excitement of adult life. It is a season long encounter that will shatter Will's preconceptions about women, sex and responsibility. ",Drama
Boomerang,A reformed gangster turns to his old associates for help after his son kills a police officer. ,Comedy
The Bonfire of the Vanities,"In this adaptation of the Tom Wolfe novel, powerful Wall Street executive Sherman McCoy (Tom Hanks) is riding with his greedy girlfriend, Maria (Melanie Griffith), when she makes a wrong turn and winds up in the Bronx. There, she runs over a black boy and drives off without reporting it. When alcoholic tabloid reporter Peter Fallow (Bruce Willis) discovers the story, he knows it will be scandalous and riles up New Yorkers with his coverage of the case, which soon goes to trial. ",Comedy
House at the End of the Street,"In search of a fresh start, divorcee Sarah (Elisabeth Shue) and her daughter, Elissa (Max Thieriot), find their dream house in a small town. But when startling, unexplainable events begin, the pair learn that a chilling secret holds the town in its grip. Years earlier a girl killed her parents and disappeared, leaving a brother, Ryan (Max Thieriot), as the sole survivor. Elissa begins a relationship with Ryan, and the closer they get, the deeper they're all pulled into a dangerous mystery. ",Drama
Beastly,"After a spurned classmate curses him, a teen will be forever ugly unless he finds love. ",Drama
Dreamcatcher,"""Dreamcatcher"" tells of four young friends who perform a heroic act -- and are changed forever by the uncanny powers they gain in return. Years later the friends, now men, are on a hunting trip in the Maine woods when they are overtaken by a blizzard in which something much more ominous moves. Challenged to stop an alien force, the friends must first prevent the slaughter of innocent civilians by a military vigilante, then overcome a threat to the bond between them. ",Drama
Replicas,"A couple (Selma Blair, Joshua Close) and their young son retreat to their woodland vacation home, only to face sinister neighbors who intend to kill them and steal their identities. ",Drama
Unfinished Business,A small-town girl (Irene Dunne) finds love after marrying for spite. ,Comedy
Stone,"Parole officer Jack Mabry (Robert De Niro) is just days from retirement and busy wrapping up the last few cases, including that of Gerald ""Stone"" Creeson (Edward Norton), a thug who burned his grandparents' house to cover up their murders. Creeson is desperate to get out of prison and will do anything to secure his parole, including telling his girlfriend to seduce Mabry. Creeson's manipulations awaken the monster within Mabry, leading to unexpected consequences for them both. ",Drama
How Do You Know,"Lisa Jorgenson's (Reese Witherspoon) entire life has been defined by softball, but at 31, she is deemed too old to play and cut from the team. After being cast adrift, she begins a fling with Matty (Owen Wilson), a charming womanizer who plays professional baseball. About the same time, she goes on a blind date with George (Paul Rudd), a businessman on the hook for stock fraud. Caught in a romantic triangle with the two men, Lisa ponders the meaning of love. ",Comedy
Aloha,"In the South Seas, a half-caste island girl refuses to follow tradition and marry a fellow islander, instead falling in love with a white man who's heir to an American fortune. ",Comedy
Laal Singh Chaddha,A simple man embarks on an extraordinary journey. ,Comedy
Stomp the Yard,"After his brother's death, a troubled but gifted street dancer enrolls in Atlanta's Truth University. As he tries to concentrate on his studies and woo a pretty classmate, he finds himself in the middle of a tug-of-war between fraternities, who want to utilize his talents in an upcoming dance competition. ",Drama
Jack Frost,"A young grizzly bear, undaunted by his mother's warnings of the coming winter, runs away from home only to be confronted by Old Man Winter himself. ",Comedy
Radhe Shyam,"A renowned palmist falls in love with a doctor who does not believe in superstitious beliefs. However, she starts to warm to his beliefs when some of his predictions start to come true. ",Drama
The Silence,The lives of two people are changed forever when a tragedy in the family tears them apart beyond repair. ,Drama
The Circle,"A university professor takes four of his archaeology students on a field trip to a remote Scottish island. With tensions already mounting, they unearth clues to an ancient threat. ",Drama
After,"A growing breed of thrill seekers thrives on breaking into the planet's most dangerous man-made structures, and members call themselves urban explorers. ",Drama
Annie,"An orphan in a facility run by the mean Miss Hannigan (Carol Burnett), Annie (Aileen Quinn) believes that her parents left her there by mistake. When a rich man named Oliver ""Daddy"" Warbucks (Albert Finney) decides to let an orphan live at his home to promote his image, Annie is selected. While Annie gets accustomed to living in Warbucks' mansion, she still longs to meet her parents. So Warbucks announces a search for them and a reward, which brings out many frauds. ",Comedy
The Dilemma,"Longtime friends Ronny (Vince Vaughn) and Nick (Kevin James) are partners in an auto-design firm. They are hard at work on a presentation for a dream project that would really launch their company. Then Ronny spots Nick's wife out with another man, and in the process of investigating the possible affair, he learns that Nick has a few secrets of his own. As the presentation nears, Ronny agonizes over what might happen if the truth gets out. ",Comedy
Twilight,"High-school student Bella Swan (Kristen Stewart), always a bit of a misfit, doesn't expect life to change much when she moves from sunny Arizona to rainy Washington state. Then she meets Edward Cullen (Robert Pattinson), a handsome but mysterious teen whose eyes seem to peer directly into her soul. Edward is a vampire whose family does not drink blood, and Bella, far from being frightened, enters into a dangerous romance with her immortal soulmate. ",Drama
Honey,"Honey Daniels (Jessica Alba) dreams of making a name for herself as a hip-hop choreographer. When she's not busy hitting downtown clubs with her friends, she teaches dance classes at a nearby community center in Harlem, N.Y., as a way to keep kids off the streets. Honey thinks she's hit the jackpot when she meets a hotshot director (David Moscow) who casts her in one of his music videos. But, when he starts demanding sexual favors from her, Honey makes a decision that will change her life. ",Drama
Maid in Manhattan,"The story of Marisa Ventura (Jennifer Lopez), a single mother born and bred in the boroughs of New York City, who works as a maid in a first-class Manhattan hotel. By a twist of fate and mistaken identity, Marisa meets Christopher Marshall (Ralph Fiennes), heir to a political dynasty, who believes that she is a guest at the hotel. Fate steps in and throws the pair together for a magical night of romance. When Marisa's true identity is revealed, the two find that they are worlds apart. ",Comedy
Rocky V,"Recently retired boxer Rocky Balboa (Sylvester Stallone) falls on hard times after his accountant mismanages his finances. He stages a comeback of sorts by mentoring fiery young boxer Tommy (Tommy Morrison), while also trying to mend his shaky relationship with his own son, Robert (Sage Stallone). These challenges prove to be at least as tough as any fight Rocky has faced in the ring. He wonders if he will be able to meet them and raise his arms in victory again. ",Drama
Zero,"A portrait of the Mitsubishi Zero, the Japanese Empire's deadliest flying machine during World War II. ",Comedy
Alvin and the Chipmunks,"After the tree they called home is cut down and shipped to Los Angeles, talking chipmunks Alvin, Simon and Theodore find a new home with songwriter Dave Seville (Jason Lee). Despite a rocky start to this new arrangement, Dave eventually discovers that the spunky critters have rare singing talent. When the three perform in front of record executive Ian Hawke (David Cross), he immediately signs them. Although the infectious group rapidly gains in popularity, their loyalty is soon tested. ",Adventure
Queen of the Damned,"Follows the legendary vampire Lestat (Stuart Townsend), who has reinvented himself as a rock star in the contemporary American music scene. His music wakes Akasha (Aaliyah), the queen of all vampires, and inspires her desire to make Lestat her king. Akasha's malevolent power is so great that all the immortal vampires must stand against her if they want to survive. Meanwhile, a young London woman with a fascination for the dark side (Marguerite Moreau) falls in love with Lestat. ",Drama
Spawn,"Covert government assassin Al Simmons (Michael Jai White) is killed after being double-crossed by his boss, Jason Wynn (Martin Sheen). Upon arriving in Hell, Simmons is offered an opportunity to return to Earth if he's willing to lead an evil army. He accepts, and is reincarnated as a ""Hellspawn"" -- a twisted, horribly disfigured version of his former self. However, Spawn serves as a force of good, much to the dismay of the Devil's henchman, a wicked clown (John Leguizamo). ",Action
Pinocchio,A woodcarver creates a puppet (Roberto Benigni) that longs to become a real boy. ,Adventure
Toys,"A hi-tech toy factory falls into the hands of an army general who turns the models into killing machines. The deceased owner's children know what's afoot and, although apparently powerless, have to find a way of bringing down the nightmarish empire that is being constructed under their noses. ",Adventure
47 Meters Down: Uncaged,"Four teenage divers discover that the sunken ruins of a Mayan city are also a hunting ground for deadly great white sharks. With their air supply steadily dwindling, the frightened girls must navigate the underwater labyrinth of claustrophobic caves and eerie tunnels in search of a way out of their watery hell. ",Adventure
Dilwale,A greedy relative schemes to break up the romance of his wealthy niece (Raveena Tandon). ,Action
The Twilight Saga: Eclipse,"Danger once again surrounds Bella (Kristen Stewart), as a string of mysterious killings terrorizes Seattle and a malicious vampire continues her infernal quest for revenge. Amid the tumult, Bella must choose between her love for Edward (Robert Pattinson) and her friendship with Jacob (Taylor Lautner), knowing that her decision may ignite the long-simmering feud between vampire and werewolf. ",Action
Obsessed,A woman (Jenna Elfman) claims she had an affair with a married neurosurgeon and stands trial for allegedly harassing him. ,Drama
After We Collided,A college student's relationship with a troubled youth gets put to the test when she meets another man who's attracted to her. ,Drama
Showgirls,"Nomi (Elizabeth Berkley) arrives in Las Vegas with only a suitcase and a dream of becoming a top showgirl. She quickly befriends Molly (Gina Ravera), who works at the high-profile Stardust Hotel, and lands a job at a seedy strip club. A chance meeting with Cristal (Gina Gershon), the Stardust's marquee dancer, and her powerful boyfriend, Zack (Kyle MacLachlan), brings Nomi one step closer to realizing her dream. But, as she ascends to the top, Nomi begins to wonder if it's all worth it. ",Drama
Sliver,"Well-to-do book editor Carly Norris (Sharon Stone) moves into a luxury apartment building before learning that a number of female tenants have been dying in grisly ways, allegedly at the hands of a serial killer. Soon, Norris becomes romantically involved with one of the prime suspects, building owner Zeke Hawkins (William Baldwin). The other suspect is her neighbor, writer Jack Landsford (Tom Berenger). Unsure of whom to trust, Norris must uncover the truth before she is the next victim. ",Drama
The NeverEnding Story II: The Next Chapter,"Having saved the magical land of Fantasia from destruction in ""The Neverending Story,"" young Bastian (Jonathan Brandis) is having trouble in the real world. Feeling abandoned by his overworked father, Barney (John Wesley Shipp), he picks up the book that led to his first adventure. He hears the voice of Fantasia's ruler, the Childlike Empress (Alexandra Johnes), telling him that her land needs help. Bastian returns to the kingdom, now threatened by a sorceress named Xayide (Clarissa Burt). ",Adventure
Knock Knock,A night of fun turns deadly for some high school students. ,Drama
The Woman in Black 2: Angel of Death,"During World War II, the London bombings force schoolteachers Eve Parkins (Phoebe Fox) and Jean Hogg (Helen McCrory) to evacuate a group of children to Crythin Gifford. When the refugees take shelter at Eel Marsh House, Eve soon comes to realize that they are not alone. The longer they remain there, the more the house's evil spirit threatens the children. With the help of a pilot (Jeremy Irvine), Eve tries to protect the children and uncover the truth behind the Woman in Black. ",Drama
Godsend,"After Paul Duncan (Greg Kinnear) and his wife, Jessie (Rebecca Romijn-Stamos), lose their young son, Adam (Cameron Bright), in an accident, they are approached by Richard Wells (Robert De Niro), a fertility doctor. Wells believes that he can clone Adam and gives Paul and Jessie the option to let him try, but only if they start life over elsewhere. Adam's clone proves to be identical to the deceased boy, but, when he reaches his 8th birthday, things begin to go horribly wrong. ",Action
Bharat,"An 8-year-old boy makes a vow to his father that he will keep his family together no matter what, a promise that he works to keep over the next 60 years of his life. ",Action
IO,"In a post-apocalyptic time, Earth has been rendered toxic, and most of humanity has abandoned the planet and colonized one of Jupiter's moons, IO. But young scientist Sam Walden has stayed behind and dedicated herself to finding a way for human beings to survive on Earth. After sending out a radio transmission to see if she can locate anyone else, a man named Micah arrives. He believes there is no hope of survival and intends to take the final shuttle to IO in 48 hours. ",Adventure
Bodyguard,An ousted Los Angeles homicide detective (Lawrence Tierney) goes to work for a widow and is framed for murder. ,Action
In the Land of Blood and Honey,"Danijel (Goran Kostic), a Bosnian Serb police officer, and Ajla (Zana Marjanovic), a Bosnian Muslim artist, are lovers before the outbreak of the Bosnian War, but the lovers land on opposite sides of the conflict as violence engulfs the Balkan region. Months later, while serving in the Bosnian Serb army, Danijel once again encounters Ajla when troops under his command take her from the apartment she shares with her sister. As the conflict marches on, they find their allegiances uncertain. ",Drama
The Twilight Saga: New Moon,"After the abrupt departure of Edward (Robert Pattinson), her vampire love, Bella (Kristen Stewart) finds comfort in her deepening friendship with Jacob Black (Taylor Lautner). However Bella's loyalties are put to the test as she becomes drawn into the world of werewolves, ancient enemies of vampires. ",Adventure
Driven,FBI informant Jim Hoffman lures troubled automobile magnate John DeLorean to an undercover sting for cocaine trafficking. ,Action
Fifty Shades Freed,"Believing they've left behind the shadowy figures from the past, billionaire Christian Grey and his new wife, Anastasia, fully embrace their inextricable connection and shared life of luxury. Just as the Greys begin to step into their new roles, sinister events come to light and jeopardize their happy ending before it even begins. ",Drama
Fifty Shades Darker,"When a wounded Christian Grey tries to entice a cautious Anastasia Steele back into his life, she demands a new arrangement before she will give him another chance. As the two begin to build trust and find stability, shadowy figures from Christian's past start to circle them, determined to destroy their hopes for a future together. ",Drama
Sex and the City 2,"Fun, fashion and friendship continue to define the lives of Carrie (Sarah Jessica Parker), Samantha (Kim Cattrall), Charlotte (Kristin Davis) and Miranda. They have more than they ever wished for, but when the combination of marriage and motherhood approach, the gals take an exotic vacation in Abu Dhabi. The sun-drenched paradise holds many surprises -- especially for Carrie, who faces temptation when she unexpectedly runs into Aidan. ",Comedy
Hannah Montana: The Movie,"Like many teenagers, Miley Stewart (Miley Cyrus) juggles family, friends and school, but unlike her peers, she has a secret pop-star persona called Hannah Montana. When Hannah's soaring popularity threatens to take over Miley's life, her dad (Billy Ray Cyrus) steps in to give the teen a reality check. Back home in the Tennessee town of Crowley Corners, Miley embarks on an exciting adventure even Hannah Montana could not imagine. ",Comedy
The Next Karate Kid,"Karate master Mr. Miyagi (Noriyuki ""Pat"" Morita) goes to Boston to attend a military reunion. There, he visits with Louisa (Constance Towers), the widow of his former commander, and meets her granddaughter, Julie (Hilary Swank). Julie's parents were recently killed in a car accident, and she is still reeling from the loss. When Julie surprises Miyagi with her knowledge of karate, he takes her to a Buddhist monastery for training and to help her come to terms with her angst. ",Action
LOL,"Through the use of their technology, three men's lives are examined. ",Comedy
Fifty Shades of Grey,"When college senior Anastasia Steele (Dakota Johnson) steps in for her sick roommate to interview prominent businessman Christian Grey (Jamie Dornan) for their campus paper, little does she realize the path her life will take. Christian, as enigmatic as he is rich and powerful, finds himself strangely drawn to Ana, and she to him. Though sexually inexperienced, Ana plunges headlong into an affair -- and learns that Christian's true sexual proclivities push the boundaries of pain and pleasure. ",Drama
You Got Served,"David (Omarion Grandberry) and Elgin (Marques Houston) helm a talented street-dancing crew that engages in dance battles in a Los Angeles warehouse belonging to local club owner Mr. Rad (Steve Harvey). When Orange County rich kid Wade (Christopher Jones) challenges David and Elgin to compete against his dancers for $5,000, they accept. As David and Elgin labor to perfect their moves for the competition, tensions within the crew threaten their chances at success. ",Drama
Krym,English and American spies team up to capture a terrorist. ,Action
The Room,A successful banker's (Tommy Wiseau) fiancee (Juliette Danielle) tempts and manipulates his best friend (Greg Sestero). ,Drama
Crossroads,Four college friends separate and must struggle with their chosen lives as strikes break out in Shanghai. ,Comedy
Liger,"A bravehearted Liger works his way up to find his dream spot in the MMA world, but his life gets complicated when he crosses paths with Taniya. ",Action
Cats,The feline wonders of the Jellicle tribe assemble at an annual ball to compete for the one and only ticket to the next life. ,Comedy
Gunday,"Hoe zou het zijn om in de huid van een varken te kruipen en een dagje op een boerderij te leven? Met deze gedachte in zijn achterhoofd maakte de legendarische documentairemaker Viktor Kosakovskiy zijn natuurfilm Gunda, waarin we aan de hand van intieme zwart-wit beelden in de dierenwereld worden geplaatst. Na het zien van Gunda kun je niet anders dan respect en empathie voelen voor elk levend wezen op onze aarde. ",Action
Smolensk,A journalist refuses to accept the official story about a plane crash. ,Drama
Sadak 2,"Ravi, a suicidal taxi driver, plans to shut shop when a young girl, Aarya, compels him to take her on a life-altering journey to Kailash. ",Action
Back to the Future,"In this 1980s sci-fi classic, small-town California teen Marty McFly (Michael J. Fox) is thrown back into the '50s when an experiment by his eccentric scientist friend Doc Brown (Christopher Lloyd) goes awry. Traveling through time in a modified DeLorean car, Marty encounters young versions of his parents (Crispin Glover, Lea Thompson), and must make sure that they fall in love or he'll cease to exist. Even more dauntingly, Marty has to return to his own time and save the life of Doc Brown. ",Adventure
Monty Python and the Holy Grail,"A comedic send-up of the grim circumstances of the Middle Ages as told through the story of King Arthur and framed by a modern-day murder investigation. When the mythical king of the Britons leads his knights on a quest for the Holy Grail, they face a wide array of horrors, including a persistent Black Knight, a three-headed giant, a cadre of shrubbery-challenged knights, the perilous Castle Anthrax, a killer rabbit, a house of virgins, and a handful of rude Frenchmen. ",Adventure
Some Like It Hot,"After witnessing a Mafia murder, slick saxophone player Joe (Tony Curtis) and his long-suffering buddy, Jerry (Jack Lemmon), improvise a quick plan to escape from Chicago with their lives. Disguising themselves as women, they join an all-female jazz band and hop a train bound for sunny Florida. While Joe pretends to be a millionaire to win the band's sexy singer, Sugar (Marilyn Monroe), Jerry finds himself pursued by a real millionaire (Joe E. Brown) as things heat up and the mobsters close in. ",Comedy
To Be or Not to Be,"Acting couple Joseph (Jack Benny) and Maria Tura (Carole Lombard) are managing a theatrical troupe when the Nazis invade Poland. Maria is having an affair with Lieutenant Sobinski (Robert Stack), who suspects Professor Siletsky (Stanley Ridges) is a Nazi spy. With Siletsky in possession of a list of members of the Polish resistance, the Turas' company takes action. Using their skill for impersonation, Joseph and company must confuse the Nazis and stop Siletsky from handing over the list. ",Comedy
It Happened One Night,"In Frank Capra's acclaimed romantic comedy, spoiled heiress Ellie Andrews (Claudette Colbert) impetuously marries the scheming King Westley, leading her tycoon father (Walter Connolly) to spirit her away on his yacht. After jumping ship, Ellie falls in with cynical newspaper reporter Peter Warne (Clark Gable), who offers to help her reunite with her new husband in exchange for an exclusive story. But during their travels, the reporter finds himself falling for the feisty young heiress. ",Comedy
The Circus,"Wrongfully accused of criminal acts, a tramp (Charlie Chaplin) unwittingly ducks into a big top, where his bumbling attempts to avoid pursuing police officers earn the laughter and applause of the circus-goers. Impressed, the ringmaster (Allan Garcia) decides to employ the tramp as an entertainer. In between getting trapped in a lion's cage and partaking in clumsy high wire escapades, he falls for a beautiful show rider (Merna Kennedy), who unfortunately has eyes for a daring tightrope acrobat. ",Comedy
Annie Hall,"Comedian Alvy Singer (Woody Allen) examines the rise and fall of his relationship with struggling nightclub singer Annie Hall (Diane Keaton). Speaking directly to the audience in front of a bare background, Singer reflects briefly on his childhood and his early adult years before settling in to tell the story of how he and Annie met, fell in love, and struggled with the obstacles of modern romance, mixing surreal fantasy sequences with small moments of emotional drama. ",Comedy
Young Frankenstein,"Respected medical lecturer Dr. Frederick Frankenstein (Gene Wilder) learns that he has inherited his infamous grandfather's estate in Transylvania. Arriving at the castle, Dr. Frankenstein soon begins to recreate his grandfather's experiments with the help of servants Igor (Marty Feldman), Inga (Teri Garr) and the fearsome Frau Blücher (Cloris Leachman). After he creates his own monster (Peter Boyle), new complications ensue with the arrival of the doctor's fiancée, Elizabeth (Madeline Kahn). ",Comedy
Roman Holiday,"Overwhelmed by her suffocating schedule, touring European princess Ann (Audrey Hepburn) takes off for a night while in Rome. When a sedative she took from her doctor kicks in, however, she falls asleep on a park bench and is found by an American reporter, Joe Bradley (Gregory Peck),who takes her back to his apartment for safety. At work the next morning, Joe finds out Ann's regal identity and bets his editor he can get exclusive interview with her, but romance soon gets in the way. ",Comedy
Shaun of the Dead,"Shaun is a 30-something loser with a dull, easy existence. When he's not working at the electronics store, he lives with his slovenly best friend, Ed, in a small flat on the outskirts of London. The only unpredictable element in his life is his girlfriend, Liz, who wishes desperately for Shaun to grow up and be a man. When the town is inexplicably overrun with zombies, Shaun must rise to the occasion and protect both Liz and his mother. ",Comedy
This Is Spinal Tap,"""This Is Spinal Tap"" shines a light on the self-contained universe of a metal band struggling to get back on the charts, including everything from its complicated history of ups and downs, gold albums, name changes and undersold concert dates, along with the full host of requisite groupies, promoters, hangers-on and historians, sessions, release events and those special behind-the-scenes moments that keep it all real. ",Comedy
The Philadelphia Story,"This classic romantic comedy focuses on Tracy Lord (Katharine Hepburn), a Philadelphia socialite who has split from her husband, C.K. Dexter Haven (Cary Grant), due both to his drinking and to her overly demanding nature. As Tracy prepares to wed the wealthy George Kittredge (John Howard), she crosses paths with both Dexter and prying reporter Macaulay Connor (James Stewart). Unclear about her feelings for all three men, Tracy must decide whom she truly loves. ",Comedy
Paddington 2,"Settled in with the Brown family, Paddington the bear is a popular member of the community who spreads joy and marmalade wherever he goes. One fine day, he spots a pop-up book in an antique shop -- the perfect present for his beloved aunt's 100th birthday. When a thief steals the prized book, Paddington embarks on an epic quest to unmask the culprit before Aunt Lucy's big celebration. ",Adventure
Vicky Donor,A man is hired by a fertility doctor to supply his clinic with sperm for all of his clients. ,Comedy
Mary Poppins,"When Jane (Karen Dotrice) and Michael (Matthew Garber), the children of the wealthy and uptight Banks family, are faced with the prospect of a new nanny, they are pleasantly surprised by the arrival of the magical Mary Poppins (Julie Andrews). Embarking on a series of fantastical adventures with Mary and her Cockney performer friend, Bert (Dick Van Dyke), the siblings try to pass on some of their nanny's sunny attitude to their preoccupied parents (David Tomlinson, Glynis Johns). ",Comedy
To Have and Have Not,"In Vichy France, fishing boat captain Harry (Humphrey Bogart) avoids getting involved in politics, refusing to smuggle French Resistance fighters into Martinique. But when a Resistance client is shot before he can pay, Harry agrees to help hotel owner Gerard (Marcel Dalio) smuggle two fighters to the island. Harry is further swayed by Slim (Lauren Bacall), a wandering American girl, and when the police take his friend Eddie (Walter Brennan) hostage, he is forced to fight for the Resistance. ",Adventure
Bringing Up Baby,"Harried paleontologist David Huxley (Cary Grant) has to make a good impression on society matron Mrs. Random (May Robson), who is considering donating one million dollars to his museum. On the day before his wedding, Huxley meets Mrs. Random's high-spirited young niece, Susan Vance (Katharine Hepburn), a madcap adventuress who immediately falls for the straitlaced scientist. The ever-growing chaos -- including a missing dinosaur bone and a pet leopard -- threatens to swallow him whole. ",Comedy
Duck Soup,"When the tiny nation of Freedonia goes bankrupt, its wealthy benefactor, Mrs. Teasdale (Margaret Dumont), insists that the wacky Rufus T. Firefly (Groucho Marx) become the country's president. Sensing a weakness in leadership, the bordering nation of Sylvania sends in the spies Pinky (Harpo Marx) and Chicolini (Chico Marx) to set the stage for a revolution. As Firefly clashes with the Sylvanian ambassador (Louis Calhern), plenty of mayhem ensues, and the countries verge on all-out war. ",Comedy
Midnight in Paris,"Gil Pender (Owen Wilson) is a screenwriter and aspiring novelist. Vacationing in Paris with his fiancee (Rachel McAdams), he has taken to touring the city alone. On one such late-night excursion, Gil encounters a group of strange -- yet familiar -- revelers, who sweep him along, apparently back in time, for a night with some of the Jazz Age's icons of art and literature. The more time Gil spends with these cultural heroes of the past, the more dissatisfied he becomes with the present. ",Comedy
The Hangover,"Two days before his wedding, Doug (Justin Bartha) and three friends (Bradley Cooper, Ed Helms, Zach Galifianakis) drive to Las Vegas for a wild and memorable stag party. In fact, when the three groomsmen wake up the next morning, they can't remember a thing; nor can they find Doug. With little time to spare, the three hazy pals try to re-trace their steps and find Doug so they can get him back to Los Angeles in time to walk down the aisle. ",Comedy
Office Space,"Corporate drone Peter Gibbons (Ron Livingston) hates his soul-killing job at software company Initech. While undergoing hypnotherapy, Peter is left in a blissful state when his therapist dies in the middle of their session. He refuses to work overtime, plays games at his desk and unintentionally charms two consultants into putting him on the management fast-track. When Peter's friends learn they're about to be downsized, they hatch a revenge plot against the company inspired by ""Superman III."" ",Comedy
Clerks,"Dante (Brian O'Halloran) is called in to cover a shift at his New Jersey convenience store on his day off. His friend Randal (Jeff Anderson) helps him pass the time, neglecting his video-store customers next door to hang out in the Quick Stop. The uneventful day is disrupted by news that one of Dante's ex-girlfriends has died. After attending her memorial service, Dante muses over staying with current girlfriend Veronica (Marilyn Ghigliotti) or reuniting with ex Caitlin (Lisa Spoonhauer). ",Comedy
Home Alone,"When bratty 8-year-old Kevin McCallister (Macaulay Culkin) acts out the night before a family trip to Paris, his mother (Catherine O'Hara) makes him sleep in the attic. After the McCallisters mistakenly leave for the airport without Kevin, he awakens to an empty house and assumes his wish to have no family has come true. But his excitement sours when he realizes that two con men (Joe Pesci, Daniel Stern) plan to rob the McCallister residence, and that he alone must protect the family home. ",Comedy
The Goonies,"When two brothers find out they might lose their house they are desperate to find a way to keep their home. They find a treasure map and bring some friends along to find it. They are all out looking for the ""X"" and trying to get away from a group of bad guys who also want the treasure. ",Adventure
Zelig,"In this fictional documentary, a man achieves notoriety for his ability to look and act like anyone he meets. With his unique talent for mimicry, Zelig (Woody Allen) ingratiates himself with people from every sector of society. His chameleon-like skill catches the eye of Eudora Fletcher (Mia Farrow), a doctor who thinks Zelig is in need of serious cognitive analysis. Their relationship moves in a direction that's not often covered in medical textbooks. ",Comedy
Love and Death,"In Woody Allen's comic take on 19th-century Russian philosophical novels and the Soviet-era epic films made from them, Boris (Woody Allen) is a simple Russian villager who pines from afar for his beautiful cousin Sonja (Diane Keaton). Forced against his will into joining the Russian army during the Napoleonic Wars, the cowardly Boris accidentally becomes a military hero. But when his beloved Sonja comes to him with a dangerous patriotic scheme, Boris debates his desires and beliefs. ",Comedy
What We Do in the Shadows,"Vampire housemates (Jemaine Clement, Taika Waititi, Jonathan Brugh) try to cope with the complexities of modern life and show a newly turned hipster (Cori Gonzalez-Macuer) some of the perks of being undead. ",Comedy
Superbad,"High school seniors Seth and Evan have high hopes for a graduation party. The co-dependent teens plan to score booze and babes so they can become part of the in-crowd, but separation anxiety and two bored police officers complicate the pair's self-proclaimed mission. ",Comedy
Dazed and Confused,"This coming-of-age film follows the mayhem of group of rowdy teenagers in Austin, Texas, celebrating the last day of high school in 1976. The graduating class heads for a popular pool hall and joins an impromptu keg party, however star football player Randall ""Pink"" Floyd (Jason London) has promised to focus on the championship game and abstain from partying. Meanwhile, the incoming freshmen try to avoid being hazed by the seniors, most notably the sadistic bully Fred O'Bannion (Ben Affleck). ",Comedy
The Muppet Movie,"After Kermit the Frog decides to pursue a movie career, he starts his cross-country trip from Florida to California. Along the way, he meets and befriends Fozzie Bear, Miss Piggy, Gonzo and rock musicians Dr. Teeth and the Electric Mayhem. When Kermit is offered a job by Doc Hopper (Charles Durning) to advertise the fried frog legs at his restaurant chain, Kermit turns Hopper down. However, Hopper refuses to relent and pursues Kermit and his companions to a final showdown. ",Adventure
The Odd Couple,"When fussy Felix (Jack Lemmon) becomes suicidal over his impending divorce, he accepts an offer to move in with his best friend, messy Oscar (Walter Matthau). Felix drives Oscar crazy with his obsession over his soon-to-be ex. Oscar tries to get him out of his funk by arranging a double date with two wacky British neighbors, Cecily (Monica Evans) and Gwendolyn (Carole Shelley). When the plan backfires and Felix grows even more despondent, his friendship with Oscar is put to the test. ",Comedy
Stree,"A town is held in the grip of terror by tales of a mysterious woman who calls men by their name and then abducts them, leaving their clothes behind. ",Comedy
Tucker and Dale vs Evil,"Two scruffy pals' (Tyler Labine, Alan Tudyk) backwoods vacation takes a bloody turn when ignorant college students mistake them for a pair of murderous hillbillies. ",Comedy
Trading Places,"Upper-crust executive Louis Winthorpe III (Dan Aykroyd) and down-and-out hustler Billy Ray Valentine (Eddie Murphy) are the subjects of a bet by successful brokers Mortimer (Don Ameche) and Randolph Duke (Ralph Bellamy). An employee of the Dukes, Winthorpe is framed by the brothers for a crime he didn't commit, with the siblings then installing the street-smart Valentine in his position. When Winthorpe and Valentine uncover the scheme, they set out to turn the tables on the Dukes. ",Comedy
The Meaning of Life,"A struggling musician gets a temporary job as a therapeutic clown, working to help a 9-year old leukemia patient cope with her illness through music and art therapy. ",Comedy
An American Werewolf in London,"David (David Naughton) and Jack (Griffin Dunne), two American college students, are backpacking through Britain when a large wolf attacks them. David survives with a bite, but Jack is brutally killed. As David heals in the hospital, he's plagued by violent nightmares of his mutilated friend, who warns David that he is becoming a werewolf. When David discovers the horrible truth, he contemplates committing suicide before the next full moon causes him to transform from man to murderous beast. ",Comedy
And Now for Something Completely Different,"More than 40 skits, animated shorts and interludes are included in this big-screen incarnation of the popular British television program ""Monty Python's Flying Circus."" The narrator (John Cleese) guides the audience through absurd segments about such diverse subjects as cannibal babies, killer cats and dead parrots. Although the skits were originally produced for television, the film contains alternate versions that were remade without a studio audience. ",Comedy
In the Loop,"During an interview, British Cabinet Minister Simon Foster (Tom Hollander) delivers an off-the-cuff remark that war in the Middle East is ""unforeseeable."" Profane political spin doctor Malcolm Tucker (Peter Capaldi) tries to cover up Foster's faux pas, but the ill-conceived comment is picked up by a warmongering American official. Foster is invited to Washington, D.C., where a war of words brews as politicians maneuver, manipulate and deceive each other before a U.N. vote on military action. ",Comedy
Best in Show,"The tension is palpable, the excitement is mounting and the heady scent of competition is in the air as hundreds of eager contestants from across America prepare to take part in what is undoubtedly one of the greatest events of their lives -- the Mayflower Dog Show. The canine contestants and their owners are as wondrously diverse as the great country that has bred them. ",Comedy
Galaxy Quest,"The stars of a 1970s sci-fi show - now scraping a living through re-runs and sci-fi conventions - are beamed aboard an alien spacecraft. Believing the cast's heroic on-screen dramas are historical documents of real-life adventures, the band of aliens turn to the ailing celebrities for help in their quest to overcome the oppressive regime in their solar system. ",Adventure
Waiting for Guffman,"When the town of Blaine, Mo., approaches its sesquicentennial, there's only one way to celebrate: with a musical revue called ""Red, White and Blaine."" Hoping the show will be his ticket back to Broadway, impresario Corky St. Clair (Christopher Guest) rounds up a cast of enthusiastic but untalented locals (Eugene Levy, Fred Willard, Catherine O'Hara) to perform his masterwork. But, when Corky reveals that theater agent Mort Guffman will attend the opening, things really kick into high gear. ",Comedy
Army of Darkness,"3rd Evil Dead movie. Ash (Bruce Campbell) finds himself trapped in medieval times. He must quest for the Necronomicon, a book of evil which can return him to his time. Unfortunately, he releases the evil trapped inside the book and unleashes an army of the dead. ",Comedy
Radio Days,"A middle-aged man looks back on his childhood in Rockaway, N.Y., in a series of vignettes focused on the golden days of radio. Joe (Woody Allen), who narrates, is portrayed as a teenager in the film by Seth Green. Eccentric relatives and radio personalities inhabit various stories, including an unlucky aunt (Dianne Wiest), a cigarette girl (Mia Farrow) with career ambitions, and two burglars with excellent timing. Young Joe involves his friends in a scam to earn a decoder ring. ",Comedy
Broadway Danny Rose,"Danny Rose (Woody Allen), a hopeless New York talent agent, is a tireless workhorse for his eccentric, unimpressive acts. When Rose signs has-been lounge singer Lou Canova (Nick Apollo Forte), he knows he has to go to great lengths to keep his new client, which means escorting Canova's mistress, Tina (Mia Farrow), to the singer's shows. The only problem is that her ex-boyfriend is a jealous gangster who thinks Rose is her new man and wants revenge. ",Comedy
The Rocky Horror Picture Show,"In this cult classic, sweethearts Brad (Barry Bostwick) and Janet (Susan Sarandon), stuck with a flat tire during a storm, discover the eerie mansion of Dr. Frank-N-Furter (Tim Curry), a transvestite scientist. As their innocence is lost, Brad and Janet meet a houseful of wild characters, including a rocking biker (Meat Loaf) and a creepy butler (Richard O'Brien). Through elaborate dances and rock songs, Frank-N-Furter unveils his latest creation: a muscular man named ""Rocky."" ",Comedy
The Party,"Sharif (Ahmed Ezz), a businessman, accompanies his wife to a supermarket and waits for her outside. When she does not return, Sharif and a policeman investigate her disappearance. ",Comedy
Paddington,A little bear will make a big splash. ,Adventure
Death at a Funeral,"Chaos reigns when members of a dysfunctional family gather to bury a loved one. Son Daniel (Matthew MacFadyen) anticipates a face-off with his famous brother Robert (Rupert Graves), while cousin Martha (Daisy Donovan) and her fiance Simon (Alan Tudyk) are desperate to make a good impression on her father. In the midst of the family turmoil, a mystery guest threatens to bring the deceased's skeleton out of the closet. ",Comedy
Election,"Jim McAllister (Matthew Broderick), a well-liked high school government teacher, can't help but notice that successful student Tracy Flick (Reese Witherspoon) uses less than ethical tactics to get what she wants. When Tracy runs for school president, Jim feels that she will be a poor influence on the student body and convinces Paul, a dim-witted but popular student athlete, to run against Tracy. When she becomes aware of Jim's secret involvement in the race, a bitter feud is sparked. ",Comedy
Deconstructing Harry,"Novelist Harry Block (Woody Allen) has become a success by turning his family and friends' lives into fodder for his books. Due to his novels' popularity, the university that once kicked Harry out has asked him to return for a ceremony that will honor him. As Harry sets out for the trip, he is confronted by his fictional characters, as well as real people who no longer want anything to do with him, and he learns how deeply his overly candid stories have affected those around him. ",Comedy
Dumb and Dumber,"Imbecilic best friends Lloyd Christmas (Jim Carrey) and Harry Dunne (Jeff Daniels) stumble across a suitcase full of money left behind in Harry's car by Mary Swanson (Lauren Holly), who was on her way to the airport. The pair decide to go to Aspen, Colo., to return the money, unaware that it is connected to a kidnapping. As Harry and Lloyd -- who has fallen in love with Mary -- are pursued across the country by hired killers and police, they find both their friendship and their brains tested. ",Comedy
Gremlins,"A gadget salesman is looking for a special gift for his son and finds one at a store in Chinatown. The shopkeeper is reluctant to sell him the ""mogwai"" but sells it to him with the warning to never expose him to bright light, water, or to feed him after midnight. All of this happens and the result is a gang of gremlins that decide to tear up the town on Christmas Eve. ",Comedy
The Gods Must Be Crazy,"The tribal people in a remote African desert live a happy life, but it is all torn to pieces when a Coca-Cola bottle falls from a plane. With the villagers fighting over the strange foreign object, tribal leader Xi (N!xau) decides to take the bottle back to the gods to restore peace. His journey to the ""end of the world"" eventually has him crossing paths with a bumbling scientist (Marius Weyers) and a band of guerrillas who take a schoolteacher (Sandra Prinsloo) and her class hostage. ",Adventure
Hausu,"In an effort to avoid spending time with her father and his creepy new lover, young Gorgeous (Kimiko Ikegami) resolves to visit her aunt's remote mansion. With six of her closest friends in tow, including the musically inclined Melody (Eriko Tanaka) and the geeky Prof (Ai Matsubara), Gorgeous arrives at the estate, where supernatural events occur almost immediately. A severed head takes flight, household appliances come to life and a portrait of a cat seems to contain an evil spirit. ",Comedy
The Suicide Squad,"Welcome to hell--a.k.a. Belle Reve, the prison with the highest mortality rate in the US of A. Where the worst Super-Villains are kept and where they will do anything to get out--even join the super-secret, super-shady Task Force X. Today's do-or-die assignment? Assemble a collection of cons, including Bloodsport, Peacemaker, Captain Boomerang, Ratcatcher 2, Savant, King Shark, Blackguard, Javelin and everyone's favorite psycho, Harley Quinn. Then arm them heavily and drop them (literally) on the remote, enemy-infused island of Corto Maltese. Trekking through a jungle teeming with militant adversaries and guerrilla forces at every turn, the Squad is on a search-and-destroy mission with only Colonel Rick Flag on the ground to make them behave...and Amanda Waller's government techies in their ears, tracking their every movement. And as always, one wrong move and they're dead (whether at the hands of their opponents, a teammate, or Waller herself). If anyone's laying down bets, the smart money is against them--all of them. ",Action
School of Rock,"Overly enthusiastic guitarist Dewey Finn (Jack Black) gets thrown out of his bar band and finds himself in desperate need of work. Posing as a substitute music teacher at an elite private elementary school, he exposes his students to the hard rock gods he idolizes and emulates -- much to the consternation of the uptight principal (Joan Cusack). As he gets his privileged and precocious charges in touch with their inner rock 'n' roll animals, he imagines redemption at a local Battle of the Bands. ",Comedy
A Mighty Wind,"In this hilarious backstage mockumentary, three eclectic, never-quite-famous folk bands come together for the first time in decades following the death of their manager to put on an reunion concert in his honor, at the request of his son (Bob Balaban). For the members of The Folksmen, The New Main Street Singers, and Mitch &amp; Mickey, time has not been kind. As the show approaches, apprehension sets in, romances are rekindled and ambitions are permanently deferred. ",Comedy
Major League,"The new owner of the Cleveland Indians, former showgirl Rachel Phelps (Margaret Whitton), has a sweetheart deal to move the team to Miami. But to break the lease with the city of Cleveland, ticket sales have to plummet. So Phelps hires the most incompetent players available, including near-blind pitcher Rick Vaughn (Charlie Sheen) and injury-prone catcher Jake Taylor (Tom Berenger). But her villainous tactics accidentally foster a can-do team spirit, turning the Indians into potential winners. ",Comedy
Caddyshack,"Danny Noonan (Michael O'Keefe), a teen down on his luck, works as a caddy at the snob-infested Bushwood Country Club to raise money for his college education. In an attempt to gain votes for a college scholarship reserved for caddies, Noonan volunteers to caddy for a prominent and influential club member (Ted Knight). Meanwhile, Danny struggles to prepare for the high pressure Caddy Day golf tournament while absorbing New Age advice from wealthy golf guru Ty Webb (Chevy Chase). ",Comedy
Grease,"Experience the friendships, romances and adventures of a group of high school kids in the 1950s. Welcome to the singing and dancing world of ""Grease,"" the most successful movie musical of all time. A wholesome exchange student (Olivia Newton-John) and a leather-clad Danny (John Travolta) have a summer romance, but will it cross clique lines? ",Comedy
Ghostbusters: Afterlife,"In Ghostbusters: Afterlife, when a single mom and her two kids arrive in a small town, they begin to discover their connection to the original ghostbusters and the secret legacy their grandfather left behind. ",Adventure
Pitch Perfect,"College student Beca (Anna Kendrick) knows she does not want to be part of a clique, but that's exactly where she finds herself after arriving at her new school. Thrust in among mean gals, nice gals and just plain weird gals, Beca finds that the only thing they have in common is how well they sing together. She takes the women of the group out of their comfort zone of traditional arrangements and into a world of amazing harmonic combinations in a fight to the top of college music competitions. ",Comedy
Booksmart,"Academic overachievers Amy and Molly thought keeping their noses to the grindstone gave them a leg up on their high school peers. But on the eve of graduation, the best friends suddenly realize that they may have missed out on the special moments of their teenage years. Determined to make up for lost time, the girls decide to cram four years of not-to-be missed fun into one night -- a chaotic adventure that no amount of book smarts could prepare them for. ",Comedy
The Muppets,"Walter, the world's biggest Muppet fan, is on vacation in Los Angeles with his brother Gary (Jason Segel) and Gary's girlfriend, Mary (Amy Adams). They discover that greedy Tex Richman (Chris Cooper) plans to raze Muppet Studios and drill for oil on the spot. Desperate to save the Muppets' former stomping grounds, the three friends join forces with Kermit to reunite Miss Piggy, Fozzie and the rest of the gang to hold a telethon to raise the $10 million they need to save the studio . ",Adventure
Whatever Works,"After a failed suicide attempt, brilliant New York misanthrope Boris Yellnikoff (Larry David) forsakes his posh upper-class existence for meager accommodations in Chinatown. He meets his exact opposite in Melody (Evan Rachel Wood), a pageant queen from the Deep South who's long on sweetness but short on smarts. Surprisingly, Boris and Melody marry, but the sparks really fly when Melody's born-again Christian mother (Patricia Clarkson) arrives and finds liberation instead of damnation. ",Comedy
Mean Girls,"Teenage Cady Heron (Lindsay Lohan) was educated in Africa by her scientist parents. When her family moves to the suburbs of Illinois, Cady finally gets to experience public school and gets a quick primer on the cruel, tacit laws of popularity that divide her fellow students into tightly knit cliques. She unwittingly finds herself in the good graces of an elite group of cool students dubbed ""the Plastics,"" but Cady soon realizes how her shallow group of new friends earned this nickname. ",Comedy
Anchorman: The Legend of Ron Burgundy,"Hotshot television anchorman Ron Burgundy (Will Ferrell) welcomes upstart reporter Veronica Corningstone (Christina Applegate) into the male-dominated world of 1970s broadcast news -- that is, until the talented female journalist begins to outshine Burgundy on air. Soon he grows jealous, begins a bitter feud with Veronica and eventually makes a vulgar slip on live TV that ruins his career. However, when an outrageous story breaks at the San Diego Zoo, Ron may get a chance to redeem himself. ",Comedy
Human Traffic,"For Jip, Lulu, Koop, Nina and Moff, the dead-end jobs they endure during the week just kill the time until Friday night. That's when they cut very loose and get on the crazy roller coaster ride that takes them right through to Monday morning. An adrenaline-pumped comedy, ""Human Traffic"" chronicles the ups and downs -- both chemical and emotional -- of five friends whose weekends are filled with endless clubbing, pubbing and partying where there are no rules, no limits and no saying ""no."" ",Comedy
The Frighteners,"Once an architect, Frank Bannister (Michael J. Fox) now passes himself off as an exorcist of evil spirits. To bolster his facade, he claims his ""special"" gift is the result of a car accident that killed his wife. But what he does not count on is more people dying in the small town where he lives. As he tries to piece together the supernatural mystery of these killings, he falls in love with the wife (Trini Alvarado) of one of the victims and deals with a crazy FBI agent (Jeffrey Combs). ",Comedy
Tommy Boy,"After his beloved father (Brian Dennehy) dies, dimwitted Tommy Callahan (Chris Farley) inherits a near-bankrupt automobile parts factory in Sandusky, Ohio. His brand new stepmother, Beverly (Bo Derek), wants to cash out and close, but Tommy's sentimental attachment to his father's employees spurs him to make one last-ditch effort to find someone who will buy their products. With his father's tightly wound assistant, Richard (David Spade), in tow, Tommy hits the road to scare up some new clients. ",Adventure
Tremors,"Repairmen Val McKee (Kevin Bacon) and Earl Bassett (Fred Ward) are tired of their dull lives in the small desert town of Perfection, Nev. But just as the two try to skip town, they happen upon a series of mysterious deaths and a concerned seismologist (Finn Carter) studying unnatural readings below the ground. With the help of an eccentric couple (Reba McEntire, Michael Gross), the group fights for survival against giant, worm-like monsters hungry for human flesh. ",Comedy
Pretty Woman,"In this modern update on Cinderella, a prostitute and a wealthy businessman fall hard for one another, forming an unlikely pair. While on a business trip in L.A., Edward (Richard Gere), who makes a living buying and breaking up companies, picks up a hooker, Vivian (Julia Roberts), on a lark. After Edward hires Vivian to stay with him for the weekend, the two get closer, only to discover there are significant hurdles to overcome as they try to bridge the gap between their very different worlds. ",Comedy
Coming to America,"Prince Akeem (Eddie Murphy) is the prince of a wealthy African country and wants for nothing, except a wife who will love him in spite of his title. To escape an arranged marriage, Akeem flees to America accompanied by his persnickety sidekick, Semmi (Arsenio Hall), to find his queen. Disguised as a foreign student working in fast food, he romances Lisa (Shari Headley), but struggles with revealing his true identity to her and his marital intentions to his king father (James Earl Jones). ",Comedy
Spaceballs,"In a distant galaxy, planet Spaceball has depleted its air supply, leaving its citizens reliant on a product called ""Perri-Air."" In desperation, Spaceball's leader President Skroob (Mel Brooks) orders the evil Dark Helmet (Rick Moranis) to kidnap Princess Vespa (Daphne Zuniga) of oxygen-rich Druidia and hold her hostage in exchange for air. But help arrives for the Princess in the form of renegade space pilot Lone Starr (Bill Pullman) and his half-man, half-dog partner, Barf (John Candy). ",Adventure
Little Shop of Horrors,"Meek flower shop assistant Seymour (Rick Moranis) pines for co-worker Audrey (Ellen Greene). During a total eclipse, he discovers an unusual plant he names Audrey II, which feeds only on human flesh and blood. The growing plant attracts a great deal of business for the previously struggling store. After Seymour feeds Audrey's boyfriend, Orin (Steve Martin), to the plant after Orin's accidental death, he must come up with more bodies for the increasingly bloodthirsty plant. ",Comedy
Sleeper,"After health-store owner Miles Monroe (Woody Allen) dies during a routine surgery, his family has him cryogenically frozen. He awakens 200 years later, revived by a group of underground radicals who oppose the oppressive regime in power. Once the police arrive to arrest the group, Miles flees, disguised as a robot. He meets Luna Schlosser (Diane Keaton), and they gradually fall in love. When Miles is later captured by the authorities, Luna seeks out the rebels to help rescue him. ",Comedy
Gentlemen Prefer Blondes,"Lorelei Lee (Marilyn Monroe) is a beautiful showgirl engaged to be married to the wealthy Gus Esmond (Tommy Noonan), much to the disapproval of Gus' rich father, Esmond Sr., who thinks that Lorelei is just after his money. When Lorelei goes on a cruise accompanied only by her best friend, Dorothy Shaw (Jane Russell), Esmond Sr. hires Ernie Malone (Elliott Reid), a private detective, to follow her and report any questionable behavior that would disqualify her from the marriage. ",Comedy
Arif V 216,A robotic alien and his human friend travel through time to the 1960s. ,Comedy
The Christmas Chronicles,"Siblings Kate and Teddy Pierce hatch a scheme to capture Santa Claus on Christmas Eve. When the plan goes awry, the kids join forces with a somewhat jolly Saint Nick and his loyal elves to save the holiday before it's too late. ",Adventure
Bhoot Police,"Two brothers, Vibhooti and Chiraunji, have fought their share of ghosts. A new case forces them to rethink their own abilities and beliefs. ",Comedy
Miss Pettigrew Lives for a Day,"It's 1939 and governess Guinevere Pettigrew finds herself out of work and on the bread line. Middle-aged and running out of options, Miss Pettigrew takes an uncharacteristic gamble when, after being refused work at an employment agency,she steals the details of a juicy assignment and pursues the job herself. ",Comedy
Frequently Asked Questions About Time Travel,"After losing his job at an amusement park, sci-fi geek Ray heads to the bar with his friends, fellow nerd Toby and die-hard cynic Pete. Bored of his friends sci-fi-related chatter, Pete heads to the bathroom where he witnesses a bizarre rift in time and a terrifying vision of the future in which everybody in the bar has been massacred. ",Comedy
Wedding Crashers,"Jeremy (Vince Vaughn) and John (Owen Wilson) are divorce mediators who spend their free time crashing wedding receptions. For the irrepressible duo, there are few better ways to drink for free and bed vulnerable women. So when Secretary of the Treasury William Cleary (Christopher Walken) announces the wedding of his daughter, the pair make it their mission to crash the high-profile event. But their game hits a bump in the road when John locks eyes with bridesmaid Claire (Rachel McAdams). ",Comedy
Elf,"Buddy (Will Ferrell) was accidentally transported to the North Pole as a toddler and raised to adulthood among Santa's elves. Unable to shake the feeling that he doesn't fit in, the adult Buddy travels to New York, in full elf uniform, in search of his real father. As it happens, this is Walter Hobbs (James Caan), a cynical businessman. After a DNA test proves this, Walter reluctantly attempts to start a relationship with the childlike Buddy with increasingly chaotic results. ",Adventure
Old School,"After discovering his girlfriend (Juliette Lewis) has been participating in group sex, attorney Mitch (Luke Wilson) feels his world come undone. He moves into a new place, which happens to be near a college campus, and tries to get his life back together. Two of his best friends, Frank (Will Ferrell) and Beanie (Vince Vaughn), start hanging out at Mitch's house, eventually turning the place into a wild party pad, much to the ire of the college's dean, Gordon ""Cheese"" Pritchard (Jeremy Piven). ",Comedy
Meet the Parents,Everything that can possibly go wrong for groom-to-be Greg Focker (Ben Stiller) does. The problems begin with Greg's disastrous first meeting with his girlfriend's family -- most notably her intimidating father Jack Byrnes (Robert De Niro) and it's all downhill from there. ,Comedy
American Pie,"A riotous and raunchy exploration of the most eagerly anticipated -- and most humiliating -- rite of adulthood, known as losing one's virginity. In this hilarious lesson in life, love and libido, a group of friends, fed up with their well-deserved reputations as sexual no-hitters, decide to take action. ",Comedy
Austin Powers: International Man of Mystery,"A world-class playboy and part-time special agent, Powers is defrosted after 30 years in a cryogenic freeze to match wits with his nemesis, Dr. Evil (also played by Myers). Possessing antiquated spy skills and mod mannerisms from the `60s, Austin must confront a villain like no other while making peace with his own out-of-date, swinging sexuality. ",Adventure
Happy Gilmore,"All Happy Gilmore (Adam Sandler) has ever wanted is to be a professional hockey player. But he soon discovers he may actually have a talent for playing an entirely different sport: golf. When his grandmother (Frances Bay) learns she is about to lose her home, Happy joins a golf tournament to try and win enough money to buy it for her. With his powerful driving skills and foulmouthed attitude, Happy becomes an unlikely golf hero -- much to the chagrin of the well-mannered golf professionals. ",Comedy
Mighty Aphrodite,"When Lenny (Woody Allen) and his wife, Amanda (Helena Bonham Carter), adopt a baby, Lenny realizes that his son is a genius and becomes obsessed with finding the boy's biological mother in hopes that she will be brilliant too. But when he learns that Max's mother is Linda Ash (Mira Sorvino), a kindhearted prostitute and porn star, Lenny is determined to reform her immoral lifestyle. A Greek chorus chimes in to relate the plot to Greek mythology in this quirky comedy. ",Comedy
Mallrats,"T.S. (Jeremy London) and his best friend, Brodie (Jason Lee), take a trip to the mall after their girlfriends break up with them. T.S.'s girlfriend, Brandi (Claire Forlani), is participating in a dating game show at the mall, which was the initial cause of their breakup. Meanwhile, Brodie's ex, Rene (Shannen Doherty), has begun dating sleazy store manager Shannon (Ben Affleck). T.S. and Brodie seek out ways to ruin the game show, hunted all the while by Brandi's father, Jared (Michael Rooker). ",Comedy
Jumanji,Movie ,Adventure
Les visiteurs,"Godefroy de Papincourt, Count of Montmirail (Jean Reno), is a 12th-century Gallic knight who finds himself transported to 1993, along with his dim servant, Jacquouille la Fripouille (Christian Clavier), when a wizard's spell goes awry. Startled and perplexed by modern technology, Godefroy and Jacquouille run amok, destroying cars and causing chaos until they meet Beatrice de Montmirail (Valérie Lemercier), an aristocratic descendant of the nobleman, who may be able to help them get back to 1123. ",Comedy
What About Bob?,"Before going on vacation, self-involved psychiatrist Dr. Leo Marvin (Richard Dreyfuss) has the misfortune of taking on a new patient: Bob Wiley (Bill Murray). An exemplar of neediness and a compendium of phobias, Bob follows Marvin to his family's country house. Dr. Marvin tries to get him to leave; the trouble is, everyone love Bob. As his oblivious patient makes himself at home, Dr. Marvin loses his professional composure and, before long, may be ready for the loony bin himself. ",Comedy
Uncle Buck,"When Cindy (Elaine Bromka) and her husband, Bob (Garrett M. Brown), have to leave town for a family emergency, there is only one person available to babysit for their three kids: Bob's lazy, carefree brother, Buck (John Candy). While he immediately gets along with the two younger children (Gaby Hoffman, Macaulay Culkin), Buck must change his bachelor lifestyle if he wants to be a responsible caregiver for the angst-filled teenager, Tia (Jean Louisa Kelly). ",Comedy
Bull Durham,"In Durham, N.C., the Bulls minor league baseball team has one asset no other can claim: a poetry-loving groupie named Annie Savoy (Susan Sarandon). As the team's season begins, Annie selects brash new recruit Ebby Calvin Laloosh (Tim Robbins), whom she christens ""Nuke,"" to inspire with the religion of baseball. Nuke also receives guidance from veteran player Crash Davis (Kevin Costner), who settles Nuke's erratic pitching and teaches him to follow the catcher's lead. ",Comedy
Sixteen Candles,"With the occasion all but overshadowed by her sister's upcoming wedding, angst-ridden Samantha (Molly Ringwald) faces her 16th birthday with typical adolescent dread. Samantha pines for studly older boy Jake (Michael Schoeffling), but worries that her chastity will be a turnoff for the popular senior. Meanwhile, Samantha must constantly rebuff the affections of nerdy Ted (Anthony Michael Hall), the only boy in the school, unfortunately, who seems to take an interest in her. ",Comedy
Funny Face,"Dispatched on an assignment, New York City-based fashion photographer Dick Avery (Fred Astaire) is struck by the beauty of Jo Stockton (Audrey Hepburn), a shy bookstore employee he's photographed by accident, who he believes has the potential to become a successful model. He gets Jo to go with him to France, where he snaps more pictures of her against iconic Parisian backdrops. In the process, they fall for one another, only to find hurdles in their way. ",Comedy
Aladdin,"Aladdin is a lovable street urchin who meets Princess Jasmine, the beautiful daughter of the sultan of Agrabah. While visiting her exotic palace, Aladdin stumbles upon a magic oil lamp that unleashes a powerful, wisecracking, larger-than-life genie. As Aladdin and the genie start to become friends, they must soon embark on a dangerous mission to stop the evil sorcerer Jafar from overthrowing young Jasmine's kingdom. ",Adventure
Ted,A mathematical genius (Daniel Passer) completely retreats from society and mails bombs to perceived enemies. ,Comedy
Paul,"For the past 60 years, a wisecracking alien named Paul (Seth Rogen) has resided at a top-secret military base in America's UFO heartland. When Paul decides he has had enough of Earth, he escapes from the compound and hops on the first handy vehicle -- a rented RV manned by two British sci-fi nerds named Graeme (Simon Pegg) and Clive (Nick Frost). With federal agents and the father of an accidental kidnap victim on their tail, the two hatch a crazy plan to help Paul return to his spaceship. ",Adventure
Knocked Up,"Rising journalist Alison Scott (Katherine Heigl) hits a serious bump in the road after a one-night stand with irresponsible slacker Ben Stone (Seth Rogen) results in pregnancy. Rather than raise the baby on her own, she decides to give Ben a chance to prove he is father material. However, he is unsure if he is ready to be a parent, and both wonder if they would be compatible lifetime partners. ",Comedy
The Holiday,"Two women, one (Cameron Diaz) from America and one (Kate Winslet) from Britain, swap homes at Christmastime after bad breakups with their boyfriends. Each woman finds romance with a local man (Jude Law, Jack Black) but realizes that the imminent return home may end the relationship. ",Comedy
Napoleon Dynamite,"In small-town Preston, Idaho, awkward teen Napoleon Dynamite (Jon Heder) has trouble fitting in. After his grandmother is injured in an accident, his life is made even worse when his strangely nostalgic uncle, Rico (Jon Gries), shows up to keep an eye on him. With no safe haven at home or at school, Napoleon befriends the new kid, Pedro (Efren Ramirez), a morose Hispanic boy who speaks little English. Together the two launch a campaign to run for class president. ",Comedy
The Wedding Singer,"Set in 1985, Adam Sandler plays a nice guy with a broken heart who's stuck in one of the most romantic jobs in the world, a wedding singer. He loses all hope when he is abandoned at the altar by his fiancé. He meets a young woman named Julia (Drew Barrymore), who enlists his help to plan her wedding. He falls in love with her and must win her over before she gets married. ",Comedy
Liar Liar,"Conniving attorney Fletcher Reede (Jim Carrey) is an ace in the courtroom, but his dishonesty and devotion to work ruin his relationships. His wife, Audrey (Maura Tierney), has left him for a more dependable man, and Fletcher often breaks the commitments he makes to his beloved son, Max (Justin Cooper). When Max wishes his dad would stop lying for 24 hours, Fletcher suddenly finds that he can only speak the truth -- on the day his career-deciding court case has to be won. ",Comedy
Matilda,A sportswriter (Robert Mitchum) sees a story in a small-time promoter (Elliott Gould) and his boxing kangaroo. ,Comedy
Clueless,"Shallow, rich and socially successful Cher (Alicia Silverstone) is at the top of her Beverly Hills high school's pecking scale. Seeing herself as a matchmaker, Cher first coaxes two teachers into dating each other. Emboldened by her success, she decides to give hopelessly klutzy new student Tai (Brittany Murphy) a makeover. When Tai becomes more popular than she is, Cher realizes that her disapproving ex-stepbrother (Paul Rudd) was right about how misguided she was -- and falls for him. ",Comedy
Ace Ventura: Pet Detective,"When the dolphin mascot of Miami's NFL team is abducted, Ace Ventura (Jim Carrey), a zany private investigator who specializes in finding missing animals, looks into the case. Soon Miami Dolphins players are kidnapped too, including star player Dan Marino (Dan Marino), making Ace's sleuth work even more pressing. Working with Dolphins representative Melissa Robinson (Courteney Cox), Ace closes in on the culprits, but not before many ridiculous misadventures. ",Comedy
Hocus Pocus,"For 30 years the Sanderson Sisters have been casting spells, now see them back on the big screen for a limited time as we celebrate the 30th Anniversary of Hocus Pocus! Conjured up by some unsuspecting pranksters, a tricky trio of 300-year-old witches set out to cast a spell on the town and reclaim their youth. But first, they must get their act together and outwit three kids and a talking cat. ",Comedy
Dave,"Shifty White House chief of staff Bob Alexander (Frank Langella) hatches a scheme to use a double for the president (Kevin Kline) at a public photo opportunity. Small business owner Dave Kovic (Kline) fits the bill, but after the president suffers a debilitating stroke, opportunist Alexander arranges for Dave to step in full time without even informing the First Lady (Sigourney Weaver). It doesn't take long before the press, the nation and the president's wife realize something is different. ",Comedy
The Addams Family,"Members of the mysterious and spooky Addams family -- Gomez, Morticia, Pugsley, Wednesday, Uncle Fester and Grandma -- are readily preparing for a visit from their even creepier relatives. But trouble soon arises when shady TV personality Margaux Needler realizes that the Addams' eerie hilltop mansion is standing in the way of her dream to sell all the houses in the neighborhood. ",Comedy
UHF,"After losing yet another job, George (Weird Al Yankovic) wonders if there is any career that can handle his outrageous personality. When George's uncle (Stanley Brock) hands him the deed to a local TV station, George creates a series of television shows based on social satire and hyperactive humor, with the help of his best friend, Bob (David Bowe). However, a rival station's bitter CEO (Kevin McCarthy) tries to destroy George's wacky programming, forcing him to fight back. ",Comedy
Overboard,"Snobbish and wealthy Joanna Stayton (Goldie Hawn) is living a life of leisure with her husband, Grant (Edward Herrmann), when she falls off their yacht and suffers amnesia. Grant takes the opportunity to rid himself of the demanding Joanna -- but Dean (Kurt Russell), a widowed carpenter with four kids who once worked for Joanna, arrives and claims she's his wife. Joanna can't remember her past identity, but has trouble believing that she was ever meant to be a working-class mother of four. ",Comedy
Flight of the Navigator,"This 1978 Disney adventure tells the story of 12-year-old David (Joey Cramer) who lives with his family in Fort Lauderdale, Fla. When he awakens from being accidentally knocked out in the forest near his home, he finds that eight years have passed. His family is overjoyed to have him back, but just as perplexed as he is by the fact that he hasn't aged. When a NASA scientist (Howard Hesseman) discovers a UFO nearby, David gets the chance to unravel the mystery and recover the life he lost. ",Adventure
Real Genius,"When science whiz Mitch Taylor (Gabe Jarret) arrives at Pacific Tech as a freshman, he's paired up with genius senior Chris Knight (Val Kilmer) to work on a laser project. Mitch initially doesn't care for Knight's slacker attitude, but is eventually won over, and their friendship allows them to make new progress on the laser project. It's only when the boys learn that the government intends to use the laser as a weapon that they start to question what they've actually been working for. ",Comedy
Time Bandits,"Young history buff Kevin (Craig Warnock) can scarcely believe it when six dwarfs emerge from his closet one night. Former employees of the Supreme Being (Ralph Richardson), they've purloined a map charting all of the holes in the fabric of time and are using it to steal treasures from different historical eras. Taking Kevin with them, they variously drop in on Napoleon (Ian Holm), Robin Hood (John Cleese) and King Agamemnon (Sean Connery) before the Supreme Being catches up with them. ",Adventure
Bananas,"In this early Woody Allen comedy, the director stars as Fielding Mellish, a hapless product-testing New Yorker desperately attempting to impress a young and attractive social activist named Nancy (Louise Lasser). When Mellish travels to the turbulent country of San Marcos, he falls in with resistance fighters and, before long, becomes drafted as their leader. While Mellish's position of authority wins Nancy over, he has to deal with the many burdens of being a revolutionary leader. ",Comedy
Yesterday,Two college students who are in love face obstacles. ,Comedy
Always Be My Maybe,Two brokenhearted people give love advice to each other. ,Comedy
Long Shot,"An innocent man is accused of murder, leading his attorney on a wild chase to confirm his alibi using raw footage from a television show. ",Comedy
Warm Bodies,"A terrible plague has left the planet's population divided between zombies and humans. An unusual zombie named R (Nicholas Hoult) sees his walking-dead brethren attacking a living woman named Julie (Teresa Palmer) and rescues her. Julie sees that R is different from the other zombies, and the pair embark on an unusual relationship. As their bond grows and R becomes more and more human, a chain of events unfolds that could transform the entire lifeless world. ",Comedy
The F Word,"A medical-school dropout (Daniel Radcliffe) tries to hide his attraction to his new friend (Zoe Kazan), a bubbly artist who already has a boyfriend. ",Comedy
Bridesmaids,"Kimberly (Shelley Hack), Caryl (Sela Ward), Beth (Stephanie Faracy) and Pat reunite in their hometown for a fifth friend's wedding. ",Comedy
Yes Man,"Carl Allen (Jim Carrey) is stuck in a rut with his negative ways. Then he goes to a self-help seminar and learns to unleash the power of yes. Living in the affirmative leads him to all sorts of amazing and transforming experiences; he gets a job promotion, and even finds a new romance. But Carl finds that too much of anything, even positive thinking, is not necessarily a good thing. ",Comedy
Role Models,"After salesmen Danny (Paul Rudd) and Wheeler (Seann William Scott) trash a company truck, the court gives them a choice: jail time or community service in a mentoring program. Thinking to take the easy way out, the two overgrown adolescents find themselves paired with a teenager (Christopher Mintz-Plasse), who is experiencing the pangs of first love, and a foul-mouthed fifth-grader (Bobb'e J. Thompson), who needs an attitude adjustment. ",Comedy
Tenacious D in The Pick of Destiny,"Musicians JB (Jack Black) and KG (Kyle Gass) begin a friendship that could lead to the formation of the greatest rock band in the world. To make that dream come true, the righteous duo embark on a quest to find a legendary guitar pick that possesses supernatural powers. ",Adventure
Bruce Almighty,"Bruce Nolan's (Jim Carrey) career in TV has been stalled for a while, and when he's passed over for a coveted anchorman position, he loses it, complaining that God is treating him poorly. Soon after, God (Morgan Freeman) actually contacts Bruce and offers him all of his powers if he thinks he can do a better job. Bruce accepts and goes on a spree, using his new-found abilities for selfish, personal use until he realizes that the prayers of the world are going unanswered. ",Comedy
Jay and Silent Bob Strike Back,"When Jay and Silent Bob learn that a ""Bluntman and Chronic"" movie is being made featuring their comic book counterparts, they drool at the thought of fat movie checks rolling in. But when the pair find that there won't be any royalties coming their way, they set out to sabotage the flick at all costs. ",Comedy
Serendipity,"On a magical night when they are in in their 20s, Jonathan (John Cusack) meets Sara (Kate Beckinsale). He finds it love at first sight, but Sara believes in destiny. After 10 years the two -- with 3,000 miles between them -- must decide if fate wants them to be together again. When love feels like magic, it is called destiny; when destiny has a sense of humor, it is serendipity. ",Comedy
Detroit Rock City,"Rock-loving teens and aspiring musicians Hawk (Edward Furlong), Lex (Giuseppe Andrews), Trip (James DeBello) and Jam (Sam Huntington) can't wait to see their favorite band, KISS, perform at an upcoming concert. However, when Jam's pious mother (Lin Shaye) finds the tickets to the event, she incinerates them, leaving the boys desperate for a way to see the show. In their attempts to see KISS, the lads endure misunderstandings, humiliation and violence, all just to see their beloved idols. ",Adventure
Addams Family Values,"The members of the odd Addams Family are up to more macabre antics in this sequel. This time around, Gomez Addams (Raul Julia) and his wife, Morticia (Anjelica Huston), are celebrating the arrival of a baby boy. But siblings Wednesday (Christina Ricci) and Pugsley (Jimmy Workman) are none too happy about the new addition, and try their best to eliminate the infant. When nanny Debbie Jelinsky (Joan Cusack) appears to keep the kids in line, her presence leads to an unexpected treacherous twist. ",Comedy
Hook,"When his young children are abducted by his old nemesis, Capt. Hook (Dustin Hoffman), middle-aged lawyer Peter Banning (Robin Williams) returns to his magical origins as Peter Pan. Peter must revisit a foggy past in which he abandoned Neverland for family life, leaving Tinkerbell (Julia Roberts) and the Lost Boys to fend for themselves. Given their bitterness toward Peter for growing up -- and their allegiance to their new leader, Rufio -- the old gang may not be happy to see him. ",Adventure
Creepshow,"A compendium of five short but terrifying tales contained within a single full-length feature, this film conjures scares from traditional bogeymen and portents of doom. In one story, a monster escapes from its holding cell. Another focuses on a husband (Leslie Nielsen) with a creative way of getting back at his cheating wife. Other stories concern a rural man (Stephen King) and a visitor from outer space, and a homeowner (E.G. Marshall) with huge bug problems and a boozing corpse. ",Comedy
Stripes,"Hard-luck cabbie John Winger (Bill Murray) -- directionless after being fired from his job and dumped by his girlfriend -- enlists in the U.S. Army with his close pal, Russell Ziskey (Harold Ramis). After his barely satisfactory performance in basic training, the irreverent Winger emerges as the figurehead for a ragtag band of Army misfits. However, his hijinks threaten to cause an international scandal when he inadvertently commandeers a military assault vehicle behind enemy lines. ",Comedy
Good Boys,"Two rent boys, hired to perform together, develop a relationship. ",Adventure
The Inbetweeners Movie,"Four uncool misfits take a post-high-school holiday in Malia, Crete, where they encounter a quartet of fun British gals. ",Comedy
Fresh,"Fresh (Sean Nelson) is a 12-year-old drug dealer who finds himself trapped in a web of poverty, corruption and racial tension in Brooklyn, New York. When his drug-addict sister Nichole (N'Bushe Wright) starts sleeping with local drug lord Esteban (Giancarlo Esposito), Fresh calls upon the skills he learned playing chess with his alcoholic father and speed-chess champion Sam (Samuel L. Jackson) and devises a complex strategy that will free both himself and his sister. ",Comedy
Metal Lords,"Two kids want to start a heavy metal band in a high school where exactly two kids care about heavy metal. Hunter (Adrian Greensmith) is a diehard metal fan who knows his history and shreds. His dream is to win the upcoming Battle of the Bands. He enlists his best friend Kevin (Jaeden Martell) to man the drums. But with schoolmates more interested in Bieber than Black Sabbath, finding a bassist is a struggle. Until Kevin overhears Emily (Isis Hainsworth) playing her cello. The motley crew must contend with school, parents, hormones and teen angst while trying to get along long enough for Skullf*cker to win the Battle of the Bands. ",Comedy
Hot Rod,"For Rod Kimball (Andy Samberg), performing stunts is a way of life, even though he is rather accident-prone. Poor Rod cannot even get any respect from his stepfather, Frank (Ian McShane), who beats him up in weekly sparring matches. When Frank falls ill, Rod devises his most outrageous stunt yet to raise money for Frank's operation -- and then Rod will kick Frank's butt. ",Comedy
Penelope,A woman and her mother try to avoid losing their ancestral castle and decadent lifestyle to taxes and modern times. ,Comedy
Charlie and the Chocolate Factory,"Based on the beloved Roald Dahl tale, this comedic and fantastical film follows young Charlie Bucket (Freddie Highmore) and his Grandpa Joe (David Kelly) as they join a small group of contest winners who get to tour the magical and mysterious factory of eccentric candy maker Willy Wonka (Johnny Depp). Aided by his diminutive Oompa Loompa workers (Deep Roy), Wonka has a hidden motivation for the tour, one that he will reveal only after the children in the group show their true colors. ",Adventure
Dodgeball: A True Underdog Story,"Average Joe's Gym and its owner, Peter La Fleur (Vince Vaughn), are both down on their luck. A fancy competing gym called Globo-Gym, run by the maniacal health nut White Goodman (Ben Stiller), is about to put Average Joe's out of business unless Peter can raise $50,000 to keep his mortgage. To save the gym, Peter and a ragtag group of Average Joe's members and employees enter a dodgeball contest with a big cash prize. In response, White forms his own Globo-Gym team to rout the competition. ",Comedy
Everyone Says I Love You,"The daughter of wealthy Manhattanites Joe (Woody Allen) and Steffi (Goldie Hawn), D.J. (Natasha Lyonne) has to contend with her extended family after her parents' divorce. The entire clan is abuzz about the impending wedding of her half-sister, Skylar (Drew Barrymore), and her fiancé, Holden (Edward Norton). However, when gruff former criminal Charlie (Tim Roth) enters the picture, things take an unexpected turn. Meanwhile, the lovelorn Joe pursues the beautiful Von (Julia Roberts) in Europe. ",Comedy
Four Rooms,"Working New Year's Eve at a hotel in Hollywood, Calif., the new bellhop, Ted (Tim Roth), has no idea what's in store for him. Left alone to tend to the guests, Ted soon finds himself in completely over his head. Between a domestic dispute and a demented entourage, spell-casting witches and destructive children, Ted has little hope of making it through the night in one piece. As he tries to maintain order and save his own life, the unlucky bellhop encounters one deranged guest after another. ",Comedy
Robin Hood: Men in Tights,"Crusading nobleman Robin of Loxley (Cary Elwes) escapes from prison in Jerusalem and returns home to find that the evil Prince John (Richard Lewis) has confiscated his family estate and is abusing the citizenry. Robin enlists his blind attendant, Blinkin (Mark Blankfield), his friend Will Scarlett O'Hara (Matthew Porretta) and Little John (Eric Allan Kramer) to help regain his home. Robin also hopes to woo the beautiful Maid Marian (Amy Yasbeck), but her chastity belt may prove a challenge. ",Adventure
Police Academy,"When the mayor of a crime-ridden city loosens the restrictions on entering the police academy in order to get more cops on the street, all manner of oddball characters enlist to join the force. Among the cadets are suave Carey Mahoney (Steve Guttenberg), hulking Moses Hightower (Bubba Smith), beautiful Karen Thompson (Kim Cattrall) and sound effects-generating Larvell Jones (Michael Winslow), who all have to show initiative and courage when they are faced with tough situations out on patrol. ",Comedy
Around the World in 80 Days,"Phileas Fogg (Steve Coogan) is an inventor living in Victorian England. He believes he can travel around the world in 80 days. Another inventor (Jim Broadbent) challenges him to make the trip, and Phileas agrees. Accompanying Phileas on his journey are his loyal manservant, Passepartout (Jackie Chan), and Monique (Cécile de France), a beautiful navigator. Utilizing a variety of transportation means and Passepartout's martial arts skills, the trio embarks on a globe-spanning adventure. ",Adventure
This Is the End,"In Hollywood, actor James Franco is throwing a party with a slew of celebrity pals. Among those in attendance are his buddies Jonah Hill, Seth Rogen, Jay Baruchel, Danny McBride and Craig Robinson. Suddenly, an apocalypse of biblical proportions erupts, causing untold carnage among Tinseltown's elite and trapping Franco's party in his home. As the world they knew disintegrates outside, cabin fever and dwindling supplies threaten to tear the six friends apart. ",Comedy
The Wedding Ringer,"Socially awkward Doug Harris (Josh Gad) is two weeks from marrying the gal (Kaley Cuoco-Sweeting) of his dreams, but he has a problem: He doesn't have any groomsmen for the occasion. Desperate and running out of time, Doug calls upon Jimmy Callahan (Kevin Hart), owner and operator of Best Man Inc., a company that provides attendants for friendless grooms. As Doug tries to pull off the con, a bromance unexpectedly blossoms between Jimmy and himself. ",Comedy
Talladega Nights: The Ballad of Ricky Bobby,"NASCAR superstar Ricky Bobby (Will Ferrell) is at the top of his game; adored by fans, a trophy wife by his side, and incredible wealth. But Ricky loses it all when French Formula One champion Jean Girard (Sacha Baron Cohen) roars onto the scene. Ricky, with the help of his ruthless father, must pull himself out of the depths of despair and restore his honor on the racetrack. ",Comedy
Nanny McPhee,"Widower Cedric Brown (Colin Firth) hires Nanny McPhee (Emma Thompson) to care for his seven rambunctious children, who have chased away all previous nannies. Taunted by Simon (Thomas Sangster) and his siblings, Nanny McPhee uses mystical powers to instill discipline. And when the children's great-aunt and benefactor, Lady Adelaide Stitch (Angela Lansbury), threatens to separate the kids, the family pulls together under the guidance of Nanny McPhee. ",Comedy
Hitch,"Dating coach Alex ""Hitch"" Hitchens (Will Smith) mentors a bumbling client, Albert (Kevin James), who hopes to win the heart of the glamorous Allegra Cole (Amber Valletta). While Albert makes progress, Hitchens faces his own romantic setbacks when proven techniques fail to work on Sara Melas (Eva Mendes), a tabloid reporter digging for dirt on Allegra Cole's love life. When Sara discovers Hitchens' connection to Albert -- now Allegra's boyfriend -- it threatens to destroy both relationships. ",Comedy
I Heart Huckabees,"Environmentalist Albert (Jason Schwartzman) enlists the services of ""existential detectives"" Bernard (Dustin Hoffman) and Vivian (Lily Tomlin) to solve the meaning of a succession of strange coincidences. The investigators conclude that the backstabbing Brad (Jude Law) -- a public relations manager at big-box retailer Huckabees -- is at the root of Albert's angst. Brad tries to turn the tables, however, by hiring the philosophic duo for his own nefarious purposes. ",Comedy
EuroTrip,"After a brutal breakup at a high-school graduation party, lovelorn Ohio teen Scott Thomas (Scott Mechlowicz) goes on a quest across Europe to find his sexy German pen pal, Mieke (Jessica Boehrs). Joining him are his brainless buddy (Jacob Pitts) and a pair of twins (Travis Wester, Michelle Trachtenberg) they meet up with in Paris. Scott's quest does not turn out to be easy, however, and the backpackers become embroiled in many farcical situations as they hop from country to country. ",Comedy
Drop Dead Gorgeous,"An annual beauty pageant in small-town Minnesota turns ridiculously competitive and ultimately chaotic in this biting comedy. Amber Atkins (Kirsten Dunst), the daughter of hard-drinking mom Annette (Ellen Barkin), and Becky Leeman (Denise Richards), who is motivated by her former beauty-queen mother, Gladys (Kirstie Alley), are among the top contenders in the event. As Amber, Becky, and other local girls prepare for the big day, bizarre incidents occur, leading up to an ending with a bang. ",Comedy
Grumpier Old Men,"Elderly, angling and contentious friends Max (Walter Matthau) and John (Jack Lemmon) back-burner their bickering when their kids (Kevin Pollak, Daryl Hannah) get engaged, but fishing season opens a can of romantic worms as newcomer Maria (Sophia Loren) plans to turn their beloved bait shop into a restaurant. Botched matchmaking leads to some major romantic mix-ups, until an unexpected death in the family helps everyone realize that the most important thing in life is love. ",Comedy
Death Becomes Her,"When a novelist loses her man to a movie star and former friend, she winds up in a psychiatric hospital. Years later, she returns home to confront the now-married couple, looking radiant. Her ex-husband's new wife wants to know her secret, and discovers that she has been taking a mysterious drug which grants eternal life to the person who drinks it. The actress follows suit, but discovers that immortality has a price. ",Comedy
Roxanne,"In this modern take on Edmond Rostand's classic play ""Cyrano de Bergerac,"" C. D. Bales (Steve Martin) is the witty, intelligent and brave fire chief of a small Pacific Northwest town who, due to the size of his enormous nose, declines to pursue the girl of his dreams, lovely Roxanne Kowalski (Daryl Hannah). Instead, when his shy underling Chris McConnell (Rick Rossovich) becomes smitten with Roxanne, Bales feeds the handsome young man the words of love to win her heart. ",Comedy
Short Circuit,"A 70-minute conversation with Col. Roberto Santivanez, former chief of El Salvador's intelligence agency. ",Comedy
Back to School,"Thornton Melon (Rodney Dangerfield) is concerned that his son Jason (Keith Gordon) is unsure whether to go to college, so the uneducated self-made millionaire encourages him by signing up as a student as well. As Jason tries to establish himself among his peers and make the diving team, Thornton falls for a pretty professor (Sally Kellerman) and gets others do his schoolwork for him. When the suspicious dean (Paxton Whitehead) finds out, Thornton needs to show he can get by on his own. ",Comedy
Revenge of the Nerds,"Geeky college students Gilbert (Anthony Edwards) and Lewis (Robert Carradine) are evicted from their dormitory when the Alpha Betas -- who recently burned down their own fraternity house by accident -- confiscate the building. When the college forces the freshmen to live in the gym, Gilbert, Lewis and their fellow dorks relocate to a run-down house. When the Alpha Betas, led by jock Stan (Ted McGinley), repeatedly humiliate them, the nerds plot revenge. ",Comedy
Bad Trip,A fugitive businessman's only chance for survival is a run for the Canadian border. ,Comedy
Eurovision Song Contest: The Story of Fire Saga,"Two small-town singers chase their pop star dreams at a global music competition, where scheming rivals, high stakes and onstage mishaps test their bond. ",Comedy
A Rainy Day in New York,Two sweethearts find their own meanings to life and love when chance circumstances lead them on different paths over the course of a day. ,Comedy
Set It Up,Two overworked and underpaid assistants come up with a plan to get their bosses off their backs by setting them up with each other. ,Comedy
Better Watch Out,Ashley travels to the suburban home of the Lerners to baby-sit their 12-year-old son Luke at Christmastime. She must soon defend herself and the young boy when unwelcome intruders announce their arrival. ,Comedy
Bad Grandpa,"Irascible Irving Zisman (Johnny Knoxville) and his young and impressionable grandson, Billy (Jackson Nicoll), set out on a road trip across America. Hidden cameras capture their insane and shocking encounters with a diverse set of unsuspecting citizens, including male strippers, disgruntled contestants (and their mothers) from a children's beauty pageant, mourners at a funeral home, patrons at a biker bar and more. Based on the ""Jackass"" TV series. ",Comedy
Diary of a Wimpy Kid: Rodrick Rules,"The riotous antics of angst-ridden, disaster-prone middle school student Greg Heffley continue in ""Diary of a Wimpy Kid: Rodrick Rules,"" focusing this time around on his complicated relationship with older brother Rodrick. A spikey-haired high school student, Rodrick is lazy and undisciplined and spends way too much time practicing with his rock band, Löded Diper. While he loves to torment Greg, he ultimately has a deep affection for his younger brother. ",Comedy
Friends with Benefits,"Jamie (Mila Kunis) is a New York-based executive recruiter who entices Dylan (Justin Timberlake), an art director from Los Angeles, to take a job at the New York office of GQ magazine. Finding that they have much in common, the two become fast friends. Feeling jaded by a number of broken romances, Dylan and Jamie decide that they are ready to quit looking for true love and focus on having fun. However, complications unfold when the two best pals add sex to their relationship. ",Comedy
Think Like a Man,"For one reason or another, friends Dominic (Michael Ealy), Jeremy (Jerry Ferrara), Michael (Terrence J) and Zeke (Romany Malco) just can't seem to seal the deal with the women in their lives. When their lovely ladies buy a book by comic Steve Harvey and start to apply its advice to their relationships, this band of brothers gets all shook up. Learning that they have been betrayed by one of their own, Dominic and his friends conspire to use the book's teachings to turn the tables. ",Comedy
Sex Drive,"Loveable teen Ian (Josh Zuckerman) has always been the best friend, not the boyfriend, and he thinks he's the last American virgin. Then online he meets Danielle, who is pretty, sweet, and really seems to like him. The trouble is Ian and Danielle live in different parts of the country. When she makes him an offer he can't refuse, Ian steals his brother's '69 GTO and sets out to meet her in person and lose his virginity. ",Comedy
Blended,"Recently divorced mom Lauren (Drew Barrymore) and widowed dad Jim (Adam Sandler) let their friends push them into a blind date, which goes disastrously wrong. Unsurprisingly, neither wants to see the other ever again. However, fate intervenes when both Jim and Lauren, unbeknown to each other, purchase one-half of the same vacation package at a South African resort; they and their children are forced to share the same suite and participate in a slew of family activities together. ",Comedy
Music and Lyrics,"Former music superstar Alex Fletcher (Hugh Grant) used to pack them in back in the 1980s, but now he is reduced to playing nostalgia tours and county fairs. He scores a chance at a major comeback when reigning pop diva Cora Corman (Haley Bennett) asks him to write a song for her, but he hasn't written anything in years and cannot compose lyrics anyway. Noticing that Sophie (Drew Barrymore), the plant lady, has a way with words, Alex proposes that he and Sophie make beautiful music together. ",Comedy
Slither,"Wheelsy is a small town where not much happens and everyone minds his own business. No one notices when evil slips in quietly but, when people find mutilated livestock and a woman goes missing, Sheriff Bill Pardy (Nathan Fillion) discovers an alien organism that threatens to devour all life on Earth. ",Comedy
Last Holiday,"When ordinary middle-class salesman George Bird (Alec Guinness) is diagnosed with a rare and fatal illness, he decides to spend his few remaining days in luxury. Cashing in his savings, he buys a fancy new wardrobe and poses as a wealthy businessman at a posh seaside resort. Unexpectedly, the dying man's luck begins to change during his holiday, from winning at gambling to establishing friendships with his fellow guests, most notably Sheila Rockingham (Beatrice Campbell). ",Comedy
Idiocracy,"In 2005, average in every way private Joe Bowers (Luke Wilson) is selected to take part in a secret military experiment to put him in hibernation for a year along with a woman named Rita (Maya Rudolph). The slumbering duo is forgotten when the base they are stored on is closed down and are left in stasis until 2505. When they finally wake up, they discover the average intelligence of humans has decreased so much that Joe is now the smartest man in the world. ",Adventure
Hollywood Ending,"Woody Allen stars as Val Waxman, a two-time Oscar winner turned washed-up, neurotic director in desperate need of a comeback. When it comes, Waxman finds himself backed into a corner: Work for his ex-wife Ellie (Tea Leoni) or forfeit his last shot. Is Val blinded by love when he opts for the reconnect? Is love blind when it comes to Ellie's staunch support? Literally and figuratively, the proof is the picture. ",Comedy
Wet Hot American Summer,"Set on the last day of camp, in the hot summer of 1981, ""Wet Hot American Summer"" follows a group of counselors who are each trying to complete their unfinished business before the day ends. The entire summer of pent-up sexual frustrations, unresolved post-traumatic stress, pending separations and of course, the talent show, all weigh heavily on the minds and groins of counselors and campers alike. ",Comedy
Zoolander,"Propelled to the top of the fashion world by a photogenic gaze he calls ""Blue Steel,"" dimwitted male model Derek Zoolander (Ben Stiller) thinks he's got a fourth consecutive win as Male Model of the Year in the bag. But, when his rival, Hansel (Owen Wilson), unexpectedly takes the crown, Derek is crushed. He becomes easy prey for fashion designer Jacobim Mugatu (Will Ferrell), who signs Derek to star in his ""Derelicte"" fashion show, then brainwashes him to kill Malaysia's prime minister. ",Comedy
BASEketball,"When slacker friends Joe Cooper (Trey Parker) and Doug Remer (Matt Stone) are challenged to a pickup basketball game against some jocks, they counter by proposing to play a game they learned called ""BASEketball,"" which combines basketball and baseball. In reality, they are improvising all of the rules, but somehow the sport becomes a hit. A promoter (Ernest Borgnine) forms a popular league, but after his death a rival owner (Robert Vaughn) wants to change the rules to increase profits. ",Comedy
Bowfinger,"On the verge of bankruptcy and desperate for his big break, aspiring filmmaker Bobby Bowfinger (Steve Martin) concocts a crazy plan to make his ultimate dream movie. Rallying a ragtag team that includes a starry-eyed ingenue (Heather Graham), a has-been diva (Christine Baranski) and a film studio gofer (Jamie Kennedy), he sets out to shoot a blockbuster featuring the biggest star in Hollywood, Kit Ramsey (Eddie Murphy) -- only without letting Ramsey know he's in the picture. ",Comedy
Mouse Hunt,"When their string magnate father, Rudolf Smuntz, dies, brothers Ernie (Nathan Lane) and Lars (Lee Evans) move into his decrepit mansion. Struggling to keep a promise to never sell the now unprofitable string factory, the brothers decide that restoring the house, the last built by a famous architect, could bring them a great deal of money. But during their restoration attempts, Ernie and Lars are continually frustrated by a malicious mouse that keeps destroying their efforts. ",Comedy
Bean,"At the Royal National Gallery in London, the bumbling Mr. Bean (Rowan Atkinson) is a guard with good intentions who always seems to destroy anything he touches. Unless, of course, he's sleeping on the job. With the chairman (John Mills) blocking Bean's firing, the board decides to send him to a Los Angeles art gallery under false credentials. When Bean arrives, his chaos-causing ways are as sharp as ever, and curator David Langley (Peter MacNicol) has the unenviable task of keeping Bean in line. ",Adventure
Sister Act,"When lively lounge singer Deloris Van Cartier (Whoopi Goldberg) sees her mobster beau, Vince LaRocca (Harvey Keitel), commit murder, she is relocated for her protection. Set up in the guise of a nun in a California convent, Deloris proceeds to upend the quiet lives of the resident sisters. In an effort to keep her out of trouble, they assign Deloris to the convent's choir, an ensemble that she soon turns into a vibrant and soulful act that gains widespread attention. ",Comedy
Father of the Bride,A best man delivers a speech at his brother's wedding. ,Comedy
Arachnophobia,"After a nature photographer (Mark L. Taylor) dies on assignment in Venezuela, a poisonous spider hitches a ride in his coffin to his hometown in rural California, where arachnophobe Dr. Ross Jennings (Jeff Daniels) has just moved in with his wife, Molly (Harley Jane Kozak), and young son. As town residents start turning up dead, Jennings begins to suspect spiders, and must face his fears as he and no-nonsense exterminator Delbert McClintock (John Goodman) fight to stop a deadly infestation. ",Comedy
The Witches of Eastwick,"Three small-town friends, Alexandra (Cher), Jane (Susan Sarandon) and Sukie (Michelle Pfeiffer), each having lost the man in their lives, are feeling unfulfilled -- until a furtive stranger, Daryl Van Horne (Jack Nicholson), arrives and begins courting each of them in turn. Eventually, Daryl tells them that they are witches. But as the three friends spend more time at his mansion, enjoying themselves and learning about their powers, they begin to worry about Daryl's ultimate intentions. ",Comedy
The Secret of My Success,"Arthur Tate (James Booth) is a dull-minded, low-ranking police officer in a small English town. However, with help from his kindly, perceptive mother (Amy Dalby), Arthur solves a murder committed by a local seamstress (Stella Stevens), takes down a baroness (Honor Blackman) who has been breeding terrifyingly large spiders, stops a revolutionary (Shirley Jones) attempting to overthrow a Third World government and might just manage to secure a big promotion. ",Comedy
Bad Taste,Gun-toting assassins try to wipe out a group of aliens that wants to use humans in New Zealand for food. ,Comedy
When We First Met,"After spending a night with the girl of his dreams only to become just friends, a man gets the opportunity to travel through time and alter that night over and over again until he gets everything perfect. ",Comedy
Pitch Perfect 2,"It's been three years since the Barden Bellas (Anna Kendrick, Rebel Wilson) became the first all-female group to win a national title. All seems well until a botched Lincoln Center performance for the president leads to a scandal that strips them of their performing duties, causing internal tension and strife. With the world championships on the horizon in Copenhagen, Denmark, the women must get their act together for their one and only shot at redemption. ",Comedy
Top Five,"Though he began in stand-up comedy, Andre Allen (Chris Rock) hit the big-time as the star of a trilogy of action-comedies about a talking bear. Andre is forced to spend the day with Chelsea (Rosario Dawson) a profile writer for the New York Times, whose film critic has just panned Andre's passion project about the Haitian Revolution. Unexpectedly, Andre opens up to Chelsea, and as they wind their way across New York, Andre tries to get back in touch with his comedic roots. ",Comedy
The Duff,"Frumpy high-school senior Bianca (Mae Whitman) has a rude awakening when she learns that her classmates secretly know her as the DUFF -- designated ugly fat friend -- to her prettier and more popular pals. Desperate to reinvent herself, Bianca enlists the aid of Wesley (Robbie Amell), a charming jock. In order to save her senior year from becoming a complete disaster, Bianca must find the confidence to overthrow a judgmental student (Bella Thorne) and revolutionize the school's social order. ",Comedy
The Dictator,American refugees in South America get caught up in the politics of a revolution. ,Comedy
Just Go with It,"His heart recently broken, plastic surgeon Danny Maccabee (Adam Sandler) pretends to be married so he can enjoy future dates with no strings attached. His web of lies works, but when he meets Palmer (Brooklyn Decker) -- the gal of his dreams -- she resists involvement. Instead of coming clean, Danny enlists Katherine (Jennifer Aniston), his assistant, to pose as his soon-to-be-ex-wife. Instead of solving Danny's problems, the lies create more trouble. ",Comedy
The Hangover Part II,"Two years after the disastrous events in Las Vegas, it is now Stu's (Ed Helms) turn to walk down the aisle. Since his bride is from Thailand, Stu decides to hold the wedding there. Desperately hoping to avoid the mayhem of Doug's (Justin Bartha) bachelor party, Stu chooses what he thinks will be a safe option: an alcohol-free, prewedding brunch. But this being Thailand, and with Phil (Bradley Cooper) and Alan (Zach Galifianakis) again in attendance, anything can happen. ",Comedy
Hot Tub Time Machine,"Four pals are stuck in a rut in adulthood: Adam (John Cusack) has just been dumped, Lou (Rob Corddry) is a hopeless party animal, Craig (Craig Robinson) is a henpecked husband, and Jacob (Clark Duke) does nothing but play video games in his basement. But they get a chance to brighten their future by changing their past after a night of heavy drinking in a ski-resort hot tub results in their waking up in 1986. ",Comedy
Leap Year,"A man (Roscoe ""Fatty"" Arbuckle) finds that marriage advice and lady friends do not mix. ",Comedy
Be Kind Rewind,"After a man (Jack Black) accidentally creates a magnetic field that erases a store's videotapes, he hatches a daring scheme to help his friend (Mos Def), a clerk at the store, keep his job. The two friends set out to re-create the most popular titles in the store's inventory, ranging from ""The Lion King"" to ""Robocop."" ",Comedy
Night at the Museum,"A night watchman (Ben Stiller) at a museum of natural history makes a startling discovery: Thanks to the unleashing of an ancient Egyptian curse, the museum's animals, birds, bugs and other exhibits spring to life after the building closes, and former President Teddy Roosevelt (Robin Williams) is among those the hapless guard encounters. ",Adventure
Severance,"Members (Danny Dyer, Laura Harris, Tim McInnerny) of the Palisades Defense Corp. sales group arrive in Europe for a team-building exercise. A fallen tree blocks the route, and they must hike to their destination. However, a psychotic killer lurks in the woods, and he has a horrible fate in mind for each of the co-workers. ",Comedy
Accepted,"After receiving his latest college rejection letter, senior Bartleby Gaines devises a novel way to fool everyone into thinking he is college-bound: Open his own university. Bartleby and his similarly stymied friends take over an abandoned building, create a fake Web site, hire a friend's uncle to pose as the dean, and -- presto -- a school is born. However, they do their jobs too well, and soon many other rejects try to gain admittance to the nonexistent South Harmon Institute of Technology. ",Comedy
American Pie 2,"After a year apart - attending different schools, meeting different people - the guys rent a beach house and vow to make this the best summer ever. As it turns out, whether that will happen or not has a lot to do with the girls. Between the wild parties, outrageous revelations and yes, a trip to band camp, they discover that times change and people change, but in the end, it's all about sticking together. ",Comedy
How to Lose a Guy in 10 Days,"An advice columnist, Andie Anderson (Kate Hudson), tries pushing the boundaries of what she can write about in her new piece about how to get a man to leave you in 10 days. Her editor, Lana (Bebe Neuwirth), loves it, and Andie goes off to find a man she can use for the experiment. Enter executive Ben Berry (Matthew McConaughey), who is so confident in his romantic prowess that he thinks he can make any woman fall in love with him in 10 days. When Andie and Ben meet, their plans backfire. ",Comedy
Legally Blonde,"Elle Woods (Reese Witherspoon) has it all. She wants nothing more than to be Mrs. Warner Huntington III. But there is one thing stopping him (Matthew Davis) from proposing: She is too blond. Elle rallies all of her resources and gets into Harvard, determined to win him back. ",Comedy
What Women Want,"Nick Marshall (Mel Gibson) gets a whole new outlook on life when a fluke accident gives him the ability to read women's minds. At first, this ""gift"" provides Nick with way too much information, but he begins to realize that he can use it to good effect, especially when it comes to outwitting his new boss, Darcy Maguire (Helen Hunt). ",Comedy
Dirty Work,"When Arabella, a young fashion graduate, becomes the personal assistant of an author, her eyes are opened to the glamorous, seductive world of her new employer. Eager to please, Arabella falls deeper under the spell of her racy new boss, whose dark desires and demands become more and more outrageous, and she soon finds herself lured into making risky, life-changing decisions. ",Comedy
Little Giants,"Ever since childhood, nerdy Danny O'Shea (Rick Moranis) has felt inferior to his brother, Kevin (Ed O'Neill), a former college football star. Danny runs a gas station, while Kevin coaches the local youth football team. When Kevin's team rejects Danny's daughter, Becky (Shawna Waldron), because she's a girl, Becky convinces her dad to start a rival team, though the city can support only one. To prove himself against his brother, Danny begins coaching his team of misfits for a playoff game. ",Comedy
So I Married an Axe Murderer,"Just after a bad breakup, Charlie MacKenzie (Mike Myers) falls for lovely butcher Harriet Michaels (Nancy Travis) and introduces her to his parents. But, as voracious consumers of sensational tabloids, his parents soon come to suspect that Harriet is actually a notorious serial killer -- ""Mrs. X"" -- wanted in connection with a string of bizarre honeymoon killings. Thinking his parents foolish, Charlie proposes to Harriet. But while on his honeymoon with her, he begins to fear they were right. ",Comedy
Gremlins 2: The New Batch,"The magical collectibles store that Gizmo calls home has just been destroyed, and the tiny monster finds his way into a newly erected skyscraper. Billy Peltzer (Zach Galligan) and his bride-to-be, Kate (Phoebe Cates), who have previously dealt with Gremlins run amok, discover that Gizmo and an impish legion of reptilian pals are inhabiting the downtown building. The couple tries to stop the creatures from escaping into New York City, but this new batch of beasts might be uncontrollable. ",Comedy
Cry-Baby,A prim and proper schoolgirl goes against her mother's wishes when she dates a motorcycle-riding juvenile delinquent. ,Comedy
The Money Pit,"Young lovers Walter (Tom Hanks) and Anna (Shelley Long) are house-sitting the New York City apartment owned by Max (Alexander Godunov), Anna's ex-husband, who suddenly decides to toss them out. Needing a new home, they settle on buying a country estate outside the city, which is available for a suspiciously low price. It soon becomes apparent why, as doors fall off their hinges, staircases come tumbling down and a bathtub falls through the floor. The couple's relationship suffers similarly. ",Comedy
Spies Like Us,"Looking for a way out of their mundane government jobs, Austin Millbarge (Dan Aykroyd) and Emmett Fitz-Hume (Chevy Chase) take the entrance exam for a CIA espionage program. Immediately chosen to take part in a top-secret mission in the Middle East by the officious Gen. Sline (Steve Forrest), the new recruits are set upon by Soviet forces in Afghanistan. Soon it becomes clear that the hapless pair are being used as decoys to expose the Russians for a Cold War nuclear showdown. ",Adventure
The Night Before,Three boys sharing a hospital room bond while waiting for surgery. ,Comedy
Ted 2,"Life has changed drastically for thunder buddies John (Mark Wahlberg), now a bachelor, and best pal Ted (Seth MacFarlane), now married to the woman (Jessica Barth) of his dreams. Problems arise when the couple decide to adopt a child, but the law declares Ted to be property and not a person. Angry and dejected, the lovably foulmouthed teddy bear must now seek legal help from a young lawyer (Amanda Seyfried) and a legendary, civil-rights attorney (Morgan Freeman) to get the justice he deserves. ",Comedy
The Internship,"After old-school salesmen Billy (Vince Vaughn) and Nick (Owen Wilson) find themselves downsized, Billy decides that, despite their complete lack of technological savvy, they should work for Google. The friends somehow manage to finagle internships at the Internet giant and promptly head out to Silicon Valley. Viewed with disdain by most of their fellow interns, Billy and Nick join forces with the rest of the misfit ""nooglers"" to make it through a series of competitive team challenges. ",Comedy
Two Night Stand,"An online hook-up turns into something more after a snowstorm traps two lovers (Miles Teller, Analeigh Tipton) in one's New York apartment. ",Comedy
Diary of a Wimpy Kid: Dog Days,"It's summertime, and Greg Heffley (Zachary Gordon) is looking forward to playing video games and spending time with his friends. However, Greg's dad (Steve Zahn) has other plans: He's decided that some father-son bonding time is in order. Desperate to prevent his dad from ruining summer vacation, Greg pretends he has a job at a ritzy country club. But Greg's plan backfires, leaving him in the middle of embarrassing mishaps and a camping trip gone wrong. ",Comedy
Neighbors,"A drama about race relations in an all-white suburban community, depicting the confrontation between an upper-class white couple and a black couple from Harlem who plan to buy their expensive suburban home. ",Comedy
To Rome with Love,"Four tales unfold in the Eternal City: While vacationing in Rome, architect John (Alec Baldwin) encounters a young man whose romantic woes remind him of a painful incident from his own youth; retired opera director Jerry (Woody Allen) discovers a mortician with an amazing voice, and he seizes the opportunity to rejuvenate his own flagging career; a young couple (Alessandro Tiberi, Alessandra Mastronardi) have separate romantic interludes; a spotlight shines on an ordinary man (Roberto Benigni). ",Comedy
John Dies at the End,"A new drug promises out-of-body experiences, but users are coming back changed forever, and an otherworldly invasion of Earth is underway. ",Comedy
Cedar Rapids,"Insurance agent Tim Lippe (Ed Helms) is sublimely naive: He has never stayed in a hotel, has never flown in a plane, has never even left his tiny Wisconsin hometown. Chosen to represent his company at a convention in Iowa, Tim meets three veteran attendees (John C. Reilly, Anne Heche, Isiah Whitlock Jr.), who set him on course for a life-altering weekend of wild times and sweet temptation. ",Comedy
Do Revenge,"Drea (Camila Mendes) is at the peak of her high school powers as the Alpha it-girl on campus when her entire life goes up in flames after her sex tape gets leaked to the whole school, seemingly by her boyfriend and king of the school, Max (Austin Abrams). Eleanor (Maya Hawke) is an awkward new transfer student who is angered to find out that she now has to go to school with her old bully, Carissa (Ava Capri) who started a nasty rumor about her in summer camp when they were 13. After a clandestine run-in at tennis camp, Drea and Eleanor form an unlikely and secret friendship to get revenge on each other's tormentors. ",Comedy
Going the Distance,"Mercy is a workaholic who barely has time for her husband or kids. When her sister Boma moves in with her for a while, she ends up falling in love with Mercy's husband. ",Comedy
Anchorman 2: The Legend Continues,"Seven years after capturing the heart of co-anchor Veronica Corningstone (Christina Applegate), newsman Ron Burgundy (Will Ferrell) is offered the chance of a lifetime: a spot on the world's first 24-hour global cable news network. Ron quickly assembles his team: Champ Kind (David Koechner), Brian Fantana (Paul Rudd) and Brick Tamland (Steve Carell). Challenged by his tough female boss, a network owner and a popular anchor, Ron and his pals must find their own way to the top of the ratings. ",Comedy
The Rebound,The Miami Heat Wheels wheelchair basketball team tries for a national championship despite a disappointing elimination the previous year. ,Comedy
Freaky,"Seventeen-year-old Millie Kessler spends her days trying to survive high school and the cruel actions of the popular crowd. But when she becomes the latest target of the Butcher, the town's infamous serial killer, her senior year becomes the least of her worries. When the Butcher's mystical dagger causes him and Millie to magically switch bodies, the frightened teen learns she has just 24 hours to get her identity back before she looks like a middle-aged maniac forever. ",Comedy
Love Hard,"An LA girl, unlucky in love, falls for an East Coast guy on a dating app and decides to surprise him for the holidays, only to discover that she's been catfished. This lighthearted romantic comedy chronicles her attempt to reel in love. ",Comedy
The Invention of Lying,"Mark Bellison (Ricky Gervais) is a down-on-his-luck writer who lives in world where falsehoods are completely unknown. When Mark suddenly develops the ability to lie, the notion that ""honesty is the best policy"" goes out the window, and he uses his newfound skill for personal gain. ",Comedy
Blades of Glory,"Figure skaters Chazz Michael Michaels (Will Ferrell) and Jimmy MacElroy (Jon Heder) take their intense rivalry too far during the Olympic Winter Games in Salt Lake City; both are banned from competition after a nasty brawl. After several years out of the public eye and hungry for glory, the men decide to set aside their feud and exploit a loophole that allows them to compete as a pair. ",Comedy
Wimbledon,"Frustrated at his own failures and disillusioned with professional sports, tennis player Peter Colt (Paul Bettany) resolves to retire from competition and become an instructor at an exclusive private club. But when Colt receives a surprise wild-card berth in Wimbledon, he can't help but enter the tournament. Soon, Colt meets Lizzie Bradbury (Kirsten Dunst), a beautiful American tennis player with an upcoming match of her own, and finds the inspiration he hopes will turn his luck around. ",Comedy
American Wedding,"Even though Jim (Jason Biggs) and Michelle (Alyson Hannigan) have been dating for several years, she's still surprised when he proposes to her in their favorite restaurant. After she happily agrees, Jim asks his best friends, Kevin (Thomas Ian Nicholas) and Paul (Eddie Kaye Thomas), to help him make sure the wedding goes as smoothly as possible. As the big day approaches, trouble arises when the trio learns their hard-partying friend, Stifler (Seann William Scott), is in town. ",Comedy
Ella Enchanted,"As a baby, Ella (Anne Hathaway) receives a visit from Lucinda (Vivica A. Fox), her fairy godmother, and is bestowed with a magical talent that requires her to obey anything that she is told to do. This proves to be more of a curse than a blessing, particularly once her mother dies and she is forced to live with the cruel Dame Olga (Joanna Lumley). Eventually, Ella embarks on a journey to find Lucinda and break the spell, accompanied by the handsome Prince Charmont (Hugh Dancy). ",Comedy
Freaky Friday,"Single mother Tess Coleman (Jamie Lee Curtis) and her teenage daughter Anna (Lindsay Lohan) couldn't be more different, and it is driving them both insane. After receiving cryptic fortunes at a Chinese restaurant, the two wake up the next day to discover that they have somehow switched bodies. Unable to switch back, they are forced to masquerade as one another until a solution can be found. In the process, they develop a new sense of respect and understanding for one another. ",Comedy
Anything Else,A writer (Jason Biggs) has problems with his live-in girlfriend (Christina Ricci) and an obsessive teacher (Woody Allen) with a history of mental illness. ,Comedy
Down with Love,"It's 1962, and feminist Barbara Novak (Renée Zellweger) pens a best-selling book that details the drawbacks of love. She encourages women to forgo serious relationships with men in favor of independence, workplace achievements and satisfying sex. Despite her success, many men are taken aback by her progressive views, including slick writer Catcher Block (Ewan McGregor), who decides to expose Barbara as a fraud by making her fall in love with him. However, his plan has unexpected consequences. ",Comedy
Meet the Fockers,"Now that Greg Focker is ""in"" with his soon-to-be in-laws, Jack and Dina Byrnes, it looks like smooth sailing for him and his fiancée, Pam. But that's before Pam's parents meet Greg's parents, the Fockers. The hyper-relaxed Fockers and the tightly-wound Byrneses are woefully mismatched from the start, and no matter how hard Greg and Pam try, there is just no bringing their families together. This all adds up to a disastrously funny time of getting to know you. ",Comedy
Billy Madison,"Man-child Billy Madison (Adam Sandler) has been a spoiled rich kid all his life, and spends his days drinking and partying. When his father, hotel magnate Brian (Darren McGavin), becomes fed up with his son's irresponsible ways, he issues an ultimatum. Since Billy passed all his schooling thanks to his father's influence and bribes, he must retake and pass every grade in 24 weeks. Otherwise, the business will be turned over to Brian's conniving associate, Eric (Bradley Whitford). ",Comedy
The Little Rascals,Mischievous youngsters lead an anti-girl organization into all sorts of trouble. ,Comedy
Splash,"A young boy saved from drowning by a beautiful mermaid, falls in love with her 20 years later when she returns to seek him out. Before he can choose between life on dry land or a deep sea paradise with his dream woman, the lovers are rudely interrupted by the intervention of a scheming scientist. ",Comedy
Bachelor Party,A man plans a wild bachelor party before his wedding. ,Comedy
Bad Moms,"Amy (Mila Kunis) has a great husband, overachieving children, beautiful home and successful career. Unfortunately, she's also overworked, exhausted and ready to snap. Fed up, she joins forces with two other stressed-out mothers (Kristen Bell, Kathryn Hahn) to get away from daily life and conventional responsibilities. As the gals go wild with their newfound freedom, they set themselves up for the ultimate showdown with PTA queen bee Gwendolyn and her clique of seemingly perfect moms. ",Comedy
Night at the Museum: Secret of the Tomb,"When the exhibits at New York's Natural History Museum start behaving strangely, Larry Daley (Ben Stiller) -- now the director of nighttime operations -- must find out the cause. He learns that the Tablet, which magically brings Teddy Roosevelt (Robin Williams), Jedediah (Owen Wilson) and the other exhibits to life at night, has started to decay. Larry, along with his son and museum friends, must travel to London's British Museum to learn how to prevent the Tablet's magic from disappearing. ",Adventure
Chalet Girl,"While working a job at an exclusive ski resort to support her Dad, Kim (Felicity Jones) learns to snowboard and is so good at it that she enters a competition with a huge cash prize. She has to dig deep to overcome her fears, but her life gets more complicated through her spoken-for boss, Jonny (Ed Westwick). ",Comedy
No Strings Attached,An engaged journalist (Vincent Spano) writing about sexual fantasies becomes obsessed with a female subject (Cheryl Pollak). ,Comedy
Dark Shadows,"In 18th-century Maine, Barnabas Collins (Johnny Depp) presides over the town of Collinsport. A rich and powerful playboy, Barnabas seals his own doom when he breaks the heart of a witch named Angelique (Eva Green). Angelique turns Barnabas into a vampire and buries him alive. Two centuries later, Barnabas escapes from his tomb and finds 1972 Collinsport a very different place. His once-grand estate has fallen into ruin, and the dysfunctional remnants of his family have fared little better. ",Comedy
The Big Year,"Three men find that they have come to a turning point. Stu (Steve Martin) faces a late-life crisis, Kenny (Owen Wilson) is in the grip of a midlife crisis, and Brad (Jack Black) is wallowing in a no-life crisis. Determined to kick-start their stagnant lives, Stu, Kenny and Brad decide to enter a prestigious contest. During the course of one calendar year, the three friendly rivals criss-cross North America in a quest to count more species of birds than anyone else. ",Comedy
Beerfest,"Two brothers (Erik Stolhanske, Paul Soter) from America happen upon a secret and centuries-old beer-games competition during a visit to Germany's Oktoberfest. After losing badly, they return to America, assemble an impressive team of brew-lovers and return to Germany for a rematch. ",Comedy
Just Friends,"High school student Chris Brander (Ryan Reynolds) loves his best friend, Jamie Palamino (Amy Smart). He finally confesses his feelings, but she tells him that she just wants to be friends, and he leaves town in shame. Ten years later, Chris is a successful record executive and involved with self-absorbed pop star Samantha James (Anna Faris). He still pines for Jamie, though, and when his plans to go to Paris for the holidays fall through, he returns to his hometown to try and win her heart. ",Comedy
13 Going on 30,"A girl who's sick of the social strictures of junior high is transformed into a grownup overnight. In this feel-good fairy tale, teenager Jenna (Christa B. Allen) wants a boyfriend, and when she's unable to find one, she fantasizes about being a well-adjusted adult. Suddenly, her secret desire becomes a reality, and she is transformed into a 30-year-old (Jennifer Garner). But adulthood, with its own set of male-female challenges, isn't as easy as it looks. ",Comedy
Anger Management,"Dunno Zuka is a rockabilly man who has a pet iguana named Nanas. When his iguana bites him, he turns angry and makes him fly with a rocket from the toilet, landing on the red genie island. ",Comedy
How High,"Multi-platinum rap superstars Redman and Method Man star as Jamal and Silas, two regular guys who smoke something magical, ace their college entrance exams and wind up at Harvard. Ivy League ways are strange but Silas and Jamal take it in a stride -- until their supply of supernatural smoke runs dry. That's when they have to start living by their wits and rely on their natural resources to make the grade. ",Comedy
Sweet Home Alabama,"New York fashion designer Melanie (Reese Witherspoon) suddenly finds herself engaged to the city's most eligible bachelor. But Melanie's past holds many secrets, including Jake (Josh Lucas), the redneck husband she married in high school, who refuses to divorce her. Bound and determined to end their relationship once and for all, Melanie sneaks back home to Alabama to confront her past, only to discover that you can take the girl out of the South, but you can't take the South out of the girl. ",Comedy
Scary Movie,"Defying the very notion of good taste, Scary Movie out-parodies the pop culture parodies with a no-holds barred assault on the most popular images and talked-about moments from recent films, television and commercials. The film boldly fires barbs at the classic scenes from ""Scream,"" ""The Sixth Sense,"" ""The Matrix,"" ""I Know What You Did Last Summer"" and ""The Blair Witch Project,"" then goes on to mock a whole myriad of teen movie clichés, no matter the genre. ",Comedy
How the Grinch Stole Christmas,"In this live-action adaptation of the beloved children's tale by Dr. Seuss, the reclusive green Grinch (Jim Carrey) decides to ruin Christmas for the cheery citizens of Whoville. Reluctantly joined by his hapless dog, Max, the Grinch comes down from his mountaintop home and sneaks into town to swipe everything holiday-related from the Whos. However, the bitter grump finds a hitch in his plans when he encounters the endearing Cindy Lou Who (Taylor Momsen). ",Comedy
Idle Hands,"When slacker teen Anton Tobias (Devon Sawa) has his right hand possessed by a demonic force, he finds that his life gets a lot more interesting. While Anton himself is an amiable guy, his hand proves to be an appendage of death, killing his two best buddies, Pnub (Elden Henson) and Mick (Seth Green), who return to life as wisecracking zombies. In addition to murdering those closest to him, Anton's evil hand significantly hinders his chances with lovely neighbor Molly (Jessica Alba). ",Comedy
Black Sheep,"Sheep-fearing Henry (Nathan Meister) returns to his brother's (Peter Feeney) New Zealand farm, hoping his sibling will buy out his share of the property. However, what he finds are genetically altered sheep that prey on humans and turn their victims into undead, woolly killers. Shear madness ensues as Henry, an animal-rights activist (Danielle Mason) and a farmhand (Tammy Davis) set out to stop the rampaging animals. ",Comedy
Major Payne,"Maj. Benson Payne (Damon Wayans) lives, breathes and sleeps war. But after being honorably discharged from the Marines due to a lack of wars, Payne, the natural-born killer, has absolutely no idea how to cope in everyday civilian life. Fortunately, before he completely breaks down, Payne finds his way back into a military capacity at Madison Preparatory School, leading a group of misfit JROTC students who don't want to be led. Whipping these kids into shape might be his toughest battle yet. ",Adventure
Killer Klowns from Outer Space,"When teenagers Mike (Grant Cramer) and Debbie (Suzanne Snyder) see a comet crash outside their sleepy small town, they investigate and discover a pack of murderous aliens who look very much like circus clowns. They try to warn the local authorities, but everyone assumes their story is a prank. Meanwhile, the clowns set about harvesting and eating as many people as they can. It's not until they kidnap Debbie that Mike decides it's up to him to stop the clowns' bloody rampage. ",Comedy
The Adventures of Buckaroo Banzai Across the 8th Dimension,"Buckaroo Banzai is caught with his trusted allies, the Hong Kong Cavaliers, in a battle to the death between evil red aliens and good black aliens from Planet 10. Led by demonic dictator John Whorfin, who has taken over the body of Italian scientist Dr. Emilio Lizardo, the aliens try to get the Overthruster back from Buckaroo Banzai. But the good black aliens are willing to destroy Earth rather than let these renegades return to their planet. ",Adventure
Private Benjamin,"A Jewish-American princess, Judy Benjamin (Goldie Hawn), is devastated when her husband (Albert Brooks) drops dead on their wedding night. While she grieves a duplicitous recruiter for the Women's Army Corps convinces her to enlist. Judy thinks her enlistment is like a vacation but Captain Lewis (Eileen Brennan) quickly dashes her hopes of an easy time. As Judy goes through basic training like any other grunt, she becomes a good soldier and develops a sense of self-esteem. ",Comedy
Holidate,"Fed up with being single on holidays, two strangers agree to be each other's platonic plus-ones all year long, only to catch real feelings along the way. ",Comedy
Between Two Ferns: The Movie,Zach Galifianakis hits the road to do celebrity interviews to restore his reputation. ,Comedy
That Awkward Moment,"Best pals Jason (Zac Efron) and Daniel (Miles Teller) indulge in casual flings and revel in their carefree, unattached lives. After learning that the marriage of their friend Mikey (Michael B. Jordan) is over, they gladly welcome him back into their circle. The three young men make a pact to have fun and avoid commitment. However, when all three find themselves involved in serious relationships, they must keep their romances secret from one another. ",Comedy
The Campaign,"When incumbent Congressman Cam Brady (Will Ferrell) commits a major gaffe, two wealthy CEOs decide to try to gain influence in their district by putting up a rival candidate. Their unlikely choice is a naive tourism director named Marty Huggins (Zach Galifianakis). Aided by his family's political connections and a cutthroat campaign manager, Marty soon becomes locked in a dead heat with Cam. As Election Day approaches, each man slings mud galore in a last-ditch effort to bury the other. ",Comedy
Vacation,A portrait of the skid row district of San Francisco's Tenderloin. ,Adventure
Nanny McPhee and the Big Bang,"Enigmatic Nanny McPhee (Emma Thompson) arrives on the doorstep of a harried mother, Isabel Green (Maggie Gyllenhaal), who is trying to raise her kids and tend to the family farm while her husband is away at war. Isabel has her hands full with not only her own three, but also with her sister's spoiled pair. With no time to lose, McPhee uses magic to instill in the children five important lessons. ",Comedy
Hocus Pocus 2,"It's been 29 years since someone lit the Black Flame Candle and resurrected the 17th-century sisters, and they are looking for revenge. Now it is up to three high-school students to stop the ravenous witches from wreaking a new kind of havoc on Salem before dawn on All Hallow's Eve. ",Comedy
Marry Me,"Arinze was accommodated by Philomena when he was nothing in life, she was there for him. Just when it was right for Arinze to reciprocate the love and kindness Philomena showered on him, he abandoned her. ",Comedy
27 Dresses,"Perennial bridesmaid Jane (Katherine Heigl) always puts the needs of others before her own, making her the go-to gal whenever someone needs help with wedding plans. So when Jane's younger sister Tess (Malin Akerman) snags the man (Edward Burns) Jane secretly loves, Jane finds herself questioning her role as a wedding junkie for the first time in her life. Meanwhile, a handsome reporter (James Marsden) sees Jane's unusual story as his ticket off the bridal beat. ",Comedy
Two Weeks Notice,"Dedicated environmental lawyer Lucy Kelson (Sandra Bullock) goes to work for billionaire George Wade (Hugh Grant) as part of a deal to preserve a community center. Indecisive and weak-willed George grows dependent on Lucy's guidance on everything from legal matters to clothing. Exasperated, Lucy gives notice and picks Harvard graduate June Carter (Alicia Witt) as her replacement. As Lucy's time at the firm nears an end, she grows jealous of June and has second thoughts about leaving George. ",Comedy
The Kid,"Bruce Willis stars as Russ Duritz, a successful image consultant whose life is suddenly turned upside down when he magically meets Rusty, Russ himself as an 8-year-old kid. Rusty is a sweet, but slightly geeky, awkward little kid who painfully reminds Russ of everything he hated about himself when he was a child-a pudgy, little cry-baby who was the daily victim of the school bullies-an image Russ has worked hard to overcome and consciously forget. ",Comedy
Bring It On,"The Toro cheerleading squad from Rancho Carne High School in San Diego has got spirit, spunk, sass and a killer routine that's sure to land them the national championship trophy for the sixth year in a row. But for newly-elected team captain Torrance, the Toros' road to total cheer glory takes a shady turn when she discovers that their perfectly-choreographed routines were in fact stolen from the Clovers, a hip-hop squad from East Compton, by the Toro's former captain. ",Comedy
Next Friday,"Craig (Ice Cube) bails his friend out of trouble, survives a climatic confrontation with Debo, the neighborhood bully, and ends up with the girl. In ""Next Friday"" the bully is back as Debo, who spent two years behind bars, is released from prison. Fearing for his sons safety, Craig's father (John Witherspoon) sends his son to live with Uncle Elroy (Don ""D.C."" Curry). However, Craig soon learns that trouble can find you no matter where you live. ",Comedy
Orgazmo,"Joe Young (Trey Parker) is a Mormon, serving his mission in Los Angeles and needing money to marry his girlfriend, Lisa (Robyn Lynne). This leads him to a porn film set, where filmmaker Maxxx Orbison (Michael Dean Jacobs) casts unwitting Joe as a masked superhero named Orgazmo. The film becomes a surprise megahit, even in the mainstream, but Joe soon discovers Maxxx is a criminal with sinister plans. So Joe and sidekick Ben (Dian Bachar) become real superheroes to combat the evil director. ",Comedy
Multiplicity,"Doug Kinney (Michael Keaton) is a busy construction worker struggling to make time for his family and his demanding job. When a scientist offers to clone him, Doug accepts and spawns a slightly more macho version of himself. He decides to create a second clone, but this sparks a series of duplications when his second clone begins to feel overwhelmed. Doug attempts to manage his many clones while trying to keep his wife (Andie MacDowell) in the dark. ",Comedy
Casper,"Casper (voiced by Malachi Pearson) is a kind young ghost who peacefully haunts a mansion in Maine. When specialist James Harvey (Bill Pullman) arrives to communicate with Casper and his fellow spirits, he brings along his teenage daughter, Kat (Christina Ricci). Casper quickly falls in love with Kat, but their budding relationship is complicated not only by his transparent state, but also by his troublemaking apparition uncles and their mischievous antics. ",Comedy
HouseSitter,"Architect Newton Davis (Steve Martin) is distraught when his girlfriend, Becky (Dana Delany), spurns his proposal and refuses to move into the lavish house he designed for her. Davis, who cannot imagine himself living alone in the house, shares his tale of woe with Gwen (Goldie Hawn), a dishonest waitress he thinks doesn't speak English. Complications arise when Davis, on the brink of reconciliation with Becky, discovers that Gwen has moved into the couple's soon-to-be dream home. ",Comedy
House,A Welsh bingo-hall worker (Kelly Macdonald) who can predict numbers considers using her talent to save the business. ,Comedy
Critters,"When strange fuzzy creatures from outer space arrive on a farm, the Brown family -- Jay (Billy Green Bush), Helen (Dee Wallace-Stone), their daughter, April (Nadine Van Der Velde), and their son, Brad (Scott Grimes) -- must fend off the malevolent little aliens. Two bounty hunters with superhuman abilities follow the aggressive beasts from beyond, but the warriors aren't terribly effective, leaving the Brown family to battle the fur balls and rescue April from their clutches all by themselves. ",Comedy
Teen Wolf,"When high school nerd Scott Howard (Michael J. Fox) learns from his father, Harold (James Hampton), that being a werewolf runs in the family, he decides to take advantage of his freakish trait. With his newfound strength and agility, Scott quickly becomes the hero of his school's basketball team while winning over longtime crush Pamela Wells (Lorie Griffin). As he grows more popular, Scott worries he is being celebrated as a novelty rather than for who he is. ",Comedy
Jexi,"Phil has a major dependency issue -- he's addicted to his cellphone. He has no friends and his love life is nonexistent. Forced to upgrade to a new phone, Phil soon learns that the latest model comes with Jexi -- an artificial intelligence life coach, virtual assistant and cheerleader. With its help, he begins to get a real life. But as he becomes less dependent on the phone, Jexi starts to morph into a tech nightmare that's determined to keep Phil all to itself. ",Comedy
My Big Fat Greek Wedding 2,"Parenting and marriage is becoming tougher and tougher for Toula (Nia Vardalos) and her husband Ian. Not only has their relationship lost some of its spark, but they're also dealing with a rebellious teenage daughter who clashes with Greek traditions. On top of that, Toula must contend with aging parents and the endless needs of cousins and friends. When a shocking family secret comes to light, the entire Portokalos clan makes plans to come together for an even bigger wedding than before. ",Comedy
Mike and Dave Need Wedding Dates,"Mike and Dave Stangle are young, adventurous, fun-loving brothers who tend to get out of control at family gatherings. When their sister Jeanie reveals her Hawaiian wedding plans, the rest of the clan insists that they both bring respectable dates. After placing an ad on Craigslist, the siblings decide to pick Tatiana and Alice, two charming and seemingly normal women. Once they arrive on the island, however, Mike and Dave realize that their companions are ready to get wild and party hard. ",Comedy
Walk of Shame,"Meghan (Elizabeth Banks) is an aspiring news anchor in the cutthroat world of Los Angeles television. After an audition for her dream job ends in failure, she goes out for an uncharacteristic night of partying. The next morning, she awakes in a stranger's bed and hears a phone message from her agent telling her the job is hers if she can make it across town by 5:00 pm. Stranded in an unknown area without money, phone or transportation, she races to the most important interview of her life. ",Comedy
The Other Woman,A man fantasizes about his best friend's new girlfriend. He is willing to throw caution to the wind to fulfill his wildest dreams. ,Comedy
Sisters,A teenage girl fighting a chronic disease is filled with a unique joy that is beyond time and space. ,Comedy
Overboard,"Snobbish and wealthy Joanna Stayton (Goldie Hawn) is living a life of leisure with her husband, Grant (Edward Herrmann), when she falls off their yacht and suffers amnesia. Grant takes the opportunity to rid himself of the demanding Joanna -- but Dean (Kurt Russell), a widowed carpenter with four kids who once worked for Joanna, arrives and claims she's his wife. Joanna can't remember her past identity, but has trouble believing that she was ever meant to be a working-class mother of four. ",Comedy
The Christmas Chronicles: Part Two,Teenager Kate Pierce is reunited with Santa Claus when a troublemaker threatens to cancel Christmas -- forever. ,Adventure
Parental Guidance,A rap artist brings his girlfriend home for dinner with his dysfunctional family. ,Comedy
Bedtime Stories,"Hotel handyman Skeeter Bronson (Adam Sandler) gets an unexpected surprise when he discovers that the tall tales he has been telling his niece and nephew are somehow coming true. Hoping to make the most of the mysterious phenomenon, Skeeter spins one outlandish yarn after another, but the children's unexpected contributions to the stories turn Skeeter's life upside down. ",Adventure
Baby Mama,"When single executive Kate Holbrook (Tina Fey) decides the time is right to finally have a baby, she hires a working-class woman (Amy Poehler) from South Philadelphia to act as her surrogate mother. However, Kate's careful planning goes out the window when the woman shows up on her doorstep needing a place to live. A comic battle of wills breaks out between the pair as they prepare for the blessed event and try not to kill one another in the process. ",Comedy
Chasing Liberty,"Anna Foster (Mandy Moore), code-named ""Liberty,"" the daughter of the president of the United States (Mark Harmon), can't get the Secret Service off her back when she goes on dates with boys. Accompanying her father on a state visit to Prague, she eludes her protectors and meets a handsome British boy, Ben Calder (Matthew Goode), with whom she embarks on a romantic journey across Europe. But there's something she doesn't know about Ben: He's a Secret Service agent. ",Comedy
Along Came Polly,"Actuary Reuben Feffer (Ben Stiller) is so aware of the risks inherent in all situations that he is unable to risk anything. His bride, Lisa Kramer (Debra Messing), seems perfect but cheats on him during their honeymoon. Back home in New York City, his best friend, former child star Sandy (Philip Seymour Hoffman), urges him to attend a party. There he meets an ex-classmate, Polly Prince (Jennifer Aniston), whose spirited ways spark his adoration but confound his neuroses. ",Comedy
Stuart Little,"When the Littles go to an orphanage to adopt a new family member, a charming young mouse named Stuart is chosen. While George is initially unwelcoming to his new brother, the family cat, Snowbell, is even less enthusiastic about having a mouse as his ""master"" and plots to get rid of him. Against these difficulties, Stuart resolves to face them with as much pluck, love and courage as he can muster. In doing so, he shows his beloved new family that great things can truly come in small packages. ",Adventure
Father of the Bride Part II,"Just when George Banks (Steve Martin) has gotten used to his daughter, Annie (Kimberly Williams), being married, she announces that she's pregnant, making him an impending grandfather. Shaken by nearing this new milestone in his life, George soon has to process even more surprising news -- his wife, Nina (Diane Keaton), is pregnant too. Reeling from these revelations, George gets help from the eccentric Franck (Martin Short), who, conveniently, has moved from planning weddings to baby showers. ",Comedy
Rookie of the Year,"A freak accident causes 12-year-old Little League player Henry (Thomas Ian Nicholas) to become such a powerful and accurate pitcher that the Chicago Cubs sign the junior high student to a contract. Unprepared for such a high-pressure environment, Henry falters until aging fastballer Chet Steadman (Gary Busey) takes him under his wing and teaches him how to play in the big leagues. Meanwhile, his mother's venal boyfriend (Bruce Altman) tries to sell Henry's contract to a hated opposing team. ",Comedy
Memoirs of an Invisible Man,"Nick Halloway (Chevy Chase) is an average businessman who undergoes an extraordinary change when an experiment gone awry turns him invisible. Government operative David Jenkins (Sam Neill) discovers Nick in his see-through condition at the scene of the accident and arranges for him to be taken into custody, but he escapes. As Nick tries to find out more about his strange situation, he receives aid from Alice Monroe (Daryl Hannah), a pretty acquaintance who helps him avoid capture. ",Comedy
Harry and the Hendersons,"While returning from a trip in the woods, George Henderson (John Lithgow) and his family run into something with their car that turns out to be a Sasquatch. Thinking the creature is dead, they take him home, but ""Harry"" (Kevin Peter Hall) soon awakens. Despite their initial fears, Harry is a kind and sensitive being, and the Hendersons become very fond of him. However, it is difficult to keep him a secret, and soon they begin to fear for Harry's safety. ",Comedy
The Kissing Booth,A high school student finds herself face-to-face with her long-term crush when she signs up to run a kissing booth at the spring carnival. ,Comedy
Playing It Cool,A lovestruck man (Chris Evans) enters into a platonic relationship with a woman (Michelle Monaghan) who's already engaged to someone else. ,Comedy
Dirty Grandpa,"Uptight lawyer Jason Kelly (Zac Efron) is one week away from marrying his boss's controlling daughter, putting him on the fast track for a partnership at his firm. Tricked by his grandfather Dick (Robert De Niro), Jason finds himself driving the foulmouthed old man to Daytona Beach, Fla., for a wild spring break that includes frat parties, bar fights and an epic night of karaoke. While Jason worries about the upcoming wedding, Dick tries to show his grandson how to live life to the fullest. ",Comedy
Absolutely Anything,Eccentric aliens give a man (Simon Pegg) the power to do anything he wants to determine if Earth is worth saving. ,Comedy
Grown Ups,"The death of their childhood basketball coach leads to a reunion for some old friends (Adam Sandler, Kevin James, Chris Rock), who gather at the site of a championship celebration years earlier. Picking up where they left off, the buddies -- with wives and children in tow -- discover why age does not, necessarily, equal maturity. ",Comedy
The Incredible Burt Wonderstone,"Superstar magicians Burt Wonderstone (Steve Carell) and his partner, Anton Marvelton (Steve Buscemi), have reigned as kings of the Las Vegas strip for years. Their work rakes in millions of dollars, but the biggest illusion yet is their friendship, for -- now -- time and familiarity have bred contempt between them. When a street magician's increasing popularity threatens to knock them off their thrones, Burt and Anton recognize that they have to repair the relationship and salvage the act. ",Comedy
Hall Pass,"Best friends Rick (Owen Wilson) and Fred (Jason Sudeikis) each have been married for a long time, and they are showing signs of restlessness. To revitalize their marriages, their wives (Jenna Fischer, Christina Applegate) grant them one week to do whatever they please, no questions asked. At first, the deal sounds like a dream come true, but as the week marches on, the two friends discover that their expectations are wildly out of sync with reality. ",Comedy
School for Scoundrels,"In the hope of winning the woman of his dreams, Amanda (Jacinda Barrett), a lovelorn meter-reader (Jon Heder) enrolls in a confidence-building class. The course's title takes on much more meaning when he discovers that he and his egomaniacal professor Dr. P (Billy Bob Thornton) both love the beautiful woman. They begin a fierce rivalry that quickly spirals out of control, their pranks and insults get uglier as they try to prove who is the ultimate guy's guy. ",Comedy
Dinner for Schmucks,"Tim (Paul Rudd) a rising executive, works for a boss who hosts a monthly event in which the guest who brings the biggest buffoon gets a career boost. Though he declines the invitation at first, he changes his mind when he meets Barry (Steve Carell), a man who builds dioramas using stuffed mice. The scheme backfires when Barry's blundering good intentions send Tim's life into a downward spiral, threatening a major business deal and possibly scuttling Tim's romantic relationship. ",Comedy
Must Love Dogs,"Sarah (Diane Lane), is 40 and recently divorced. Believing Sarah needs to date more, her sister, Carol (Elizabeth Perkins), creates an online dating profile for her. Simultaneously, Jake (John Cusack) reluctantly decides to try Internet dating. Sarah and Jake meet, and though both agree they are not interested in a serious relationship, their chemistry is undeniable. But, when Bob (Dermot Mulroney) suddenly shows interest in Sarah, her future with Charlie becomes unclear. ",Comedy
Guess Who,"Theresa (Zoe Saldana) is a young woman who is about to introduce her fiancé to her father, Percy Jones (Bernie Mac). Percy is eager to meet his African-American daughter's businessman beau, but is shocked to learn that she is engaged to Simon Green (Ashton Kutcher), a white man. Staying with the Joneses to celebrate Percy and his wife's 25th wedding anniversary, the accident-prone Simon makes a terrible first impression and faces an uphill battle to win over his future father-in-law. ",Comedy
A Cinderella Story,"Sam (Hilary Duff), a teenager in California, is obliged to work as a janitor and dishwasher in the diner of her stepmother (Jennifer Coolidge). After a cell phone mix-up, Sam begins an anonymous text-messaging and e-mail relationship with a boy. They agree to meet at a school dance, but when Sam finds out that her secret pen pal is none other than Austin Ames (Chad Michael Murray), the cutest boy in school, she panics and looks for a way to make herself cooler. ",Comedy
Cheaper by the Dozen,"Tom (Steve Martin) and Kate Baker (Bonnie Hunt) have compromised their careers to raise 12 children. Tom coaches a high-school football team, while Kate has retired from journalism to raise the family. Things change when Tom is offered a college coaching job in a new city at the same time a publisher buys Kate's parenting memoir. After moving, Kate goes on a book tour, leaving Tom in charge of the children, who -- already unhappy about relocating -- plunge the household into chaos. ",Comedy
Duplex,"A writer named Alex (Ben Stiller) and his girlfriend, Nancy (Drew Barrymore), move into a spacious duplex in Brooklyn, N.Y. The elderly woman (Eileen Essell) who lives on the building's top floor seems a sweet enough neighbor at first. But pretty soon her constant demands and accidents ruin Alex and Nancy's attempts at having the perfect home. Once they discover that the woman cannot be evicted, they resort to more permanent measures to get rid of her. ",Comedy
Vegas Vacation,"The Griswolds are off on a family outing to Las Vegas, where they each have their own misadventures. Hapless dad Clark Griswold (Chevy Chase) immediately starts losing money at blackjack, while his wife, Ellen (Beverly D'Angelo), develops a crush on lounge performer Wayne Newton (Wayne Newton). Elsewhere, young Rusty (Ethan Embry) is enthusiastically playing dice, and his sister, Audrey (Marisol Nichols), winds up in seedy nightclubs. Can the family reunite and stay out of trouble? ",Comedy
Joe Versus the Volcano,"Joe Banks (Tom Hanks) is dying, apparently. This is good news, since his life was not much worth living anyway. On the upside, a strange millionaire (Lloyd Bridges) offers Joe a way to die with meaning and dignity: by hurling himself into a volcano. With plenty of spending cash and an ensemble of new luggage, Joe embarks on an absurdist journey to his demise, guided by two very disparate sisters, and trying to puzzle out the meaning of existence. ",Comedy
The Perfect Date,"A high school student creates an app to offer his services as a fake date to make money for college. When he develops feelings for someone, his plan gets complicated. ",Comedy
Pitch Perfect 3,"After the highs of winning the world championships, the Bellas find themselves split apart and discovering there aren't job prospects for making music with your mouth. But when they get the chance to reunite for an overseas USO tour, this group of awesome nerds will come together to make some music, and some questionable decisions, one last time. ",Comedy
The To Do List,"It's 1993, and high-school valedictorian Brandy Klark (Aubrey Plaza) decides she needs to shed her uptight image before college. She puts together a list of all the activities -- including sex -- she missed in high school. When she soon realizes she is out of her depth, Brandy enlists the aid of her friends, older sister, and boss. Summer marches on, and members of the group realize that they will need plenty of imagination and open mindedness to complete her project before September. ",Comedy
Office Christmas Party,"When the CEO (Jennifer Aniston) tries to close her hard-partying brother's (T.J. Miller) branch, he and his chief technical officer (Jason Bateman) must rally their co-workers and host an epic office Christmas party in an effort to impress a potential client and close a sale that will save their jobs. ",Comedy
The Babysitter: Killer Queen,"Two years after defeating a satanic cult led by his babysitter, Cole once again has to outsmart the forces of evil when old enemies unexpectedly return. ",Comedy
Confessions of a Shopaholic,"Like many New York City gals, Rebecca Bloomwood (Isla Fisher) loves to shop. The trouble is, she shops so much that she is drowning in debt. Rebecca would love to work at the city's top fashion magazine but, so far, has not been able to get her foot in the door. Then she lands a job as an advice columnist for a financial magazine owned by the same company. Her column becomes an overnight success, but her secret threatens to ruin her love life and career. ",Comedy
Monte Carlo,"Best friends Grace (Selena Gomez) and Emma (Katie Cassidy) quit their waitress jobs in small-town Texas and head to Paris for a summer adventure, accompanied by Grace's stepsister, Meg (Leighton Meester). The prepackaged tour fails to meet their expectations, however, and soon their spirits sag. But, when Grace is mistaken for a British socialite named Cordelia, she and her companions head to Monte Carlo to enjoy a week of yacht parties and cute bachelors -- then the real Cordelia arrives. ",Adventure
Made of Honor,"Always shy of commitment, Tom (Patrick Dempsey) lives as a serial dater. Hannah (Michelle Monaghan), his best friend, has wanted to marry and now has found Mr. Right -- just as Tom realizes he really loves Hannah. When she asks him to be in her bridal party, Tom seizes the opportunity to prevent the nuptials and woo her himself. ",Comedy
Ghosts of Girlfriends Past,"Celebrity photographer Connor Mead (Matthew McConaughey) lives life in the fast lane, committed to bachelorhood and simultaneous relationships with multiple women. On the eve of his brother's wedding, Connor receives a visit from the spirits of his jilted lovers, who take him on an odyssey through his many failed relationships to try to find out what made him such a cad -- and if there is any hope of Connor finding true love. ",Comedy
Black Sheep,"Sheep-fearing Henry (Nathan Meister) returns to his brother's (Peter Feeney) New Zealand farm, hoping his sibling will buy out his share of the property. However, what he finds are genetically altered sheep that prey on humans and turn their victims into undead, woolly killers. Shear madness ensues as Henry, an animal-rights activist (Danielle Mason) and a farmhand (Tammy Davis) set out to stop the rampaging animals. ",Comedy
Nacho Libre,"Ignacio (Jack Black), or Nacho to his friends, works as a cook in the Mexican monastery where he grew up. The monastery is home to a host of orphans whom Nacho cares for deeply, but there is not much money to feed them properly. Nacho decides to raise money for the children by moonlighting as a Lucha Libre wrestler with his partner Esqueleto (Héctor Jiménez), but since the church forbids Lucha, Nacho must disguise his identity. ",Comedy
The Heartbreak Kid,"After a short fling with a beautiful woman named Lila (Malin Akerman) and at the urging of his friends and family, Eddie (Ben Stiller) proposes marriage. But Eddie didn't realize that Lila is a shrew, and she reveals her true nature during their honeymoon. He then meets Miranda (Michelle Monaghan) and is convinced she is his soul mate. Eddie sets out to woo Miranda and extricate himself from his wife's claws. ",Comedy
The Princess Diaries 2: Royal Engagement,"Mia (Anne Hathaway), still coming to terms with her life as a princess, graduates from Princeton. She returns to Genovia, and her best friend, Lilly (Heather Matarazzo), goes with her. When they arrive, Mia's grandmother (Julie Andrews) informs her that Mia cannot become queen unless she is married within 30 days. Nicholas Devereaux (Chris Pine) is one of her top suitors, though he is more interested in the crown than Mia. But when Nicholas realizes he loves Mia, he decides not to pursue her. ",Comedy
Stuck on You,"In Martha's Vineyard, Mass., conjoined twins Walt (Greg Kinnear) and Bob Tenor (Matt Damon) make the best of their handicap by being the fastest grill cooks in town. While outgoing Walt hopes to one day become a famous actor, shy Bob prefers to stay out of the spotlight. When a fading Hollywood actress, Cher (Cher), decides to get her show ""Honey and the Beaze"" cancelled, she hires Walt -- and his brotherly appendage -- as her costars. But their addition surprisingly achieves the opposite. ",Comedy
The Ringer,A son is reunited with his long-lost father and is quite surprised by what he learns. ,Comedy
Dracula: Dead and Loving It,"Dapper Count Dracula (Leslie Nielsen) relocates from his Transylvanian castle to Victorian London with his slavish assistant, Renfield (Peter MacNicol), in search of new blood. He finds it in a pair of beautiful young women, Mina (Amy Yasbeck) and her best friend, Lucy (Lysette Anthony). When Mina's straitlaced fiancé, Jonathan (Steven Weber), notices his future bride's odd behavior, he calls in his mentor, vampire hunter Van Helsing (Mel Brooks), to save the day. ",Comedy
Encino Man,"California teen Dave Morgan (Sean Astin) is digging a pit for a pool in his backyard when he happens upon a caveman frozen in a block of ice. Aided by his goofy friend Stoney (Pauly Shore), Dave transports their discovery to his garage, where the Neanderthal thaws and is revived. When Dave and Stoney find the living and thoroughly bewildered caveman, they attempt to pass him off as a foreign exchange student named Link (Brendan Fraser), resulting in many misadventures. ",Comedy
Barbarella,"Barbarella (Jane Fonda) roams 41st-century space with her blind guardian angel, Pygar (John Phillip Law). ",Adventure
The Kissing Booth 2,"After a romantic summer together, Noah is off to Harvard, and Elle heads back to high school for her senior year. ",Comedy
The Wrong Missy,Disaster strikes when a man invites his dream girl to an island resort -- but a previous blind date shows up instead. ,Comedy
Neighbors 2: Sorority Rising,"Life is good for Mac Radner (Seth Rogen) and pregnant wife Kelly (Rose Byrne) until the unruly sisters of Kappa Nu move in next door. As the loud parties threaten the sale of their home, the couple turn to ex-neighbor and one-time enemy Teddy Sanders (Zac Efron) for help. Now united with the former college student, the trio devises schemes to get the wild sorority off the block. Unfortunately, the rebellious young women refuse to go down without a fight. ",Comedy
I Give It a Year,"After a quick courtship, two lovers (Rose Byrne, Rafe Spall) hastily decide to tie the knot. As their first year of marriage unfolds, temptation and incompatibility put their relationship in jeopardy. ",Comedy
Rubber,"A sentient tire rolls through the desert, using the power of its mind to make small animals -- and human heads -- explode. ",Comedy
Playing for Keeps,"Danny (Danny Jordano), Spikes (Matthew Penn) and Silk (Leon W. Grant) have just finished high school in New York City and are wondering what their next step will be. Danny receives the title to a big house in a rural community and gets the idea to refurbish it, turning it into a rock 'n' roll hotel. With some aid from investors, they're on their way. However, they soon face vehement opposition from locals, who resent the outsiders, and local politicians, who want to use the site as a dump. ",Comedy
You Again,"High school was hell for Marni (Kristen Bell), so she is horrified to learn that her brother's fiancee is Joanna, the nemesis of her teen years. Marni intends to expose Joanna's evil side to her family, but the situation really explodes with the arrival of Joanna's Aunt Ramona (Sigourney Weaver), who was the high-school rival of Marni's mother (Jamie Lee Curtis). When both older women revert to their teenage personas, the result is extreme wedding turmoil. ",Comedy
John Tucker Must Die,"After discovering they are all dating the same same guy (Jesse Metcalfe), three popular students from different cliques band together for revenge, so they enlist the help of a new gal in town and conspire to break the jerk's heart, while destroying his reputation. ",Comedy
The Santa Clause 2,"Scott Calvin (Tim Allen) has been in the role of Santa for the past eight years, and his loyal elves consider him the best one ever. But the world of the ""Merry Old Soul"" turns upside down when he's dealt a double whammy of news: Not only has his son, Charlie (Eric Lloyd), landed on this year's naughty list, but Scott discovers that he must marry by Christmas Eve -- just a month away! -- or he will stop being Santa Claus forever. ",Comedy
Life or Something Like It,"Lanie Kerrigan (Angelina Jolie), a feature reporter at a Seattle television station, leads the ultimate superficial life, even though she thinks she has it all, like a superstar boyfriend, a gorgeous apartment, and a shot at a big network assignment. Her perfect world starts unraveling after a homeless street seer tells Lanie that she leads a meaningless existence, and will die the following week. When the savant's other predictions come true, Lanie begins to re-examine her life and priorities. ",Comedy
Not Another Teen Movie,"""Not Another Teen Movie"" shows no mercy as it skewers the conventions and clichés of the genre you hate to love. Join Janey Briggs (Chyler Leigh), an aspiring artist who is outcast by her classmates for wearing glasses, a ponytail and paint-covered overalls; and Jake Wyler (Chris Evans), the all-American football star who makes a foolish bet to turn Janey into a prom queen, in a risqué romp with an assortment of twisted takes on classic teen characters and teen movies. ",Comedy
Bubble Boy,"A coming-of-age comedy follows the life of Jimmy Livingston (Jake Gyllenhaal), a young man born without immunities and raised in a manufactured world provided by his well-intentioned, but misguided mother (Swoosie Kurtz). But when he realizes that he's in love with Chloe (Marley Shelton), the girl next door, he has no choice but to build a mobile bubble suit, and set off across the country to Niagara Falls, to stop Chloe's wedding -- which is only seven days away -- in time to confess his love. ",Adventure
Deuce Bigalow: Male Gigolo,"Deuce Bigalow (Rob Schneider) is a less than attractive, down on his luck aquarium cleaner. One day he wrecks the house of a gigolo and needs quick money to repair it. The only way he can make it is to become a gigolo himself, taking on an unusual mix of female clients. He encounters a couple of problems, though. He falls in love with one of his unusual clients, and a sleazy police officer is hot on his trail. ",Comedy
Good Burger,"Teen misfits (Kel Mitchell, Kenan Thompson) at a modest burger joint face competition from a hamburger emporium across the street. ",Comedy
The Nutty Professor,"Julius Kelp (Jerry Lewis) is a college professor with a problem. Clumsy, awkward, inarticulate and unattractive, Julius is a hopeless case when it comes to women -- but he's desperate to impress beautiful student Stella (Stella Stevens). Fortunately, he does know something about chemistry and decides to concoct a potion that will turn him into a whole new man. In this classic comedy, Julius' suave alter ego, Buddy Love, must win Stella's affections before his short-lived potion runs out. ",Comedy
Jingle All the Way,"Workaholic Howard Langston (Arnold Schwarzenegger) wants to make things up to his son, Jamie (Jake Lloyd), and wife, Liz (Rita Wilson). He promises to get Jamie the hottest toy of the season, Turbo-Man -- even though it's Christmas Eve and the toy is practically sold out. As Langston hunts down the elusive gift, he runs into mailman Myron (Sinbad), another father on the same quest. With the clock winding down, Langston's moral code is tested as he starts to learn the real meaning of Christmas. ",Adventure
Police Academy 2: Their First Assignment,"After graduating in the first ""Police Academy,"" Carey Mahoney (Steve Guttenberg) and the rest of his hapless fellow officers are assigned to a precinct commanded by Capt. Pete Lassard (Howard Hesseman), whose district is being harassed by a gang led by Zed (Bob Goldthwait). Given 30 days to shape up or lose his post, Lassard struggles to discipline his incompetent new charges, while subordinate Lt. Mauser (Art Metrano) plots to take his job away. ",Comedy
I Feel Pretty,"An ordinary woman who struggles with feelings of insecurity and inadequacy on a daily basis wakes from a fall believing she is suddenly the most beautiful and capable woman on the planet. With this newfound confidence, she is empowered to live her life fearlessly and flawlessly, but what will happen when she realizes her appearance never changed? ",Comedy
Night School,A Boston police detective (Leonard Mann) blames ritual beheadings on a professor (Drew Snyder) with a live-in assistant (Rachel Ward). ,Comedy
Dolittle,"Dr. John Dolittle lives in solitude behind the high walls of his lush manor in 19th-century England. His only companionship comes from an array of exotic animals that he speaks to on a daily basis. But when young Queen Victoria becomes gravely ill, the eccentric doctor and his furry friends embark on an epic adventure to a mythical island to find the cure. ",Adventure
A Bad Moms Christmas,"Under-appreciated and overburdened moms Amy, Kiki and Carla rebel against the challenges and expectations of the Super Bowl for moms: Christmas. As if creating the perfect holiday for their families isn't hard enough, they'll have to do it while hosting and entertaining their own respective mothers when they come to visit. ",Comedy
Life of the Party,"Michael Elgin may have been a master of the track back in high school, but now he's hit his thirties and his once-perfect form has devolved into a depressing drunken stumble. Life after high school just wasn't what he expected, and when his wife threatens to walk out while his career hangs by a thread Michael simply drinks away the pain. ",Comedy
Dumb and Dumber To,"In need of a new kidney and having learned that he has a long-lost daughter, dimwit Harry Dunne (Jeff Daniels) snaps his equally cretinous pal, Lloyd Christmas (Jim Carrey), out of an apparent fugue state to accompany him on a journey to find her. The witless wonders criss-cross the country using whatever mode of transportation they can find, ultimately arriving at the one place on Earth where they least belong: a summit of the world's most brilliant minds. ",Comedy
Wanderlust,An elderly Italian man sets out to find a wife. ,Comedy
The Sitter,Hotel guests leave their 5-year-old daughter (Kimberly Cullum) with a warped teenage girl (Kim Myers) who is about to snap. ,Comedy
Bad Teacher,"For most, teaching is an honorable profession -- except for Elizabeth (Cameron Diaz). The foul-mouthed, boozy woman can't wait to marry a rich man and quit her job, but she has to rethink her plans when her sugar daddy dumps her. Then Scott Delacorte (Justin Timberlake), a substitute teacher who's cute and rich, arrives. Elizabeth can't wait to sink her teeth into a new meal ticket, but she faces stiff competition from Amy (Lucy Punch), a popular and perky colleague. ",Comedy
Fred Claus,"Of the two Claus brothers, Fred (Vince Vaughn) is the troublemaker and polar opposite of his saintly sibling, Nicholas (Paul Giamatti). When Fred's criminal ways finally land him in big trouble, Nicholas bails him out and brings him to the North Pole to work off the debt by making toys. The headaches mount for St. Nick, who not only must deal with his troublemaking brother, but also an efficiency expert who has come to evaluate Santa's operation. ",Comedy
Good Luck Chuck,"Cursed since childhood, dentist Charlie Kagan (Dane Cook) cannot find the right woman. Even worse, he learns that each of his ex-girlfriends finds true love with the man she meets after her relationship with him ends. Hearing of Charlie's reputation as a good-luck charm, women from all over line up for a quick tryst. But when Charlie meets the woman (Jessica Alba) of his dreams, he must find a way to break the curse or risk losing her to the next man she meets. ",Comedy
Failure to Launch,"A young man (Matthew McConaughey) continues to live at the home of parents who, in desperation to push him out of the nest once and for all, hatch a plan. They hire a beautiful woman (Sarah Jessica Parker) to entice him to assume the mantle of responsibility and get his own place. ",Comedy
Hatchet,"Ben (Joel Moore) and Marcus (Deon Richmond) are college students in New Orleans, enjoying Mardi Gras, when they decide to go on a boat tour of an allegedly cursed bayou. Meeting up with several other tourists, including quietly beautiful Marybeth (Tamara Feldman), they are entertained by their guide Shawn (Parry Shen), who regales them with tales of a ghostly serial killer who wanders the swamp. They laugh off the stories -- until someone, or something, starts picking off members of the group. ",Comedy
Daddy Day Care,"While his wife, Kim (Regina King), brings home the bacon, unemployed Charlie (Eddie Murphy) spends his days caring for the couple's young son. With help from a friend, Phil (Jeff Garlin), Charlie decides to start a day care center. Enrollment quickly surges, and, as they add another employee, goofy Marvin (Steve Zahn), Charlie finds himself dealing with endless red tape. Will he be able to keep the business afloat, or will parents defect to Mrs. Harridan's (Anjelica Huston) day care center? ",Comedy
Bringing Down the House,"Lawyer Peter Sanderson (Steve Martin) wants to dive back into dating after his divorce and has a hard time meeting the right women. But he lucks out with online dating and meets a fellow lawyer. The two agree to meet in the flesh, but the woman he meets -- an escaped African-American convict named Charlene (Queen Latifah) -- is not what he expected. Peter is freaked out, but Charlene convinces him to take her case and prove her innocence, and along the way they learn to become friends. ",Comedy
40 Days and 40 Nights,"Matt Sullivan's (Josh Hartnett) last big relationship ended in disaster and ever since his heart's been aching and his commitment's been lacking. Then came Lent, that time of year when everybody gives something up. That's when Matt decides to go where no man's gone before and make a vow: No sex. Whatsoever. For 40 straight days. At first he has everything under control. That is until the woman of his dreams, Erica (Shannyn Sossamon), walks into his life. ",Comedy
Runaway Bride,"Having already left three grooms at the altar, Maggie Carpenter (Julia Roberts) is branded ""the runaway bride"" by jaded city journalist Ike Graham (Richard Gere). But, after his facts are called into question, Ike races to Maggie's hometown to save his reputation and report on her upcoming fourth trip down the aisle -- during which he's convinced she'll run again. Though he's there on a muckraking mission, Ike can't help but fall for this breathtaking heartbreaker. ",Comedy
Sister Act 2: Back in the Habit,"In this sequel, Las Vegas performer Deloris Van Cartier (Whoopi Goldberg) is surprised by a visit from her nun friends, including Sister Mary Patrick (Kathy Najimy) and Sister Mary Lazarus (Mary Wickes). It appears Deloris is needed in her nun guise as Sister Mary Clarence to help teach music to teens at a troubled school in hopes of keeping the facility from closing at the hands of Mr. Crisp (James Coburn), a callous administrator. Can Deloris shape the rowdy kids into a real choir? ",Comedy
Dennis the Menace,"Mischievous Dennis Mitchell (Mason Gamble) makes the life of neighbor George Wilson (Walter Matthau) miserable with his overactive energy and inadvertent troublemaking. Because his parents must leave town for work and can't find a baby sitter for Dennis, they ask George and his wife, Martha (Joan Plowright), to take care of him. But when burglar Switchblade Sam (Christopher Lloyd) breaks in to steal George's gold coin collection, he takes Dennis as a hostage, and crusty George must save the boy. ",Comedy
Senior Year,"After a cheerleader falls off a pyramid and into a 20 year coma, she wakes up as a 37-year-old woman, ready to return to high school, regain her status and claim the prom queen crown that eluded her. ",Comedy
Your Highness,"Prince Thadeous (Danny McBride) has always lived his life in the shadow of his brother, the heir apparent, Prince Fabious (James Franco). Tired of always being passed over, Thadeous is now content to slack off, drink mead and enjoy the company of a maiden or two, while Fabious has fabulous adventures. But when an evil wizard kidnaps Fabious' fiancee (Zooey Deschanel), Thadeous has no choice but to find his inner hero and join his brother's quest to save her. ",Adventure
When in Rome,"Disillusioned with romance, Beth, an ambitious New Yorker (Kristen Bell), travels to Rome, where she plucks magic coins from a special fountain. The coins attract an assortment of odd suitors, including a sausage merchant, a street magician and an artist. But when a persistent reporter (Josh Duhamel) throws his hat in the ring, Beth wonders if his love is the real thing. ",Comedy
Couples Retreat,"Four couples, all friends, descend on a tropical island resort. Though one husband and wife are there to work on their marriage, the others just want to enjoy some fun in the sun. They soon find, however, that paradise comes at a price: Participation in couples therapy sessions is mandatory. What started out as a cut-rate vacation turns into an examination of the common problems many face. ",Comedy
Little Fockers,"After 10 years of marriage and two children, it seems that Greg Focker (Ben Stiller) has finally earned a place in the ""circle of trust"" of his uptight father-in-law, Jack (Robert De Niro). However, Greg is moonlighting with a drug company, which raises Jack's suspicions. As two clans descend on the scene of the young twins' birthday party, Greg must find a way through myriad misunderstandings to prove to Jack -- once and for all -- that he is worthy of being the next family patriarch. ",Comedy
Because I Said So,"Daphne Wilder (Diane Keaton) is the proud mother of three women: Milly (Mandy Moore), Maggie (Lauren Graham) and Mae (Piper Perabo), and her love for her offspring knows no bounds. Because her youngest, always chooses the wrong man, she decides to take action to prevent Milly from repeating the mistakes of the past. Dating disaster ensues when Daphne tries to achieve her goal by placing an online personal ad for Milly. ",Comedy
Piranha 3D,"Spring break turns gory when an underground tremor releases hundreds of prehistoric, carnivorous fish into Lake Victoria, a popular waterside resort. Local cop Julie Forester (Elisabeth Shue) must join forces with a band of unlikely strangers -- though they are badly outnumbered -- to destroy the ravenous creatures before everyone becomes fish food. ",Comedy
Cheaper by the Dozen 2,"Tom Baker (Steve Martin) and his wife, Kate (Bonnie Hunt), take their children for what they hope will be a relaxing summer at a lakeside resort. When the Bakers end up with the shoddiest unit imaginable, a clueless but well-meaning Tom struggles to repair it himself. To make matters worse, Tom's old nemesis -- Jimmy Murtaugh (Eugene Levy) -- and his similarly gigantic family appear on the scene and engage the Bakers in a not-so-friendly rivalry that threatens to spoil their trip. ",Adventure
RV,"The Munros are a typically American dysfunctional family, complete with rebellious, uncommunicative offspring and baffled parents. Patriarch Bob (Robin Williams) would like to remedy the situation before his son and daughter instant-message their parents out of their lives. Bob rents a motor home to take the clan on vacation but soon finds that camping and togetherness can be hazardous to one's health. ",Adventure
Employee of the Month,"Zack (Dane Cook) and Vince (Dax Shepard) are rival co-workers at Super Club, the country's largest bulk-discount retailer but, while Vince is on the fast-track at Super Club, Zack's laid-back approach to work holds him back. That all changes when a new cashier, named Amy (Jessica Simpson), transfers to their store. Zack is instantly smitten, but Amy prefers Vince. Zack determines that the only way to win her is to win his store's most coveted honor. ",Comedy
Scary Movie 3,"After newspaper reporter Cindy (Anna Faris) accidentally watches a strange videotape that causes the viewer to die within a week, she discovers the tape is only one of many weird happenings. Local farmers Tom (Charlie Sheen) and George (Simon Rex) have reported massive crop circles appearing overnight in their fields. Cindy finds a link between the tape and the crop circles with help from the U.S. president (Leslie Nielsen) and a kindly aunt (Queen Latifah). ",Comedy
Big Fat Liar,"Who's afraid of the big bad Wolf? Not Jason Shepherd (Frankie Muniz), who has to prove that sleazy Hollywood producer Marty Wolf (Paul Giamatti) stole his class paper and turned it into a blockbuster hit movie, ""Big Fat Liar."" Traveling to Los Angeles with his best friend Kaylee (Amanda Bynes), Jason tries to break into show business -- literally. Through a hilarious series of pranks and ruses, Jason brings one of Hollywood's most powerful producers to his knees. ",Adventure
Bride of Chucky,"After being cut apart by the police, killer doll Chucky (Brad Dourif) is resurrected by Tiffany (Jennifer Tilly), an ex-girlfriend of the serial murderer whose soul is inside the toy. Following an argument, Chucky kills Tiffany and transfers her soul into a bride doll. To find the magical amulet that can restore them both to human form, Chucky and Tiffany arrange to be driven to New Jersey by Jesse (Nick Stabile) and Jade (Katherine Heigl), who are unaware that their cargo is alive. ",Comedy
Forces of Nature,"All Ben Holmes (Ben Affleck) wants to do is make it from New York to Savannah, Ga., in time for his wedding. When a seagull and a hurricane ruin any chance he has of flying there, Holmes reluctantly joins the quirky Sarah Lewis (Sandra Bullock) in a rental car for a road trip back to his waiting bride-to-be, Bridget Cahill (Maura Tierney). But nature seems to conspire against his every attempt at a timely return -- and in the meantime, he finds himself growing closer to Sarah. ",Comedy
Nine Months,"When successful child psychologist and one-time playboy Samuel Faulkner (Hugh Grant) hears that his girlfriend, Rebecca (Julianne Moore), is pregnant, he panics. As Faulkner's crippling fear of commitment sets in, Rebecca decides to leave him. Realizing he wants to spend his life with her, Faulkner struggles to come to terms with the gravity of impending fatherhood -- a struggle helped in no way by the antics of Rebecca's bumbling obstetrician, Eastern-Bloc refugee Dr. Kosevich (Robin Williams). ",Comedy
The Boss,A man struggles to be the head of his household. ,Comedy
Bride Wars,"Since the time they were little girls, best friends Liv (Kate Hudson) and Emma (Anne Hathaway) have been planning every aspect of their future weddings, including choosing the same destination: New York's famed Plaza Hotel. But when a clerical error causes a clash in wedding dates, Liv and Kate discover their inner demons -- with their lifelong friendship as a possible casualty. ",Comedy
Teeth,"Dawn (Jess Weixler) is an active member of her high-school chastity club but, when she meets Tobey (Hale Appleman), nature takes its course, and the pair answer the call. They suddenly learn she is a living example of the vagina dentata myth, when the encounter takes a grisly turn. ",Comedy
Evan Almighty,"Newscaster Evan Baxter (Steve Carell) leaves Buffalo behind when he wins a seat in Congress. Moving his wife (Lauren Graham) and family to northern Virginia, he seems to have it made, then God (Morgan Freeman) throws a crisis of biblical proportions at his feet: The Lord wants him to build an ark and line up all the animals two-by-two in preparation for a flood. ",Comedy
Just My Luck,"As the luckiest woman in the world, Ashley (Lindsay Lohan) has a wonderful life, which all changes after she kisses a stranger (Chris Pine) at a costume party. She sees everything turn into a living hell, as she realizes that she has unwittingly exchanged her good fortune for the stranger's bad luck. ",Comedy
Christmas with the Kranks,"Finally alone for the holidays, Luther (Tim Allen) and Nora Krank (Jamie Lee Curtis) plan to eschew the Christmas traditions and take a cruise in the Caribbean instead. This doesn't sit well with their Christmas-obsessed neighbors Vic Frohmeyer (Dan Aykroyd) and Walt Scheel (M. Emmet Walsh), who are determined to win the annual ""best decorated street"" competition, and the Kranks soon find themselves social outcasts because of their lack of Christmas spirit. ",Comedy
The Perfect Man,"Along with sorting out her love life, a would-be artist (Michele Little) deals with a neurotic mother (Phyllis Diller) and a promiscuous friend. ",Comedy
Just Married,"Tom (Ashton Kutcher) and Sarah (Brittany Murphy) are two lovebirds from different worlds. He's an average guy with a fondness for beer who works a low-level job, while she's an aspiring writer from a wealthy and cultured family. The disapproval of family and friends doesn't prevent the pair from marrying, but their disastrous honeymoon in Italy, with an unwelcome appearance by Sarah's ex-boyfriend, Peter (Christian Kane), nearly succeeds in tearing them apart. ",Comedy
Doctor Dolittle,"Dr. John Dolittle (Rex Harrison) lives in a small English village where he specializes in caring for and verbally communicating with animals. When Dr. Dolittle is unjustly sent to an insane asylum for freeing a lovesick seal from captivity, his animals and two closest human friends, Matthew Mugg (Anthony Newley) and Tommy Stubbins (William Dix), liberate him. Afterward, they join Emma Fairfax (Samantha Eggar) and set out by boat to find a famed and elusive creature: the Great Pink Sea Snail. ",Comedy
Coneheads,"Cone-headed extraterrestrials Beldar (Dan Aykroyd) and Prymaat (Jane Curtin) find themselves in New Jersey after a recon mission for their home planet of Remulak goes awry. Stranded, they are forced to live as typical suburban humans. Beldar gets a job, and daughter Connie (Michelle Burke) grows up to be a typical, if oddly shaped, teenager. When INS agents start investigating the family and Beldar receives sinister orders from Remulak, the Coneheads must decide where their allegiance lies. ",Comedy
Problem Child,"Ben (John Ritter) is a good-hearted guy who's always wanted a son of his own, but so far he and his wife have had no success. The couple adopt Junior (Michael Oliver), a redheaded hellion who quickly makes their lives miserable. Disaster follows Junior wherever he goes, from camping trips that require emergency-room visits to birthday parties that turn into Grand Guignol affairs. When Ben's incensed family tells him to get rid of the boy, he starts to wonder if they might be right. ",Comedy
My Stepmother Is an Alien,"Trying to rescue her home planet from destruction, a gorgeous extraterrestrial named Celeste (Kim Basinger) arrives on Earth and begins her scientific research. She woos quirky scientist Dr. Steve Mills (Dan Aykroyd), a widower with a young daughter (Alyson Hannigan). Before long, Celeste finds herself in love with Steve and her new life on Earth, where she experiences true intimacy for the first time. But when she loses sight of her mission, she begins to question where she belongs. ",Comedy
Coming 2 America,"Set in the lush and royal country of Zamunda, newly-crowned King Akeem (Eddie Murphy) and his trusted confidante Semmi(Arsenio Hall) embark on an all-new hilarious adventure that has them traversing the globe from their great African nation to the borough of Queens, New York – where it all began. ",Comedy
Grown Ups 2,"Lenny Feder (Adam Sandler) moves his family back to his hometown to be with his friends, but he finds -- what with old bullies, new bullies, party crashers and more -- that he hasn't left the crazy life behind in Los Angeles. Lenny's friends must also cope with their own challenges: Eric (Kevin James) must face his ultimate fear; Kurt (Chris Rock) has gone back to work as a cable repairman; and Marcus (David Spade) learns that he has an 18-year-old son. ",Comedy
Bachelorette,"After ruining their friend's wedding gown, bridesmaids (Kirsten Dunst, Isla Fisher, Lizzy Caplan) set out on a frantic search for a replacement, but their mission degenerates into a night of booze, drugs and nightclubbing. ",Comedy
Aquamarine,"Two teenage girls (Joanna ""JoJo"" Levesque, Emma Roberts) discover that mermaids really do exist after a violent storm washes one ashore. The mermaid, a sassy creature named Aquamarine (Sara Paxton), is determined to prove to her father that real love exists, and enlists the girls' help in winning the heart of a handsome lifeguard (Jake McDorman). ",Comedy
View from the Top,"A comedy about a young woman from meager beginnings, who has high hopes for the future. Donna (Gwyneth Paltrow) dreams of becoming a first-class international flight attendant and is willing to do whatever it takes to ensure that her dreams come true. The road to success, though, is rarely a smooth flight, and as she begins her trip she encounters more turbulence than even she bargained for. ",Comedy
Scary Movie 2,"As the supernatural extension of the first film, ""Scary Movie 2"" casts its satirical eye on such iconic classics as ""The Exorcist"" and ""Poltergeist,"" as well as the more recent films ""Hannibal,"" ""What Lies Beneath"" and ""The House on Haunted Hill."" In addition to all things supernatural, it lunges even further, taking on pulp icons including ""Charlie's Angels"" and ""Mission Impossible 2."" ",Comedy
Loser,"A conservative man tries to befriend a woman who is very open about her progressive attitude toward sex. However, after he fails, he loses his cool and commits a heinous act that goes against his own traditionalist principles. ",Comedy
Little Nicky,"In a perfect world, he'd be happy to head-bang in his room all day to heavy metal music. But no, his mom is an angel, his old man is the devil, and like all good fathers, he insists that Nicky get involved in the ""family business."" Nicky could think of 666 things he'd rather be doing than corrupting souls or spewing evil, but when his father's command over Hades is threatened by his bullying older brothers, it's up to unbalanced Nicky to restore the balance between Good and Evil on earth. ",Comedy
Flubber,"Professor Philip Brainard (Robin Williams) is experimenting with new kinds of energy, and he thinks this project will save struggling Medfield College, where his girlfriend, Sara (Marcia Gay Harden), is president. But when he discovers a lively, rubber-like substance dubbed ""flubber,"" he gets so excited, he absent-mindedly misses his own wedding. Sara dumps him, so he tries to use his discovery to win her back; unfortunately, the mischievous flubber seems to have a mind of its own. ",Comedy
Police Academy 3: Back in Training,"When the governor announces the state can't afford to keep both of its police academies open, Commandant Lassard (George Gaynes) and Commandant Mauser (Art Metrano) are pitted against one another. Lassard asks some of his old cadets, including Sgt. Mahoney (Steve Guttenberg), to train the new recruits, who include high-strung Sweetchuck (Tim Kazurinsky) and loudmouthed Zed (Bobcat Goldthwait). As evaluation day approaches, each side tries to sabotage the other. ",Comedy
Popeye,"A collection of Max Fleischer cartoons, including the first two-reel Technicolor ""Popeye"" productions. ",Adventure
Rough Night,"Jess is an engaged politician who reunites with three of her college friends for a wild bachelorette weekend in Miami. The night of hard partying soon takes a hilariously dark turn when a male stripper accidentally dies at their beach house. Amid the craziness of trying to cover it up, the women ultimately find themselves becoming closer when it matters most. ",Comedy
Zookeeper,"Kindhearted Griffin Keyes (Kevin James) is one of the best-loved caretakers at the Franklin Park Zoo, but since he is more comfortable with the animals than with females of his own species, his love life is lacking. When Griffin decides that the only way to get a girlfriend is to find a more-glamorous career, the animals panic. To keep him from leaving, they reveal their secret ability to talk and offer to teach him the rules of courtship, animal style. ",Comedy
Beast,"In a small island community, a troubled young woman falls for a mysterious outsider who empowers her to escape her oppressive family. When he comes under suspicion for a series of murders, she defends him at all costs. ",Action
License to Wed,"Newly engaged couple Sadie (Mandy Moore) and Ben (John Krasinski) look forward to a traditional wedding in St. Augustine's Church but, unfortunately for the lovebirds, the Rev. Frank (Robin Williams) refuses to bless the union until they pass his arduous marriage-prep course. While the clergyman puts the couple through holy hell, Ben and Sadie learn if they are truly destined to love each other till death do them part. ",Comedy
Spy Kids 2: Island of Lost Dreams,"Now full fledged Spy Kids, Carmen (Alexa Vega) and Juni (Daryl Sabara) Cortez are back for another James Bond style adventure. Their newest mission takes them to a distant island where they take on a mysterious man and his imaginative creatures. But this time, they also have to fight the forces of rival sibling Spy Kids, Gary (Matt O'Leary) and Gerti (Emily Osment) Giggles, as they head right into a trap that will test each and every spy in the Cortez family. ",Action
Snow Dogs,"When Miami dentist Ted Brooks (Cuba Gooding Jr.) finds out that he's been named in a will, he travels to Alaska to claim his inheritance. Once he gets there, however, his dreams turn to mush: he discovers he's been left a mischievous team of sled dogs -- who have got it in for him. Making matters even worse is the crusty mountain man Thunder Jack (James Coburn), who's also got it in for the city slicker. Wanting to claim the dogs for himself, Jack urges Ted to hotfoot it back to warmer climates. ",Adventure
Sex Tape,"When Annie (Cameron Diaz) and Jay (Jason Segel) first meet, they have an instant and intense romantic connection. However, 10 years and two children later, the flames of passion have dimmed to dull embers. To bring back the spark, the couple decide to record themselves trying out every position in ""The Joy of Sex,"" which seems like a great idea at the time -- until they discover that their private recording has gone public via the Internet. ",Comedy
Meet Dave,"Dave Ming Chang (Eddie Murphy) is the ultimate fish out of water. Even though he's just arrived in New York, that doesn't explain his odd behavior or disjointed locomotion. The outside Dave is actually a spaceship, controlled by a crew of tiny aliens, and modeled after their captain. As the crew contends with a slew of physical challenges, such as eating, drinking and excreting, they begin to experience profound emotional changes as well. ",Adventure
Scary Movie 4,"Dim-witted Cindy Campbell (Anna Faris) and her sex-crazed friend, Brenda (Regina Hall), team up with cute-but-clueless Tom Ryan (Craig Bierko) to save the world from a hostile alien invasion, with hints of ""War of the Worlds,"" ""Saw II,"" ""Million Dollar Baby"" and ""The Village."" Celebrity cameos include Carmen Electra, Shaquille O'Neal, Dr. Phil McGraw, Bill Pullman, Molly Shannon and Michael Madsen. ",Comedy
A Haunted House,"Young couple Malcolm (Marlon Wayans) and Kisha (Essence Atkins) have just moved into their dream home. As they settle in, they learn that they're not alone -- not because the house is haunted, but because Kisha is possessed by a demon. Desperate to salvage his relationship -- and more importantly -- his sex life -- Malcolm hires a coterie of paranormal specialists, which includes a priest and ghost busters, to banish the unwelcome intruder from Kisha's body. ",Comedy
Tooth Fairy,"Twelve-year-old Pamela (Nicole Muñoz), vacationing with her family, is startled to learn that years earlier, the tooth fairy slaughtered children for their teeth -- and now she has returned. ",Comedy
Deck the Halls,"Steve (Matthew Broderick), suburban dad and Christmas enthusiast, finds a wrinkle in his well-ordered existence with the arrival of his new neighbor Danny (Danny DeVito). Danny has big dreams and plans to illuminate his house with enough holiday lights to make it visible from space. Not to be outdone, Steve declares a war of one-upmanship with Danny that threatens to drag the Christmas spirit through the slush. ",Comedy
Cursed,An uncertain fate awaits three young soldiers after they venture into a mysterious land and gradually start losing their minds. ,Comedy
Nothing But Trouble,Servants Stan (Stan Laurel) and Ollie (Oliver Hardy) handle a banquet for a boy king whose life is in danger. ,Comedy
Superman III,"Computer programmer Gus Gorman (Richard Pryor) is hired by financial tycoon Ross Webster (Robert Vaughn) to seize control of a weather satellite and annihilate Colombia's coffee crop. When Superman (Christopher Reeve) manages to thwart the plan, Webster commands Gorman to use the satellite to locate kryptonite, the Man of Steel's mortal weakness. But a missing unknown element in the kryptonite -- replaced by Gorman with tar -- causes an unintended side effect when presented to Superman. ",Action
Casino Royale,"After receiving a license to kill, British Secret Service agent James Bond (Daniel Craig) heads to Madagascar, where he uncovers a link to Le Chiffre (Mads Mikkelsen), a man who finances terrorist organizations. Learning that Le Chiffre plans to raise money in a high-stakes poker game, MI6 sends Bond to play against him, gambling that their newest ""00"" operative will topple the man's organization. ",Comedy
Meet the Blacks,"When some unexpected money comes his way, Carl Black (Mike Epps) moves his family from cold and windy Chicago to bright and sunny Beverly Hills, Calif. As the Blacks settle into their beautiful new home, they start to notice some strange behavior in the neighborhood. Nighttime is approaching, and President El Bama (George Lopez) announces that the annual purge is about to begin. Carl and his loved ones must now endure a 12-hour period of lawlessness before they can enjoy life once again. ",Comedy
Tammy,"For Tammy (Melissa McCarthy), a burger-joint waitress, a bad day keeps getting worse. She wrecks her car, loses her job and finds her husband in a compromising position with their neighbor. It's time for Tammy to hit the road, but without money or transportation, her options are limited. Her only choice is a road trip with her grandmother, Pearl (Susan Sarandon), who has a car, cash and an itch to see Niagara Falls. It's not the escape Tammy had in mind, but it may be what she needs. ",Comedy
Year One,"After Neanderthal hunter Zed (Jack Black) is exiled for eating forbidden fruit, he and his sardonic buddy Oh (Michael Cera) leave their village and begin an epic journey through history. The pals encounter biblical characters such as Cain (David Cross) and Abel, Abraham (Hank Azaria), and others, and wind up in Sodom. Along the way, Zed debunks commonly held beliefs and replaces them with his own delusions of grandeur. ",Comedy
Herbie Fully Loaded,"Maggie Peyton (Lindsay Lohan) wants to become a NASCAR driver but her overprotective father, Ray Peyton Sr. (Michael Keaton), won't hear of it. A former racer himself, Ray wants Maggie to take a lucrative TV sportscasting job and leave the driving to her crash-prone brother (Breckin Meyer). When Ray Sr. takes Maggie to a junkyard to pick out a car, she has no idea that the little Volkswagen Beetle -- named Herbie -- she takes home will change her life. ",Adventure
Seed of Chucky,"Gentle Glen (Billy Boyd) is a ventriloquist's dummy, the offspring of evil doll Chucky (Brad Dourif) and his doll bride (Jennifer Tilly), both of whom are now deceased. When the orphaned Glen hears that a film is being made about his parents, he goes to Hollywood and resurrects them in an attempt to get to know them better. He is horrified when Chucky and his lover embark on a new killing spree, and Chucky is equally horrified that his son has no taste for evil. ",Comedy
Boat Trip,"After Nick (Horatio Sanz) makes an insensitive remark, his travel agent decides to get some payback by sending him and his best friend, Jerry (Cuba Gooding Jr.), on a cruise for gay men. As the true nature of their situation gradually dawns on them, they start to get over their feelings of homophobia and meet potential mates. For Nick, love takes the form of a gorgeous model, Inga (Victoria Silvstedt), while Jerry develops feelings for dance instructor Gabriella (Roselyn Sánchez). ",Comedy
Black Knight,"Jamal (Martin Lawrence), an employee of the Medieval World amusement park, suffers a blow to the head and wakes up in 14th Century England. He encounters knaves, peasants, archers and a giant while showing the people some modern dance moves. Tapping into his good side, Jamal aligns with a peasant woman (Marsha Thomason) and a down and out ex-knight who are bound and determined to overthrow the evil King Leo (Kevin Conway) and his right hand man Sir Knolte (Tom Wilkinson). ",Adventure
The Flintstones,"Big-hearted, dim-witted factory worker Fred Flintstone (John Goodman) lends money to his friend Barney Rubble (Rick Moranis) so that he can adopt a baby. As thanks, Barney swaps his IQ test for Fred's during an executive search program. After getting promoted, however, Fred becomes embroiled in the dastardly scheming of his boss Cliff Vandercave (Kyle MacLachlan), who enlists his secretary, Sharon Stone (Halle Berry), to seduce Fred, angering Fred's wife, Wilma (Elizabeth Perkins). ",Comedy
Recep Ivedik,A man tries to impress his childhood lover. ,Comedy
All About Steve,"After a lovely blind date, crossword-puzzle creator Mary Horowitz (Sandra Bullock) falls head over heels in love with Steve (Bradley Cooper), a news cameraman. Mary is convinced that she and Steve are soul mates, and with the encouragement of a reporter (Thomas Haden Church), follows Steve around the country in a bid to win his love. Along the way, she befriends an assortment of misfits who accept her for who she is, leading her to reassess her reasons for this strange journey. ",Comedy
Bewitched,"Movie star Jack Wyatt (Will Ferrell) has hit a rough patch in his career. Looking to make a comeback, he signs on to play the role of Darrin in a movie version of the popular 1960s sitcom ""Bewitched."" Jack insists that an unknown is hired to play Darrin's better half, the beguiling witch-housewife Samantha, so the studio finds an up-and-comer named Isabel Bigelow (Nicole Kidman). Once shooting begins, though, Jack learns that Isabel was cast too well -- since she actually is a witch. ",Comedy
102 Dalmatians,"In this all-new tale, Cruella De Vil (Glenn Close) is released from prison on good behavior vowing that she will have nothing to do with fur ever again. She, however, cannot keep this promise and is soon plotting another ""fur-ocious"" scheme to get her ultimate Dalmatian coat. The fun and adventure shift into high gear as Cruella and the dogs romp through Paris. ",Adventure
Double Team,An international spy (Jean-Claude Van Damme) teams with a flamboyant weapons dealer (Dennis Rodman) to escape from a penal colony and save his family. ,Action
Teenage Mutant Ninja Turtles III,"Reporter April O'Neil (Paige Turco) purchases an ancient Japanese scepter that can cause those simultaneously holding it in different centuries to switch places in time. When she is transported to 16th-century Japan, her crime-fighting pals, the Teenage Mutant Ninja Turtles, pursue her. After landing in the past, the Turtles learn April has been captured by the villainous Lord Norinaga (Sab Shimono). To rescue her, they must team up with rebel leader Misu (Vivian Wu). ",Action
Junior,A black boy sees his father mistreated by police. ,Comedy
Leprechaun,"Dan O'Grady (Shay Duffin) steals 100 gold coins from a leprechaun (Warwick Davis) while on vacation in Ireland. The leprechaun follows him home, but Dan locks the murderous midget in a crate, held at bay by a four-leaf clover. Ten years later, J.D. Redding (John Sanderford) and his daughter, Tory (Jennifer Aniston), rent O'Grady's property for the summer. When their new neighbors accidentally release the leprechaun, he goes on a murderous rampage to reclaim his gold. ",Comedy
Howard the Duck,"In this film based on the comic book character, Howard the Duck is suddenly beamed from Duckworld, a planet of intelligent ducks with arms and legs, to Earth, where he lands in Cleveland. There he saves rocker Beverly (Lea Thompson) from thugs and forms a friendship with her. She introduces him to Phil (Tim Robbins), who works at a lab with scientist Dr. Jenning (Jeffrey Jones). When the doctor attempts to return Howard to his world, Jenning instead transfers an evil spirit into his own body. ",Action
Snatched,The husbands of three kidnapped women are brought into conflict when one refuses to pay a large ransom demand. ,Action
Confessions of a Teenage Drama Queen,"Mary Elizabeth Cep (Lindsay Lohan) is an ambitious teen girl who goes by the name of Lola and aspires to be a famous stage actress. Lola's dream of performing on Broadway suffers a setback when her family moves from New York City to suburban New Jersey. Determined to make the best of it, however, Lola embarks on a mission to become the most popular girl at her high school, a goal that sets her on a collision course with the catty Carla Santini (Megan Fox). ",Comedy
Freddy Got Fingered,"Gord Brody (Tom Green) is a struggling cartoonist trying to pitch an animated show to Hollywood executives. When he fails, he returns to his hometown with no choice but to live with his parents and younger brother, Freddy (Eddie Kaye Thomas). His father (Rip Torn) doesn't approve of Gord's career path, and pressures him to gain independence. As father and son exchange barbs, Gord comes up with a lie that changes everything: He claims his dad is molesting Freddy, leading to drastic consequences. ",Comedy
Thunder Force,"In a world where supervillains are commonplace, two estranged childhood best friends reunite after one devises a treatment that gives them powers to protect their city. ",Action
Grease 2,"Stephanie Zinone (Michelle Pfeiffer) is the leader of Rydell High School's Pink Ladies, a gang of girls who are counterparts of the school's group of greasers called the T-Birds. Stephanie is tired of her relationship with top T-Bird Johnny Nogerelli (Adrian Zmed), so she breaks up with him and quickly catches the eye of English exchange student Michael Carrington (Maxwell Caulfield). Hoping to win her over, Michael tries to overcome his nerdy ways while holding off the jealous Johnny. ",Comedy
Nutty Professor II: The Klumps,"Professor Sherman Klump (Eddie Murphy) is getting married. And the Klump family could not be more delighted. His fiancee Denise (Janet Jackson) is thrilled to become a Klump, and with her appetite she'll fit right in. But Buddy Love ... well, Buddy is another matter. ",Comedy
Movie 43,"Twelve directors, including Peter Farrelly, Griffin Dunne and Brett Ratner, contributed to this collection of outrageous spoofs and stories. A seemingly perfect man has an unusual blemish on his neck in ""The Catch."" Superheroes attend a speed-dating event in ""Robin's Big Speed Date."" Two people on a blind date try to break the ice by playing ""Truth or Dare."" Other stories include ""iBabe,"" ""The Proposition,"" ""Beezel"" and ""Victory's Glory."" ",Comedy
Cinderella,"With a wicked stepmother (Eleanor Audley) and two jealous stepsisters (Rhoda Williams, Lucille Bliss) who keep her enslaved and in rags, Cinderella (Ilene Woods) stands no chance of attending the royal ball. When her fairy godmother (Verna Felton) appears and magically transforms her reality into a dream come true, Cinderella enchants the handsome Prince Charming at the ball, but must face the wrath of her enraged stepmother and sisters when the spell wears off at midnight. ",Comedy
Spy Kids 3: Game Over,"Pint-sized kid spy Juni Cortez (Daryl Sabara) faces his biggest challenge yet when he confronts the Toymaker (Sylvester Stallone), a ruthless villain sentenced to virtual prison by the Organization of Super Spies. The Toymaker has captured Juni's sister, OSS agent Carmen (Alexa Vega), and is holding her inside a virtual reality environment called ""Game Over."" Now Juni must use his cunning to advance to the nearly impossible ""Level Five"" in order to rescue his sister. ",Action
Norbit,"Mild-mannered Norbit (Eddie Murphy) has always had it rough, since the day he was left abandoned at a combination Chinese restaurant and orphanage. Recently forced to marry the shrewish glutton Rasputia, he is at wit's end. Then his childhood sweetheart, Kate (Thandie Newton), moves back to town, and he tries to figure out a way back to his true love. ",Comedy
Street Fighter,"Martial arts master Terry Tsurugi (Sonny Chiba) may be an assassin-for-hire, but when he hears of a plot to kidnap Sarai (Doris Nakajima), the daughter of a dead billionaire, he offers her protection. As he attempts to keep Sarai safe, he also deals with a pair of siblings who refuse to pay up after Terry helps their convicted brother escape from prison. But it's Sarai's life he cares about, so when the mobsters manage to steal her away, Terry will battle whoever gets in his way to rescue her. ",Action
Piranha 3DD,"Though it was once a wholesome, family-oriented attraction, a water park owned by Chet (David Koechner) now features a nudist pool and aquatic strippers. Chet's daughter, a marine biologist named Maddy (Danielle Panabaker), is unhappy about the changes but is powerless to stop the grand reopening. However, when a school of ravenous, prehistoric piranha migrate over from nearby Lake Victoria, Maddy must somehow prevent the park's patrons from becoming fish food. ",Comedy
The Adventures of Pluto Nash,"""Pluto Nash"" is an action comedy set on the moon in the year 2087, starring Eddie Murphy as the title character, an audacious nightclub owner who finds himself in hot water when he refuses to sell his club to the local mob. The lunar gangsters are helping the mysterious Rex Crater mastermind a plan to take over the moon. ",Action
Spice World,"Hang on to your knickers, pump up your platforms and fasten your seat belts, because the Spice Girls - Emma Bunton (Baby Spice), Geri Halliwell (Ginger Spice), Melanie Brown (Scary Spice), Melanie Chisholm (Sporty Spice) and Victoria Addams (Posh Spice) - are taking center stage in their feature film debut ""Spice World,"" a roller coaster ride which will spice up your life and open your eyes very wide! ",Comedy
Scary Movie 5,"Much bizarre activity follows after a husband (Simon Rex) and wife (Ashley Tisdale) bring their newborn infant home from the hospital. When they realize that a demon is stalking their family, they consult paranormal specialists and install numerous cameras to drive out the pesky spirit. Movies that are spoofed in the familiar format include the ""Paranormal Activity"" franchise, ""Mama,"" ""Sinister,"" ""Evil Dead,"" ""Inception,"" ""Black Swan"" and ""Rise of the Planet of the Apes."" ",Comedy
Vampires Suck,"Becca, an angst-ridden teenager, is torn between two supernatural suitors: vampire Edward and werewolf Jacob. However, she must find a way to evade her controlling father, who treats her like a helpless child. Meanwhile, her friends contend with their own romantic issues, leading to a confrontation at the prom. ",Comedy
Dumb and Dumberer: When Harry Met Lloyd,"After years of homeschooling, dim-bulb teen Harry Dunne (Derek Richardson) finally makes the leap to public school and meets the equally intellectually challenged Lloyd Christmas (Eric Christian Olsen). The duo land in a ""special needs"" class created by Principal Collins (Eugene Levy) in order to bilk money from parents to fund his condo in Waikiki, Hawaii. His corruption is discovered by Jessica (Rachel Nichols), a fellow student who asks Harry and Lloyd to help her prove Collins' guilt. ",Comedy
Celal ile Ceren,"Realizing that bachelorhood isn't for him, a man tries to win back his ex-lover. ",Comedy
Troll 2,"When young Joshua (Michael Stephenson) learns that he will be going on vacation with his family to a small town called Nilbog, he protests adamantly. He is warned by the spirit of his deceased grandfather that goblins populate the town. His parents, Michael (George Hardy) and Diana (Margo Prey), dismiss his apprehensions, but soon learn to appreciate their son's warnings. Guided by his grandfather's ghost, will Joshua and his family stand a chance in fighting off these evil beings? ",Comedy
Meet the Spartans,"When Xerxes (Ken Davitian), the evil god king of Persia, sends his massive army to Sparta, King Leonidas (Sean Maguire) and 13 strapping warriors rise up to defend their homeland. Leonidas, Captain (Kevin Sorbo) and the rest face down dancing Persians, bad punch-lines and celebrity look-alikes. ",Comedy
Epic Movie,"Four adult orphans (Kal Penn, Adam Campbell, Faune Chambers, Jayma Mays) have an incredible adventure in a spoof of blockbuster and fantasy films. They visit a bizarre confectioner's chocolate factory and enter a mythic realm in which they must help a wise but lusty lion rid the land of a witchy woman. ",Adventure
Son of the Mask,"A cartoonist and family man, Tim Avery (Jamie Kennedy) lives a peaceful existence with his wife, Tonya (Traylor Howard), as well as their infant son and dog. When the curious canine finds a mask with mystical properties, both dog and baby create chaos with its powers. While Tim and Tonya try to contain the damage, the sly Norse god Loki (Alan Cumming) comes looking for the artifact, resulting in more mishaps that ultimately incur the wrath of the deity's powerful father, Odin (Bob Hoskins). ",Comedy
Disaster Movie,"During a fateful night, a group of impossibly attractive 20-somethings (Matt Lanter, Vanessa Minnillo, Kim Kardashian) must dodge a series of man-made and natural disasters. Twisters, asteroids, earthquakes and singer Amy Winehouse are just some of the perils they face while trying to make their way to safety. ",Comedy
From Justin to Kelly,"In this musical, college student Justin (Justin Guarini) arrives in Fort Lauderdale, Fla., for spring break with his friends Brandon (Greg Siff) and Eddie (Brian Dietzen), and quickly crosses paths with waitress Kelly (Kelly Clarkson). Although Justin falls for Kelly almost instantly, Kelly's jealous friend, Alexa (Katherine Bailess), tries her best to keep the two apart. With the help of several song-and-dance numbers, however, Justin and Kelly eventually connect and make sweet music together. ",Comedy
